© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report on the possibility of tuning the martensitic transition temperature in Ni2FeGa Heusler alloys prepared in the form of glass coated microwires. Glass-coated microwires with different valence electron concentration (e/a) and possible structural transformation in the temperature range from 100 K to 400 K have been prepared (Ni51+xFe22-xGa27; x = 0, 2, 4). Magnetic and electrical resistance measurements demonstrated a linear dependence of structural transformation temperature on valence electron concentration TT(e/a). In order to prove the correctness of the TT(e/a) dependence, a glass-coated microwire with the transformation temperature 310 K (human body temperature) was selected, prepared and experimentally investigated. The effect on magnetocaloric response is also shown. Our theoretical prediction together with the experimental results point to the fact that the e/a parameter is the key parameter for transition temperature tuning in Ni2FeGa Heusler-based glass-coated microwires.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Pressure variations of the Curie temperature of the 5f ferromagnet β-UH3 were studied using the Mo-alloyed hydride (UH3)0.82Mo0.18, which is stable in air and has very similar TC and magnetization per U atom. By means of ac magnetic susceptibility a linear decrease of TC was observed for pressures up to 3.2 GPa. The coefficient dTC/dp = −2.05 K/GPa gives dlnTC/dp = 1/T*dTC/dp ≈ −0.011 GPa−1. This value is smaller than expected for a 5f-band ferromagnet with relatively short U-U distances and suggests that UH3 may be more localized than expected. Among AnX compounds, similar dependence was found e.g. for US. Revisiting existing data on lattice elasticity for β-UH3, bulk modulus B ≈ 100 GPa can be assumed, leading to dlnTC/dlnV = 1.1. Experimental data are confronted with results of GGA + U electronic structure calculations. Plausible values of direct Coulomb U and Hund's exchange J are deduced. The lattice compression was found to reduce predominantly the orbital moments.© 2020We observed abnormal threshold voltage (VT) shift in amorphous InGaZnO (a-IGZO) thin-film transistors under negative gate bias stress (NBS) after soaking them in H2O (pH 8). Before NBS, we soaked a-IGZO TFTs in H2O. During application of NBS, VT decreased by −0.43 V, then increased to nearly the initial value. We hypothesize that the electrical field that was applied during NBS caused some dissociation of H2O to hydrogen ions (H+) and hydroxide ions (OH−); the effects between H+ and OH− are responsible for the changes of ΔVT. The initial decrease was a result of trapping of H+ at the front channel; the subsequent increase was caused by neutralization of the H+ and the OH−; the a-IGZO was very thin, so the front channel and the back channel could affect each other; therefore, mitigation of energy band bending was possible. Recovery after NBS also occurred in two-phases: VT first increased then decreased to its initial value. During the recovery process, accumulation of an OH− layer generated electric field that attracted H+ so that the two species recombined. Increase in ΔVT occurred due to desorption of H+ from the front-channel interface, and decrease in ΔVT occurred by recombination.© 2020 Elsevier LtdConventional Hall effect devices are designed to respond to a single magnetic field component in 3D space. However, if plastic encapsulated Hall effect devices in cubic crystals are exposed to poorly defined and unstable mechanical shear stress, small portions of unwanted, perpendicular magnetic field components will show up in the Hall output signals. Mathematically, any such crosstalk – may it originate from mechanical stress or not – can be expressed as a Taylor series in powers of the magnetic field. The even powers are the well known planar Hall effect at zero mechanical stress. In practice powers of even order are irrelevant, because they are eliminated by the widely used spinning current schemes. In this paper we address the odd powers of the magnetic crosstalk and their drift versus mechanical stress. The effect is small for Hall plates but large for Vertical Hall devices in (1 0 0)-silicon. It is fully described by piezo-resistance and piezo-Hall tensors. We present results of numerical simulations and measurements. Thin devices are less affected than thick devices. If magnetic angle sensors are made of Vertical Hall devices, in-plane shear stress leads to small orthogonality errors. This article lays the foundations for compensation circuits to eliminate such shear-stress induced orthogonality errors.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe triboelectric nanogenerator (TENG) based on the contact-electrification and electrostatic induction are attractive for the abundant application in many disciplines. To explore the practical application of TENG devices, we firstly reported a novel TENG based on the white sugar (WS-TENG) to harvest mechanical energy, and simultaneously, which can also serve as the self-powered humidity sensor due to the essential hydrophilic property of white sugar molecules. In this work, the polytetrafluoroethylene (PTFE) film and white sugar play the role of triboelectric parts. Moreover, the electrical output of WS-TENG involved in the short-circuit current (Isc) and open-circuit voltage (Voc) can get to 6.35 µA and 95.68 V, respectively. The fabricated WS-TENG has good long-term durability and reliability. According to the experimental results, the self-powered humidity sensor based on the WS-TENG can reflect the humidity change of the environment. The current research could effectively promote the practical application of TENG devices.© 2020 Elsevier LtdPattern-recessed ohmic contacts are investigated for InAlGaN/GaN high-electron-mobility transistors (HEMTs). Periodically-recessed patterns are introduced in the source and drain contact area to achieve the lower contact resistance by making sidewall contact as well as top contact on the active mesa. The lowest ohmic contact resistance (Rc) of 0.19 Ω·mm is achieved. It is significantly lower than the contact resistance of 0.29 Ω·mm, which is obtained from the conventional ohmic contact without recessed pattern. When the proposed ohmic contact scheme is introduced in 3-μm-long gate HEMTs, the on-resistance and the maximum transconductance are improved from 2.41 Ω·mm and 320 mS/mm to 2.24 Ω·mm and 332 mS/mm, respectively. The unity current gain cut-off frequency (fT) and the maximum oscillation frequency (fmax) of the device is increased from 2.78 and 10.05 GHz to 2.97 and 10.65 GHz, respectively.© 2020Recently, negative capacitance (NC) effect in the dielectric/ferroelectric (DE/FE) bilayer system has received significant attention due to its potential in achieving sub- 60 mV/decade subthreshold swing in FETs as well as extremely large capacitance density in dynamic random-access memory (DRAM). However, such reports, to date, are primarily based on conventional perovskite FE materials which are not compatible with the present CMOS technology. Herein, we study the interfacial charge density (σi)and negative capacitance (NC) effect in CMOS compatible Hf-Zr-Al-O (DE) /Hf0.5Zr0.5O2 (FE) bilayer system. The DE layer of various thicknesses (5–20 Å) was deposited on the top of FE layer (100 Å) and the DE layer thickness was found to play a crucial role in determiningσi. The NC effect in the aforesaid DE/FE system was suppressed due to the contribution of σi. The σiat the interface of the DE layer and FE layer was found to be in the range of −0.57 Cm−2 to −0.18 Cm−2 for the DE thickness range of 5–20 Å.© 2020 Elsevier LtdA systematic method for the verification of high frequency measurement (up-to 500 GHz) of silicon germanium heterojunction bipolar transistor (SiGe HBT) is proposed. First of all, the method involves an accurate estimation of the effects of passive environment on the overall measurement by a detailed electro-magnetic (EM) simulation. This ensures that the complete measurement environment like probes, pads and access lines along with the appropriate layouts are precisely included in the EM simulation framework. In order to additionally include the active device like SiGe HBTs, technology computer aided design (TCAD) tool is used to simulate the device S-parameters. TCAD simulation results are fed into an EM-plus-SPICE simulation framework to emulate a complete on-wafer measurement environment. The final simulation results show appreciable correlation with the on-wafer measurement data up-to 500 GHz.© 2020 Elsevier LtdDue to their excellent photo-to-electric power conversion efficiency (PCE) (up to 25.2%) under AM 1.5G (≈100,000 Lux), the perovskite solar cells (PSCs) have received widespread attention in recent years, but the research on their weak light (0–1000 Lux) performances is still rare. So, the effect factors of their weak light performances were explored in this work. According to the results, the PSCs with higher shunt resistance (Rsh) exhibit better weak light performances. The PSCs with low Rsh exhibit a significant weak diode leakage mechanism, and thus their output characteristics would decrease seriously with the decrease of light intensity. This work provides constructive guidelines for improving the weak light performances of PSCs.© 2020 Elsevier LtdFor pragmatic utilizations of field-effect transistors (FETs), the control of threshold voltage (Vth) is significant for sensing applications as various sensors and circuits require distinctive electrical characteristics. Moreover, the controllable threshold voltage is essential for creating integrated circuits (IC). The threshold voltage of a TFT is sensitive to numerous factors, which make it alluring for sensing applications. However, its estimation is not simple, particularly when mobility is field-dependent and source/drain resistances are noteworthy. Precise control of the threshold voltage in organic FETs also remains challenging. Conventionally, for an organic transistor threshold voltage is typically an empirical parameter that is obtained by fitting the experimental current–voltage transfer characteristics, which is temperamental as it relies upon the range of the gate bias. However, the turn-on voltage of a transistor is not affected from these downsides and therefore suggests an alternative that can be used for sensing applications. Customary, measurement of on-state voltage requires the estimation of current in the subthreshold region and its extrapolation at the voltage axis, which it is normally not utilized. The present work analyzes the threshold voltage extracted using differential and conventional methods and the turn-on voltage extracted using the floating probe technique which is straightforward and requires the estimation of voltage at the floating terminal as the source voltage is linearly sloped while sustaining gate voltage constant. Two-dimensional numerical simulation results are introduced to support that the floating probe procedure yields reliable parameters than the threshold voltage and subsequently can be suitably used for sensing applications. Experimental results obtained with pentacene based top-contact organic TFT's (OTFTs) are also shown to delineate the proposed idea.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIt is important to characterize the distribution of spatial traps in the MOS structure for separating the interface states from the subgap density-of-states. In this study, we report a characterization technique for the spatial distribution of traps using the C-V characteristics under deep-depletion bias. Depletion capacitance is determined by the depletion depth (Xd) and the dielectric constant with the MOS structure. Thus, the distribution of spatial depletion charges can be identified if only the depletion capacitance can be separated from the measured gate capacitance. In the case of MOS structure with spatial traps in the element, it will show a deviated characteristic from the ideal depletion capacitance. Therefore, this allows us to characterize the spatial distribution of traps in MOS structures. The spatial distribution of traps from a single crystal silicon MOS capacitor was extracted Ntrap,max = 3.45 × 1018 cm−3 ass the maximum value in the interface, indicating that the concentration tends to decrease more in the substrate direction.© 2020 Elsevier LtdWe have investigated the effects of a silicon nitride (SiNx) passivation process using plasma-enhanced chemical vapor deposition (PECVD) on a ultra-thin-barrier AlGaN/GaN heterostructure field-effect transistors (HFETs). The bulk charge characteristics of the PECVD SiNx films were dependent on the film deposition conditions, which strongly influenced the sheet resistance (Rsh) and flat-band voltage characteristics of AlGaN/GaN HFETs. The reduction in Rsh is a strong function of the amount of positive bulk charges in the SiNx passivation film. An optimized PECVD SiNx process was used to drastically decrease the Rsh from 45,450 Ω/sq to 732 Ω/sq. A Mo/Au Schottky-gate device fabricated with PECVD SiNx passivation exhibited a maximum drain current density of 172 mA/mm, quasi-normally-off operation, and breakdown voltage of > 1100 V© 2020 Elsevier LtdProcessing techniques for the thickness-controlled layer separation of a single-crystalline semiconductor have been actively developed for manufacturing complementary metal–oxide–semiconductor (CMOS)-technology-based flexible devices. A mechanical separation process for thin semiconductor layers, called the spalling technique, has recently attracted much attention because of its process simplicity, thickness controllability, and kerf-less layer separation. In this paper, we show that the thickness of separated device layers and the residual stress in the layers are critical factors to determine the performance of flexible CMOS devices fabricated with the spalling process. We investigated the electrical characteristics of flexible field-effect transistors (FETs) and CMOS inverters under various stress conditions. The results show that the excessive stress induced in the device layers can cause a severe performance mismatch between n- and p-channel FETs that results in the malfunction of flexible silicon CMOS devices. In addition, we verified that the unrelaxed stress remaining in the device layer after the spalling/transfer process is a major factor degrading the CMOS performance. The results also show that the residual stress induced by the spalling/transfer process as well as the external stress by mechanical bending are significantly dependent on the thickness of the separated device layers.© 2020 Elsevier LtdTCAD modelling of InGaAs channel MOSFETs is a complex task due to the combined effect of quantization and interface or border traps, which affect the device electrostatics as well as the electron mobility through Coulomb scattering. In addition, trap distributions and mobility are strain-dependent. In this paper, we start from a microscopic physical approach, based on the use of Sentaurus SBand by Synopsys as 1D Schrödinger-Poisson solver and mobility calculator through the Kubo-Greenwood (KG) approach, to end up with a TCAD modelling framework that combines the Density Gradient (DG) model for quantum corrections with simple empirical expressions for the mobility model. Only the long-channel (or low-field) mobility is addressed. A distinctive feature of the paper is the use of experimental Hall electron density and mobility data as a reference for the calibration of interface traps and scattering rates in SBand. SBand simulation results for different strain levels and layer thicknesses are then used as the basis for the TCAD model calibration (DG and mobility). Our findings indicate that strain can increase mobility mainly through the reduction of Coulomb scattering with trapped charge.© 2020This paper demonstrates the design strategy in the self-aligned quantum-well InAs MOSFETs with T-shape S/D. A 2-D TCAD simulation is performed based on the experimental data. The effect of air gap between the T-shape metal contacts is taken into account. It is found that the fringing effects induced by the air gap has significant impacts on both DC and RF performances. Further study is carried out based on this TCAD simulation platform. The channel extension region, which is simply considered as part of series resistances, needs to be properly designed to maximize fT and fMAX. RF performances can't be further improved even if the gate length is aggressively scaled down. However, the reduction of contact resistance can improve fT and fMAX without any limitations. This contact resistance reduction can be realized by incorporating the additional annealing process in the self-aligned gate-last T-S/D process.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents an accurate, comprehensive and physics-based aging compact model for stress-induced degradation due to hot-carrier generation and oxide trapping in advanced complementary NPN and PNP SiGe HBTs. The analytical model equations are derived from the solution of reaction–diffusion theory and Fick's law of diffusion combined with oxide trapping mechanism under accelerated stress conditions. The model accuracy has been validated against results from long-term aging tests performed close to the safe-operating-areas of an advanced complementary 0.25 µm BiCMOS technology. Degradation asymmetry observed between NPN and PNP devices is accurately captured by this unified aging compact model. This study highlights the challenges of predicting degradation of complementary circuits and thereby improving its functionalities by designing better-matched NPN and PNP HBTs.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe depth profiles of aluminum (Al) ion implantation on 4H-SiC epilayers with implantation energy range from 90 keV to above 1 MeV have been studied. The SIMS profiles show that the channeling effect is significantly reduced as the energy increases. This is attributed to the dechanneling effects due to the introduction of interstitial type defects created by preceding implanting ions under high-implantion energy and high-dose level conditions. We compare experimental data with simulation results based on SRIM™ program and Sentaurus™ Monte Carlo (MC) model. The SRIM simulation shows good agreement with the experimental profiles around the projected range, but could not reproduce the channeling tails of the profiles. The calibrated sentaurus MC model can show good agreement with the experimental profiles of projected range and channeling. The effect of tilt angle and implantation temperature on the channeling in the calibrated sentaurus MC model is also studied.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this work, the use of sublimated copper phthalocyanine (CuPc) organic thin films as a buffer interlayer in aluminum tracks on paper is presented for the first time. The CuPc was synthetized using a new eco-friendly synthetic protocol and the higher purity of the product turn out to be useful for the set forth applications. With the use of the CuPc buffer interlayer it is possible to enable paper substrates as printed circuit boards and as dielectric material for flexible electronic devices. The connectivity of the aluminum tracks was evaluated when the paper substrate is bent several times and after ten months of storage at ambient conditions. In addition, the aluminum tracks exhibit reliable current driving capabilities to turn-on a LED device. Finally, the fabrication of a hybrid touch sensor on paper is demonstrated.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this study, ZnO and CdS deposited ZnO nanostructured material was successfully synthesized by using co-precipitation and ultra-sonication methods, respectively. A comparative study of the sensitization of ZnO and nanostructured ZnO/CdS with two different dyes (carminic acid and pyrocatechol violet) and applications of the synthesized material in solid state dye sensitized solar cells (DSSCs) are reported here. The characterization of the materials was performed by using x-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), UV–visible spectroscopy, and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR). The SEM and TEM results showed that surface of ZnO nano spheres is well covered with CdS. UV–visible spectrum showed the rise of a new optical band due to CdS deposition which effectively tuned the band gap of ZnO from 3.12 eV to 1.877 eV. XRD analysis revealed the successful formation of hexagonal phases of CdS and ZnO. The materials were applied as photoanodes in DSSCs with and without dye sensitization. P3HT (Poly (3-hexylthiophene) was used as a hole conducting polymer. CdS deposition and sensitization with different dyes showed a significant effect on the overall efficiency of fabricated devices. The ZnO/CdS based DSSC sensitized with carminic acid showed a current density (Jsc) of 8.72 mA/cm2 with an open circuit voltage (Voc) of 0.43 V and an overall efficiency of 1.42%. While the same photoanode material sensitized with pyrocatechol violet gave Jsc value of 9.13 mA/cm2 with a Voc of 0.39 V and an overall efficiency of 1.55%.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the superlattice-like V2O5/Ge8Sb92 films are studied. Compared with Ge8Sb92 film, V2O5/Ge8Sb92 films have a high crystallization temperature (~233 °C), a large amorphous resistance (~3.4 × 107 Ω) and good data retention temperature (~171.2 °C) for ten years. The volume change rate of V2O5/Ge8Sb92 superlattice-like film is only 1.855% during the crystallization, which can guarantee a better contact with the electrode when it is applied in the phase-change memory. By adding of V2O5 interlayers, the thermal stability and reliability of Ge8Sb92 film have been greatly improved.© 2020 Elsevier LtdStraightforward contact resistance extraction methods based on electrical device characteristics are described and applied here to graphene field-effect transistors from different technologies. The methods are an educated adaptation of extraction procedures originally developed for conventional transistors by exploiting the drift–diffusion-like transport in graphene devices under certain bias conditions. In contrast to other available approaches for contact resistance extraction of graphene transistors, the practical methods used here do not require either the fabrication of dedicated test structures or internal device phenomena characterization. The methodologies are evaluated with simulation-based data and applied to fabricated devices. The extracted values are close to the ones obtained with other more intricate methodologies. Bias-dependent contact and channel resistances studies, bias-dependent high-frequency performance studies and contact engineering studies are enhanced and evaluated by the extracted contact resistance values.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe modern electronic devices have been scaled down significantly. The scaling rules would dictate higher doping concentrations which lead us to consider the degeneracy in the calculations. One of the semiconductor device quantities that would be impacted by considering the degeneracy is the Einstein Relation. The commonly used formula of Einstein Relation assumes that it is constant and independent of doping. The doping-independent Einstein Relation would cause serious inaccuracy in the calculations. This paper offers a closed-form solution fordoping-dependent Einstein Relation. The proposed expression employs approximations of Fermi-Dirac Integrals (FDI) needed in the Einstein Relation. The quality and accuracy of the proposed approximations have been determined.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.It is pointed out that some mistakes in research article (Chang, Liang, et al., 2018). There were existing mistakes in the conception, theoretical analysis method and conclusion of loss separation. I have shown that authors to obtained conflict between the experimental data and theoretical analysis conclusion. There were existing serious mistakes in the experimental data measurement in the article. Loss per cycle versus frequency curves for effective permeability μe = 60 of Fe-Si powder core are plotted as a correction. The rate of hysteresis loss power in power loss (Ph/Pt) at different magnetic flux densities and frequencies for effective permeability μe = 60 of Fe-Si powder core is demonstrated.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The first-principles calculations have been used to study the effects of Cu addition on the martensitic transition and magnetic properties of Ni24Mn17−xIn7Cux (x = 0–5) alloys. The phase stability and martensitic transformation sequence were determined according to the formation energies of the austenite (A), 6-layer modulated martensite (6M) and non-modulated martensite (NM) phases with ferromagnetic (FM) or ferrimagnetic (FIM) state. The doped Cu atoms tend to occupy the excess Mn sites. When x = 1, the martensitic transformation sequence is FA → FIM 6M → FIM NM; while FA → (FM 6M) → FIM NM for 2 ≤ x ≤ 3; and FA → (FM 6M) → FM NM for x ≥ 4. The magnetostructural coupling characteristics can be found with 1 ≤ x ≤ 3. The variation of the magnetic properties for the FA, 6M and NM phases was discussed in detail from the perspective of the electronic density of states (DOS).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.With the increasing demand for high-frequency electronic devices in wide applications, microwave absorption materials of GHz have attracted extensive attention. In this paper, a new method is provided for quantitative analysis of energy dissipation in the microwave absorption materials. The loss of electromagnetic energy in absorbers can be strictly classified into only two types: magnetic and dielectric loss, and the ratios of the two losses with respect to incident microwave intensity can be accurately evaluated. Moreover, different materials were analyzed with the new method. Notably, both magnetic loss and dielectric loss were found to be important in Sm1.5Y0.5Fe16.5Si0.5/paraffin composite, which can consume up to 88% and 78% of the incident microwave energy under certain conditions, respectively. The fascinating combination of the magnetic loss and the dielectric loss well explained the peculiar two or three peaks in the reflection loss (RL) curves. This analysis method can be a powerful supplement for current theories to explain the microwave absorption property of materials, thus providing a new perspective for the design of high-performance absorption materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have demonstrated enhancement of the spin-charge current interconversion by oxidation of rhenium (Re). Although amorphous rhenium oxide (ReOX) is electrically conductive, the spin–orbit torque efficiency measured by spin-torque ferromagnetic resonance is 0.074, and 37 times larger than the pure Re case whose amplitude is 0.002. Furthermore, we have also found that the values of the damping-like and field-like torque efficiencies are 0.030 and −0.052, respectively. These values are comparable with those for conventional spin–orbit materials such as Pt or Ta, suggesting that ReOX is a candidate material for spintronics devices. THz-time domain spectroscopy was performed to confirm the inverse spin-charge current conversion process in ReOX.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The influence of Nb content on the primary recrystallization microstructure, crystallographic texture and magnetic properties of grain-oriented silicon steel manufactured by low-temperature slab reheating were studied. The results show that the effect of grain refining was enhanced with the increase of Nb content. With the increase of Nb content, the total contents of texture {1 1 1}〈1 1 2〉 and {1 1 4}〈4 8 1〉 in primary recrystallization which are beneficial to the secondary recrystallization increased, but the contents of deviated Goss component and adverse textures with abnormal growth ability in primary recrystallization also increased, which led to the deterioration of magnetic properties. By adding 0.005% Nb, the average size of the primary grain reduced to 23 μm, the content of {1 1 0}〈1 1 2〉 increased slightly and the least deviated Goss nuclei were obtained, therefore the final product had the sharpest {1 1 0}〈0 0 1〉 texture of secondary recrystallization and the best magnetic properties with B800 = 1.873 T, P1.7/50 = 1.21 W/kg.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt-based nanoparticles directly synthesized on conductive substrates through electrodeposition find application in a broad range of scientific and technological fields.The capability to characterize both morphological parameters (e.g., shape, size, structure, and numerical density per unit of area) and magnetic properties (e.g., magnetic moment, saturation magnetization, or coercivity) directly on the substrate on which they are grown is fundamental for many of those applications. In this work, we report on the use of magnetic force microscopy (MFM) to characterize Co-based nanoparticles synthesized through electrodeposition on Al substrates using two different counter electrodes, i.e., Co and Pt. Morphological analysis using AFM and scanning electron microscopy (SEM) was used to assess differences in size and number density of the nanoparticles obtained using the two counter electrodes, while MFM was employed to measure the remanent magnetization of single isolated nanoparticles, to asses the presence of a nonmagnetic shell on the nanoparticles and to estimate their thickness.© 2020 Elsevier LtdZnO thin-film transistors (TFTs) with scaled channel lengths of 10 μm, 5 μm, 4 μm, and 2 μm exhibit increasing intrinsic channel electron mobility at a gate bias of 10 V (15 V) from 0.782 cm2/Vs (0.83 cm2/Vs) in the 10 μm channel length TFT to 8.9 cm2/Vs (19.04 cm2/Vs) for the channel length scaled down to 2 μm. Current-voltage measurements indicate an n-type channel enhancement mode transistor operation, with threshold voltages in the range of 8.4 V to 5.3 V, maximum drain currents of 41 μA/μm, 96 μA/μm, 193 μA/μm, and 214 μA/μm at a gate bias of 10 V, and breakdown voltages of 80 V, 70 V, 62 V, and 59 V with respect to channel lengths of 10 μm, 5 μm, 4 μm, and 2 μm. The channel electron mobility (excluding contact resistance) is extracted by the transmission line method (TLM) from the effective electron mobility (including contact resistance). The contact sheet resistance of4.6×105Ω/sq extracted from the measurements, which is 3.5× larger than the contact sheet resistance of 1.3×105Ω/sq obtained from the DFT calculation and the 1D self-consistent Poisson-Shrödinger simulation, largely limits the drive current in the scaled ZnO TFTs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Analytic solutions of the Weiss mean field equation are obtained using an approximant of the inverse Langevin function. These solutions provide temperature dependencies of the magnetization and the magnetic susceptibility typical of the classical Weiss mean field model. It is interesting that the approximate cubic equation, studied in the work, is very close to that derived by the differentiation of the exact Weiss mean field equation. These equations coincide in the low temperature limit.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We reported in this Letter the high-temperature (high-T) lattice stability and low-temperature (low-T) multiferroicity of GdMn2O5 by performing first-principles density functional theory (DFT) calculations. We show that the high-T paramagnetic structure should be denoted as an uncommon superparaelectric state, and that the low-T multiferroic phase shows a multiple-valued electric polarization depending on the combination of spin order and high-T polar structure. It is the multiple-valued polarization in the low-T phase that leads to an unusual tunability of multiferroicity in GdMn2O5 by the electric-poling-sequence. In addition, our results demonstrate the dominant role of Mn-Mn exchange striction in determining the large type-II multiferroicity, while the effect of Gd-Mn exchange striction is small. Our present work may offer an effective strategy for superior magnetoelectric effects in type-II multiferroics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The influence of various dopants such as (Sn, Sb, Te, Pb, Ti, V, Cr, Mn, Co, and Ni) on the electronic and magnetic properties of asymmetric washboard (aW) phase bismuthene was explored by using density functional theory (DFT). The results indicate the formation of a chemical bond between the dopants and Bi atoms, due to the large binding energies and strong orbital hybridization. According to the total density states (TDOS) results by PBE and PBE + HSE method, we noted that bismuthene was transferred from semiconductor to be metallic, expect for the Sb-doped bismuthene (Sb-Bi) owns a small value of bandgap., The bandgap of Sb-Bi was increased to be 0.28 eV and the Cr-doped system was changed to semiconductor by considering the interaction of spin–orbit couplings (SOC). Moreover, our results also specified that V-, Cr-, Mn-doped aW-phase bismuthene appeared in various magnetic characteristics, which was mainly contributed by the d-orbital of dopant. Moreover, our results indicate that Cr-doped system presents anti-ferromagnetic (AFM) order, but V- and Mn-doped systems appear ferromagnetic (FM) state. These results also endorse that the electronic structures and magnetic characteristics of aW-phase bismuthene can be efficiently modified by doping.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated in detail the structural, magnetic, and dielectric properties of half-doped Nd0.5Ba0.5CoO3 perovskite cobaltite synthesized by the auto-combustion method. The Rietveld structure refinement from X-ray diffraction pattern reveals that a polycrystalline sample of Nd0.5Ba0.5CoO3 crystallizes into an orthorhombically distorted crystal structure with space group Pmmm along with a minor distorted tetragonal phase with P4/mmm space group. The temperature dependence of magnetization measurements show paramagnetic to ferromagnetic phase transition at Curie temperature TC around 147 K for H = 200 Oe. The value of TC strongly depends on the applied magnetic bias field, and TC decreases with an increasing magnetic field. The polycrystalline sample of Nd0.5Ba0.5CoO3 cobaltite exhibits Griffiths’ phase in the temperature range 147 K ≤ T ≤ 235 K for H = 200 Oe. Investigation of the isothermal magnetic field measurements on Nd0.5Ba0.5CoO3 reveals that it exhibit antiferromagnetic, ferromagnetic and paramagnetic behaviors, at T = 2 K, 100 K and 150 K, respectively. The negative slope of the isothermal Arrott's plots (i.e., H/M versus M2) in the low magnetic field region suggests a first-order magnetic phase transition while the positive slope in high magnetic field region reveals a second-order magnetic transition. The dielectric constant and electrical resistivity of the synthesized Nd0.5Ba0.5CoO3 cobaltite material decrease with increasing temperature as well as frequency. Bulk Nd0.5Ba0.5CoO3 cobaltite shows insulator/semiconductor to metal transition at 76 °C.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The properties of RE-rich phase have important effects on the process and magnetic properties of NdFeB magnets. In this work, two MQ powders with different compositions were employed to fabricate hot pressed and hot-deformed magnets. The hot-deformed magnets produced from MQP-01 powders with Pr containing and Zr/Nb-free composition exhibit lower coercivity and less pinning effect compared to those from MQP-02 powders with Pr-free and Zr/Nb-containing composition, though the former has high rare earth (RE) content. These differences are attributed to the different mobilities of the RE-rich phase in the grain boundaries due to the composition difference. The RE-rich phase in MQP-01 powders has relatively good mobility, which leads to the aggregation of RE-rich phase and the open recoil loops for deformed magnets. On the contrary, relatively poor mobility of RE-rich phase in MQP-02 powders results in the thick and continuously distributed grain boundary phase in the hot-deformed magnets, which contributes to the strong pining effect and the high coercivity. The present results provide reference for optimizing the magnetic properties of hot deformed NdFeB type magnets.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A relatively low density nanocrystalline high entropy alloy (HEA) with a nominal composition of Al20Fe20Mg20Ni20Ti20 is synthesized through the mechanical alloying process. The synthesized HEA is comprised of the mixture of bcc and fcc solid solution with crystallite size of the order of 6 to 7 nm. To understand the phase stability, the synthesized HEA is annealed at 200 °C and 500 °C for 2 hr. The 200 °C annealed HEA does not show any significant change in the XRD pattern. However, annealing at 500 °C affects the relative volume fraction of the formed phases. The synthesized Al20Fe20Mg20Ni20Ti20 HEA showed better magnetic characteristics with Ms (54.28 emu/g) and Hc (43.4 Oe) as compared to the many of recently reported HEAs. Moreover, for 200 °C annealed HEA, the found value of Ms (54.92 emu/g) and Hc (42.4 Oe) is similar to the as-synthesized HEA. An interesting change in magnetic behaviour has been observed after annealing at 500 °C, which may be related to the change in the fcc to bcc phase volume and change in the lattice parameter of these phases.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The temperature of the annealing treatment applied to the MnBi alloys with the intention to stabilize the α-MnBi “low-temperature” phase – a promising material for the rare-earth-free permanent magnets – is usually kept below the range of the β-Mn1.08Bi “high-temperature” phase. This work is aimed at the investigation of the effects of partial and complete α → β phase transformation in bulk magnetic-field-annealed magnets on their structure and magnetic properties. MnBi alloys modified with In, Mg and Sb were melt-spun, compacted to their full density and then heated in a magnetic field of 30 kOe to temperatures sufficiently high for the beginning of the α → β transformation. A heating of 15 °C/min was used which was immediately followed by cooling at the rate of 7.5 °C/min; the degree of the phase transformation was measured by in situ monitoring of changes in the sample magnetization. In all the studied alloys, the α → β transformation was found to improve the [0 0 1] fiber texture induced by the applied magnetic field, although it simultaneously decreased the coercivity. A partial transformation has resulted in a 11% increase of the maximum energy product for the Mn50Bi49Sb0.5In0.5 magnet, to 8.3 MGOe, and a 3% increase for the Mn50Bi46Mg3Sb0.5In0.5 magnet, to 12.8 MGOe. In the latter alloy, the α → β and reverse transformations were found to initially occur in well-defined pockets leading to clusters of large, highly textured α crystallites. In the Mn50Bi48.5Sb1.5 magnet, only part of the α phase could be recovered after the transformation, which instead promoted the paramagnetic MnBi0.9Sb0.1 phase.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Materials containing high amounts of grain boundaries and crystal defects are promising candidates for the applications in memristor devices due to their intrinsic low manipulation energy. Here, we present memristive characteristics of granular composite samples containing Co2FeSi and Mn (CFS + M) for the first time. The structure is composed of an Mn oxide phase detected by x-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns which will role as an active layer. The bipolar memristance effect is seen in all samples which can be attributed to a valence change mechanism (VCM). Also, the composition of the granular material with different amounts of Al2O3 nano phases increased the RHRS/RLRS ratio through the reduction of the OFF current. Optimally, the RHRS/RLRS ratio of 1117 and a low threshold voltage of 0.88 V is obtained. Results can be considered for the development of memristors based on granular materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt ferrite – barium titanate coreshell composite nanoparticles are an important part of the emerging field of magnetoelectric materials. Understanding the structure of these nanoparticles is vital towards controlling and adjusting their key properties for specific applications. Although transmission electron microscopy can reveal nanoparticle size, shape, and crystallinity, key information regarding the magnetic properties and the compositional makeup of the coreshell configuration remains elusive at nanoscale. This paper covers the use of scanning probe microscopy to directly measure these features using topography imaging, magnetic force imaging, and phase imaging. This technique provides significant insights into the intrinsic magnetoelectric coupling between the magnetostrictive cobalt ferrite core and the piezoelectric barium titanate shell. Particularly, this technique was applied to obtain phase images that directly exhibited the coreshell configuration, including an intermediate transition region between the core and the shell. The samples examined include 20 nm and 50 nm cobalt ferrite-barium titanate coreshell nanoparticles fabricated via co-precipitation and sol–gel synthesis. The results revealed a cuboid shape for the cobalt ferrite cores, and an oval shape for the cobalt ferrite-barium titanate coreshell nanoparticles. This result was confirmed by transmission electron microscopy. Additionally, the paper comprehensively analyzes the samples in their powder form via X-ray diffraction. The results indicate that the crystallinity of barium titanate is enhanced as the cobalt ferrite concentration is increased because of heterogeneous nucleation requiring a lower nucleation barrier compared to homogeneous nucleation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic aging is observed in Bi0.84La0.16Fe0.88Ti0.12O3 polycrystalline ceramic at the morphotropic phase boundary. The magnetic properties, including the magnetization and coercivity, undergo a drastic change over time. The magnetic aging is explained according to the spin frustration at the phase boundary (PB) induced by the competition in Gibbs free energy and lattice strain of the coexisting phase. The change in the spin state at the PB creates the ferromagnetic order, which in turn supports the magnetic interaction at the interface of antiferromagnetic (AFM)/ferromagnetic (FM)/AFM sandwich structure. The magnetic interaction is revealed in terms of the vertical hysteresis shift, exchange bias effect, and field step-dependent hysteresis loop.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic cross-linked enzyme aggregate (MCLEA) of cellulases and a non-magnetic analogue (CLEA) were synthesized and further investigated. The obtained MCLEA and CLEA showed a high enzyme loading efficiency of 90% and 88%, respectively. However, the MCLEA presented an activity 33% higher than the CLEA one, suggesting a catalytic enhancement effect as a result of magnetic nanoparticle presence in cross-linked cellulase aggregates structure. In addition, MCLEA shows an unusual behavior with highest enzymatic activity at low temperatures near to 37 °C. Lastly, a full factorial design (2x2) with two variables at two levels, frequency (203–420 kHz) and amplitude (3–6 kA m−1), was used in order to better investigate the effects of an alternating magnetic field (AMF) on MCLEA activity. AMF application decreased MCLEA activity, particularly in the highest values of frequency and amplitude, when compared to condition field free. In addition, frequency implied in more significant effects on MCLEA activity when compared to AMF amplitude.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Exchange stiffness and damping of spin waves in a soft ferromagnet of CoFeB are investigated using a time-resolved pump-probe technique. A pump pulse excites coherent spin waves in CoFeB via optical spin-orbit torque from Pt, and a probe pulse detects the phase of the spin waves via magneto-optic Kerr effect. From the frequency of spin waves, exchange stiffness is determined to be 13 pJ m−1, which is nearly independent of the CoFeB thickness from 6 to 16 nm and the annealing temperature of 400 °C. Damping constant of spin waves is determined from the relaxation of spin waves. Importantly, the spin wave damping increases with decreasing the CoFeB thickness, suggesting the spin pumping effect at the interface between CoFeB and Pt. The thickness dependence of damping becomes stronger after annealing at 400 °C, and the spin wave damping of >0.08 is obtained at a CoFeB thickness of 6.3 nm. Such large damping of spin waves would have an important effect on the operation of the CoFeB-based memory devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.By using the magnetron sputtering, a Gd/CoFeTaB multilayer structure film was fabricated, and investigated the effect of annealing temperature on magnetic and magnetoresistance characteristics of the multilayer film. A magnetic compensation phenomenon was observed, which means there is an antiferromagnetic coupling in the Gd/CoFeTaB system. It was found that the annealing enhances the antiferromagnetic coupling, lead to increase the Gilbert damping coefficient. Furthermore, an unsaturated magnetoresistance effect was observed, which is explained by the electron-electron interaction in the system. It is expected that the artificial antiferromagnetic multilayer system with weak macro-magnetism and internal magnetic order will has a good application prospect for the development of spintronics devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Rare earth –transition metal heterostructures are known to exhibit a number of magnetic structures at different temperatures and magnetic fields due to the strong antiferromagnetic interaction at the interfaces. Using spin-dependent specular and off-specular polarized neutron reflectivity (PNR), we observed the field-dependent twisted helical magnetic structure with a planar 2π domain wall (DW) in a Gd/Co multilayer. Macroscopic magnetization measurements revealed the field-dependent compensation temperature, which increases with an increase in the applied field. Specular PNR at 5 K, after field cooling the multilayer in an applied field of 100 Oe, reveals the formation of planar 2π DWs and antiferromagnetic coupling at the interfaces. Off-specular PNR data from multilayer at 5 K also revealed the development of magnetic inhomogeneities for the central part (thickness ~ 25 Å) of each Gd layer in the multilayer. In contrast, a similar magnetic property of the multilayer was observed at a higher temperature (125 K) on applying a field of 500 Oe. The field-dependent tunability of twisted helical magnetic structures with planar 2π DWs and the development of highly correlated magnetic inhomogeneities may be key for application in spin-based technology.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The coercivity of Sm2Fe17N3 as a sintered magnet has remained at several % of its huge anisotropy field to date. Control of grain boundary properties has proven to be effective for improving coercivity of modern permanent magnets, and in powder metallurgical processes, overlaying the raw powder surface with a different material can be a powerful methodology for the grain boundary control. Recently, we established a versatile technique for coating powders with minimal surface oxides. In this study, we coated Sm2Fe17N3 powders with 20 nonmagnetic metals by using the technique, and investigated the effects of coating and heat treatment on the coercivity. A simple non-sintering heat treatment was applied to the coated powders to clarify the pure effects of coating excluding intergrain coupling issues. The whole process from powder preparation to coating and heat treatment was undertaken in gloveboxes with a low-oxygen atmosphere. Powder coating was performed by a DC magnetron sputtering method. The powder was continuously stirred during deposition to ensure uniform coating. The magnetic properties of the powders were measured as bonded magnets by using a vibrating sample magnetometer. It was found that a sputter-coating as thick as several nm increased coercivity with most coating elements in varying degrees. However, subsequent heat treatment at 500 °C caused further coercivity changes which depended strongly on the element. The mechanism of the former effect is supposed to be a universal one, whereas the latter seems to be related directly to the chemical details of each element.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The influence of the concentration of alloying components on thermal stability, magnetic and electrical properties of amorphous alloys of Co73-66Fe4,6-3Cr0-9(B,Si)22-29 system was studied by methods of differential scanning calorimetry, XRD, resistometry and magnetometry. The crystallization of several alloys with advanced magnetic characteristics was studied. At continuous heating of the ribbons, either primary or eutectic crystallization was observed depending on the chemical composition of these alloys. Certain tendencies in the anomalous behavior of temperature dependence of electrical resistance of ribbons were revealed. By increasing chromium and metalloids concentrations, we obtained the alloys with relatively low saturation induction and large difference between the Curie temperature and the temperature of crystallization onset. The heat treatment regimes to obtain the best magnetic properties of these alloys were found. Prospective applications of Co73-66Fe4,6-3Cr0-9(B,Si)22-29 amorphous ribbons for fabrication of high sensitive sensors of magnetic field were discussed.© 2020 Elsevier LtdCowell's method of extracting barrier heights of top and bottom electrode metals in asymmetric metal-insulator-metal (MIM) tunneling diodes exhibiting Fowler-Nordheim tunneling is successfully automated. Pt-Al2O3-TiN MIM diodes with 5 nm insulator thickness are used in demonstration. Conditions assuring successful application of Cowell's method and its automation are discussed.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents an investigation of the abnormal hump phenomenon in amorphous indium gallium zinc oxide thin-film transistors under positive gate bias and temperature stress (PBTS). During PBTS, the current-voltage curve shows a severe hump and an abnormal double hump. Additional stress tests were conducted under long-term and low-temperature PBTS and current stress (CS), then the capacitance-voltage (C-V) curves after PBTS and CS were compared to identify the causes of the double-hump phenomenon. Threshold voltages VT were extracted at two levels of normalized drain current IDS: high VT_H at IDS = 10-8 A and low VT_L at IDS = 10-12 A. After 10,000 s, high-temperature PBTS shifted VT_H by + 3.48 V and VT_L by –3.20 V; low-temperature PBTS shifted VT_H by + 1.46 V and VT_L by –0.56 V; and CS shifted VT_H by + 5.02 V and VT_L by –0.98 V. Saturation measurement indicated that degradation of the source region has the strongest influence on degradation of IDS-VGS during CS; these results indicate trapping of charged species. In addition, both high-temperature PBTS and CS affected the C-V results; these changes indicate creation of defect states. Therefore, we hypothesize that the severe hump occurred because of a combination of trapping of charged species and creation of defect states. The double hump occurred only during PBTS. Thus, we hypothesize that the double hump was caused by trapping of ionized oxygen vacancies in the back channel. In a 2D TCAD simulation, the proposed hypothesis suggests that the migration of defect states and charged species affect the hump phenomenon. By changing distribution of shallow donor-like states in the channel and by changing the number of trapped electrons, we obtained simulated curves that were well fitted to our experimental results.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In a lower magnetic field, perovskite manganese oxide has the prodigious potential of room temperature magnetic refrigeration because of its simple preparation, low cost and stable structure. In this paper, a series of polycrystalline nanomaterials La0.8-xSr0.2SmxMnO3(x = 0,0.05,0.1,0.15,0.2) were prepared by sol–gel method. The XRD patterns showed that the crystal structure of samples was rhombohedral and the surface morphology seen by SEM was ellipsoidal. The variation of magnetization with temperature and external magnetic field was measured by a superconducting quantum interferometer. By deducing and calculating, the ideal magnetic parameters are the maximum magnetic entropy change, Curie temperature and relative cooling power. Finally, It was found that when the doping amount of Sm3+ was in the range of 0.1 to 0.15, the Curie temperature was controlled in the range of 266 K to 303 K. Under the applied magnetic field of 5 T, the maximum magnetic entropy change was up to 4.03Jkg-1K−1, and the maximum relative cooling power applicable to room temperature reached 295.31 J/kg, equivalent to 72.03% of the metal gadolinium (Gd) performance. These parameters show that present magnetic materials are prospective for applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we present an investigation on the effects of thermal annealing on the magnetic response of Lithium Niobate/Fe samples. Fe thin films have been deposited on Lithium Niobate Z-cut ferroelectric substrates by vapor phase epitaxy. A series of annealing treatments were performed on the samples, monitoring the evolution of their magnetic properties, both at the surface and on the volume. The combination of structural, magnetic, chemical and morphological characterizations shows that the modification of the chemical properties, i.e. the phase decomposition, of the substrate upon annealing affects drastically the magnetic behavior of the interfacial Fe layer. By tuning the annealing temperature, the magnetic coercive field value can be increased by an order of magnitude compared to the as-grown value, keeping the same in-plane isotropic behavior. Since no evident differences were recorded in the Fe layer from the chemical point of view, we attribute the origin of this effect to an intermixing process between a fragment of the substrate and the Fe thin film upon critical temperature annealing, process that is also is responsible for the observed changes in roughness and morphology of the magnetic thin film.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a study of magnetic properties of nanogranular films constructed with different grain sizes is presented. The total energy of the system is proposed by mean a Hamiltonian with four contributions, which was solved using the Monte Carlo Method. The proposed terms include: (i) The exchange interactions, which consider the stress at grain boundaries. (ii) Three anisotropy contributions: cubic magnetocrystallinity in the grain cores, the Neel's approximation in the film surface and the cubic magnetoelastic distortion at the grain boundaries. (iii) The dipolar interactions with a cutoff radius of five replicas and (iv) the energy contribution from the external magnetic field. Hysteresis loops and the temperature dependence of the magnetization under the zero-field-cooled (ZFC) and field-cooled (FC) conditions were computed. The used parameters, such as grain size, grain polydispersity, exchange values among others were chosen considering typical values reported from experimental works. The ZFC magnetization curve shows a broader maximum of which determines the blocking temperature. This maximum moves towards higher temperatures as the grain volume increases, fact related to greater stability of the ferromagnetic (FM) coupling on those grains with larger sizes, being a direct consequence of the decrease in the number of atoms located at the boundaries and of the reduction in the surface disorder. The hysteresis loops features, as well as the trend of some parameters (e.g., coercive field and remanence magnetization) as function of grain size, are in acceptable agreement with the experimental data tendencies. Local anisotropy in boundaries observed around coercive field explains grain size dependence of coercive field at nanoscale.© 2020 Elsevier LtdTiO2/g-CN based photocatalyst has been widely studied for its easy synthesis and outstanding charge separation efficiency. However, the difficulty in obtaining a high photocurrent value limits its application in photoelectrocatalysis water splitting. In this article, bimetallic NiMoO4 nanosheets co-catalyst was decorated onto TiO2/g-CN heterojunction to form TiO2/g-CN/NiMoO4 3D nanostructure. We obtained a photocurrent density as high as 1.8 mA/cm2 under 1 sun illumination at 1.23 V versus RHE, which is 2 times higher than that of pristine TiO2 nanorods arrays (NRs). The improved performance mainly comes from two aspects. One is g-CN expands the response range to visible light, and forms a heterojunction with TiO2, which improves the efficiency of charge separation at the same time. The other is that the addition of bimetallic NiMoO4 nanosheets oxygen evolution co-catalyst increases the surface active sites, and reduces the surface reaction barrier to promote oxidation reaction.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThin films with HfO2/Al2O3 laminated structure were prepared by the ALD method in this paper. Typical bipolar resistance switching characteristics were observed in the Pt/HfO2/Al2O3/TiN structure device. The samples were characterized by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) and atomic force microscopy (AFM). The effects of dielectric thickness and different test temperatures on the electrical performance were investigated. Experiments show that when the thickness of HfO2/Al2O3 is 7 nm/3 nm, the electrical properties are the best. As the test temperature increases, the resistance values (RLRS and RHRS) of the Pt/HfO2/Al2O3/TiN structure fluctuate more and more. When the test temperature approaches the failure temperature, the device's transition voltages (VSet and VReset) will also become more volatile.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report a systematic study of structural properties and quasi-static and dynamical magnetization behavior of trilayered systems produced in the meander-line geometry. Our samples consist of NiFe/Cr/NiFe layers produced by the magnetron sputtering technique. Here we grow samples with NiFe and Cr layers in a wide thickness range, keeping constant the total thickness of the trilayer. The structural properties and the quasi-static magnetic behavior were characterized by X-ray diffraction and magnetization curves, respectively. The magnetization dynamics was investigated through the magnetoimpedance effect at the high-frequency regime. The sample geometry, as well as the configuration of the magnetic fields, employed in the magnetoimpedance measurements, enabled us to modify the frequency limits in which the distinct mechanisms are acting on the magnetoimpedance response. Hence, we are able to modify/tailor the impedance as a function of both the magnetic field and probe frequency. Our results pave the way for the exploration the meander-line geometry at the high-frequency regime in samples with low dimensionalities.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The peculiarities of the magnetism of one of the first known and most studied multiferroic compounds remain a challenge for solid-state theory. The antiferromagnetic ordering of PbFe1/2Nb1/2O3 (PFN) occurs at TN≈150 K. On the one hand, this value is much larger than the TN value for most of the other double perovskites. On the other hand, it is significantly lower than theoretical estimates. The temperature dependence of magnetic susceptibility is substantially different from that one expected for conventional antiferromagnets. In order to find the solution of these puzzles, several density functional theory calculations of the magnetic interactions in PFN are reported. The interactions between first-, second-, third- and fourth-neighbor Fe3+ ions (S=5/2) are calculated. The magnetic response of Fe spins is shown to depend both on the interaction value and the mutual spin arrangement. The magnetic susceptibility of various spin lattices is calculated using the tenth-order high-temperature expansion method and compared with the experiment. A substantial role of disorder for the understanding of the magnetic properties is discussed.© 2020Magnetization switching of nanomagnets induced by voltage shows an energy-efficient way to spintronic devices. In-plane magnetization switching can be realized by simulating the magnetization dynamics under a combination of spin-orbit torque (SOT) and strain. The magnetization dynamics were simulated using the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation under macrospin approximation in the presence of thermal noise. Results show that a relatively small voltage (~60 mV) along with a charge current (1011 A/m2) can drive the magnetization flipping 180° (the switching probability near ~0.98), the energy required is ~0.25 pJ. The energy dissipation of Strain + SOT clocking scheme is 4 orders of magnitude less than that of SOT clocking scheme (~4.44 nJ). Low current density (<109 A/m2) makes no contributions to magnetization switching, which was dominated by the thermal noise (the probability ~0.5). If the current is too large, the probability of 180° flipping will not increase significantly when increasing the current, but the power consumption of the device is greatly increased. We should take a compromise between performance and energy dissipation. Moreover, the stochastic switching behavior of the SOT strain-mediated nanomagnets demonstrates the feasibility to mimic the artificial neurons that can be used to construct an artificial neural network to recognize the handwritten digits. The accuracy of the Strain + SOT neurons-based ANN is ~98%, which can work as well as traditional neurons. These results prove that Strain + SOT clocking scheme provides an additional feasible route to realizing energy-efficient spintronic neurons and memory.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Herein, monolayer-CdS substitutional elemental doping with metal (X; Fe) and non-metal (X; H, N, F) atoms has been investigated by the first-principle calculations. In non-magnetic monolayer-CdS, magnetism can be induced by metal and non-metal atom substitution at possible dopant sites except for FS (F doped at the chalcogen site). In particular, Fe doping at Cd-Site (FeCd) results in a maximum magnetic moment of 4.0 μB, and half-metallic character with a small dispersion at Γ point. Among all the substitutional dopants at the hole-site, Fh is ferromagnetic, being most energetically favorable under both atomic and molecular phases. The Hh in monolayer-CdS retained the semiconducting nature with reduced band gaps for spin-up and spin-down channels. Nh exhibits half-metallic character with a small dispersion of 0.13 eV at K-Γ point. The Fh and Feh show metallic behavior. To determine the exchange-field strength ferromagnetic (FM) and anti-ferromagnetic (AFM) coupling between the two dopants at far positions (1, 3) and near positions (1, 2) have been considered. The effect of dopants concentration on FM and AFM coupling were also investigated. It was found NS (Θ = 4 %) at near positions (1, 2) shows FM state with Curie temperature (Tc) of 106 K. As the biaxial strain of −5 % is applied the maximum FM state was achieved withTc of 164 K. The functionalization of monolayer-CdS with the proposed elements provided in this work can help tailoring two-dimensional (2D) materials applied in spintronics and electronics devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The emergence of ferromagnetism in tensile strained LaCoO3 (LCO) films is still being researched due to the lack of any uniform explanation. Herein, the magnetic anisotropy and the precise ratio of Co2+ ions in LCO films growth on different substrates are reported. The emergence of ferromagnetic state can be observed irrespective of the tensile or compressive strain on the LCO films. A small magnetization along the out-of-plane easy axis is exhibited in the LCO film under compressive strain. The maximum magnetization (1.11 μB/u.c.) is observed in the LCO film over tensile strained LSAT substrate along the in-plane easy axis, which is around four times compared to the magnetization of LCO film on compressive strain. In addition, the exact percentage of Co2+ ions in different LCO films deviated from 12.8% to 10.6% as the strain changed from tensile to compressive. This little variation has a relatively weak effect on the hugely different magnetization of LCO films. Subsequently, the magnetization of LCO film grown on STO buffer layer has a great increase compared to the film direct on LAO substrate. All these results support the proposition that the tensile strain should induce more IS (t2g5eg1) or HS (t2g4eg2) spin states of Co3+ ions, which plays the key role for enhancement of ferromagnetism.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We perform a numerical study of microwave detection using an unbiased magnetic tunnel junction with a perpendicularly magnetized free layer by utilizing the phenomena of Voltage Control Magnetic Anisotropy (VCMA). We show that the field angle for achieving maximum sensitivity is significantly affected by the presence of the VCMA effect. The combination of VCMA effect and spin-transfer torque (STT) enhances the maximum sensitivity by >30% compared to the case of pure STT. We explain this behavior using the symmetric voltage component that arises solely due to the VCMA effect in the spin-torque ferromagnetic resonance spectra. We also show the presence of meta-stable states at the low field for which the sensitivity in the presence of the VCMA effect is enhanced by ~70%. For the chosen device parameters, we predict a maximum sensitivity value of 1400 mV/mW, which is comparable to commercial semiconductor-based unbiased Schottky detectors.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Clarification of magnetic phase transition nature and critical behavior is an essential step in the development of new magnetic functional materials. In this work, we studied critical properties of intermetallic compound (Ce0.65Pr0.35)2Co7 by bulk dc magnetization around the paramagnetic to ferromagnetic phase transition. It exhibits a second-order magnetic phase transition with TC = 214 K. Critical exponents β = 0.546(5) and γ = 1.054(5) are obtained by the modified Arrott plot, whereas δ = 2.843 is obtained by a critical isotherm analysis at TC. These critical exponents not only obey the Widom relation δ = 1 + γ/β, but also collapse the isothermal magnetization M-H-T data into two branches below and above TC following the single scaling equation M(H, ε) = εβf±(H/εβ+γ). Although the obtained exponents are close to the theoretical values of mean-field model, a noticeable deviation unable to be ignored, indicating the existence of localized magnetic interaction which competes with a long-range ferromagnetic state. Our results will establish a sound theoretical basis for understanding the complex magnetic interaction in the light rare earths ternary alloy.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this paper we have implemented a recently proposed direct-measurement technique to characterize near-interface oxide traps (NITs) in SiC MOS capacitors with gate oxides obtained by four different processes. This measurement technique enables characterization of NITs with energy levels above the bottom of the conduction band, which are active in the accumulation mode of MOS capacitors on N-type SiC and in the strong inversion of N-channel MOSFETs. The measurements revealed that annealing in nitric oxide of thermally grown oxides in dry oxygen removes NITs that are further away from the SiC surface, but it leaves a defect with energy levels located between 0.13 eV and 0.23 eV above the bottom of conduction band. The oxides grown in pure nitric oxide exhibit NITs with energy levels above 0.2 eV. The measurements also show that low-temperature oxide deposition and subsequent annealing in nitric oxide resulted in the lowest density of NITs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Dynamic magnetic hysteresis loops (DMHL) features of molecular-based magnetic materials and ferrimagnetic systems are investigated by a mixed spin (1/2, 1) model by means of the path probability method (PPM). The PPM contains two rate constants; hence the DMHL features have been studied by using the method with two rate constants. In particular, the effects of the repulsive (J<0) and attractive (J>0) bilinear nearest-neighbor pair interactions, temperature (T), crystal-field interaction (D), angular frequency (ω) of the oscillating magnetic field and especially the rate constant (k2), which corresponds to the wheel speed in the melt spinning technique (MST), on the DMHL are investigated. The shapes and areas of hysteresis loops are affective sensibility by these system parameters. We also investigate the magnetic coercive fields and remanents magnetizations as a function ω. We found that the most of our results are in a good agreement with some theoretical and experimental reported works. We also observe the novel and interesting DMHL behaviors for lower values of T, and higher values of ω, k2 and D.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The results of modelling of the excitation and propagation processes of exchange spin waves (ESW) in epitaxial films of yttrium iron garnet (YIG) are presented. It is shown that the origin of the efficient ESW excitation is magnetic inhomogeneity, which is always present in a thin transition layer at the interface between a magnetic film and a nonmagnetic substrate. It is found that the parameters of magnetic inhomogeneity significantly affect wave characteristics of the emitted ESWs. A method was proposed for employing ESWs to measure the magnetization distribution parameters over the thickness of the YIG film and the ESW dissipation parameter. The measured parameters were used to calculate the dispersion and attenuation of the ESWs, define their amplitude characteristics in continuous and pulsed regimes, and estimate their phase losses. It is shown that dissipative losses of ESWs are not significant. More significant losses can occur due to phase dispersion on non-parallel reflective surfaces of the YIG film. It is demonstrated that such phase losses can be significantly reduced by precision optical polishing of the YIG film samples.© 2020 Elsevier LtdSpin-transfer torque magnetic random access memory (STT-MRAM) is one of the most promising candidates for “universal memory” with the ultra-fast access speed, radiation resistance and theoretically unlimited endurance. However, there are many practical aspects that could degrade the life-time of STT-MRAM. In this paper, degradation on the life-time of the STT-MTJ device is observed experimentally, which is attributed to the so-called “self-heating effect” of the device. Simulation on the device is conducted on the self-heating effect to obtain the internal temperature inside the device. The self-heating effect of the STT-MTJ device is analyzed and its influence on the life-time degradation of the STT-MTJ is included in the time dependent dielectric breakdown model (TDDB, 1/E model). This inclusion should improve the accuracy of the estimation on the life-time.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Controlling Vortex Domain wall (VDW) dynamics and stability in a stepped nanowire with in-plane magnetic anisotropy was investigated by using micromagnetic simulation with fixed nanowire dimensions. A stepped area is constricted at the center of the nanowire with proportions of length (d = 50 nm) and width (λ = 50 nm) to pin the magnetic domain wall (DW) with high barrier potential energy to achieve a high information storage capacity. From this study, it was found that the DW with different structures was pinned at the stepped area with high stability. Also, a reduction of VDW behaviors due to its chirality and polarity has been obtained according to saturation magnetization (Ms). By increasing the values of Ms, the VDW attraction to the nanowire edges based on its chirality and polarity becoming less and VDW moves in a straight line towards the stepped area. Therefore, with high values of MS, the VDW is stable in type and moves towards the stepped area with a speed of 500 m/s until pinning there. In addition, the symmetry of the stepped area design helps the VDW to move in a straight line through the stepped area and maintain its magnetization configuration during the depinning. This is important for writing and reading the information in storage memory devices. Furthermore, current density values (J) have affected the stability of the VDW by decreasing the VDW behaviors regarding its chirality and polarity. With low driven current density values, the VDW kept its structure until reaching and got pinning at the stepped area. Further investigations were done to examine the transverse domain wall (TDW) and VDW depinning through the stepped area. The results have shown that TDWs have a high barrier potential than VDWs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.By using Monte Carlo simulations, we discuss the dynamic magnetic properties of a double-layer core–shell graphene nanoisland with mixed-spin (2, 5/2) configuration in an oscillating magnetic field. We investigate the influence of exchange couplings, oscillating magnetic field, and temperature on the dynamic magnetic and thermodynamic properties of the system. We obtain the various characteristic curves of the dynamic order parameter, susceptibility, and internal energy as well as hysteresis loops. To better understand the impact of these physical parameters on the phase transition of the system, the phase diagrams are depicted. It should be noticed that the system can exhibit multiple-loop hysteresis behaviors under certain conditions. Besides, we plot the coercivity and remanence of the system under the influence of various parameters.© 2020 The AuthorsThe study presents frequency dependences of real part of admittance Z′ (f) and phase shift angle θ(T, f) in nanogranular films containing CoFeZr nanoparticles with “core-shell” structure embedded into SiO2 matrix. The 3 μm thicknesses (Co41Fe49Zr10)x(SiO2)100−x films with 20 ≤ x ≤ 80 at.% were deposited in vacuum chamber evacuated either with pure Ar (Set 1 samples) or Ar + O2 gas mixture (Set 2) using ion-beam sputtering technique. After characterization by X-Ray diffraction, Mössbauer spectroscopy, scanning electron microscopy and magnetization studies, the films both of Set 1 and Set 2 samples were subjected by admittance measurements at 300 K in the frequency range of 0.1–1000 kHz. Mössbauer spectroscopy have shown that oxidized CoFeZr nanoparticles in Set 2 samples contain semiconducting iron-based oxides with Fe3+ charge states of iron ions. The observed Z′ (f) and θ(f) dependencies for the Set 2 films below the xc have shown dielectric regime of carrier transport. They also exhibited that at weak AC electric fields inductive-like contribution to reactive part of admittance (with positive θ values) prevails over the capacitive one f > 10 kHz. This effect of the so-called “negative capacitance” was explained by the delay of current, formed by electrons hopping between nanoparticles, relative to applied bias voltage. This delay is forced by formation of dipoles of charged FeCoZr nanoparticles with native Fe-based oxide “shells” around them that results in the increase of mean life time of hopping electrons on nanoparticles with “core-shell” structure.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Searching for low-dimensional materials with high Curie temperature and full spin–polarization ratio is an urgent demand for the rapidly evolving spintronic industry. Here, the stability, electronic structures, and magnetic properties of two-dimensional hexagonal CrOX (X = F, Cl, Br) monolayers were investigated with density functional theory. The CrOF and CrOCl monolayers exhibit good stability and are ferromagnetic semiconductors with a Curie temperature of ~ 215 and 64 K, respectively, as determined from Monte Carlo simulations. High-temperature ferromagnetism and controllable half-metallicity can be realized by hole doping from a gate voltage. At a doping concentration of 0.1|e|per unit cell, the Curie temperatures of CrOF and CrOCl are increased to 385 and 576 K, respectively, and the doped systems change from semiconductors into half-metals. These findings suggest a route for controlling and tuning the electronic and magnetic properties of CrOX monolayers, which are promising materials for spintronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this paper we identify the dominant contribution to the OFF-state distortion of an MOS transistor coming from the overlap regions applying of device-level harmonic balance simulations in a calibrated TCAD setup. Both overlap (Cgs,Cgd) and direct capacitance (Cds) are described with novel physics-based models that are, in conjunction with an analytical Volterra series analysis, capable of describing the harmonics. This includes the dependency on process and device design parameters such as gate oxide thickness, DC gate bias and doping profile properties in the gate overlap region. The new model is compared to the overlap models of BSIM and EKV showing superior accuracy in modeling the harmonics qualitatively and quantitatively (within <3 dBm for the second and <5 dBm for the third harmonic, respectively).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report on the investigations of a system of 8-nm NiO particles representing antiferromagnetic (AFM) materials, which are weak magnetic in the form of submicron particles, but can be considered to be magnetoactive in the form of nanoparticles due to the formation of the uncompensated magnetic moment in them. The regularities of the behavior of magnetization switching in AFM nanoparticles are established by studying the magnetic hysteresis loops under standard quasi-static conditions and in a quasi-sinusoidal pulsed field of up to 130 kOe with pulse lengths of 4–16 ms. The magnetic hysteresis loops are characterized by the strong fields of the irreversible magnetization behavior, which is especially pronounced upon pulsed field-induced magnetization switching. Under the pulsed field-induced magnetization switching conditions, which are analogous to the dynamic magnetic hysteresis, the coercivity increases with an increase in the maximum applied field H0 and a decrease in the pulse length. This behavior is explained by considering the flipping of magnetic moments of particles in an external ac magnetic field; however, in contrast to the case of single-domain ferro- and ferrimagnetic particles, the external field variation rate dH/dt is not a universal parameter uniquely determining the coercivity. At the dynamic magnetization switching in AFM nanoparticles, the H0 value plays a much more important role. The results obtained are indicative of the complex dynamics of the interaction between magnetic subsystems formed in AFM nanoparticles.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the surface spin dynamics and magnonic characteristics of a magnetically ordered fcc Fe-Ni alloy monolayer on a Ni magnetic slab substrate. The calculations are performed using the Heisenberg Hamiltonian representation for the magnetic ground state of the system. Using the Spin Polarized Relativistic Korringa-Kohn-Rostoker (SPRKKR) method, the relevant magnetic exchange parameters are computed, taking into account the nearest and next nearest Fe-Fe interactions. This establishes the appropriate Heisenberg Hamiltonian. The Phase Field Matching Theory (PFMT) is applied to compute the spin dynamics and surface magnonics of the system, and thus determine the spin wave eigenmodes localized at the surface but propagating in its plane with surface group velocities; these intrinsic eigenmodes constitute basic elements for the magnonic characteristics of the system. The inclusion of the Fe-Fe interactions alters the highest magnonic mode compared to the case when such interactions are absent. The localized densities of states (LDOS) for the irreducible representative magnetic sites at the surface nanostructure are extracted from our computed PFMT Green's functions. The model is general, and can be applied to different ultrathin layered magnetic alloys on magnetically ordered substrates.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Double-loss absorbers have attracted considerable attention due to their light weight, thin thickness, wide absorption bandwidth, and strong absorptivity. Herein, MoS2 was decorated with magnetic Ni particles by electroless plating process to fabricate a double loss MoS2/Ni absorbent. The MoS2/Ni powders were successfully prepared and the Ni particles were coated on the surface of MoS2. Changing the Ni content optimized not only the electromagnetic parameters but also the microwave absorption performance. Complex permittivity and permeability increased with increasing Ni content from 0 wt% to 20 wt%. The sample with MoS2-20 wt% Ni powders exhibited favorable absorption performance. For the mixture with a thickness of 2.0 mm, a frequency band range of below −10 dB reached over 9.0–11.8 GHz, with a minimum RL value of −22 dB at 10.3 GHz. Therefore, MoS2/Ni powders are expected to be a promising absorbent for thin and lightweight microwave-absorbing materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present an extensive study of the structural, magnetic and thermodynamic properties of high-quality monocrystals of two heterometallic oxyborates from the ludwigite family: Cu2GaBO5 and Cu2AlBO5 in the temperature range above 2 K. The distinctive feature of the investigated structures is the selective distribution of Cu and Ga/Al cations. The unit cell of Cu2GaBO5 and Cu2AlBO5 contains four nonequivalent crystallographic sites of metal ions. Two sites in the structure of Cu2GaBO5 are fully occupied by Cu atoms which form the quasi one-dimensional chains along the a-axis. For Cu2AlBO5 all sites are partially occupied by Al and Cu atoms. The joint analysis of low-temperature data on magnetic susceptibility and magnetic contribution to the specific heat showed that Cu2AlBO5 and Cu2GaBO5 exhibit an antiferromagnetic transition at TN=2.4 and 4.1 K, respectively. The magnetic response below TN can be represented as the sum of two contributions: the ordered component and the paramagnetic contribution from defects of the same relative weight. It is shown that the external magnetic field above 2.5 T and 2.8 T for Cu2GaBO5 and Cu2AlBO5, respectively, leads to a broadening of the magnetic phase transition indicating suppression of the long-range antiferromagnetic order.© 2020Coercivity enhancement of thicker sintered NdFeB magnets with 5–10 mm in thickness by grain boundary diffusion (GBD) with low-melting Tb75−xCexCu25 alloy powders (x = 0–45) is demonstrated. For 5-mm-thick magnets, after GBD with Tb75−xCexCu25 alloys (x = 0–45), a significant iHc increment (ΔiHc) of 8.2–11.5 kOe with a slight decrease in Br is found. Although the magnet GBD treated with Tb75Cu25 exhibits the highest ΔiHc of 11.5 kOe, the coercivity enhancement per wt% Tb usage (ΔiHc/wt.% Tb) could be increased by about 2-folds with increasing x from 0 to 45. As for the 10-mm-thick magnets, large ΔiHc of 8.4 kOe and 7.4 kOe can also be attained by GBD with Tb75Cu25 and Tb55Ce20Cu25 powders, respectively. The optimized microstructure and the effective distribution of Tb and Ce at grain boundary after GBD with Tb75−xCexCu25 are the main factors for the coercivity enhancement. As a result, the magnetic properties, as well as the thermal stability of the sintered NdFeB magnets with 5–10 mm in thickness, are improved considerably. This work provides a cost-effective way to enhance the coercivity of the thicker sintered NdFeB magnets.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we explore magnetic phases and spin reorientation phase transitions (SRPT) in the BiFeO3 – like multiferroics. We consider the Dzyaloshinskii – Moriya exchange interaction (DMI) as the principle mechanism responsible for appearance of spin space modulated structures (SSMS) in BiFeO3 and focus the peculiar features of the DMI manifestation in single crystals and films. As an example we take a (1 1 0) – oriented BiFeO3 film whose thickness is much lower than the period of SSMS (dfilm≪λ) and construct phase diagram in terms “magnetic field H – perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) constant κ” accounting the PMA dependence on the strains, where the tensile strains correspond to the situation κ > 0; the compressive strains correspond to the situation κ < 0. Our findings shows that at the condition (dfilm≪λ) the SSMS modulated along the [0 0 1] axis with spin rotating in a plane (1 1 0) exists as the ground magnetic state in a definite range of the control parameters (H, ±κ). We show that magnetic field applied along the normal to the film along with strains leads to the transition into homogeneous magnetic state of the “easy plane” type at κ > 0 and tilted phase at κ < 0. As well as in the single crystals at the positive values κ > 0 phase transition from SSMS into homogeneous “easy plane” phase goes through the cone SSMS whose existence was recently experimentally confirmed [S. Kawachi, et al, Phys. Rev. Mater. 1, 024, 408 (2017)]. We believe that our findings performed for the (1 1 0) BiFeO3 film will be of interest for further experimental and theoretical research and the implementations of BiFeO3 based technologies.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Ionic liquid gating has emerged as an attractive means of manipulating the magnetic properties of materials. Here, we report ionic liquid gating modulating the ferromagnetism of a Co film. A weak and strong saturation magnetization can be reversibly obtained by applying a negative voltage and a positive one, respectively. The modulation may be related with the oxidization and reduction of Co. Negative (or positive) gating voltages drive the oxygen ions to inject into (or extract from) Co layer of the sample, which oxidizes (or reduces) Co. These gating processes are reversible. Moreover, the magnetism of the gated states is considerably stable. It is a significant step towards designing low-power electric-controlling magnetic devices in future.© 2020Grain boundary diffusion process (GBDP) of Tb on sintered Ce-substituted Nd-Fe-B magnets has been conducted by magnetron sputtering deposition of Tb film for coercivity enhancement. The microstructure and magnetic properties of the diffused (Nd,Ce)FeB magnets have been evaluated and the effect of diffusion temperature, time and Tb coating thickness on the Ce-substituted N35 magnets are discussed. The results show that a core-shell structure is formed around the main grains after GBDP, which promotes the coercivity enhancement of the magnets. A maximum coercivity enhancement from 10.9 kOe to 15.2 kOe is achieved in Ce-N35 magnets by deposition of 10 μm Tb films followed by diffusion processing at 900 °C for 300 min. The inhibition effect of Ce in GBDP of Tb is also evaluated using (Nd,Ce)FeB magnets with different Ce contents and discussed using diffusion model simulation implemented by Tb distributions through GD-OES. The rare earth element (REE)-rich nodes located at the triple junction of the grains may attribute to the Tb aggregation and the formation of TbFe2, resulting in the inhibition of further Tb diffusion.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Monte Carlo simulation technique is applied on a magnetic bilayer system composed of spin-1/2 Ising and spin-1 Blume-Capel spin variables distributed on a honeycomb lattice. Assuming an indirect exchange interaction between adjacent monolayers, we investigate the influence of single ion anisotropy and number of nonmagnetic layers between the magnetic sheets on the critical behavior of the system. Equilibrium phase diagram in a reduced pseudo critical temperature (Tc/J) versus reduced single ion anisotropy (DB/J) plane has been determined. In the presence of alternating magnetic field, dynamic phase transition properties have been elucidated. The form of the oscillating magnetic field is assumed to be in a square wave form. By performing a detailed finite-size scaling analysis, we have calculated the critical half period t1/2c at which the system undergoes a dynamic phase transition between dynamically ordered and disordered states. Extracted critical exponent ratios β/ν and γ/ν suggest that observed dynamic phase transition for the present multilayer system falls into the same universality class as the equilibrium two-dimensional Ising model.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, high-power up to 4000 mW electro-mechanical behavior of a capacitive micro-electromechanical systems (MEMS) microwave power sensor using cantilever beam is investigated. Due to residual stress gradients, the power sensor is proposed for a warped cantilever beam connected to coplanar waveguide (CPW) structure. The proposed sensor is fabricated using the GaAs monolithic microwave integrated circuit (MMIC) process. It is demonstrated that the output response of this sensor exhibits non-linear characteristics under high power levels (more than 1000 mW). The measurement results can be classified as three regions: linear region (1–1000 mW), saturated region (1000–2500 mW), and over-saturated region (2500–4000 mW). Their corresponding sensitivities are 2.8 fF/W, 1.03 fF/W, and 0.32 fF/W at 10 GHz, respectively. The non-linear output response of the power sensor is mainly caused by impedance mismatch at X-band (8–12 GHz). Furthermore, an electro-mechanical model of power sensor based on warped cantilever beam is proposed. The results are well in agreement with the calculated ones using this model by software that employs the finite element method (FEM), which provides the potential prospect for the design of capacitive power sensor.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we have deposited a tri-layer film stack of Ta (25, 50, 75 and 100 nm)/FeGaB (100 nm)/Ta (5 nm) onto Si substrates, and studied ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) properties of the Ta buffer layer thickness and temperature dependence. The surface morphology of the tri-layer film stack is captured by Atomic Force Microscopy (AFM). The static magnetic properties for different buffer layer thickness reveal that both coercive field and remanent magnetization decrease for increasing the Ta buffer layer thickness due to the disturbance of magnetic moments from the FeGaB layer. The dynamic ferromagnetic properties of all samples suggest that narrow inhomogeneous linewidth and low damping factor are obtained for different Ta buffer layer thickness. Ta (100)/FeGaB (100)/Ta (5) film stack shows the lowest damping from 100 K to 300 K. The buffer layer thickness and temperature dependence studies indicate that the interface damping dominates at low temperature 100 K. Hence, these studies are of great importance for development of magnetostrictive microwave devices applications.© 2020Low frequency noise study is performed at deep cryogenic temperature of 10 K in p-channel gate-all-around (GAA) nanowire (NW) FETs. As expected, the carrier number fluctuations mechanism explains the flicker noise origin for conventional fixed applied drain bias. At very low applied drain biases step-like effects impact the drain current transfer characteristics. Noise measurements performed at a fixed very low drain voltage as a function of the applied gate bias show that the gate voltage flicker noise behavior follows a IDS3/2/gm2 law. It was already proved that this dependency may be modeled considering classical transport theory, in the framework of the mobility fluctuations mechanism from Coulomb scattering interactions. The noise measurements performed at fixed gate voltage as a function of the applied drain bias show that the gate voltage 1/f noise levels present a deviation from the IDS3/2/gm2 law. In order to explain this behavior, an improved model is proposed mainly considering some additional hypotheses: the inversion charge dependency on the applied drain bias and the fact that the impact of the drift component of the drain current may be neglected when measurements are made at low fixed gate voltage biases for very low applied drain voltages. The results show that for the lower drain biases considered in this work, the flicker noise behavior may be explained using physical-based models derived from classical transport considerations for cryogenic temperatures by the mobility fluctuations mechanism originating from Coulomb scattering interactions. This may be surprising, and suggests that even if step-like effects impact the DC measurements, there is a polarization interval in which they do not impact the 1/f noise.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate the possibility of controlling dipole spin-wave coupling in the lateral array of ferromagnetic stripes using local strains. Lateral system of magnonic stripes with a piezoelectric layer is fabricated and tested with microwave and Brillouin light scattering spectroscopy. The mechanisms of controlling the dipole coupling of spin waves by elastic strains localized in the region of maximums of the electric field strength are revealed. It is shown that when the absolute value and sign of the electric field are changed, it is possible to effectively control the properties of the propagating spin waves and the spatial distribution of the intensity of the dynamic magnetization in the lateral structure. We emphasize that the spin-wave intermodal coupling can be tuned with the external electric field in the adjacent magnonic stripes. Formation of channel for spin-wave edge mode propagation is observed experimentally in the vicinity of the gap between adjacent stripes. Effective control of the spin-wave coupling by changing the gap is demonstrated. From an applied point of view, the results can be used in information processing devices with electric and magnetic field tunability.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A new, portable device is presented, which can be used to monitor changes in the magnetic properties of a ferromagnetic material, such as steel, due to stresses or other effects, through measurements of magnetic flux density. The device consists of a yoke, formed of a permanent magnet, which provides a constant flux density, and two high permeability soft ferromagnetic poles. The yoke is placed above the material under test, forming a magnetic circuit. Two Hall sensors placed at the ends of the yoke's poles measure the magnetic flux density. Through this arrangement, the ambient magnetic field is cancelled and the changes in the magnetic flux density values depend only on the changes in the magnetic properties of the sample's material participating in the magnetic circuit. The optimal parameters of the device, such as the lift-off distance between the yoke and the sample, were selected based on simulation results. The device includes the above-mentioned sensing element, a microcontroller, a temperature sensor, an Analog-to-Digital converter, an RF transmitter, a Bluetooth module and a battery. The collected data are wirelessly transmitted to a receiving device, consisting of a microcontroller, an RF receiver, an LCD and a battery. The output information can be viewed either on the dedicated device or on any other Bluetooth-compatible device (e.g. smartphone, tablet, laptop etc).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this article, evaluations of the microstructure and HRE distribution of grain boundary diffused (GBD) Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets with diffusion time (t) and diffusion depth (d) were investigated. The coercivity (Hcj) first increases and then decreases with increasing t; while the remanence (Br) and the maximun energy product ((BH)m) of GBD magnets have an opposite changing trend. A large amount of Tb diffused into the inner of grains, and formed extensive Tb-rich areas in the surface layer at the beginning of GBD process. This suggests that Tb diffuses not only along grain boundaries, but also via grains in the surface layer because of high concentration gradient of Tb. As the concentration gradient of Tb is reduced, Tb diffuses mainly along grain boundaries. The grain boundary acts as the GBD path, but not as a Tb enriched area. There are two coexisting processes, namely, one process is diffusing from the surface to the inside of the magnet, the other is diffusing from the grain boundaries to the shell, then to the inner of grains. The two diffusion processes cause the changes of microstructure and Tb distribution, thus, the magnetic properties of the GBD samples vary correspondingly.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Iron oxide superparticles referring to a cluster of smaller nanoparticles have recently attracted much attention because of their enhanced magnetic moments but maintaining superparamagnetic behavior. In this study, iron oxide superparticles have been synthesized using a solvothermal method in the presence of six different polymers (e.g., sodium polyacrylate, pectin sodium alginate, chitosan oligosaccharides, polyethylene glycol, and polyvinylpyrrolidine). The functional group variation in these polymers affected their interactions with precursor iron ions, and subsequently influenced crystalline grain sizes within superparticles and their magnetic properties. These superparticles were extensively characterized by transmission electron microscopy, dynamic light scattering, x-ray diffraction, Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy, and vibrating sample magnetometry.© 2020 The AuthorsWe present a detailed study of the effect of gate-oxide-related defects (traps) on the small-signal radio frequency (RF) response of III-V nanowire MOSFETs and find that the effects are clearly identifiable in the measured admittance parameters and in important design parameters such as h21 (forward current gain) and MSG (maximum stable gain). We include the identified effects in a small-signal model alongside results from previous investigations of III-V RF MOSFETs and thus provide a comprehensive physical small-signal RF model for this type of transistor, which accurately describes the measured admittance parameters and gains. We verify the physical basis of the model assumptions by calculating the oxide defect density from the measured admittances.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have produced hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets from commercial (MQU-F) Nd-Fe-B ribbons. The spark-plasma-sintering technique was used to deform the samples under low pressures of 40 MPa. The initial stages of the hot-deformation process were investigated in terms of microstructures and magnetic properties. Hot-deformed magnets with different deformation ratios were produced and the dependence of the remanence on the deformation ratio was determined. In the initial stages of the hot-deformation process, a cone-like shape of the magnet was observed for the first time. The experimental data can be qualitatively interpreted by applying the basic Stoner–Wohlfarth model.© 2020In this paper, we have investigated magnetic, dielectric, and pyroelectric properties of polycrystalline Fe4NbTaO9 which is closely related to the recently discovered Fe4Nb2O9 and Fe4Ta2O9 that show magnetoelectric/multiferroic effect. Fe4NbTaO9 samples were synthesized using two synthesis routes i.e. solid-state reaction and arc melting methods. Rietveld analysis of XRD patterns confirmed the proper phase formation with P3-c1 space-group symmetry of these two samples. No impure phase was observed in the arc melted sample. Magnetic measurements have indicated an antiferromagnetic phase transition at TN ≈ 88 K for both synthesized samples. Temperature dependent dielectric curves reveal two broad transitions at TN1 ≅ 88 K and TN2 ≅ 50 K. Further, magnetic field induced electric polarization is evidenced by pyro-electric curves in both samples of Fe4NbTaO9. Herein, all findings demonstrate that partial replacement of Nb5+ by Ta5+ is sufficient to modify the ground state in the Fe4B2O9 (B = Nb, Ta) members. Our results provide new insights into magnetoelectric phase control of the novel oxide multiferroics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Amorphous magnetic CoFeTaBO granular films with different oxygen contents are fabricated by using magnetron sputtering. The effect of oxygen contents on magnetic and electrical properties of the amorphous CoFeTaBO granular films are investigated, and a model for the coexistence of two states of oxygen-dependent metallic oxides in the CoFeTaBO film is proposed to explain magnetic and electrical characteristics in amorphous film system. It is expected that our proposed two-state model can provide a new perspective for understanding the physical properties of amorphous magnetic granular film materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the evolution of magnetic entropy in a triclinic FeVO4 multiferroic using temperature and magnetic field dependent magnetic measurements at magnetic transitions. The observed antiferromagnetic transitions are at TN1 = 22 K and TN2 = 15 K, together with the paramagnetic phase above TN1. A magnetic field induced maximum magnetic entropy change (ΔSM = 0.37 J kg−1K−1 at H = 50 kOe) at multiferroic transition, 15 K is observed in conjunction with a crossover from the negative to positive in ΔSM(T) data at TN1 towards TN2. The crossover of magnetic entropy substantiates the onset of inverse magnetocaloric effect below the antiferromagnetic transition temperature at TN1 together with maximum ΔSM at TN2.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A new value-added at submicron scale was developed from industrial wastes via the Pechini method using a ferric oxide (iron/steel husk lamination) precursor from steel industry. The analysis of all synthesized samples was carried out by X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy, vibrating sample magnetometer, UV–Vis/DRS analysis, Fourier-Transform infrared spectroscopy and Raman spectroscopy. X-ray diffraction and scanning electron microscopy exhibit the structure, morphology, phases and the purity of the samples studied. The crystallite size was estimated for each thermal treatment. Vibrating sample magnetometer study shows high saturation magnetization for the sample at 500 °C with respect to the other samples. For this sample, the energy band gap was determined by using two methods to avoid false conclusions. Also, a detailed study by vibrational spectroscopy was carried out on the local structure of the sample. The sample treated at 500 °C exhibited a higher saturation magnetization of 55.1 emu/g compared to the sample treated at 300 °C (45.5 emu/g).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The surface antiferromagnetic (AFM) ordering of ultrathin CoO(0 0 1) films grown on Ag(0 0 1) has been investigated using low energy electron diffraction (LEED) and valence band photoemission spectroscopy. We have observed coherent exchange scattered half-order spots in LEED with a periodicity of the magnetic unit cell of the CoO(0 0 1) surface. These spots show very low intensities (2–3% of the integer-order spots) and are visible only below a critical temperature for low electron beam energies (<70 eV), revealing its AFM origin. Significant enhancement of surface Nèel temperature (TN) of CoO(0 0 1) for different film coverages has been observed and it is exceeding the bulk TN even in the ultrathin limit. The enhancement of surface TN has been explained by the combined effects of finite size, surface strain, and polarizability of the underlying substrate. The critical behaviour near TN shows a coverage dependent evolution as the magnetic critical exponent (β) varies from 0.16 to 0.48 upon increasing film coverage from 0.5 ML to 10 ML, suggesting crossovers in the critical behaviour. Furthermore, upon transition from paramagnetic (PM) to AFM phase, minor modifications of the valence band electronic structure have been observed such as enhancement of spectral weight in the Co 3d band as well as widening of an energy gap relative to EF by ~150 meV, in agreement with the theoretical predictions.© 2020 The AuthorsWe outline the idea of magnetic-field sensing with a nanometer spatial resolution using the effect of giant magnetoreactance (GMX) and we discuss results of our micromagnetic studies of domain-wall-assisted (or double-vortex-assisted) GMX in nanomagnets. By analogy to low-frequency giant magnetoimpedance (GMI), we consider systems of domains magnetized perpendicular to the direction of the AC current that creates an alternating Oersted field, thus, it drives the DW oscillations. Because of small cross-sections, the nanomagnets are not capable to induce large changes of the magnetic flux, therefore, the impedance of magnet-containing nanocircuits is dominated by the static resistivity (in accessible frequency regimes), while, GMX is an alternative effect to be utilized for sensing. We analyze in detail the effect in single-crystalline nanowire of cobalt with the easy axis transverse to the nanowire axis. In that system, small coherent shifts of the domain walls (DWs) induce relatively high changes of the magnetic flux through the largest cross-section of the nanowire due to large density of periodically packed DWs. Driven by the alternating transverse field of the Oersted origin, the system allows for perpendicular (the field directed perpendicular to the long axis of the nanowire and to the domain magnetization) GMX of improved characteristics (the GMX ratio and the field sensitivity of GMX) at a high stability of the magnetic structure in a wide region of the external field. Moreover, due to a non-zero overall magnetization (created by DWs), the perpendicular GMX is strongly asymmetric with respect to the field reversal (in a low-field regime). Also, we study the transverse GMX (the field parallel to the domain magnetization).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Sm(Co0.9Cu0.1)5 ribbons doped by Fe-Cr-Co alloy were prepared by melt-spinning at 40 m/s and annealing at 450 °C for 15 min. The annealing and magnetic field have different effects on the structure and magnetic properties of the ribbons. The solute-partitioned structures consisting of Co-rich SmCo5- and (Sm, Cu, Fe, Cr)-rich CeCo5-type phases formed in each of the three ribbons. The as-spun ribbons show the SmCo5- and CeCo5-type phases in two distribution modes and high magnetic properties of Hc = 24.6 kOe, Mr = 45.4 emu/g and Ms = 61.5 emu/g. Annealing increases the content of SmCo5-type phase and enlarges the componential differences between the two Sm(Co, M)5 phases, eventually leading to an increase in Hc and a decrease in Mr. MHT plays a vital role in promoting doping atoms to occupy the 2c sites, narrowing the differences in content and composition between the two Sm(Co, M)5 phases, and forming a nearly equiaxed and uniform two-phase structure, which not only inhibits the negative effect of annealing on Mr but also increases Hc to 30.1 kOe and Ms to 63.0 emu/g.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The restoration process of irradiation-induced metastable magnetic states of FeRh thin films during the heat treatments at 373–1073 K was investigated by measuring the magnetization-magnetic field (M−H) curves and the magnetization-temperature (M−T) curves for the FeRh thin films irradiated with 50 keV Ar ions to various fluences. The recovery of lattice structures accompanying the magnetic restoration was also examined by an x-ray diffraction (XRD) measurement. For the ferromagnetic state induced by low fluence irradiation, the magnetic restoration to the thermal equilibrium antiferromagnetic state occurs during the heat treatment. Whereas for the paramagnetic state induced by high fluence irradiation, it once changes to the ferromagnetic state, and then, is restored to the antiferromagnetic (i.e., thermal equilibrium) state during the heat treatment. The above magnetic transformation occurs by the heat treatments at higher temperatures for the higher fluence irradiation. Moreover, the magnetic transition temperature from the antiferromagnetic state, which has been thermally restored from the irradiation induced ferromagnetic or paramagnetic state, to the ferromagnetic state decreases with increasing the irradiation fluence. This result implies that the antiferromagnetic state with larger amount of lattice defects is more unstable against the thermal vibration of lattice atoms.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Zirconolite oxides R3+Fe3+Ti2O7 (R rare earth element) are known to exhibit spin glass behaviour at low temperatures. Here we present a detailed study of these compounds for R = Eu, Gd, Dy, Ho, and Er, together with reviewed previous measurements on Sm, Tb, Tm, Yb and Lu, with the scope of determining the role played by the rare earth on their magnetic properties. They have been investigated using X-ray powder diffraction, and further characterized by magnetization, frequency dependent ac susceptibility and heat capacity measurements. RFeTi2O7 compounds are all isostructural showing orthorhombic structure, space group Pcnb at 300 K. Disorder of the magnetic ions in the RFeTi2O7 lattice induces spin glass behaviour at low temperatures, mainly due to the Fe sublattice. We show that magnetic rare earth ions participate in the spin glass state tuning its properties. The single ion anisotropy of the R3+ ions, excluding exchange interaction with other magnetic ions, has been calculated by ab initio methods, and expressed in terms of the g tensor of the ground doublet or quasi-doublet in Kramers (Sm, Dy, Er, Yb) and non-Kramers (Tb, Ho) ions, respectively, in an effective spin S* = 1/2 model. In the case of R with a singlet ground state (Eu, Tm) or a multiplet state (Gd), the ion is isotropic. We show that the relative increase in the spin-glass temperature ΔTSGR/TSGFe with respect to the LuFeTi2O7, where Lu is non-magnetic, correlates qualitatively with the product of the ratio gz/gJ (R = Tb, Dy, Ho, and Er), or g⊥/gJ (R = Sm), times the ratio of exchange interactions [Formula presented] determined from the paramagnetic room temperature susceptibility measurements. Besides, for increasing anisotropy the spin glass transition dynamics slows down to values typical of cluster glass. The coercive field below the transition is increased in the same trend. This paper explains the effect of the R-Fe exchange interaction and R single ion anisotropy on the spin-glass behaviour of these compounds.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effects of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) on the magnetic vortex gyrations in a Permalloy nanodisk are investigated using micromagnetic simulation under the excitation of an out-of-plane spin-polarized current. It is found that spin-polarized current can drive the vortex to display two mode gyrations in the presence of DMI. Mode I gyration is like the conventional gyration studied in previous studies with the similar gyration radius, velocity and the eigenfrequency. However, the velocity of mode II gyration is about 2 times higher than that of mode I gyration, but with half gyration radius. And the eigenfrequency in mode II gyration is higher than that in mode I gyration by one order of magnitude. In addition, simulation calculations reveal that the magnetic vortex of these two mode gyrations can be triggered to gyration in shorter time compared with the conventional gyration.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Ternary europium copper phosphide Eu₂Cu₆P₅ was synthesized from the elements by the standard ampule method as a phase-pure product and studied by means of X-ray powder diffraction. Temperature dependencies of the tetragonal unit cell parameters and volume revealed pronounced anisotropy. The observed anomalies on the a(T) and c(T) curves at about TC ≈ 36 K were related to magnetic phase transition in the phosphide under study. The linear spontaneous magnetostrictions in the basal plane and in the direction of the c axis have different signs that indicates a pronounced anisotropy of the thermal expansion at the temperatures of magnetic ordering. Temperature changes of the unit cell volume Vu(T) were analyzed within the Debye-Einstein approximation. The parameters of the model applied (Debye and Einstein characteristic temperatures, shares of the correspondence contributions) were determined. It was shown that the ratio of the shares of the Debye and Einstein contributions to the thermal characteristics are 0.85/0.15; consequently, in the region of moderately low temperatures, the thermal properties of Eu2Cu6P5 are determined mainly by the Debye vibrations of the Cu/P framework. Experimental data on thermal expansion and calculated heat capacity were used to calculate the temperature-dependent Grüneisen parameter, γ(T), for the further analysis of the lattice dynamics of Eu2Cu6P5. The revealed monotonic growth of γ(T), which is a measure of the anharmonicity of lattice vibrations, indicates an increasing influence of anharmonicity on the thermal properties of Eu₂Cu₆P₅. The anisotropy of the vibrations of europium atoms, as well as local regions of structural heterogeneity of the sample that leads to the appearance of local stresses in the crystal structure can be the reasons for the increasing influence of anharmonicity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, Fe soft magnetic composites (SMCs) coated with MnO2 were prepared successfully by ball milling and following spark plasma sintering. The effect of MnO2 content on microstructure and magnetic properties for the Fe/MnO2 SMCs was investigated in detail. The analysis results show that a uniform MnO2 coating layer can be formed on the surface of the Fe particles via low speed ball milling with agate balls. When the MnO2 content increases from 0.0 wt% to 10.0 wt%, the thickness of the MnO2 coating layer exhibits a growth trend. As a consequence, the increased nonmagnetic phase leads to the magnetic dilution, finally resulting in the reduced saturation magnetization and deteriorated coercivity. Moreover, the enhanced resistivity induced by the increased thickness, significantly reduces the generation of the inter-particle eddy current, which leads to more stable permeability and lower total core loss at high frequencies. This study provides a novel insulating coating layer to reduce total core loss and is advantageous for the development of iron-based SMCs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic vortices belong to the possibilities to store information in magnetic structures. Understanding their nucleation and propagation is also of interest in basic research. While vortices are usually examined in particles of homogeneous material, here we give an overview of the impact of borders between two materials, i.e. iron and permalloy, on magnetization reversal and vortex formation in double-wedges as well as adjacent rectangles of different thickness. While former investigations of pure iron nanoparticles of similar dimensions revealed different magnetization reversal magnetisms without vortex, with one or two vortices, the addition of a permalloy part stabilized the magnetization reversal so that in all situations under investigation, a single vortex was observed. Our simulations underline the technological importance of such double-material structures for the preparation of nanostructures for storage devices with reliable magnetization reversal processes, stable against erroneous modifications of nanoparticle dimensions and magnetic field orientations.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Temperature-dependent magnetic measurements indicate a magnetic transition (TC) at 33 K in monoclinic Y2CrMnO6. The presence of different cations Cr 2+, Cr3+, Mn3+, and Mn4+ leads to incompatible magnetic interactions in the material. The Curie-Weiss (CW) fit of the magnetic susceptibility suggests that antiferromagnetic interactions are prominent in the material and the deviation of the susceptibility from the CW law near above the TC hints the presence of a Griffiths-like phase due to ferromagnetic short-range interactions up to the Griffiths temperature, TG = 98 K.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the dependence of microstructure and magnetic properties on the iron content for Sm(CobalFexCu0.073Zr0.024)7.6 (x = 0.226, 0.233 and 0.24) magnets has been systematically studied. The magnet with x of 0.226 (relatively low Fe content) shows a homogeneous microstructure and optimal magnetic properties after it has undergone a solid solution treatment for only 2 h at 1443 K. However, under the same solid solution treatment, a largely uneven composition distribution is observed in magnets with an increased Fe content (x = 0.24). As a result, the peak and gradient of Cu concentration in the cellular boundaries are lower, giving rise to poor magnetic properties. It is impressive that there Cu precipitates are found in the as-solutionized magnet though the cellular structure has not yet occurred. Our results show that a prolonged solid solution treatment (ts) is necessary to improve the microstructure and magnetic properties of the magnets with higher Fe content. Moreover, the optimal ts can be shortened by increasing the solid solution temperature (Ts). However, when the Ts is too high, the composition is not uniform but segregated, and the magnet shows poor magnetic properties as well. Furthermore, it is also found that the homogeneous microstructure and optimal magnetic properties are deteriorated when the magnets undergo a solution treatment at much higher Ts. However, it can be recovered if the magnet is further solution treated at the proper conditions. Our results suggest that the transformation of microstructure and magnetic properties can be controlled reversibly by adjusting the solution treated conditions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fe-based amorphous magnetic materials are attracting more and more attentions in the application of low and medium frequency transformers due to their favorable properties of low core loss and high saturation magnetic flux density. Accurate modelling of their static and dynamic characteristics is required for analysis and design optimization of low and medium frequency transformers. In particular, for numerical analysis using the vectorial magnetic potential, an inverse magnetic hysteresis model is needed to predict the magnetic field strength from the magnetic flux density. When the excitation varies with time, the magnetic hysteresis model must be able to predict the dynamic hysteresis characteristics. This paper presents a generalized inverse Preisach dynamic hysteresis model for dynamic characterization of Fe-based magnetic materials. This model incorporates the reversible magnetization and magnetization dependent hysteresis, as well as all core loss components, including the hysteresis, eddy current, and excess losses. The proposed model can predict accurately the magnetic field strength from the magnetic flux density and hence accurate core losses. The predicted results are verified by experimental measurements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The presence of a weak remanence in Ultra-Low-Field (ULF) NMR sample containers is investigated on the basis of proton precession. The high-sensitivity magnetometer used for the NMR detection, enables simultaneously the measurement of the static field produced in the sample proximity by ferromagnetic contaminants. The presence of the latter is studied by high resolution chemical analyses of the surface, based on X-ray fluorescence spectroscopy and secondary ions mass spectroscopy. Methodologies to reduce the contamination are explored and characterized. This study is of relevance in any ULF-NMR experiment, as in the ULF regime spurious ferromagnetism becomes easily a dominant cause of artefacts.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis letter reports a systematic study about the effect of surface stoichiometry induced by inductively coupled plasma (ICP) etching on the ohmic contact to N-face n-GaN. It is found that N-face n-GaN surface has a very high activity towards oxygen adsorption. And it is indispensable to remove GaOx layer on the N-face n-GaN surface prior to the metal deposition to realize ohmic contact. Moreover, the radio frequency power of the ICP etching and the plasma species greatly affect the surface stoichiometry and the electrical property of the ohmic contact to N-face n-GaN. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy was implemented to characterize the surface stoichiometry of N-face n-GaN after plasma treatment and reveal the mechanism behind the phenomena. As a result, a non-alloyed ohmic contact to N-face n-GaN has been successfully achieved in a reproducible way.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Rare earth doping could greatly enhance the magnetostrictive properties of Fe-Ga as-cast alloys. But the origin of this large magnetostrictive property has always been controversial. Some researchers think that this large magnetostrictive property is induced by the distortion of A2 lattice. While others think this is sourced from the formation of (0 0 1) oriented textures. In order to solve this controversy, the microstructure and magnetic properties of La, Pr, Sm and Y doped Fe-Ga as-cast alloys were examined by scanning electron microscopy and energy dispersive spectroscopy (SEM/EDS), X-ray diffraction (XRD), electron backscattered diffraction (EBSD), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and strain gauge method in this paper. And the results show that the reason for the increase of the magnetostrictive properties of Fe-Ga cast alloys caused by rare earth doping is closely related to whether the rare earth elements enter the A2 crystal lattice. When the rare earth elements cannot enter into the A2 lattice of the alloy sample, the cause of the large magnetostriction is mainly attributed to the (0 0 1)-oriented columnar crystals. However, when rare earth elements can enter into the A2 crystal lattice of the alloy sample, the cause of large magnetostriction is mainly due to residual stress, or distortion caused by rare earth elements entering into the A2 crystal lattice, and secondly by the (0 0 1)-oriented columnar crystals.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A surface magneto-electric effect in hybrid multilayer systems consisting of antiferromagnet (Cr2O3) and ferromagnet films is considered using the Landau theory. We show that the antiferromagnetic order parameter in Cr2O3 film can be switched without applying an external magnetic field. Only an electric field is needed. The switching happens in the surface region of Cr2O3. The thickness of the switched region is of order of the domain wall width. If the antiferromagnetic layer thinner than the domain wall the electric field switches the whole layer. In the ferromagnet/Cr2O3/ferromagnet structure with the thin antiferromagnetic layer, the magneto-electric effect can be turned on and off by reversal of magnetization of one of the ferromagnetic leads. The ME effect is “turned on” when the ferromagnetic layers magnetizations are co-directed and “turned off” in the opposite case.© 2020 The AuthorsTemperature and field dependencies of the magnetostriction of the Tb0.2Gd0.8 single crystal were measured in strong magnetic fields up to 14 T in a temperature range of 4.2–300 K. The temperature dependencies of five magnetostriction constants λ1α,0, λ2α,0, λ1α,2, λ2α,2 and λγ,2 were determined, using Clark's theory for rare-earth hexagonal close-packed single crystals. Giant values of linear and volume magnetostriction due to forced magnetostriction were found in the Tb0.2Gd0.8 single crystal (λbc = 1.6 × 10−3) in the region of the Curie temperature (near room temperatures). It is shown that giant values of forced magnetostriction are caused by the sharp dependence of exchange interactions on interatomic distances along the hexagonal the c axis.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Two superconducting intermetallic compounds in the Ni-Bi system, namely NiBi and NiBi3, can be formed as result of interdiffusion, if Ni/Bi are produced as bilayers at room temperature by pulsed laser deposition (PLD). These two equilibrium phases are responsible for the observed superconductivity in this kind of bilayer material. Due to different behavior in external magnetic fields, there appear two-step superconducting transitions in the electrical transport measurements. In this work we studied the superconducting and magnetic properties of the Ni-Bi bilayers with the formation of the two intermetallic compounds, NiBi and NiBi3, which have similar Tc ~ 4.0 K but very different upper critical magnetic fields at zero temperature [Bc2(0)]. The magnetic hysteresis loops of the pure NiBi3 phase show the behavior of a weak type II superconductor without strong pinning effect. Upon formation of the NiBi phase caused by highly energetic atoms during pulsed laser deposition, strong pinning effects appeared in the hysteresis loops below Tc. The isotherm V(I) curves show that the residual Ni layer does not induce spontaneous vortices in the NiBi or NiBi3 phases.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic cooling (MC) method developed by using magneto-caloric effect (MCE) of magnetic solids is generally taken as an excellent alternative way to widely used vapor expansion/compression based refrigerator due to its more environmental-friendly and higher energy-efficiency. In present work, systematic investigations of the melt-spun Cu22Al18Ho22Tm20Gd18 amorphous ribbon in terms of glass formation ability, magnetic and MCE properties have been reported. The undercooled liquid region and reduced glassy transition temperature for Cu22Al18Ho22Tm20Gd18 amorphous ribbon reach 28 K and 0.57, respectively. A broad typical ferromagnetic to paramagnetic transition (FM-PM, second ordered) around TC ~ 33.6 K accompanied by a considerable MCE is found in Cu22Al18Ho22Tm20Gd18 amorphous ribbon. The peak magnetic entropy change, temperature averaged entropy change with 5 K lift and refrigerant capacity values for Cu22Al18Ho22Tm20Gd18 amorphous ribbon are 8.70 J/kgK, 8.65 J/kgK and 401.8 J/kg for ΔH = 0–5 T, respectively.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Heatproof domain-refined grain-oriented (DRGO) silicon steel is an ideal material for the manufacture of S15-type ultra-high efficiency transformer with three-dimensional wound-core (TDWC). In this paper, the microstructure, grain orientation, and magnetic performance of 23ZDMH80 heatproof silicon steel during stress-relief annealing were investigated by scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and electron backscattered diffraction (EBSD) techniques. Based on heatproof DRGO steel, the Epstein-SST (single sheet tester) conversion factor and equivalent magnetic path length were calculated, and then an ultra-high energy efficiency transformer was developed. Results show that, the average size of micrograins in notched region increased from 42.3 μm to 68.2 μm after annealing at 850 ℃ for 0–8 h. The orientations of micrograins grown on large-size Goss grain included not only the non-〈0 0 1〉 orientations, such as {210} 〈−241〉, {215} < 1–20>, and {1 1 0} < 1–12}, which were harmful to the magnetic properties, but also the favorable {1 0 0} 〈0 0 1〉 and Goss. Correspondingly, the core loss of 5 pairs of Epstein specimens first decreased then increased slowly (the growth rates below 1.2%) during annealing. The Epstein-SST conversion factor δP for 23ZDMH80 heatproof steel was 8.6% (higher than 5.0% the value recommended by IEC standard), and the equivalent magnetic path length was 0.489 m. Finally, the developed 10 kV/400 kVA transformer with TDWC presented ultra low no-load loss of 289 W, load loss of 3072 W, and noise of 35.4 dB, it means significant advantage of energy conservation and environmental protection.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.From density functional DFT investigations, pairs of Fe (diiron), mostly known in molecular diiron nona-carbonyl Fe2(CO)9 and diiron-mono-carbide Fe2C, are embedded in hexagonal C6 substructures. Based on formerly studied parent structure (FeC6), Fe2C6 and Fe2C12 modeling Fe-network-embedded graphene are shown to be more cohesive than the mono-carbide on one hand, and increasingly cohesive from hexa- C6 to dodeca- C12 on the other hand. From energy differences, the ground state is spin-polarized SP, versus a non-spin-polarized NSP configuration, and identified as ferromagnetic versus a higher energy anti-ferromagnetic hypothesis. The projection of the magnetic charge density on Fe and C shows that only Fe carries the magnetic moment; while carbon receives charges from Fe as illustrated by the electron localization function ELF 3D and 2D mapping. SP configuration induces an enlarged c/a hexagonal ratio, versus NSP, while ahex. remains constant thanks to the rigid C6 carbon substructure network, resulting in an anisotropic magneto-volume response. This feature essentially due to in-plane diiron is discussed from the energy-volume (E, V) NSP and SP equations of state EOS and derived quantities like volume and d(Fe-Fe) change of the magnetization. Such model structures find support from experimental evidence of multiatomic Fe networks embedded in graphene.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effect of a high magnetic field (25 T) on the D03 to L12 phase transformation in two Fe-Ga alloys with 24 and 27 at.% Ga during isothermal annealing at 475 °C is investigated using neutron diffraction and magnetization measurements techniques. It is proved that annealing in the magnetic field increases the amount of fcc – derived L12 phase in both samples. This effect is stronger in the Fe-27%Ga alloy as compared with the Fe-24%Ga alloy. The reasons for enhancing the D03 to L12 phase transition in the magnetic field are discussed. We suggest that the most significant increase in the transformation rate is related to a decrease in the energy barrier between the phases involved in the transformation process.© 2020Electromagnet measurements of demagnetization M(H) curves of two Nd-Fe-B cylinder specimens of radius and length rs=ls=5 mm with different length lg=l0-ls,l0 being the pole gap length of electromagnet, of end gaps are carried out using a B-coil or a pair of J-coils to detect B or M and a Hall probe to record H. The measured curves for lg>0 are demagnetizing corrected to be consistent with that for lg=0, after the volume and midplane averaged demagnetizing factors, Nvol and Nmid, are calculated as functions of γs≡ls/(2rs) and lg/ls, using an effective solenoids approach. It is found that the measured intrinsic coercivity Hci for lg>0 is always smaller than that for lg=0,Nmid and lg/l0 could be used as the demagnetizing factor for the correction with respect to M in the B-coil and J-coils cases, respectively, and pHlg/l0(<Nvol), where pH decreases with decreasing lg, may be used as the demagnetizing factor for the correction with respect to H. The mechanisms of these phenomena are studied by further calculations on the local demagnetizing fields and on the magnetization reversal process based on a tubular reversal model.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This investigation is devoted to a theoretical study of the role of orbital ordering in the magnetic frustration of the pseudoperovskite manganite La1/3Ca2/3MnO3. In the current study, the effect of orbital ordering on magnetic competition is described within the framework of orbitally-dependent superexchange interaction. The ranges of the mixing angles in the orbital structure of frustrated magnetic structures are determined. An orbitally-dependent single-ion anisotropy that takes octahedra tilting into account is proposed as the cause for strongly non-collinear magnetic ordering. The magnetic field dependences of complicated magnetic structures are discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.For several transition metals M, we have computed atomic magnetic moments for the body-centered cubic substitutional solid solution Fe1-xMx, by two comparative first-principle approaches for atomic disorder: Korringa-Kohn-Rostoker Coherent Potential Approximation (KKR-CPA) and Density Functional Theory applied to Special Quasirandom Structures (SQS-DFT). Our results, compared with experimental and numerical literature, led to a classification of transition metal solutes in α-iron with respect to their magnetic behavior.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Using the transfer matrix method, the valley- and spin-dependent transport properties of a monolayer MoS2 superlattice in the presence of the extrinsic Rashba spin–orbit interaction (ERSOI) are theoretically investigated. The presence of the extrinsic Rashba and intrinsic spin-orbit coupling in this superlattice enhanced the valley and spin polarizations. By adjusting the superlattice parameters or the ERSOI strength, the perfect valley and spin-polarized currents can be observed. The valley- and spin-dependent conductance can be manipulated by the ERSOI strength and the barrier height. Due to the presence of the direct band gap and ERSOI, the conductance has a gap with respect to the barrier height. Furthermore, it was found that the efficiency of the spin-inversion can be modulated via the ERSOI strength, the number of superlattice barriers, and the gate voltage.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This second part of the work estimates the reading depth of the magnetic Barkhausen noise, testing surface-treated steels. The concomitant changes of the surface microstructure result in a pronounced two-peak profile of the Barkhausen noise signal: an additional peak arising from the surface-treated layer suppresses the initial peak generated in the bulk material. To confirm and explain the results obtained for semi-hard steel ribbons in the first part of this work (Stupakov et al., 2020), the steels with opposite surface treatments (soft decarburized and hard milled layers of different thickness) have been measured by commonly used detection sensors: classical sample-wrapping and industrial surface-mounted coils. To obtain physically accurate data, dynamic variations of the Barkhausen noise signal have been corrected using the recently proposed dH/dt normalization of its rms envelopes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports on dependence of the Gilbert damping constant α on the microstructure in nanocrystalline Y3Fe5O12 (YIG) coatings fabricated on a Si substrate by a sequence of co-precipitation, spin-coating, and annealing processes. When the annealing temperature Ta increases from 1023 K to 1323 K, the average particle size of the YIG crystals estimated by scanning electron microscopy increases from 64 nm to 217 nm, and the value of α also increases from 2.7 × 10−2 to 1.2 × 10−1. The observed increase of α is attributed to the microstructural evolution in the nanocrystalline YIG coatings upon annealing.© 2020 Elsevier LtdGe-rich GeSbTe (GST) alloys are attracting Phase Change Materials for future memories as their higher crystallization temperature offers an extended range of applications. We have studied the electrical characteristics of PCM cells using such alloys as active layers. We show by impedance spectroscopy that the cells in the RESET (amorphous) state are not only resistive but also exhibit a capacitive component. Although trap-assisted conduction models are apparently able to describe the I(V) and I(T) characteristics of the devices in this state, their physical background is thus questionable. Alternatively, we show that granular models, describing electrical transport through conductive grains separated by insulating interfaces, are also able to simulate these characteristics, while fed by physically sound fitting parameters. Moreover, we show that the SET (crystalline) state is not simply ohmic but that its characteristics, as conductive as a metal but reacting as an insulator to temperature, resemble to those found in a semiconductor doped with a very low ionization energy defect. Finally, all these characteristics can be understood by considering that the electrical properties of cells made of Ge-rich GST layers are not those characteristic of some defective and homogeneous material but instead result from strong chemical heterogeneities found both in the amorphous and crystalline states of these Ge-rich alloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Considering Dresselhaus-type spin–orbit coupling (SOC), we theoretically investigate spin-polarized transport in a 3-layered semiconductor heterostructure, InSb/InxGa1-xAs/GaSb. Adopting improved transfer matrix method to solve Schrödinger equation, electronic transmission coefficient is obtained exactly, and then spin polarization ratio is evaluated. An appreciable electron-spin polarization effect by the Dresselhaus-SOC appears in this layered semiconductor heterostructure. Spin polarization is associated closely with in-plane wave vector, incident direction and SOC strength. In particular, both magnitude and sign of spin polarization are manipulated by strain engineering or an appropriate intermediate-layer. Therefore, such a 3-layered semiconductor heterostructure can serve as a controllable spin filter for spintronics device applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Reasonable design of micro-structure and chemical constitution is an effective way to fabricate highly efficient electromagnetic (EM) wave absorbers. In this work, a series of mesoporous core–shell structure NiFe2O4@polypyrrole (NFO@PPy) micro-rod composites are successfully synthesized through a convenient in-situ polymerization progress. The characterizations confirm porous one-dimensional rod-like NiFe2O4 (NFO) is formed by the aggregation of many nanoparticles. The amount of pyrrole (Py) greatly affects the thickness of polypyrrole (PPy) shell, as well as the relative content of magnetic and carbon components, which regulates dielectric loss and magnetic loss of NFO@PPy. To be specific, when the dosage of Py is 10% (NFO@PPy-10%), the sample manifests the best performance with the minimum reflection loss (RLmin) of −54.6 dB at C band (7.0 GHz). Notably, the effective absorption band (EAB, RL < -10 dB) is up to 13.7 GHz via manipulating the coating thickness which covers all C, X, and Ku wavebands. This work highlights the importance of synergistic coupling effects between dielectric loss (strong interfacial/dipolar polarizations, conductive loss, multiple scatterings) and magnetic loss (eddy current loss, natural ferromagnetic resonance, and exchange resonance) for the NFO@PPy to achieve sufficient attenuation capacity and impedance matching.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, an axial-type vibration energy harvester with an impact-sliding structure that uses a magnetostrictive Permendur (Fe-Co-V) rod was produced and its power generation properties were measured. It was found that all the peak frequencies analyzed using the FFT method from the experimentally obtained voltage waveforms were consistent with the calculated inherent frequencies of the axial vibration of the rod. Therefore, the power generation by the proposed harvester likely resulted from the inherent axial vibration of the magnetostrictive rod. Furthermore, the maximum output energy obtained in this work was 1592 µJ, which was generated by a harvester with 3000 coil turns and two magnets under a load resistance of 3 kΩ. It was found that the maximum output energy was generated when the load resistance was close to the coil impedance at the inherent frequency of the axial vibration of the rod.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fatigue damage of materials is generally evaluated by the degree of degradation of mechanical properties under fatigue loading. Existing experiments show that fatigue damage of ferromagnetic materials can also be evaluated utilizing changes in magnetization, but the quantitative relationship between magnetization changes and fatigue damage is still unclear. In this paper, a nonlinear magneto-mechanical coupling constitutive relation for ferromagnetic materials under fatigue loading is established based on the local equilibrium state of magnetization and the stress-strain response relationship in classical fatigue theory. The magnetic induction intensity of the ferromagnetic materials predicted by the present model increases with the number of cyclic loadings, and then tends to stabilize and finally increase rapidly, which is consistent with the existing experimental results. The model can also predict the evolution of complex magneto-mechanical coupling behavior under different loading times. In addition, the relationship between the evolution of spontaneous magnetic field (SMF) and fatigue damage for ferromagnetic materials is discussed in details. These results are helpful to understand the magneto-mechanical coupling behavior of ferromagnetic materials during fatigue damage process and also have important significance for the fatigue damage monitoring in practical engineering.© 2020This work investigates the effects of an applied magnetic field on the laminar flow of a ferrofluid over a backward-facing step. Both constitutive equation and global magnetization equation for a ferrofluid are considered. The resulting formulation consists in a coupled magnetic-hydrodynamic problem. Computational simulations are carried out in order to explore the physics of the flow and the consistency of theoretical aspects of our formulation. The unidirectional sudden expansion in a ferrofluid flow is investigated numerically under the perspective of Ferrohydrodynamics in a two-dimensional domain using a Finite Volumes Method. The boundary layer detachment induced by the sudden expansion results in a recirculating zone, which has been extensively studied in purely hydrodynamic problems for a wide range of Reynolds numbers. Similar investigations can be found in literature regarding the sudden expansion under the Magnetohydrodynamics framework, but none considering a colloidal suspension of magnetic particles out of the superparamagnetic regime in the framework of Ferrohydrodynamics. The vorticity-stream function formulation is implemented. Our simulations show a clear coupling between the flow vorticity and the magnetization field. We observe a systematic decay on the length of the recirculating zone as we increase the magnetic parameters of the flow, such as the intensity of the applied field and the volume fraction of particles. The results are discussed from a physical perspective in terms of the dynamical non-dimensional parameters. We argue that the reduction of the recirculating region is a direct consequence of the magnetic torque balancing the action of the torque produced by viscous and inertial forces of the flow. For the limiting case of small Reynolds and magnetic Reynolds numbers, the diffusion of vorticity balances the diffusion of the magnetic torque on the flow. This mechanism controls the growth of the recirculating region.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The influence of array geometry on synchronization properties of a 2-D oscillator array is investigated based on a comparison between a rectangular and a hexagonal grid. The Kuramoto model is solved for a nearest-neighbor case with periodic boundary conditions and for a small-scale, realistic coupling case with 1/r3 decay characteristic of spintronic oscillators. In both cases, it is found that the hexagonal grid choice leads to lower synchronization threshold and higher emission power than its rectangular counterpart, which results from increased connectivity, as well as, in the realistic-coupling case, from decreased contributions of the array edges. Additionally, a more general spin-torque oscillator model including both amplitude and phase as degrees of freedom is employed for reservoir computing simulations, showing that by using hexagonal grid one can increase the short-term memory capacity but not the parity-check capacity of the system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We fabricated by solid-state ceramic technique single-phase mixed spinel ZnxMg0.3−xCu0.7Al0.3Fe1.7O4 with x index from 0.05 to 0.25, step 0.05 for the first time. The goal was to study the effect of cation doping on internal structure and magnetic properties of the material. The ferrites were first characterized by X-ray diffraction to confirm their purity. Magnesium and Zinc cations showed tetrahedral site preference, while Aluminum cations preferred the octahedral site. The effective magnetic moment and exchange interaction increased with the Zinc content. The pure single phase structures allowed us to investigate the vibrational spectra based on the symmetry conditions. We found only two infrared bands, while based on symmetry calculation of the factor group, four bands are predicted. The number of atoms and their relative arrangement in the crystal are the main criteria to define the active vibrational bands as predicted by factor group theory and the magnetic response of the material.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Artificially engineered magnetoelectric materials, whose electrical properties can be manipulated by an external magnetic field and vice versa are a new class of materials and find extensive applications in the field of emerging technologies like sensors, electrically controlled spintronic, and microelectronics and memory storage devices. Composites, having ferromagnetic and ferroelectric components are commonly employed where coupling between magnetic and electric fields is relatively weak. It is known that the interface between the components plays a very crucial role for achieving a stronger magnetoelectric (ME) coupling in artificially engineered magnetoelectric materials if the composites are synthesized with a ferro/ferri magnetic core and a ferro/piezoelectric shell. Such core-shell architecture ensures strong interaction and enables better connectivity. In realizing this goal, we report a simple technique to fabricate a core-shell nanostructure consisting of a ferrimagnetic core of CoFe2O4 and a piezoelectric shell of ZnO. The core size is varied and the elastic strain mediated magnetoelectric coupling mechanism through the interface of the core-shell nanostructure is examined.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The spin-transfer-torque-driven (STT-driven) dynamics of a domain wall in an easy-axis rare-earth transition-metal ferrimagnet is investigated theoretically and numerically in the vicinity of the angular momentum compensation point TA, where the net spin density vanishes. The particular focus is given on the unusual interaction of the antiferromagnetic dynamics of a ferrimagnetic domain wall and the adiabatic component of STT, which is absent in antiferromagnets but exists in the ferrimagnets due to the dominant coupling of conduction electrons to transition-metal spins. Specifically, we first show that the STT-induced domain-wall velocity changes its sign across TA due to the sign change of the net spin density, giving rise to a phenomenon unique to ferrimagnets that can be used to characterize TA electrically. It is also shown that the frequency of the STT-induced domain-wall precession exhibits its maximum at TA and it can approach the spin-wave gap at sufficiently high currents. Lastly, we report a numerical observation that, as the current density increases, the domain-wall velocity starts to deviate from the linear-response result, calling for a more comprehensive theory for the domain-wall dynamics in ferrimagnets driven by a strong current.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we study the effects of Rashba spin-orbit interaction, quantum barrier shape, barrier height, etc. on the spin polarization and less studied superarrival of spin-dependent Gaussian wave-packets propagating through one-dimensional rectangular and inverse parabolic quantum barriers. We show that in some situations the transient inverse parabolic barrier can be regarded as a reflectionless dispersion reducing tool for wave-packet propagation applications. Spin up and down components of the wave-packet have different Superarrivals and they can be tuned by means of the strength of the Rashba parameter. The superarrival effect is also very sensitive to the strength of the nonlinearity and can be eliminated by using a small 0.3 nonlinearity strength. Superarrival depends just on the physical properties of the system and the spin polarization of the incident initial wave packet does not affect it.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Carbon nanotubes loaded Fe3O4 (CNTs-loaded Fe3O4) composites synthesized via a common chemical vapor deposition method showed excellent electromagnetic wave absorption performance. The effect of different Fe3O4 content on the electromagnetic parameters and wave absorption properties of the CNTs-loaded Fe3O4 composites was investigated. The results indicated that the CNTs-loaded Fe3O4 composites with the content of 42.4% Fe3O4 exhibited the best absorption property among the as-synthesized CNTs-loaded Fe3O4 composites. The minimum RL value reached −35.9 dB at 7.12 GHz with a thickness of 3 mm. More significantly, the effective bandwidth less than −10 dB was 4.32 GHz with a thickness of 1.5 mm. Compared with pure CNTs or Fe3O4, the impedance matching of CNTs-loaded Fe3O4 composites is markedly improved. The absorbing mechanism is mainly due to the synergistic effect of improved impedance matching, interface scattering, dielectric loss and magnetic loss. CNTs-loaded Fe3O4 composites with excellent electromagnetic wave absorption performance contribute to the development of light and highly efficient electromagnetic wave absorbing materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Most liver tumors are non-surgical and require other treatments. Another non-surgical treatment for these tumors is the microwave technique. In this study, heat distribution and destruction of cancerous tissue in the liver using microwaves have been studied numerically. For this purpose, a microwave-generating antenna is used which is inserted into the position. By generating waves, the tumor cells become very hot and die. This procedure is performed to treat small liver lesions. It is sometimes used as a complementary treatment after surgery or chemotherapy. Frequency and power change in ranges 1.45 GHz ≤ f ≤ 8.45 GHz and 10 W ≤ P ≤ 40 W, respectively. The governing equations are solved with the help of the finite element method (FEM). Temperature distribution, degradation factor, specific absorption rate (SAR), and current density (due to the magnetic field) parameters are obtained at various frequencies and powers. The results show that each frequency has its performance so that low frequencies are more suitable for teardrop-shaped tumors or elongated appendages and high frequencies are more suitable for spherical-shaped tumors in deep areas. Besides, the destruction rate at higher frequencies is slower, but the process can be greatly increased by using high power. The highest local SAR occurs at 4.45 GHz.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Through applying GHz (Gigahertz) pulse current on the amorphous micro wire, we observed an increase in the coil voltage around the wire, and a sine function relationship between the coil voltage and the surrounding magnetic field. We assumed that the new performance of the coil voltage must be caused by the rotation of electron spins on the wire surface with GHz angular velocity, induced by the magnetic field force in the same direction, and proposed to name the observed new phenomena as GSR (Gigahertz Spin Rotation) effect. The developed GSR sensor presents excellent features with enhanced sensitivity and low hysteresis better than that of the GMI (Giant Magnetoimpedance) sensor. We developed the production technology to produce micro coils and developed a Micro-coil-on-ASIC (Application Specified Integrated Circuit) type GSR sensor, where the micro coils are directly formed on the ASIC surface, making small size GSR sensor possible.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The Berezinskii-Kosterlitz-Thouless (BKT) transition is a well-known phenomenon on planar surfaces; however, for curved spaces, the situation is not clear. In this work, we applied the Self-consistent Harmonic Approximation (SCHA) to study the XXZ ferromagnetic model on the spherical surface. The Hamiltonian is written in terms of the canonically conjugate fields (operators in the quantum formalism) Sz and Φ that provide a renormalized spin stiffness depending on temperature. We consider both semiclassical and quantum approaches to the problem. The BKT transition is then determined by the temperature that provides abrupt vanishing of the spin stiffness. Our results show TBKT values close to that obtained for the planar model, and they are in agreement with the general aspects of the BKT phase transition theory.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The domain structures of standard Sm2Fe17N3 particles and three almost α-(Fe,Co)-free magnetic compounds with a ThMn12-type structure, namely, (Sm0.9Zr0.1)(Fe0.8Co0.2)11.3Ti0.7, (Nd0.8Zr0.2)(Fe0.9Co0.1)11.3Ti0.7N1.5, and Nd(Fe0.8Co0.2)11MoN1.3, were examined via magnetic force microscopy. Using the observed domain widths (d) and particle sizes (D) in conjunction with classical equations, the domain wall energy (γ), critical single-domain particle size (Rc), exchange stiffness (Aex), and exchange integral (Jij) of the compounds were calculated.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In order to reduce the RE-Fe-B material cost and balance the utilization of rare earth sources, misch metal substitution for Nd in the sintered magnet becomes of many interests. Under the process of fabricating high magnetic properties magnet, the strip-casting (SC) technique plays a key role, a series of rapidly solidified [(PrNd)1-xMMx]13.8FebalCo0.5Cu0.1Al0.6Ga0.07B5.9 (x = 0 ~ 1.00) (MM, Misch Metal) strips were manufactured. Subsequently, the phase constitution, microstructure and the intrinsic magnetic properties were measured. There are always stable RE2Fe14B phase in the strips with MM, which is similar to Nd-Fe-B strip. Whereas, when x ≥ 0.50, there exists REFe2 phase inevitably, and the amount of REFe2 phase gradually increases with increasing MM content. Magnetic measurements indicated that intrinsic magnetic properties, such as the saturation magnetization Ms and magneto-anisotropy field HA, deteriorate gradually by substituting PrNd with MM except for x = 0.35. For x = 0.35, the abnormal phenomenon is ascribed to Ce valence shifting toward +3 that is caused by lattice expanding. In addition, when x ≥ 0.50, La and Ce is prior to aggregate in the RE-rich phase clusters, and the content of Fe rises with the increase of MM, moreover, the interfaces between of RE2Fe14B phase and RE-rich phase become indistinct.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.BaFe12O19/Ni0.5Co0.5Fe2O4 (H/S) as magnetic composite powder and subsequently carbon foam decorated with BaFe12O19/Ni0.5Co0.5Fe2O4 (H/S@CF) nanocomposites were prepared using one-step sol–gel and dip coating methods, respectively. Phase structures, morphology, magnetic and electromagnetic properties were evaluated using X-ray diffraction (XRD), Field emission electron microscopy (FESEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and vector network analyzer (VNA) respectively. According to the results, through XRD analysis, presence of pure barium hexaferrite, spinel ferrite and carbon are revealed. Rietveld refinement was also done to evaluate the phases in the prepared nanocomposites. FESEM analysis depicted the honey comb like structure of H/S@CF sample. Based on electromagnetic measurements, smooth and continuous behavior for permittivity and permeability of H/S@CF composite revealed strong interfacial polarization and migration of charges in the direction of field. The minimum reflection loss of H/S@CF nanocomposite was − 45 dB at a matching frequency of 12.4 GHz, and the effective bandwidth under − 10 dB was 4 GHz with a thickness of 2 mm. The excellent microwave absorption performances of H/S@CF nanocomposite may be ascribed because of the less dielectric, magnetic losses and high dielectric properties. H/S@CF nanocomposite is expected to be a suitable candidate for aeronautic and aerospace fields because of low cost, lightweight and better microwave absorbing material.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Size dependent coercivity of Fe particles synthesized through polyol process in a vast average size range from 210 nm to 19 nm has been reported. The large particles exhibit multidomain behaviour whereas the smaller particles show single domain nature and exchange bias. Saturation magnetization upto 211 emu/g, close to bulk Fe, has been obtained for particles with the largest average size. The major contribution to magnetization reversal is influenced by the magnetocrystalline anisotropy of Fe particles. The room temperature coercivity of multidomain particles with an average size of 210 nm is less than 100 Oe while that of 50 nm single domain particles reaches a maximum of 328 Oe. The TEM analysis of 50 nm and 19 nm particles reveal core shell morphology, with an iron oxide shell of thickness 3–4 nm. The increase in exchange anisotropy contribution due to size reduction has been studied from field cooled hysteresis loop measurements at 15 K. The interfacial exchange coupling between the core and shell gives rise to an exchange bias field of 16 Oe and 38 Oe for the 50 nm and 19 nm particles, respectively. Exchange bias blocking temperature of 50 K is observed for particles of average size 19 nm. The increase in exchange bias field for the particles of average size 19 nm has been correlated to interfacial effects using the Malozemhoff's random field model with a roughness factor of 2.51.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Motivated by the insufficient understanding of the drastic effects of the disordered interfacial phases at the interface in F/AF bilayers on the exchange bias properties, we consider a realistic model for F/AF nanodots which accounts for roughness at the interface, grain boundaries (GB) and magnetic frustration in the AF layer. Then, we investigate the effect of the magnetic disorder at the F/AF interface on the exchange field by means of Monte Carlo simulations. First, using a simplified model based on a perfect crystal structure (without GB) and with an ideal interface, our results indicate that non-collinear ordered magnetic configuration at the F/AF interface (due to frustration) causes a small decrease of the exchange field (about few dozen percent). Including GB in the model, we show that this kind of structural disorder produces disordered magnetic configurations with domains at the F/AF interface. This magnetic disorder does not lead to a decrease of the exchange field compared to the perfect crystal but makes the AF layer more stable. Our study also reveals that adding roughness in the form of a percentage of mixed F and AF moments in the interfacial layer results in a more significant decrease of the exchange field (two orders of magnitude) leading to values which are comparable to experimental values.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have undertaken a comparative study on the effect of Li-doping on the magnetic property of Cu(OH)2-CuO composite. A simple chemical solution route is used to synthesize the doped and undoped composite samples, while the structural characterization was investigated using X-ray Diffraction studies. With 1% Li-doping in Cu(OH)2-CuO, we discover dramatic changes in the magnetic features of both CuO and Cu(OH)2, which is directly reflected in the temperature-dependent magnetic susceptibility and field-dependent magnetization curves. It is found that the antiferromagnetic transition temperature for monoclinic CuO is reduced from 230 to 216 K while the same in contrast is enhanced from 55 to ~85 K for orthorhombic Cu(OH)2 upon Li-doping in Cu(OH)2-CuO. More importantly, the shape of the magnetic susceptibility curve, as observed in Li doped Cu(OH)2-CuO, indicates the weakening of the quasi-1D property of CuO. The present study demonstrates that the underlying magnetism (dimensionality as well as collective magnetic ordering) for both CuO and Cu(OH)2 in Cu(OH)2-CuO can be tailored by Li-substitution.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.New determination of the magnetic anisotropy from single crystals of (Fe1-xCox)2B alloys are presented. The anomalous temperature dependence of the anisotropy constant is discussed using the standard Callen-Callen theory, which is shown to be insufficient to explain the experimental results. A more material specific study using first-principles calculations with disordered moments approach gives a much more consistent interpretation of the experimental data. Since the intrinsic properties of the alloys with x=0.3-0.35 are promising for permanent magnets applications, initial investigation of the extrinsic properties are described, in particular the crystallization of melt spun ribbons with Cu, Al, and Ti additions. Previous attempts at developing a significant hysteresis have been unsuccessful in this system. Our melt-spinning experiment indicates that this system shows rapid crystallization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report the adiabatic temperature change in ErAl2 magnetocaloric wires fabricated by a powder-in-tube (PIT) process. The adiabatic temperature change of the PIT wires is found to be determined by not only the volume fraction of ErAl2 core but also the magnitude relationship between the specific heat of the ErAl2 core and the metal sheath. We propose a quantitative analysis method for calculating the temperature and core volume fraction dependence of adiabatic temperature change in the PIT wire, whose formula is applicable to also various magnetocaloric composites, useful to estimate the magnetocaloric response prior to fabrication.© 2020Polyoxopalladates hosting 3d, 4d or 4f central ions form a new class of molecular materials with well-defined, tunable morphology and ions coordination to be considered as model systems for basic research. We investigated the isotropic X-ray absorption near-edge structure (XANES), X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD), and X-ray magnetic linear dichroism (XMLD) to monitor the influence of symmetry changes on electronic and magnetic properties. After a brief introductory review about recent results on 3d and 4d transition metal ions, we (i) show that a change of the coordination symmetry from cubic eightfold (tetrahedral) to sixfold (octahedral) reduces the magnetic moment of Co2+ significantly and (ii) investigate whether axial distortions can modify the 4f states of trivalent lanthanide ions. While for Gd3+ there is no effect visible within experimental uncertainties, changes were observed for Dy3+ and Ho3+. The results are compared to atomic multiplet calculations including the intra-atomic spin-dipole term 〈Tz〉. Furthermore, several experimental pitfalls are discussed that may lead to misinterpretation of X-ray absorption data but can be excluded in the present study.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.High-coercivity Nd–Fe–B magnets are required for clean energy applications, particularly for hybrid and electric vehicles. This study was focused on the structural design of a Nd2Fe14B-based magnet by precise engineering of its microstructure, which included grain-boundary diffusion and grain-boundary structuring processes, through the introduction of a hydrogenated Tb3Co0.6Cu0.4Hx composition in the powder mixture. A low-rare-earth-metal strip-cast Nd-24.0, Pr-6.5, Dy-0.5, B-1.0, Al-0.2, Fe-balance (wt.%) alloy was used as the base component of the powder mixture. The distributions of the components of the blended powder mixture in the sintered magnet with the added 2 wt% of Tb3Co0.6Cu0.4Hx and stability of the structure-sensitive magnetic parameter (coercive force) during a low-temperature heat treatment were studied. The sample exhibited a high coercive force up to 1480 kA/m at a heavy rare-earth element content in the 2–14–1 phase of ~1 at.%.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The author acknowledges the usage of the following sentences, which were part of the rejection letter for his manuscript submitted earlier in another version to another journal from an editorial member of that journal: “The XMCD measurements were performed on Si capped ultrathin Fe films. It is well known that capping can strongly influence the magnetic properties of ultrathin films underneath. Capping ultrathin Fe films with Si at room temperature could cause the formation of an iron silicide layer at the interface.” (Page 3, section 4.1, first paragraph). Previously however, the following group of words, which were a part of the author's earlier submission, were directly used multiple times in the same editorial rejection letter as their usages retain the same sense: “surface sensitive […]”, “of the magnetic moments […]”, “the error bar […]”, “ultrathin Fe films […]”, “are quite […]”, “complementary to […]”, “this thickness range […]”, “magnetization of […]”, “orbital moment […]”, “element specific […]”, “PNR is not sensitive […]”, “spin and orbital moments […]”, “Fe on Cu(001) […]”, “XMCD measurements […]”, “were performed […]” The author also noticed that the fitted lines for the polarized neutron reflectivity (PNR) data in Fig. 10 and Fig. 11 were not properly visible in the published article. The author merely provides a clearer version of the same figures below.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In in vivo applications of magnetic particles one crucial aspect is the control of their transport in the tissue microvasculature and their release to target areas. These mechanisms can be driven and influenced by external magnetic fields with large gradients. Experimental results can be elucidated with the aid of in silico models that can also be employed to design optimized multifunctional particles and magnetic field sources. In this framework, we have developed a numerical model that enables us to calculate the trajectory of an ensemble of magnetic nano/microbeads injected in a blood vessel and manipulated by an applied magnetic field. The model combines Navier-Stokes equations for the fluid dynamics simulation of blood flow with classical Newtonian mechanics for bead motion, performing the analysis in a 3D vessel segment reconstructed from a computed tomography scan. The numerical model is applied to study the influence of bead properties (size and magnetic moment) on both transport and adhesion rate, taking into account the interplay of magnetic and viscous drag forces, as well as magnetic dipole–dipole and steric interactions. We also consider different configurations of the external magnetic field source, in order to optimize bead accumulation and adhesion to the vessel wall in a specific target region, processes that can be driven by magnetic forces.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.For the stability analysis or dynamic analysis of the interface phenomena of magnetic fluids as the Rosensweig instability, this paper presents mainly a magnetic analysis with reduced loads, since magnetic fields must be re-calculated every time step the interface changes. This method adopts the indirect boundary element method (IBEM), since the behavior of the surface can be explained mainly by the magnetic stress difference obtained from the interface magnetic field. Starting with Green's theorem applied for harmonic fields, the magnetic potential and the normal magnetic induction are obtained separately through the density of singular sources on boundaries. The problems of sharp-pointed peaks on the interface, or edges and corners where boundaries cross are avoided easily. The magnetic field, the interface stresses and the fluid velocity are calculated on the largely-deformed interface in a two-layered system of fluid and vacuum domain under a homogeneous vertical magnetic field. In consideration of the nonlinear equation of motion of the pattern amplitude (Gollwitzer et al., 2010), the sum of interface stresses and the normal fluid velocity are shown in the phase space of the height of the solitary-wave interface profile and the intensity of the applied magnetic induction. This IBEM is compared with another method called Magnetic Analysis for General Use (MAGU, Mizuta, 2011) on the formulation basis, and their extension to the nonlinear magnetization is discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The local distributions of the one-dimensional dilute annealed Ising model with charged impurities are studied. Explicit expressions are obtained for the pair distribution functions and correlation lengths, and their low-temperature asymptotic behavior is explored depending on the concentration of impurities. For a more detailed consideration of the ordering processes, we study local distributions. Based on the Markov property of the dilute Ising chain, we obtain an explicit expression for the probability of any finite sequence and find a geometric probability distribution for the lengths of sequences consisting of repeating blocks. An analysis of distributions shows that the critical behavior of the spin correlation length is defined by ferromagnetic or antiferromagnetic sequences, while the critical behavior of the impurity correlation length is defined by the sequences of impurities or by the charge-ordered sequences. For the dilute Ising chain, there are no other repeating sequences whose mean length diverges at zero temperature. While both the spin correlation and the impurity correlation lengths can diverge only at zero temperature, the ordering processes result in a maximum of the specific heat at finite temperature defined by the maximum rate of change of the impurity-spin pairs concentration. A simple approximate equation is found for this temperature. We show that the non-ordered dilute Ising chains correspond to the regular Markov chains, while various orderings generate the irregular Markov chains of different types.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.It is predicted that the oxygen behaviour in A-site may be different from that of B-site. The magnetic behaviour of oxygen in alkaline ferrites having the composition AFe2O4 (A = Mg, Ca and Sr) has been discussed using electronic structure calculations. The calculations have shown that the physical properties of the studied compounds are exclusively sensitive to the magnetic moment carried by the 2p-electrons of the oxygen anions. The compounds, with A = Ca, Sr and Ba, have a closely related electronic structures different from MgFe2O4. Fe with oxygen is more active in Ca, Sr and Ba than in the Mg compound this means that Oxygen atom is inactive in alkaline ferrites when carrying no moment. The calculations have shown that the alkaline impurities, with relatively large covalent radius, can form an excitonic state near the band edge of the ferrite. The electron pockets formed at the high symmetry point N in up and down channel for MgFe2O4, but these pockets not appear for the other studied compounds. MgFe2O4 has shown a lower current carrier density than the others compounds. The spin relaxation is expected to be suppressed as moving from Mg to Ba. It is speculated that as u increases, the ferrite becomes more efficient for the electronics that depends mainly on the electron spin.© 2020In order to figure out the effect of excess Mn atoms on the preference of the martensite structure, the tetragonal distortion was employed in the off-stoichiometric Ni-Mn-In alloys with different Mn contents using the Extra Muffin-tin Orbital combined with the Coherent Potential Approximation (EMTO-CPA). The calculations were conducted with the optimization of the magnetic structure, where the stoichiometric Ni2MnIn alloy was served as the reference. The ground state-energy-resolved tetragonal distortion reveals that the excess Mn changes the preferred stable structure from the perfect cubic L21 structure to the tetragonally distorted structures. The stable tetragonal structure could shift from c/a < 1 to c/a > 1 with the increase of the Mn concentration. Furthermore, to find out more accurate preference of the martensite structure, the formation energies were calculated using different relaxation methods. The chemical disorder method with a 4-atom cell was used for the tetragonal L10 structure by the EMTO-CPA, and the supercell method with a 96-atom cell was applied for the orthorhombic structure by the VASP at 0 K in their ferromagnetic state. The results show that, compared with the perfect cubic L21 structure of the stoichiometric Ni2MnIn alloy, the orthorhombic structure is preferred at lower Mn concentrations (between 29 at. % and 40 at. %), whereas the tetragonal L10 structure is more stable at the higher Mn concentrations (above 40 at. %). Moreover, the effect of the Mn concentration on the magnetic properties was also studied. With the increase of excess Mn content, the magnetic moment increases linearly in the ferromagnetic cubic L21 structure, whereas it varies in the two kinds of martensite. The excess Mn could lead to the coexistence of ferromagnetism and antiferromagnetism. The appearance of the antiferromagnetism could be attributed to the Ni-Mn antiferromagnetic interaction in the tetragonal martensite.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Gas nitriding and high-energy ball milling were adopt to prepare iron nitrides samples. The iron nitrides samples with different nitrogen contents and different magnetic properties were obtained through mixing with different ingredients with high-energy ball milling process. The samples were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), high-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and vector network analyzer (VNA). The iron nitrides samples were nanostructured and contained lots of interfaces, boundaries and defects inside the particles. The electromagnetic wave reflection loss (RL) value was simulated according to transmission line theory by using the samples’ electromagnetic parameters. The sample with a saturation magnetization of 173.3 emu∙g−1 had the best RL value, which reached −63.31 dB at 17.93 GHz with a thickness of 1.77 mm. The samples with Ms value greater than 90.9 emu∙g−1 could effectively absorb electromagnetic waves in the Ku band. The absorption performance decreased with the decreasing Ms value. The nanostructure obtained by high-energy ball milling was discussed to be beneficial for improving the permittivity and the permeability of the iron nitrides samples in the Ku band. The electromagnetic wave absorption mechanisms were also analyzed. In addition, this study offers a reference for industrially producing electromagnetic wave absorbing materials with low cost.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports the evaporation and drying characteristics of ferrofluid droplets on a PDMS (Polydimethylsiloxane) substrate under the influence of magnetic field. The effect of magnetic field strength and asymmetry of the external magnetic field with respect to the axis of the droplet is studied. Goniometric measurement is used for visualization of the evaporating droplets. Confocal microscopy is used for imaging the drying pattern and particle motion inside the droplet. The magnetic field strength is controlled by varying the distance between the magnet and the substrate. COMSOL Multiphysics software is used to report the magnetic field and magnetic force distribution. The uniform deposition of drying pattern is observed under the influence of magnetic field. The effect of magnetic field on evaporation dynamics is attributed to the modification in drying pattern. The evaporation of the droplet takes place in constant contact radius (CCR) mode, constant contact angle (CCA) mode, mixed mode, and late pinning mode. Both sliding of the droplet and receding of the contact line is observed during evaporation when the center of magnet is not aligned with the center of the droplet. The suppression in duration of the CCR and CCA modes of evaporation and increase in duration of mixed mode evaporation is observed at higher magnetic field strength. The initial contact angle decreases and receding contact angle increases with increasing strength of magnetic field. This is attributed to lower concentration of nanoparticle in the contact line region resulting in lower frictional resistance to the contact line motion. Hump formation takes place at the apex region of the droplet, which depends on the strength of the magnetic field and local concentration of nanoparticle. The hump formation is followed by splitting of the droplet.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A facile in-situ strategy has been developed to synthesize lightweight ultrathin coal-derived carbon-nickel composites (CDC/Ni) with superior microwave absorption performances using anthracite as raw material for the first time. The phase structure and chemical composition were investigated by X-ray diffractometry (XRD) and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). Field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM) images indicate that the surface of the composite is covered with layered stripes and a large number of macropores. Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) images show Ni nanoparticle size from 30 to 80 nm. Since the introduction of magnetic nickel increases the magnetic loss and improves impedance matching, the CDC/Ni magnetic composites exhibit excellent microwave absorption performance. Specifically, a minimum reflection loss of −62.51 dB is observed at 15.76 GHz, with an effective absorption bandwidth of 4.08 GHz, while the thickness is only 1.31 mm. The superior microwave absorption performance is mainly attributed to the suitable conductivity of CDC. The presence of the nickel nanoparticles has enabled to achieve impedance matching. Besides, the special morphology and oxygen-containing functional groups also bring out various loss mechanisms. Therefore, such CDC/Ni composites could be potential lightweight high performance microwave absorbing materials. In addition, our strategy is a cleaner and more efficient process to utilize coals.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The phase transformation mechanism and magnetic properties of the Sm-Fe alloy powders produced by melt-spinning and high-energy ball milling are investigated. The amorphous phase is stable between 2 and 5 h, and the SmFe9 phase is precipitated from the amorphous matrix after milled for 5 h. The time of 3–5 h is optimal to obtain the largest number of short-range/medium-range order in the amorphous alloy, which can contribute to the formation of uniform microstructure in the subsequent crystallization annealing process. The magnetic properties of the nitrided powders produced by crystallizing the amorphous precursors are improved compared to the properties of those produced by direct melt-spinning. The coercivity (Hcj) and the remanence (Br) are increased by 1.28 kOe and 23.6 emu/g, respectively. This kind of micro-regulation plays a key role in improving the magnetic properties after nitrogenating and lays the foundation for the production of bulk materials in the future.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, flaky carbonyl iron powder (CIP)@SiO2 particle/polyurethane (PU) composites with different steric configurations were prepared using a rotating magnetic field and different cutting methods. The effects of the angle between the easy magnetization plane and the vector of incident electromagnetic (EM) waves on the EM parameters and microwave absorption characteristics were studied. In order to investigate the influences of different steric configurations of the flaky CIP@SiO2 particles on the EM parameters of the composites, the complex permeability of the samples was calculated using the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation and Bruggeman's effective medium theory combined with consideration of the shape anisotropy. The calculated results agreed well with the experimental results. In addition, it was revealed that the complex permeability of the composites was dominated mainly by the steric configuration of the flaky CIP@SiO2 particles, which was significant for the development of an excellent absorber in oblique incident conditions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report numerical stable and localized breather-soliton solutions of the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation for ferromagnetic wires of easy-axis anisotropy under the influence of an external periodic magnetic field and considering the detailed magnetocrystalline anisotropy field. Specifically, we study the existence and the precessional and nutational motion of these structures in iron wires (with cubic anisotropy) and in cobalt wires (with hexagonal anisotropy).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The study of closure domain structure dynamics at the end of magnetic bistable glass-coated microwire is presented. The method in which critical parameters of the so-called three-level rectangular field pulse are measured is used. It is shown that dependences measured using three-level field pulses cannot be satisfactorily interpreted by the model in which application of a rectangular field pulse causes the release of a single domain wall from a potential well. A new model based on the simplest possible closure domain structures at the microwire end is proposed. In the framework of this model the application of a non-zero first-level field results in changes in domain wall parameters (inertial mass and mobility) which have opposite effects on the prolonging/shortening of critical field pulse width and do not provide satisfactory explanation of experimental observations. Shortening of the path which the wall has to move along to become free can result from the wall lengthening caused by application of the non-zero first-level field. This effect combined with position-independent force acting on the wall can explain the observed behaviour. Modelling of this process is also presented and supports this interpretation.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe transition region between the active area and the edge termination of silicon carbide (SiC) MOSFET is either used to place a poly-silicon gate runner (G-MOS) or electrically contacted to the source potential (S-MOS), which is studied experimentally and by TCAD simulation in this work. The simulation results indicate that the transition region of G-MOS can effectively alleviate the propagation delay in the poly-silicon gate and allow all elementary cells to turn on quickly at the same gate voltage magnitude, which leads to a lower on-resistance (Ron), and small switching delay time. On the other hand, the transition region of G-MOS increases the Miller capacitance (Cgd), which can be reduced by shortening the length of the transition region. The simulation results are further validated by the experimental values, which show a reduction of Ron of G-MOS by 2–12% and an increase of Cgd of G-MOS by 72% compared to S-MOS. Moreover, the transition region barely influences the breakdown voltage of the devices, which are both higher than 1700 V.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetism has been used for years as a subsidiary method to identify the level of mechanical residual stress through ferromagnetic steels. It is admitted that residual stress strongly modifies the magnetic behavior and consequently the monitored magnetic signatures. However, some of them like the Eddy Current Magnetic Signature (EC-MS) happen to be especially sensitive. EC-MS exhibits drastic changes, strong enough to predict and anticipate the presence of elastic or plastic deformations. The EC-MS signature is obtained by plotting the imaginary part versus the real part of an Eddy current probe impedance, controlling locally a tested sample under the influence of a slowly varying high amplitude magnetic excitation. The superimposition of the weak amplitude, high-frequency magnetic excitation of the Eddy current probe to the quasi-static contribution creates minor hysteresis loop situations where the reversible magnetic contribution is the main provider. EC-MS is, therefore, an exceptional way to observe and characterize this reversible contribution and this over different average magnetic states. This contribution tends to be particularly sensitive to residual stresses and strains, and so is EC-MS. In this article, the Jiles-Atherton-Sablik theory and an improved Dodd and Deeds analytical solution for the simulation of a pancake-type Eddy current coil are combined to simulate EC-MS. From the simulation results, we illustrate and understand why EC-MS is so sensitive to residual stress. Eventually, we justify this method as probably the most indicated magnetic method for the control and evaluation of residual stresses through structural and construction steels.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Temperature-dependent magnetic properties of cobalt chromite (CoCr2O4) and nickel chromite (NiCr2O4) nanoparticles (NPs) have been compared by using magnetic measurements. The average particle size of CoCr2O4 and NiCr2O4 NPs deduced from TEM images was found to be 48 and 46 nm, respectively. The NiCr2O4 NPs showed paramagnetic to ferrimagnetic transition (Tc) at 84 K which is relatively lower than the Tc = 98 K for CoCr2O4 NPs. The temperature dependent Ms value for CoCr2O4 NPs showed deviation from Bloch's law at low temperatures which may be due to the existence of lock-in and strong conical spin spiral state. NiCr2O4 NPs showed a good Bloch's law fit with high value of Bloch's constant B = 0.00183 K−1 and low value of Bloch's exponent b = 1.23 than their respective bulk value which indicates the presence of disordered surface spins and finite size effect in these NPs. Interestingly, a high value of Hc (5 K) was observed for NiCr2O4 NPs relative to CoCr2O4 NPs which is attributed to the large canted angle between the oxygen and metallic cations in NiCr2O4 NPs. Temperature dependent coercivity (Hc) for both the NPs were fitted with Kneller's law. The Kneller's law fit to Hc vs. T data revealed an exponent α = 0.46 for CoCr2O4 NPs which indicates the non-interacting particles with uni-axial symmetry, while it was 0.74 for NiCr2O4 NPs indicating the assembly of randomly oriented particles. In summary, CoCr2O4 and NiCr2O4 NPs showed a different low temperature magnetic response which is also relatively different than counter ferrite NPs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigate whether field homogeneity of a magnetic assembly can be optimized by varying the remanence of its constituting magnetic segments. We specifically study this hypothesis for a Halbach cylinder using a numerical model, MagTense. We consider a Halbach cylinder consisting of six layers of three concentric rings, each ring made from 16 segments. We show that ideally, the homogeneity can reach close to 1 ppm for a finite magnet. We then proceed to consider a real world set of magnet segments, i.e. non-ideal magnets with a variation in their remanence. This reduces the field homogeneity to about 1000 ppm when considering a Gaussian perturbation of the remanence with a standard deviation of 1%. However, we also show that the reduction in homogeneity may be countered by organizing the magnet pieces found through optimization, which is possible if each magnet segment is well characterized experimentally. We note that the presented method is applicable to any case where homogeneity of the field is important. The results we present are considered for the specific case of nuclear magnetic resonance for concretenes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The nonlinear magnetic behaviour of superparamagnetic iron-oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs) has attracted interest as a valuable feature for upcoming medical applications. Injecting SPIONs into the human body affects their magnetic properties through the formation of protein corona or cell immobilisation. It is therefore important to study the effects of environmental changes on the magnetic susceptibility of SPIONs. A superparamagnetic quantifier (SPaQ) is used here to assess the differential magnetic susceptibility of three commercially available SPIONs: Synomag®, Resovist® and Sienna+®. The following experiments were carried out to mimic the influence of the biological environment on the magnetic responses of SPIONs: (i) varying the viscosity of the medium; and (ii) immobilising the nanoparticles by freeze-drying. Differential magnetisation curves as a function of the applied magnetic field were visualised to reveal the dynamic magnetic behaviour of SPIONs in both experiments. Synomag® displayed the lowest decrease (~5%) in differential magnetic susceptibility compared to Resovist® (~33%) and Sienna+® (~21%), for a change from water to a high-viscosity fluid. Although Synomag® showed a clear drop in differential magnetic susceptibility (~58%) after freeze-drying, it still appears to be a promising candidate for clinical applications due to its low sensitivity to changes in viscosity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Temperature-dependent Raman spectroscopy, X-ray absorption near-edge spectroscopy (XANES), optical absorption spectroscopy (OAS) and ac-susceptibility measurements have been carried out on GaFeO3 samples to understand the effect of sintering temperature (TS) on optical and magneto-elastic properties. The temperature-dependent ac-susceptibility measurements suggest the systematic scaling in the values of ferri-magnetic transition temperature (TC) with TS. The observed variation has been understood in terms of enhancement in the Goodenough-Kanamori-Anderson coupling. Instead of expected anharmonic behavior in Raman spectra around TC, several vibrational modes of rigid FeO6 units were found to show anomalous behavior, which suggests the significant magneto-elastic coupling contributions to phonon frequencies. The strength of magneto-elastic coupling has been quantified by using the phonon renormalization function (Δw) and is found to scale systematically with TS. Further, optical absorption study demonstrates the increase in intensity and red shift in charge-neutral d-d transitions, which infers the increase in oxygen non-stoichiometry with TS. The oxygen non-stoichiometry has been further quantified by the XANES measurements. The present investigations on GaFeO3 samples reveal that TC can be tuned by varying the oxygen stoichiometry and can be very beneficial for spintronic devices applications.© 2020 Elsevier LtdPresent work has used Green's function approach to derive a two-dimensional analytical model of the double gate (DG) MOSFET at the subthreshold regime of operation that considers the effect of inevitable source/drain (S/D) lateral Gaussian doping profile. The non-integrable Gaussian term has been converted into an integrable function for accurate Fourier coefficient calculation which is then used to determine the potential equations of all three regions. These equations are then utilized to formulate channel current (Isub), the threshold voltage (Vt) roll off and subthreshold slope (SS) of the device. The effects of lateral Gaussian profile at different gate length (L), and for devices with different combinations of oxide thickness (tox) and channel thickness (tsi) have been investigated. The results show that the S/D Gaussian doping profile has severe effects at scaled gate lengths, where gate electrostatic control is of paramount importance.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nickel microspheres with core–shell structure were synthesized via depositing nickel metal on the polystyrene (PS) microspheres surface by the method of chemical platting, which were used to assemble a multiple-loss absorbers hybrids of Ni@MWCNTs. The nickel shell thickness of Ni-microspheres was controlled via regulating the platting solution concentration of nickel sulfate solution. XRD analysis indicated that the Ni@MWCNTs hybrids still retained the crystal structure of MWCNTs and nickel metal. The SEM results showed that the nickel shell thickness of Ni-microspheres was effectively regulated by altering the plating solution concentration. When the plating solution was 24 g/L, 12 g/L and 6 g/L, the nickel shell thickness of Ni-1, Ni-2 and Ni-3 microspheres were 55 nm, 45 nm and 20 nm, respectively. While the nickel shell thickness of Ni-2 microspheres was 45 nm, the Ni-2@MWCNTs hybrids presented the best microwave absorption (MA) property. At 11.20 GHz, the minimum reflection coefficient (RC(min)) value was −40.65 dB and the bandwidth of RL < -10 dB was 3.6 GHz, while the RC(min) of Ni-1@MWCNTs and Ni-3@MWCNTs were −17.83 dB and −27.52 dB, respectively. The results demonstrated that the nickel shell thickness of Ni-microspheres had a meaningful influence on the MA performance of Ni@MWCNTs hybrids.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Energy crisis prompts the society to improve the utilization efficiency of traditional energies and develop new renewable energies. In industrial sector more than half of electric power sources are consumed by various kinds of electric-driven motors. Compared with traditional motors permanent magnet motors exhibit much great advantages in improving the conversion efficiency from the electrical energy to mechanical energy, and vice versa. The fabrication of the permanent magnet motors requires large amounts of permanent magnets. Nd-Fe-B magnets are the most popular permanent magnets in manufacturing permanent magnet motors due to the high magnetic energy product. To keep Nd-Fe-B magnet motors from demagnetizing at high operation temperatures (150 ~ 200 °C) heavy rare earth elements Dy/Tb are added to improve the coercivity. For example, the sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets used for producing wind turbines and electric/hybird vehicle motors usually contain about 10 wt% Dy/Tb. This accelerates the consumption of limited Dy/Tb resources. The technology of grain boundary diffusion process (GBDP) makes full use of Dy/Tb to improve the coercivity of sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets. In addition, GBDP has also been successfully utilized in promoting the coercivity of hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets. This article summarizes the recent developments of GBDP in fabricating Nd-Fe-B magnets with high magnetic properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Noncollinear magnetic moments in antiferromagnets (AFM) lead to a complex behavior of electrical transport, even to a decreasing resistivity due to an increasing temperature. Proper treatment of such phenomena is required for understanding AFM systems at finite temperatures; however first-principles description of these effects is complicated. With ab initio techniques, we investigate three models of spin fluctuations (magnons) influencing the transport in AFM CuMnAs; the models are numerically feasible and easily implementable to other studies. We numerically justified a fully relativistic collinear disordered local moment approach and we present its uncompensated generalization. A saturation or a decrease of resistivity caused by magnons, phonons, and their combination (above approx. 400 K) was observed and explained by changes in electronic structure. Within the coherent potential approximation, our finite-temperature approaches may be applied also to systems with impurities, which are found to have a large impact not only on residual resistivity, but also on canting of magnetic moments from the AFM to the ferromagnetic (FM) state.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Synchrotron radiation (SR) is an interesting tool for probing the properties of the matter in various domains such as nanotechnology, energy materials, catalysis and the cultural heritage. Herein, we synthesized nanomultiferroic samples La1−xCexFeO3 (0.00 ≤ x ≤ 0.15) using auto combustion method and glycine as a fuel. The magnetic behavior was studied and interrelated with the results of synchrotron radiation X-ray absorption fine structure (XAFS) spectroscopy for better understanding the compositional-dependent fine local structures of A-site (Ce3+) doped LaFeO3 nanomultiferroic. The crystallinity and phase formation of the samples of perovskite structure were confirmed by XRD technique. Field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM) revealed the formation of homogenous porous morphology in the prepared nanomultiferroic. The collected XAFS signals at Fe K- edge (7112 eV) and La L3- edge (5483 eV) are analyzed, fitted, and refined in both the XANES and EXAFS regions. All obtained results are correlated in order to help in the interpretation of the magnetic character of nanocrystallite La1−xCexFeO3 (0.00 ≤ x ≤ 0.15). It was observed that there is a magnetization improvement in Ce3+ doped LaFeO3 samples where the molar magnetic susceptibility (χM) increased upon Ce3+ doping. The characteristics of the improved magnetic nanomultiferroic hand in hand with its distinguished morphology recommend it in multifunctional applications such as catalysts and/or γ-radiation dosimetry purposes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the mean-field approximation, static and dynamic properties of isotropic ferrimagnet with two sub-lattices with spin equaling one and spin one-half are investigated. It was shown that the account of non-Heisenberg (biquadratic) exchange interaction can lead to the realization of the phase characterized with vector order parameters (ferrimagnetic phase) or of the phase, characterized by both vector and tensor order parameters (quadrupolar-ferrimagnetic).The quadrupolar-ferrimagnetic phase realizes due to the account of biquadratic exchange interaction in the first spin-1 sub-lattice. The type of the phase transition and the conditions of the magnetic moments compensation were determined.© 2020 Elsevier LtdA novel PNP-triggered dynamic substrate GGNMOS (gate-grounded NMOS) structure is proposed and verified in 0.18 μm salicided CMOS process. Owing to the dynamic substrate technique and imbedded PNP transistor which injects triggering current to the substrate under ESD (electrostatic discharge) events, the proposed structure features a small trigger voltage, a small snapback region, a high robustness, and a larger margin of ESD design window is achieved. Compared with traditional dynamic substrate GGNMOS, the proposed structure promotes FOM (figure of merit) by 60%. So it is a more feasible solution in ESD protections applications of low-voltage and thin gate oxide process for its overall improved performances.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.New complex Cr-containing pyrochlores Ln2CrTaO7, Ln = Y, Sm, Gd, were synthesized. The Rietveld refinement of the Ln2CrTaO7 composition confirmed the pyrochlore type of the structure. The Cr3+ oxidation state is corroborated by XANES spectra. The detailed study of DC and AC magnetization of Ln2CrTaO7, Ln = Y, Sm, Gd, was carried out in the temperature range 2–300 K and magnetic field up to 5 T. FM phase transitions at 143, 192, and 163 K were observed in pyrochlores with Y, Sm, and Gd, respectively. It is shown that these transitions are due to canted antiferromagnetism or weak-ferromagnetism in the Ln2CrTaO7 pyrochlores. AFM interactions between Ln- and Cr-sublattices in Sm2CrTaO7 and Gd2CrTaO7 causes AFM transition at T = 42 K, after which magnetization continues increasing. Unusual magnetic properties were observed for Gd2CrTaO7 at low temperatures. Competitive FM and AFM interactions in Cr-and Gd-sublattice give rise to the occurrence of reentrant spin glass at T < 20 K. FM transition at 11 K is also detected. Spin glass state exists along with strong FM interactions. The effect of the magnetic properties on thermal expansion is also investigated for these compounds.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a doping and field-assisted sintering process is provided to accelerate the densification of silver microwires. Silver microwire doped with a small amount of nickel nanoparticles sintered in a magnetic field can efficiently improve the densification and conductivity of wires. The silver microwire doped with nickel mass fraction of 5 wt% was sintered in a magnetic field with the intensity of 15 mT achieved the maximum shrinkage. Compared with the wire made of pure silver nanoparticles sintered without magnetic field, the shrinkage rate increased by 67.7%, and the resistivity reduced by 15.5%. We reasonably analyzed the wire densification mechanism by scanning the surface and internal structure of the microwire.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fe-Co films were prepared by electrodeposition from an electrolyte containing citric acid and annealed afterwards at different temperatures up to 700 °C. The grain sizes of the deposits increased from 11 nm to 30 nm with increasing annealing temperature, which lead to changes in magnetic properties of deposits. SQUID measurements indicate that there is a difference between the coercive force, Hc, of the as deposited samples (17 Oe) and the heat-treated samples (25–40 Oe) with a measurement error of 1–2 Oe. The remnant magnetization, Mr, decreased from 190 ± 12 emu/cm3 for the as deposited to 75 ± 5 emu/cm3 for the annealed samples, respectively. The saturation magnetization, Ms, seems not to be influenced strongly by the thermal treatment, with the only exception for the samples annealed at 500 °C. Thus, Ms has a slightly decreasing tendency from 1880 ± 90 emu/cm3 for the as-deposited samples to 1780 ± 85 emu/cm3 for samples annealed at 700 °C. The biggest value for Ms (2100 ± 105 emu/cm3) was obtained if the samples were annealed at 500 °C. The thermal treatment generated cracks in the deposits. Interestingly, these cracks had a regular rectangular shape only if the deposits were annealed at 600 °C. The coercivity of the layers annealed at 600 °C was lower compared to layers annealed at the other temperatures. Magnetic force microscopy measurements indicated the magnetic domain distribution and the topography of the annealed deposits. The deposits showed the best soft magnetic properties if annealed between 500 and 600 °C.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The low temperature magnetic state of martensite in the shape memory Ni50Mn37.5Sn12.5 single crystal was confirmed from DC and AC magnetization measurements. At temperatures below the martensite finish and above the Curie temperature of martensite the martensite phase shows superparamagnetic behavior. On cooling growing superparamagnetic clusters manifest a strong interaction and develop, below the freezing temperature (~200 K), into a nonconventional spin glass state. The amount of retained austenite evaluated by high-energy synchrotron radiation was estimated at the level of 1.5 – 2%. Subsequent training procedure cleansed martensite from any retained austenite fraction. The evaluated cluster magnetic moment decreased following training (~9.5%). It is demonstrated that the retained austenite effectively subsidizes but not warrants the superparamagnetic exchange in martensite, which descends from alterations in interatomic spacing inflicted by martensitic transformation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetomotive optical coherence tomography (MMOCT) is a functional modification of conventional optical coherence tomography (OCT). It utilizes the nano-scale displacement embedded magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) and subsequent amplitude and phase changes in OCT interferogram scattered from samples. We report a new robust method for ‘phase-lock-in’ detection of MMOCT signals and subsequent imaging. We validated this method utilizing iron-gold (Fe-Au) composite nanoparticles as an exogenous contrast agent for MMOCT. High contrast and specific background-subtracted images was generated for Fe-Au MNPs targeted samples. MMOCT with MNPs imaging systems was corroborated with tissue phantoms and in-vivo swiss albino mice model with modulating external magnetic field (resonant frequency of 30 Hz). A time-dependent dynamics study of diffusion for MNPs inside the tissue of mice as a function of time and depth is also reported.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Iron doped titanium nitride thin films were prepared by RF/DC magnetron sputtering of titanium and iron targets in the presence of argon and nitrogen gasses. Iron concentration in the films was controlled by adjusting the DC power of the sputtering gun whereas the RF power for the titanium target was kept constant for all the films. Spectrophotometry of the grown films revealed a reduction in the bandgap with the increase in the iron concentration in the films. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy of the films confirmed the presence of iron and the increase in its concentration with the increase in the DC sputtering power. The surface roughness of the films slightly increased with the increase in the iron concentration. All the grown films were n-type semiconductors and the carrier concentration increased with the increase in iron concentration. Positive magnetoresistance was observed in undoped or low-doped titanium nitride films, whereas negative magnetoresistance was observed in the films with high iron concentration, which was due to the formation of ferromagnetically aligned magnetic polarons.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate spin-orbit torque (SOT) driven multi-state magnetization switching in Co/Pt Hall crosses in the presence of varying externally applied in-plane (IP) bias fields from room temperature (RT = 295 K) to 360 K. In-situ Kerr imaging at various resistance states reveal the evolution of up and down magnetic domain expansion due to current-induced SOT switching. The control of magnetization states in the Hall cross is attributed to the inhomogeneous current-density and current-induced effective out-of-plane field due to the device geometry. The critical switching current density scales inversely with device temperature, and the SOT-driven change in Hall resistance varies across device temperatures and IP fields. Subsequently, the current-induced SOT efficiency, χsat, and the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction effective field, HDMI, at RT and 360 K are determined using the chiral domain wall model and current-induced loop-shift method. The χsat and HDMI values are found to decrease by ~26% and ~15%, respectively, with increasing device temperature. These results demonstrate the thermal sensitivity of current-induced SOT magnetization switching in multi-state devices.© 2020 Elsevier LtdMetal-insulator-metal (MIM) diode is considered as a promising candidate for various high frequency applications owing to its tunneling dominant ultra-fast switching time. The zero bias operation of these diode rectifiers is very desirable for detection of low power RF signals. In the present work, an Au/Al2O3/Mo MIM diode integrated with coplanar waveguide (CPW) is fabricated and its rectification response is evaluated at zero bias i.e. without applying any external dc biasing across the diode. The complete device structure was patterned using the facile direct laser beam lithography technique forming the junction area of diode as small as 1 µm2. The as fabricated diode exhibited maximum sensitivity of 9.4 A/W at zero volt leading to significant zero bias rectification performance. The direct rectification at 5 MHz and 10 MHz were obtained with rectification ratios of 2.33 and 1.57, respectively while at 7 GHz frequency with 0 dBm RF power, the maximum rectified dc current was measured as 7 µA. The zero bias RF to dc conversion efficiency of the device was estimated as 0.55%.© 2020 Elsevier LtdHerein, the effect of pulsed Nd:YAG laser irradiation at different fluencies in air at room temperature on the performance of n-PSi/ZnO-based UV MSM photodetector was demonstrated. Thermal and photon energies were coupled to synthesize n-PSi/ZnO NCs heterojunctions. The porous silicon (PSi) films with nano-sized pore arrays were first prepared via photoelectrochemical etching (PECE) of n-type silicon wafers with 45 mA/cm2 current density for a duration of 30 min. This was followed by radio frequency sputtering (RFS) of ZnO on PSi at 700 °C and irradiating with a Nd: YAG laser pulses with laser fluence of 40 mJ/cm2. X-ray diffraction analysis indicates the formation of ZnO wurtzite hexagonal crystal structure of n-PSi/ZnO NCs, where the crystallite size decreases (96–29 nm) with number of pulses. Field emission electron scanning microscopy and atomic force microscopy reveal porous nanostructure, arrays of nearly spherically shape particles homogeneously distributed on the entire surface where roughness increases (84–139 nm) with number of pulses. Photoluminescence spectroscopy reveals intrinsic band-to-band transition, donor-acceptor pair emission and quenching of the broadband intensity related to improved of crystallinity, meanwhile the band gap energy of the n-PSi/ZnO NCs is found to decrease (3.26 – 3.13 V). The Nd:YAG laser annealing demonstrate a positive effect on the properties of n-PSi/ZnO NCs photodetector, exhibiting very high sensitivity (3772.92) and very short rise and recovery times (0.30 s and 0.26 s).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Exchange bias (EB) properties of Co/CoO/Co trilayer structure with increasing top Co layer thickness has been studied in-situ using magneto-optic Kerr effect (MOKE) and reflection high energy electron diffraction (RHEED). Intermediate native oxide layer (CoO) was prepared by thermal oxidation of the bottom Co layer (Cobot), whereas the trilayer structure was formed by subsequent deposition of another Co layer (Cotop) on top. Two step magnetization reversal of trilayer at room temperature (RT) is observed due to the different coercive field (Hc) contribution of Cobot and Cotop layers. Individual contribution of magnetization reversal of both Co layers at RT as well as field cooled (FC) conditions is separated out by fitting the magnetic hysteresis loops using an adequate mathematical function. Increasing thickness of Cotop on Cobot/CoO bilayer is found to affect EB and Hc of the Cobot layer significantly. With an addition of 4 nm thick Cotop layer, EB corresponding to a Cobot layer is reduced by about 20% when FC to 153 K. Whereas, a further increase in Cotop layer thickness is found to be responsible for the relatively slow reduction in EB. Unusual asymmetric magnetization reversal with single step coherent rotation in descending branch and two step reversal in ascending branch of the loop after field cooling below Néel temperature (TN) was understood in terms of the combined effect of interface induced EB and interlayer coupling (IC) between Cotop and Cobot layers. The present study, where all the measurements are performed in-situ just after each step of deposition on the same film, provided genuine information about the EB in interlayer coupled spin valve like Co, CoO based trilayer structure.© 2020Neuromorphic systems are expected to be a breakthrough beyond the conventional von Neumann architecture when implementing an artificial neural network. In a neuromorphic system, analog synaptic devices store the synaptic weight values of an artificial neural network. Among various memory devices, RRAM-based synaptic device has several advantages such as excellent scaling potential with a simple two-terminal structure and low energy consumption during the read and write operations. However, it has an inherent limitation of abrupt and nonlinear change in the conductance characteristics. Here, we investigate the non-ideal characteristics of conductance modulation using a fabricated RRAM device. We also analyze the impact of non-ideal conductance modulation on pattern recognition accuracy through a device-to-system level simulation. In addition, to solve the drawback of the previous conductance update method (occasional RESET), we propose a new conductance update method (occasional RESET without re-write). This comprehensive experiment and device-to-system level study can facilitate the realization of reliable learning performance on RRAM-based neuromorphic systems.© 2020Voltage-induced magnetization switching of multiferroic nanomagnets provides an effective method for low energy consumption writing of magnetic tunnel junction. However, this method usually requires the initial state of the tunnel junction to be read out before the logic writing. We report a numerical simulation on a novel magnetic tunnel junction of switching/insulator/auxiliary layers where the switching layer and the auxiliary layer are two non-parallel magnetostrictive layers. The magnetic tunnel junction is deposited on a piezoelectric substrate. A bottom electrode is fabricated under the substrate, and pair square surface electrodes are fabricated on both sides of the magnetic tunnel junction. The strain generated by the applied voltage and the dipole coupling effect between the two magnetostrictive layers jointly regulate the switching layer of the magnetic tunnel junction to flip by 180°. Our physical model proves that the magnetization switching in the magnetic tunnel junction can be completed by full voltage at room temperature. The logic writing of the magnetic tunnel juction is repeatable and does not need to read the initial state of the magnetostrictive layers. Besides, the energy consumption per unit area is one or two orders of magnitude lower than the state-of-the-art spin-transfer-torque magnetic tunnel junction. This method is important in the regulation of low-energy-consumption magnetic memories and spintronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Microwave devices, designed by the electromagnetic characteristics of spin waves, are widely used in radio frequency circuits and microwave systems, such as magnetic tunable filters, frequency multiplier, and signal-to-noise ratio enhancers. In order to manufacture these devices, it is not only the saturation magnetization (4πMs) and ferromagnetic resonance linewidth (ΔH) that need to be regulated, but also the exchange stiffness (A). In this study, the Fe (t nm)/Ni81Fe19 (50 nm)/Fe (t nm) multilayer films were proposed to regulate the 4πMs, ΔH, and A, which were fabricated using electron beam evaporation, and the dynamic magnetic properties of the film were studied by ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectroscopy. Firstly, we obtain the 4πMs, γ and Ha by fitting the uniform FMR mode. Then we obtain the exchange stiffness by fitting the first (p = 1) perpendicular standing spin wave (PSSW) mode. With the increasing Fe film thickness, the calculated saturation magnetization increased from 9250 to 14060Gs, FMR linewidth increased from 111.5 to 140.3Oe and the exchange stiffness decreased from 22.1 × 10−12 to 7.8 × 10−12J/m.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Microwave ablation (MWA) is a targeted process that kills malignant cells by heating a tumor region without damaging the surrounding tissue. The microwave heating of tumors can be improved by the injection of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs). The effectiveness of this technique, evaluated by the dimensions of the ablation zone, is related to the MNPs’ concentration and the MWA input power and frequency. This work investigates how MNP dissipation affects the temperature profile of solid tumors undergoing MWA. The influences of the injection site, diffusion duration, and the size of the particles are investigated. The temperature profile is numerically estimated by solving coupled electromagnetic field and bio-heat transfer equation using the finite element method. Results demonstrate that the injection process has an essential role in temperature distribution, and that the assumption of uniform drug distribution in the tumor is not a prerequisite. Although increasing the diffusion time decreases the maximum temperature difference from 76.7 °C to 62.6 °C, the radius of the ablation zone increases 1.4 times, because MNPs seeping throughout the tumor increase heat penetration. Results also demonstrate that, compared to 20 nm nanoparticles, 10 nm ones increase the area of ablation by 30%, due to their better diffusion in the tumor. This investigation concludes that diffusion of MNPs in a tumor can improve MWA efficiency.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The synthesized Mn2FeAl alloys crystallize in a geometrically frustrated cubic β-Mn structure (space group: P4132) with an antiferromagnetic ordering whereas the previous theoretical findings suggest for a Heusler structure (L21: regular and X: inverse). The experimental stability of the structure is verified by electronic structure calculations performed for various arrangements of Mn, Fe and Al atoms in the β-Mn-type crystal structure. When compared the energy of the β-Mn structure with the energy of L21 and X type structures, it is found that for an expansion of the lattice volume β-Mn structure becomes more preferable in total energy than L21 and X-type structures. The calculated theoretical equilibrium lattice parameter value for the β-Mn2FeAl is within the accuracy of the experimental value obtained in this work. Additional DFT + U calculations for the optimized crystal structure of the β-Mn2FeAl revealed that the electronic correlations in the Mn ions result in the increased total magnetic moment. In the X type structure, Mn2FeAl is a half metal, whereas the disordered arrangement of atoms in the β-Mn structure leads to the closure of the semiconductor gap. The β- Mn2FeAl alloys exhibit antiferromagnetic ordering (TN ≈ 42 K), which is in excellent agreement with our electronic structure calculations. The detailed analysis of the magnetic and heat capacity measurements suggests a short-range magnetic ordering in the Mn2FeAl alloys. Owing to the strong antiferromagnetic spin fluctuation caused by the geometric frustration in β-Mn, a large enhancement in the electronic heat capacity is noticed. Mn2FeAl shows the characteristic features of spin glass as verified from the frequency dependent AC susceptibility analysis using critical power law and Vogel-Fulcher law. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first ever report on the theoretically predicted lowest ground state configuration for Mn2FeAl with a β-Mn structure and the experimental realization of spin glass features in this geometrically frustrated antiferromagnet.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The noncoplanar multiple-Q magnetic orderings are investigated on the basis of an effective spin model with bilinear-biquadratic interactions in momentum space. By performing the simulated annealing for the model on a triangular lattice, we find various types of the multiple-Q magnetic orderings including the skyrmion crystals and magnetic chiral states at zero magnetic field. We show that the effective positive biquadratic interaction leads to a multiple-Q instability depending on the amplitude of the anisotropic parameter. The nearly isotropic biquadratic interaction induces two types of skyrmion crystals with the topological number of two and triple-Q chiral state, while the easy-axis one favors the triple-Q collinear bubble crystal and the easy-plane one becomes a source of the double-Q and triple-Q coplanar magnetic states without a net scalar chirality. We also find that the multiple-Q states in the region for large easy-axis or easy-plane anisotropy can turn into the multiple-Q chiral states by introducing the external magnetic field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Narrow magnetic domain walls in rectangular nanowires with perpendicular anisotropy are a vital component for many spintronic devices. Probing the structure of the domain wall is interesting for applications, and it also provides a means to accurately determine fundamental material parameters, such as the size of the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction strength. The domain wall structure can be inferred using a variety of recent, novel experiments that measure the stray field above the magnetic wire, but the interpretation of these measurements requires an accurate theoretical method that relates the stray field to the magnetic structure. Here, various one-dimensional analytic methods for finding stray field are compared to MuMax simulations in order to determine if there exists an accurate analytic way to interpret a wide range of experiments. This has the advantage of being fast and simple compared to numerical simulations. Our analytic method relies on approximating the domain wall profile as a piecewise, linear function. It is shown to be accurate for parameters appropriate to CoPtCr nanowires that are 3 nm thick and 40–100 nm wide, and is expected to work broadly for nanowires that are thinner than the exchange length.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The main features of the spin wave band structure formation and manipulation in the magnonic crystal – semiconductor layered heterostructure have been studied. We demonstrate possibility of double electric and magnetic control of band gap characteristics within the spectra of propagating spin waves. It is shown that in the magnonic crystal- semiconductor heterostructure, when a positive polarity voltage is applied to the semiconductor layer, the band gap in the spin-wave spectrum shifts to the low-frequency region, while for the negative polarity the band position is practically not changed. We show also that as the magnitude of the applied magnetic field is increased the shift of the band gap is decreased. Our results show the possibility of integration of magnonics and semiconductor electronics on the base of proposed structure.© 2020 Elsevier LtdJunctionless transistors (JLTs) are one of attractive candidates for further scaling down thanks to their promising advantages based on a structural simplicity without PN junctions, and their physical operation is quite different from traditional inversion-mode (IM) transistors. In this paper, we investigated the subthreshold operation of tri-gate JLTs with various effective width (Weff) and compared to that of IM transistors. The on current to off current ratio (Ion/Ioff) and subthreshold swing (SS) of JLTs were varied dramatically as changing Weff. In addition, a better immunity against short channel effects (SCEs) of JLTs was proven. Physical operation mechanism on the subthreshold regime was also discussed in detail with considering distribution of mobile charge carriers, maximum depletion width, full-depletion mode, bulk neutral and surface accumulation conduction.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Polar magnetic oxide HoCrWO6 is synthesized and its crystal structure, magnetic structure, and thermodynamic properties are investigated. HoCrWO6 forms the polar crystal structure (space group Pna21 (#33)) due to the cation ordering of W6+ and Cr3+. There is an antiferromagnetic transition at TN = 24.5 K along with the magnetic entropy change (~5 J.Kg.−1K−1 at 70 kOe). Neutron diffraction measurement indicates that both Cr and Ho sublattices are ordered with the moment of 2.32(5)μB and 8.7(4)μB at 2 K, respectively. While Cr forms A-type collinear antiferromagnetic (AFM) structure with magnetic moment along the b axis, Ho sublattice orders in a non-coplanar AFM arrangement. A comparison with isostructural DyFeWO6 and DyCrWO6 indicates that the magnetic structure of this family of compounds is controlled by the presence or absence of eg electrons in the transition metal sublattice.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the composition, structure characteristics and magnetic properties of Co-substituted Ni-Zn ferrite, which was synthesized by solid state method. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns and relevant refined diagram give the spinel structure and the crystallite size of the samples, and the XRD results indicate that all of our samples are quite good in quality. The DSC-TG analyse thermal stability of the sample, from where, one can see that a considerable thermal stability of Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe1.95Co0.05O4 is obtained. The FT-IR spectra and XPS measurement curve of the samples were used to characterize chemical elements and valence states, illustrating the structure and element distribution. Moreover, the saturation magnetization (Ms) increase with increasing Co substitution when x ≤ 0.05 and reaches the maximum value 135.5 emu/g at x = 0.05 (T = 5 K). Similarly to Ms, μ′ exhibits the same tendency during the substitution and achieves the maximum value of 426 when x = 0.05 at room temperature.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) in permalloy (NiFe, Py)/MoS2 bilayer is studied and a strong enhancement of AMR in Py layer is observed due to the MoS2 coating on its surface. The spin Hall magnetoresistance and the induced magnetic moment by interfacial magnetic proximity effect at the Py/MoS2 interface cannot explain the observed AMR enhancement. In order to find the origin of the observed MR increase in Py/MoS2 sample, the magnitude of magnetic anisotropy constants are derived from torque curves on the basis of AMR data. The enhanced AMR in the Py/MoS2 bilayers can be attributed to the interfacial hybridization at the interface. Our findings enrich the understanding of the magnetoresistance of metallic FM/transition metal dichalcogenide (TMDC) bilayers and present AMR enhancement for application in spintronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present the results of a comparative analysis of the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in Pr0.7Sr0.2Ca0.1MnO3, through direct and indirect measurements, using experimentally measured magnetization, specific heat, magnetostriction, resistivity, thermal diffusivity and thermal conductivity parameters. We have demonstrated that the change in each parameter in response to a magnetic field near the ferromagnetic-paramagnetic phase transition temperature of the material correlates with the change in magnetic entropy. These findings allow us to interrelate these parameters and provide an alternative, effective approach for accessing the usefulness of magnetocaloric materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This work aims to reconstruct a continuous magnetization profile of a ferrofluid channel flow by using a discrete Langevin dynamics approach for the fluid's micro structure. The continuous magnetization field is obtained through the coupled solution of 2D Ferrohydrodynamics equations in a CFD approach using a numerical code developed by the authors. The discrete Langevin Dynamics simulations consider a collection of magnetically interacting particles subjected to long-range field-dipole and dipole-dipole magnetic interactions. The particles are also subjected to hydrodynamic drag and to Brownian fluctuations for the translational and rotational motion. It is assumed that the dipole moments of the magnetic particles are fixed to their mechanical body, meaning they rotate along the particle's angular velocity with no delay or advance. We identify an interesting demagnetization effect in the near wall region for moderate Brownian timescales associated with the competition between magnetic relaxation and flow's vorticity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.One of the fields spintronics is dealt with nanoelectronic devices that reduce power consumption and increase memory with the help of spin polarized electrons. Therefore, both half-metal ferromagnet materials and non-magnetic materials created by spin injection from half-metal ferromagnets can also be used in spintronic applications. We wondered whether Co2ReSb, MnCoReSb, CoMnReSb and Mn2ReSb compounds that have not been studied experimentally and theoretically are suitable materials for use in spintronic applications. The half-metal ferromagnetic predictions of compounds were investigated by using Wien2k programme in Tran Blaha modified Becke-Johnson (TB_mBJ) method. First, the volume-energy optimization curves were plotted and observed that FM phases were the most stable energetically. Then the total magnetic moments of Co2ReSb and Mn2ReSb compounds were obtained as 2.00 µB/f.u. while these were 4.00 µB/f.u. in MnCoReSb and CoMnReSb compounds. Finally, the elastical studies showed that each compound was elastically stable because the stability conditions were satisfied. Therefore, Co2ReSb, MnCoReSb, CoMnReSb and Mn2ReSb compounds are half-metal ferromagnetic materials and they can be new candidates for using in spintronic applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Effect of an external magnetic field on the sound attenuation coefficient is investigated using the Landau-Ginzburg model incorporating a tricritical to mean-field crossover. The dynamics is treated within the framework of the Onsager theory. Temperature variation of the attenuation coefficient has been obtained for arbitrary values of the magnetic field. For non-zero sixth order term in the Landau-Ginzburg expansion and for sufficiently high magnetic field the maximum in attenuation occurs above the Curie point and is displaced towards the higher temperatures as the magnetic field is increased. In the high temperature region a very rapid increase of attenuation with reduced temperature is demonstrated before the maximum is attained. This increase is much steeper than in the analogous hydrodynamic regime below the Curie temperature. At constant temperature the quadratic field dependence of attenuation on magnetic field is found in the low-field region until a maximum at a certain magnetic field is attained. This maximum is followed by a power-law decay to zero in the high-field region. A quantitative comparison between obtained results and available ultrasonic measurements in MnP is presented. Good agreement is achieved for moderate and large magnetic fields and temperatures not very close to the Curie temperature.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of artificial opals infiltrated with nickel nanoparticles are studied both experimentally and theoretically. The response of the composite has a dominating ferromagnetic behavior at low magnitude fields (below the saturation region), then it is followed by a dominating diamagnetic one as the intensity of the external applied field is increased. These characteristics are not observed in most cases due to the low magnetic response of the elements involved. Diamagnetism in the artificially synthesized opals was observed, having a negative volume magnetic susceptibility of the order of 10−5. Also theoretical calculations were performed on the basis of the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert (LLG) equation, taking into account the diamagnetic response of the host material. Results obtained show the importance of the local magnetic field on the ferromagnetic nanoparticles, as well as the importance of the nature of the magnetic response of SiO2 spheres, which aligns in the opposite direction of the external applied field.© 2020 Elsevier LtdA parallel-MOS-triggered silicon-controlled rectifier (PMTSCR) is firstly proposed and verified in a 0.25-μm Bipolar-CMOS-DMOS process, aiming to prevent the latch-up effect of SCR in the electrostatic discharge (ESD) protection. Comparing to the conventional SCR, the trigger voltage (Vt1) of the PMTSCR decreases because of the effect of PMOS embedded in the N-well, and the holding voltage (Vh) increases because of the attribution of the NMOS embedded in the P-well. By shortening the SCR current conduction path and designing a special metal connection, the modified-PMTSCR (M-PMTSCR) is obtained. The failure current of the M-PMTSCR remarkably increases from 1.8 to 4.8 A. However, M-PMTSCR exhibits a lower Vh and a higher Vt1. By further optimizing the location and connection of the embedded PMOS and NMOS, the obtained cascade-MOS-triggered SCR (CMTSCR) possesses a high Vh of 8.4 V and a strong ESD robustness of 6000 V in a small chip area. Meanwhile, the operation mechanism simulated by Sentaurus was consistent with the theoretical circuit analysis and transmission line pulse measurements. Thus the proposed CMTSCR with the good latch up immunity and temperature stability is a promising device to meet the requirements of high voltage ESD protection.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The conduction and charge transport mechanism of cobalt substituted barium hexaferrite (BaCoM) were studied by impendence spectroscopy at different temperatures and compared with BaM. Frequency dependent impedance spectra showed two distinct relaxations in BaM whereas a single relaxation peak was present in BaCoM. The relaxation frequencies were found to be temperature dependent. Scaling behaviour confirmed the dynamic conduction process is temperature independent and deviates from Debye type relaxation. Brick layer model has been employed to investigate the charge conduction through grain and grain boundaries. Arrhenius plot of conductivity showed two sharp transitions in three different temperature regime which indicates parallel conduction mechanism in the system. The frequency dependent conductivity was fitted with Jonscher's power law at different temperatures. The variation in frequency exponent with temperature confirmed the evidence of three types of conduction process. Higher conductivity and different transition temperature was observed for BaCoM as compared to BaM. The conduction process was in accordance with overlapping-large polaron tunnelling model.© 2020 The AuthorsThe Pair Approximation method has been formulated for the isotropic ferromagnetic Heisenberg model with spin S=1. The exchange interactions of arbitrary range have been taken into account. The single-ion anisotropy has been considered as well as the external magnetic field. Within the method, the Gibbs free-energy has been derived, from which all thermodynamic properties can be self-consistently obtained. In order to illustrate the developed formalism, the numerical calculations have been performed for CrIAs planar magnetic semiconductor, a hypothetical material whose existence has been recently predicted by the Density Functional Theory-based calculations. For this model material, all the relevant thermodynamic magnetic properties have been studied. The numerical results have been presented in the figures and discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The essential step for epitaxial growth of tetragonal Mn3Ge films with high perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) is to choose suitable substrates with small lattice misfit. The exploration process has involved large efforts on depositing films on single crystalline substrates using buffer layers preferably formed from Cr or Pt, but they lacked a systematically comparative investigation for practical applications. This study investigates the structural, surface and magnetic properties of ultrathin Fe (2 nm) seed layer to induce homoepitaxial Mn3Ge films on MgO (0 0 1) substrates compared with that of the heteroepitaxial Mn3Ge films on three typical buffer layers, such as Cr (40 nm), Cr (20 nm)/Pt (10 nm), Fe (2 nm)/Pt (20 nm). Furthermore, a correlation between film strain and film quality has been established, which is critical for spintronics applications. More importantly, we attribute the homoepitaxial growth of Mn3Ge films on the ultrathin Fe seed layers to the Fe diffusion and formation of Fe-Mn-Ge alloy at the interface, and confirm this supposition with HAADF-STEM characterizations. The Fe-doped Mn3Ge interlayer can act as the gradual buffer layer, and lead to a high-quality crystal structure and extremely high magnetic squareness ratio of Mn3Ge films in a large range of thickness (100 ~ 400 nm). This result offers a new concept of high-quality growth of D022-Mn3Ge films, which may enhance the prospect for tetragonal Mn3Ge thin films in superior spintronics applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The structure and magnetic properties of the (Ce,Sm)Co2Fe2B-type phase prepared by melt-spinning technique are presented. The structure of the Ce1-xSmxCo2Fe2B (x = 0–1) melt-spun ribbons was amorphous, whereas the annealed Ce1-xSmxCo2Fe2B (x = 0–0.25) specimens consisted of the (Ce,Sm)Co2Fe2B-type phase. Although the annealed Ce1-xSmxCo2Fe2B (x = 0–0.25) specimens did not show high coercivity, high coercivity was exhibited by the annealed Ce1-xSmxCo2Fe2B (x = 0.5–1.0) specimens. The annealed Ce0.25Sm0.75Co2Fe2B specimen with fine (Ce,Sm)Co2Fe2B-type grains showed a coercivity as high as 1.58 MAm−1.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we present an investigation about the out of plane component of the magnetization of Ga-rich sputtered FeGa thin films. To study this magnetic component, we have used magnetometric measurements and magnetic force microscopy combined with a structural characterization by means of x-ray diffractometry. For a more profound analysis, we have examined samples in both, as-grown and annealed state. The out of plane component of the magnetization promotes a magnetic ripple observed by magnetic force microscopy in all the studied samples. To quantitatively monitor the out of plane component of the magnetization, we have used the ratio between the magnetic remanence and the maximum magnetization (Mr/Mmax), i.e. the squareness, measured in the perpendicular hysteresis loops. The experimental results indicate that the out of plane component of the magnetization is reduced upon annealing at a moderate temperature of 400 °C. The experimental results can be understood considering that phase coexistence is the most likely origin for the observed magnetic ripple.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Monte Carlo simulation with Metropolis algorithm was used to study the magnetic and thermodynamic properties of a mixed spin hexagonal nanowire, with spins half and integer. The phase diagram was obtained by the extrapolation to the thermodynamic limit and associated with previous analytical results. An uncommon increase in the magnetization with the temperature and a weak magnetic order in a midland chain of Ising spins is explained through the thermodynamic states of the system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Local coordination geometry is crucial in determining the physical properties of transition metal compounds. In this work, we report a detailed density functional theory study on the magnetic and electronic properties of layered Sr2NiO2Cl2, which possesses an unusual square planar coordination. Due to the crystal field and spin splitting, Ni 3d electrons fully occupy the dxz, dyz, and dxy orbitals, while partially occupy the dz2 and dx2-y2 states, leading to the high spin state of Ni2+ ions and strong antiferromagnetic in-plane nearest-neighbor exchange interaction J1. Thus, Sr2NiO2Cl2 is predicted to exhibit a G-type magnetic ground state, which all nearest-neighbor magnetic moments are antiparallel to each other in the NiO2 plane. A band gap is opened irrespective of the specific magnetic state since the unique square planar crystal field splitting. Finally, large orbital moments and giant easy-plane magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy are obtained, which is again related to the unique coordination environment.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this report we describe the synthesis and characterization of several members of the Ni2YZ (Y = V, Cr; Z = Ga, Ge) family. While the Heusler alloy Ni2VGa was prepared phase pure, the Ni2CrGa sample consisted of a slightly Cr-deficient alloy and elemental Cr inclusions. The Ge analogues, Ni2VGe and Ni2CrGe, were also prepared as primarily Y-element deficient alloys, with minor secondary phases to balance the starting composition. Despite the minor secondary phases, all Ni2VGa, Ni2CrGa, and Ni2CrGe have diffraction patterns consistent with the cubic Heusler structure (a = 5.814(5), 5.765(3), and 5.788(8) Å, respectively). Ni2VGe was concluded to consist of at least two highly off-stoichiometric phases and was excluded from further study. Specific heat and magnetization measurements on the prepared samples demonstrated they are non-magnetic or only weakly paramagnetic down to lowest temperature. No measurable magnetic moment was found in phase pure Ni2VGa down to 2 K, while only low moments (µ7T2K = 0.027(1) μB and 0.170(2) μB) were observed in Ni2CrGa and Ni2CrGe. Low values of magnetic moments were discussed from the viewpoint of magnetic Cr impurities in a non-magnetic lattice. Such interpretation was well supported by the specific heat data revealing a strong lowest-temperature contribution ascribed to ferromagnetic Cr clusters in the material. The impact of atomic disorder is discussed, particularly with respect to previous theoretical studies and the predicted properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We study the frustration properties of the Ising model on a one-dimensional monoatomic equidistant lattice, taking into account the exchange interactions of atomic spins at the sites of the nearest, next-nearest, and third neighbors. The exact analytical expressions for the thermodynamic functions of the system are obtained using the Kramers-Wannier transfer matrix technique. Criteria for the emergence of magnetic frustrations in the presence of competition between the energies of exchange interactions are formulated. The points and intervals of the existence of frustrations, which depend on the values and signs of the exchange interactions, are found. The features of the entropy and heat capacity of this model in the frustration regime and its vicinity are investigated. Non-zero entropy values of the ground state of a frustrated system, as well as a two-peak temperature structure of the heat capacity in the vicinity of the frustration point, are found.© 2020Spin-gapless semiconductors are recently discovered class of materials that behave as an insulator for one spin channel and as a zero-gap semiconductor for the opposite spin. Here, we show from first-principle calculations that one such material Ti2CoSi predicted to exhibit spin-gapless semiconductivity has an energetically close non-spin-polarized phase. In particular, we show that the regular Heusler phase of this material is non-magnetic, while the inverted Heusler phase is nearly spin-gapless semiconducting, with a very small energy difference of ≈0.1 eV per 16-atom cell, in favor of the regular Heusler structure. Moreover, we also show that a 100% spin polarization in inverted Heusler phase is detrimentally affected by the emergence of surface states in thin-film geometry. These results need to be taken into account for realistic implementations of this and similar materials in nano-device applications, which rely on highly spin-polarized current in thin-film geometry.© 2020Magnetic phase transitions in two Mg2Ni3Si-type of Gd2Rh3Ge and Er2Rh3Ge compounds (space group R3‾m, hR18) belonging to rhombohedral Laves phases are studied in this paper. Structural investigations using X-ray diffraction and subsequent Rietveld analysis confirm the rhombohedral R3‾m Laves phase for both compounds. Magnetization as a function of temperature, M(T), identifies the ferromagnetic transition temperature in both samples with TC = 64 K and 20 K for Gd2Rh3Ge and Er2Rh3Ge respectively which is supported by the specific heat, Cp(T). Arrott plots, universal scaling curves by normalizing magnetic entropy changes (ΔSm) and field dependent ΔSm revealed that both compounds undergo second order ferromagnetic phase transitions at TC. Significant magnetocaloric effect (MCE) is observed for both compounds, attaining a value of 12 J kg−1 K−1 at T = 64 K, H = 7 T for Gd2Rh3Ge and 11 J kg−1 K−1 at T = 20 K, H = 7 T for Er2Rh3Ge. The adiabatic temperature change is 5.9 K for Gd2Rh3Ge and 10.5 K for Er2Rh3Ge for H = 7 T.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic drug targeting (MDT) is a therapeutic method that delivers drug carriers containing magnetic nanoparticles to a target lesion by directing them using an external magnetic field. To minimize the possible side effects on the surrounding normal cells, focused magnetic drug targeting (FMDT) has been introduced, which allows drug carriers to be delivered only to the target lesions. FMDT, with its capability for local focusing and wide attraction, aims for highly efficient and concentrated drug delivery. In this study, a modified quasi-axisymmetric Halbach array design was introduced as an external magnetic source to perform FMDT. The proposed Halbach array design has a simple structure that is easy to assemble, unlike earlier Halbach array designs. The optimized Halbach array is fabricated as a result of the optimization of the magnetic force magnitude and local focusing with wide attraction using finite element method (FEM) analysis. Through simulations and experiments, the optimized Halbach array design is validated and a comparative analysis with other magnet types is performed. As a result, the optimization of the Halbach array using FEM is experimentally validated, and it is confirmed that the optimized Halbach array is more effective for FMDT than the permanent magnet used in MDT.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A series of Co1+xFe2−2x/3O4 (x = 0, 0.05, 0.1, 0.15, 0.2) samples, in which Fe3+ was progressively replaced by Co2+, were prepared through the sol-gel auto-combustion method using spent Li-ion batteries as raw materials. The structure, morphology, magnetic and magnetostrictive properties of the samples were studied. The purpose of the present work is to make cobalt ferrite more suitable for its application in non-contact sensors and actuators. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns show that all the samples have a pure single-phase cubic structure. The non-stoichiometric cobalt ferrite has different crystallite size and lattice constant compared with pure CoFe2O4. Field emission scanning electron microscopy (FE-SEM) was carried out to investigate the amount and size of pores in the sintered samples. The cationic oxidation state and cation distribution of the spinel structure was investigated by means of X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). The variations in structure and morphology were found to lead to significant changes in the magnetic and magnetostrictive properties. With the increase of cobalt content, the saturation magnetization and the maximum magnetostrictive coefficient of the samples initially increase and then decrease. Given the different behaviors of the magnetostriction coefficient and strain sensitivity of the samples, their magnetostrictive performance was quantified through a “figure of merit” defined as the product between the two above mentioned parameters.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effects of amorphous SiO2 coating onto FeSiCr alloy powder on the electric and magnetic properties were investigated. FeSiCr alloy powder with an average particle size of 10 μm was coated with nano-sized silica powder to increase the resistivity and DC bias superposition characteristics. Inexpensive water glass (sodium silicate) was used as the raw material to form the amorphous silica layer onto the FeSiCr alloy powder surface acting as a binding and insulation layer. The amorphous silica layer thickness was about 20 nm to 50 nm. The thickness can be controlled by the amount of sodium silicate addition. The amorphous silica layer can significantly promote anti-oxidation, resistivity and DC bias superposition characteristic of the FeSiCr alloy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the separation process of micro-particles by applying magnetic force, the particle can be separated and diverted depending on its magnetic susceptibility and size. In this paper, the motion of particles with different sizes were analyzed in a microchannel to obtain particle trajectories due to the effects of magnetic fields, Nickel Sputtering and fluid flow. By applying a permanent magnet, temporal movement of non-magnetic particles in a ferrofluid flow inside the T-shape microchannel was investigated. The distribution of the magnetic force on the particles and their trajectories were first confirmed by analytical and empirical data, and then three models (including magnet arrangements and Nickel layer) were presented to increase the separation efficiency by optimizing the magnetic field. Non-magnetic particles of polystyrene with the diameter of 0.2–7 μm and EMG 408 as the ferrofluid have been used in the model. The results show that the separation efficiency in the model with Nickel Sputtering is more than the others. For the proposed models, two threshold values of particle size were reported for the first time; So that all particles with the sizes greater than the first threshold value are completely sorted to the first outlet of the channel, meanwhile; the particles smaller than the second threshold value are only ejected from the second outlet. Therefore, a smart sorting can be accessible by the proposed technique. The particle diameter threshold values in the 1st, 2nd and 3rd models are obtained as 7, 6, 4.5 μm (i.e. first outlet) and 0.35, 0.3, 0.2 μm (i.e. second outlet), respectively. The threshold values were reported in the paper to design different tuning strategies.© 2020In the journal publication “Drain current local variability analysis in nanoscale junctionless FinFETs utilizing a compact model” by T.A. Oproglidis; D.H. Tassis; A. Tsormpatzoglou; G. Ghibaudo and C.A. Dimitriadis; published in Solid State Electronics vol. 170 (2020) 107385 in 2020 there was an omission on our part in the acknowledgements section. The authors would like to acknowledge the Horizon 2020 ASCENT EU project (Access to European Nanoelectronics Network -Project no. 654384). The authors would like to apologize for any inconvenience caused as the aforementioned work was entirely based on experimental data measured in the frame of the 2020 ASCENT EU project.© 2020For achieving the room temperature magnetoencephalography (MEG) and magnetocardiography (MCG) measurements in an unshielded environment, we have developed a high performance, pico-tesla resolution magnetoimpedance (MI) sensor system with the peak-to-peak voltage detector, by synchronized switching. We have achieved a high field detection sensitivity with good linearity, and a noise level lower than 1 pT/Hz1/2, by utilizing the time-differential measurement in each MI element for suppressing the low frequency noise components and increasing the stability of sensor system. We have successfully developed a Pk–pk VD-type MI sensor system aiming to measure the room-temperature real-time alpha rhythm signals, and demonstrated a clear sensitivity for spontaneous brain activity with SNR of about 8. The considerable enhancement of alpha rhythm measured by new MI sensor system in each eyes-closed condition is further evidence that these recorded signals are emanating from spontaneous brain activity. Meanwhile, we have also achieved the real time MCG measurements via pk-pk VD-type MI sensor system, with a high real time SNR of about 14 dB, and successfully measured the T wave and R wave of MCG signals, in averaging over 10 cycles, with a high SNR of more than 20 dB.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.CoRu-substituted BaM hexaferrites, with additives of Bi2O3, demonstrate low losses and high permeability above 1 GHz. The RuCo- and BiRuCo-doped BaM ferrites were prepared by conventional solid-state reaction methods. Magnetic spectra indicate that there were two peaks in the imaginary part of the permeability spectra which originate from domain wall motion and spin rotation. Compared to the RuCo-BaM sample, BiRuCo-doped BaM samples exhibit slight decreases in permeability (~2.9), but the magnetic loss tangents decrease markedly by 47% to ~0.05 at 1 GHz while retaining a low magnetic loss ~0.1 up to 1.5 GHz. From fitting to experimental data, it's clear that the reduction of magnetic loss stems predominantly from a suppressed domain wall damping due to the introduction of Bi2O3. It is demonstrated that Bi2O3 can effectively control the microstructure of polycrystalline ferrites, and in turn tailor the contribution of domain wall resonance or spin rotation to permeability and magnetic loss. The results are valuable to the engineering of ferrite materials for use in the miniaturization of wide band microwave antenna at operating frequencies up to 1 GHz.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Advanced materials often involve multi-dependent approaches, merging electrical, optical and magnetic responses in nanostructured systems. To this purpose we have explored a semi-transparent, soft magnetic thin film (Permalloy) of nano-undulated morphology with which uniaxial anisotropy can be induced and tuned. This media is grown on the ripple surface of flexible, polymeric foil of polyethylene terephthalate (PET) that was previously patterned by a versatile pulsed-laser irradiation technique achieving a linear array with periodicity 220–250 nm and large amplitudes around 45 nm. Vectorial Kerr (reflection) as well as Voight (transmission) magneto-optical effects confirm a complete uniaxial anisotropy induced with easy axis along the ripple pattern for Py films of thickness ranging from 10 to 30 nm. Analysis of curved magnetic systems is a major challenge, so we need to combine measurements of surface magnetization with thorough micromagnetic modelling of a quasi-infinite ripple film (same dimensions as the media). Remarkably, our modelling indicates unique features confirmed by experiments; namely, two disparate demagnetizing fields in hard axis magnetization and a distinctive thickness evolution. These findings are characteristic of an undulated magnetic state with the uniaxial anisotropy driven by volume-like poles. The choice of large pattern dimensions has made possible to realize the undulated state where the anisotropy strength can simply be tuned with film thickness without any role of surface contributions. This approach to anisotropy engineering provides ground for applications design without the limitations of surface preparation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Localized surface magnetism in materials with non-magnetic bulk is a subject of considerable interest. In particular, in the case of strained transition metal overlayers on transition metals substrates, the interaction overlayer-substrate can lead to a fascinating magnetic behavior where the competition between strain and hybridization controls spin-polarized states. In this work, we have studied the structural, electronic, and magnetic properties of V overlayers on W(100). We report full potential linearized augmented plane wave (FLAPW) calculations, within the local density approximation (LDA), the generalized gradient approximation (GGA) and the hybrid functional B3LYP for the exchange-correlation part of the total energy, including spin-orbit coupling. A magnetic to non-magnetic transition was found in the surface layer as a function of the number of atomic vanadium layers. For the monolayer and bilayer cases, we found that the strong hybridization between the overlayer 3d-orbitals and the substrate 5d-orbitals define the characteristics of the surface density of states, resulting in a magnetic moment of 1.06μB,1.42μB,1.21μB and 0.53μB,1.07μB,0.71μB at the surface layer of 1V/W(100) and 2V/W(100) in the LDA, GGA and B3LYP, respectively. In contrast, for 3V/W(100), the surface density of states presents a strong localization due to the strain generated by the substrate; in this case, the magnetism disappears. The effects of the strain and the hybridization of the 3d-5d orbitals of the overlayer-substrate on the local electronic band structure of the surface layers are discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We studied the influence of La (nonmagnetic) and Ce (intermediate valence) impurities on the ferromagnetic ordering temperature Tc of compounds RE1-x(La,Ce)xNi (RE = Pr, Gd). The ordering temperature Tc was measured in a wide range of impurity concentration. Crystal electric field (CEF) splitting for the PrNi and Pr0.25Ce0.75Ni was defined by neutron spectroscopy measurements. The strong difference in the influence of La and Ce on Tc of PrNi and GdNi based systems has been obtained. The introduction of a spin-fluctuating intermediate valence impurity in PrNi leads to a dramatic increase in the area of the ordered state on the phase diagram, due to an increase in Tc, compared to the impact of La-impurity over the entire concentration range. The dependence of Tc on the Ce concentration for the Pr1-xCexNi was calculated within the framework of the model of microscopic states. The essential modification of the CEF splitting by the Ce impurity appears to be the decisive factor affecting Tc wherein the Ce ion carries zero static magnetic moments similar to the La case. The latter explains the identical dependencies of the ordering temperature on the impurity concentration observed in systems with a long-range order of local magnetic moments Gd1-xLaxNi and Gd1-xCexNi.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroic materials have attracted a remarkable interest due to its high potential for magneto-electrical coupling; however, the knowledge about magneto-optical coupling remains incipient. Some particular works have focused on the dependency between optical and magnetic properties through the two types of Kerr effects in this kind of material. In this work, we have investigated the optical and magneto-optical Kerr effects on PbNiO3, PbCrO3, and PbMnO3 through an excited-state approach. Our calculations have predicted the Kerr effect from the refractive index tailoring as a function of the ground and excited states. In this context, the magneto-optical Kerr effect increased the magnetization along excited state allied to the magneto-crystalline anisotropy observed for R3c materials. Furthermore, we propose a molecular origin for the two kinds of Kerr effects.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.By means of detailed electrical, magnetic and thermal studies, we illustrate the unusual coexistence of ferromagnetism and Kondo effect for the critical Nd concentration of x = 0.3 in (Ce1−xNdx)3Al. Magnetic susceptibility χ(T) confirms the ferromagnetic character with TC ~ 8 K along with Kondo effect which appears below 35 K. Non-saturating nature of magnetization (M (H)) and Hall resistivity (ρxy (H)) isotherms indicates the Kondo screening. Resistivity ρ (T) curves exhibit nonlinear temperature dependence; ~Tn (0.48 < n < 1) below 40 K. Higher values of Sommerfeld coefficient γ (=321 mJ/Ln - mol-K2) and Seebeck coefficient S (T) as compared to the parent compound Ce3Al and other Nd doped compounds in the series (Ce1−xNdx)3Al (x = 0–1) indicate the role of critical Nd concentration namely, 0.3 in the anomalous behavior. The high value of γ observed in this critical concentration is unusual for a ferromagnetic compound and appears to be partially contributed by the exchange interaction due to Nd doping along with the Kondo hybridization. Suppression of γ value with field corroborates with the resistivity data i.e., weakening of Kondo screening. Like in the case of Ce3Al, Nd doped compound also shows structural transition attributed to the valence fluctuation of Ce. χ (T), ρ (T), S (T) and 4f part of specific heat, C4f (T) data show peculiar temperature dependence and confirm the non-Fermi liquid behavior due to Ce (4f) – Nd (4f) interaction. Change in the relative strengths of Coulomb repulsion (U) and Kondo hybridization (Vfd) is found to determine the temperature dependence of thermal and thermoelectric behavior in this compound.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties are investigated in details for the GdFeO3-type Pr0.5Eu0.1Sr0.4MnO3 and Pr0.5Er0.1Sr0.4MnO3 manganites (oP20, space group Pnma, N 62). Landau analysis, Banerjee's criteria, and universal behaviour are studied to assess magnetic ordering in the samples. These methods reveal the occurrence of a second-order phase transition and the short-range interactions in the vicinity of Curie temperatures. The maximum of the magnetic entropy change ΔSM (field change of 5 T) is found to increase from 4.47 J/kg.K at TC = 279.9 ± 1 K to 4.86 J/kg.K at TC = 188.5 ± 1 K for Pr0.5Eu0.1Sr0.4MnO3 and Pr0.5Er0.1Sr0.4MnO3, respectively with corresponding relative cooling power (RCP) 264.8 J/kg to 270.9 J/kg.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Different mixing methods were used for the fatty acid modification of magnetite nanoparticles. The magnetite nanoparticles were dissolved in ethanol with a previously dissolved oleic or stearic acid solution. The mix was then homogenized and washed to eliminate the unreacted fatty acid. The modified nanoparticles were FTIR analysis confirmed that the modified nanoparticles presented the characteristic groups of the fatty acids. The vibrating sample magnetometer analysis (VSM) showed a very slight decrease in the magnetic properties of the magnetite, from 88.7 to 53.7 emu/g, which obviously was due to the presence of the fatty acids. TGA showed that the fatty acid modification degree of the magnetite was less than that reported elsewhere, nonetheless, during the precipitation tests in toluene; it was observed that the modification was sufficient to maintain the stability of the dispersion without affecting the magnetic properties. Additionally, TEM micrographs showed that the modified magnetite nanoparticles formed a cluster, with the fatty acids surrounding the magnetite nanoparticles. Confirming that the fatty acid layer was deposited as monolayers on the magnetite particle surface of approximately 2 nm in thickness with OA and 2.3 nm with SA. It was observed that the use of the two fatty acids produced inter-digitation among the fatty acids. Finally, nanocomposites based on liquid silicone rubber (LSR) were prepared with modified and unmodified magnetite and their rheological and magnetic behavior was studied. This fatty acid modification of magnetite particles improved the dispersion and distribution of modified particles into the silicon matrix.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Microstructure and magnetic properties, especially the DC-bias-superposition characteristic of the MgO-doped and low temperature fired NiCuZn ferrites, were investigated. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns showed a single-phase spinel structure for all samples. The microstructure manifested little change with MgO content. Initial permeability, sintered density and saturation magnetic flux density (Bs) monotonously decreased; however, coercive force (Hc) gradually increased with increasing MgO content. MgO addition mode could effectively consider both initial permeability and DC-bias-superposition characteristic of the NiCuZn ferrites. With 1.5 wt% to 2.5 wt% of MgO addition content, the ferrites could obtain high initial permeability of 70–85 with H70% of 846–700 A/m, indicating good application prospect in the field of chip power magnetic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.As was found in recent experiments, carbonyl iron particles in the magneto-sensitive elastomer clusterise into column-like structures when subjected to the external field. However, the majority of the theoretical approaches, developed for the description of such systems, use the point-like dipole-dipole interparticle interactions, resulting in a single thread chain-like clustering only. This leads to the inaccuracies of the theoretical description of both mechanical and rheological properties of these materials. In the current paper we develop a formalism of the magnetizable microspheres, suggested earlier, in the way that allows inclusion into the model of the inhomogeneous magnetization of the particles. This approach corrects the expression for the interparticle interactions and, thus, enables the column-like clustering. We developed the self-consistent dipole (SCD) model, which results in the expression for the total energy of two particles written in a compact form. It is compared with the similar expression obtained earlier for two spheres using Laplace equation (LE). We found that the SCD model provides the energy contribution which mimics the dipolar terms in the expression for the energy derived via LE. We also calculate the shape factor for the magnetic energy of the macroscopic sample using generalized particle interactions, obtained earlier within the LE approach, and show that it coincides both with the result obtained for the point-like dipoles and reproduces the fundamental result of the continuum mechanics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A series of Fe2MnSi1−xBx (x = 0–0.4) Heusler alloys was synthesized and investigated. The variation of lattice parameters with B content suggests that B prefers entering the substitutional site of Fe2MnSi when the amount is small. But when B content is high, it enters the interstitial site. A spin reorientation is observed at ~54 K in Fe2MnSi, which moves to low temperatures with increasing B content and disappears when x = 0.3. Both the Curie temperature TC and saturation magnetization Ms increase with the substitution of B for Si. The Ms gets closer to the calculated total spin moment Mt. All this suggests that the dope of B can enhance the ferromagnetic character of Fe2MnSi1−xBx. For the high B content, B-doping expands the lattice and enlarges the distance between magnetic atoms. This leads to the increase of Fe and Mn spin moments. The substitution of B for Si has an ordering-effect for Fe2MnSi lattice by forming a strong covalent bonding and relieves the possible Fe-Mn disorder. This effect also contributes to the increase of Ms.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Cation-substituted magnetite (MFe2O4, M = Mg, Zn, Mn) were prepared by a facile oxidation-precipitation process in an oxygen-free environment without autoclaves. By XRD, TEM, FESEM and EDS mapping analysis, the as-prepared MFe2O4 are characterized to be polycrystalline nanoparticles with spinel structures and regulated M/Fe ratios. Their electromagnetic properties are strongly dependent on the substitution of M2+. MnFe2O4 has higher saturation magnetization and increased coercivity in contrast to MgFe2O4 and ZnFe2O4. At the optimum absorbent thickness, ZnFe2O4 achieves a minimum reflection loss of −23.4 dB around 17.9 GHz, while MnFe2O4 exhibits a broad effective absorbing bandwidth covering 6.4 GHz in medium frequency ranges. The intense magnetic loss for MnFe2O4 and high dielectric loss together with effective electromagnetic impedance matching for ZnFe2O4 should be responsible for their enhanced microwave absorption performance.© 2020For the first time, the YIG (2 μm) /TiO2 (0.2 μm) /PZT (400 μm) structures, where YIG is a polycrystalline layer of yttrium-iron garnet (Y3Fe5O12), PZT is an epitaxially mismatched ferroelectric ceramics based on lead zirconate titanate (PbZr0.45Ti0.55O3) were synthesized by means of ion-beam sputtering – deposition technique. Scanning electron microscopy combined by focused ion-beam method indicates the presence of high-quality plane-parallel YIG/TiO2 and TiO2/PZT interfaces. They were obtained by preliminary ion-beam planarization of the substrate surface using an anti-diffusion layer of titanium dioxide TiO2. Atomic force microscopy showed that planarization allows to achieve a surface smoothness of 10 nm. FMR spectroscopy revealed that the ferrite garnet layers are characterized by a resonance absorption linewidth of ~100 Oe. The linewidth broadening is due to the presence of defects and YIG layer roughness because of the substrate imperfection. The calculated values of the spin-wave damping parameter are of the order of 10−3. The obtained YIG/TiO2/PZT structures can serve as media for the spin waves propagation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Structural and magnetic properties of polycrystalline bulk Er1-xLaxFeO3 (x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8 and 1.0) samples prepared by co-precipitation technique have been investigated. Rietveld refined x-ray diffraction patterns confirm a single phase orthorhombic crystal structure of all the samples. Substitution of La at Er-site significantly modify the magnetic properties of parent ErFeO3. The temperature-dependent magnetization study reveals that, all the samples exhibit antiferromagnetic ordering throughout the temperature range studied. All the samples become fully antiferromagnetic ~81 K with the lowest value of net magnetization. Erbium moments order at ~4.1 K. ErFeO3 sample exhibits compensation temperature TCOMP at ~48 K and spin reorientation TSR phenomena in the temperature range of ~85–98 K. The highest value of coercivity with nearly saturated M−H loops is observed at 2 K indicating the existence of weak ferromagnetic order due to the magnetic interaction between the Er3+ and Fe3+-ions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This comment compares the temperature extent of the Griffiths like phase in delafossite compound CuCr0.95Ti0.05O2 as determined by two different methods. It is shown that the λ – TCR method underestimates a temperature extent of Griffiths phase. Finally it is argued that the temperature location of Griffiths phase should be determined by the more sensitive differential method instead of the λ – TCR method.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a voltage amplifier device is proposed based on the Hall effect principle. Existing method based on this principle requires large magnetic field, but it is limited due to saturating effect of magnetic field on output. Therefore, the technique presented in this paper provides amplification control by changing applied stress on the material placed in a magnetic field. This device has the ability to produce large amplification (theoretically infinite). The effect of the choice of material based on magnetic properties and effect of stress on geometrical dimensions is also studied. The undesired effect of temperature rise on the device is also studied in detail, and compensation techniques are proposed. This paper shall substantially contribute to designing such amplifiers based on Hall effect to someday pose a challenge to op-amp technology.© 2020Polycrystalline ceramics with composition 0.6BiFeO3-0.4 K0.5Bi0.5TiO3 + 2.5 mol.% MnO2 has been successfully prepared by using solid-state reaction technique. The effect of sintering temperature and dwell time on the microstructural, magnetic, and dielectric properties were comprehensively investigated. The XPS analysis shows that the oxygen vacancy concentration increases with the rise in sintering temperature as well as dwell time. In addition to this, an increase in sintering temperature also leads to a significant rise in the grain size along with a substantial reduction in the porosity of the material. The sample sintered at 980 °C for 3 h shows an enhancement in magnetic properties, which is mainly attributed to the occurrence of a higher concentration of oxygen vacancies in this sample. The sample sintered at 980 °C with 6 h dwell time exhibit an oxygen vacancy concentration of 23.79% and shows a significant improvement in dielectric properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The solid solution of Fe2-xCrxO3 (x = 0.2–0.8) has been prepared by mechanical alloying of α-Fe2O3 and α-Cr2O3 oxides and subsequent heat treatment. The lattice structure and properties of the heat treated samples differed from the as-alloyed samples. High quality synchrotron X-ray diffraction patterns have shown an inhomogeneous structure of α-Fe2O3 and α-Cr2O3 phases in as-alloyed samples. The heat treatment has homogenized structure and successfully incorporated the Cr atoms into lattice sites of the Fe atoms in α-Fe2O3. The soft ferromagnetic properties with signature of two Morin transitions have been observed in the as-alloyed samples. A canted antiferromagnetic spin order has appeared in the heat treated samples, irrespective of Cr content in Fe2-xCrxO3. The spin flop transition has been observed at a critical magnetic field that depends on Cr content in the system. The Mössbauer spectra at room temperature have suggested a non-uniform distribution of magnetic spin order of Fe and Cr ions in rhombohedral structure. The electrical conductivity of the heat treated samples has shown enhancement with the increase of Cr content in α-Fe2O3 structure.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Heusler alloys demonstrate various effects, such as the ferromagnetic shape memory effect, the magnetocaloric effect, etc. But these alloys are also liable to destruction during multiple cycles of martensitic transformation. In order to increase stability of functional properties of the alloys, thermo-mechanical treatment by various methods is carried out. In this work, a Heusler Ni2.26Mn0.80Ga0.89Si0.05 alloy was subjected to combined deformation processing: multiple isothermal forging and subsequent direct extrusion. The multiple isothermal forging was carried out at 700 °C in 5 upset transitions and a total true degree of deformation of e ≈ 2.42. The extrusion was also carried out at 700 °C with an extrusion ratio of 2:1 (e = 1.39). Analysis of the microstructure shows that, resulting from combined treatment, metallographic and crystallographic textures are formed. The metallographic texture is characterized by coarse grains of approximately 1 mm in length and hundreds of microns in diameter. The coarse grains are in turn surrounded by a layer of fine-grained structure. The crystallographic texture is axial of the 〈1 1 0〉 type. This kind of structure enhances mechanical properties of the alloy. According to the study of thermal expansion anisotropy in the region of martensitic transformation, contribution of the martensitic transformation to the relative change in the length of the extruded sample is 0.13% in the direction, normal to the extrusion axis, and 0.09% - along it. These values are comparable to those observed on Heusler alloys in the as-cast state. Thus, it is found that thermo-mechanical treatment by the combined method allows obtaining a significant amount of thermal expansion anisotropy while remarkably increasing mechanical properties of the material.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effect of the spin–orbit coupling interaction and atomic relaxation, on the ground state non-collinear magnetism of deposited Fe thin films, on a Cu (001) surface, is studied by using first principles density functional theory calculations. The total energy values and spin and orbital magnetic local moments are calculated for a Fe film of N = 6 atomic layers deposited on a 12 layer thick Cu film playing the role of substrate. As a first step, we allow the thin film and surface layers to atomically relax. We found important contractions of about 20% between the first and second, the third and fourth, and firth and sixth Fe layers. Then, we obtain collinear and non-collinear magnetic arrangements which agree with the main experimental resultssatte that show a non-collinear configuration at low temperatures (around 40 K). The magnetic properties of the first four Fe layers are well reproduced. The agreement is better than the results obtained ignoring the spin–orbit coupling and the structure relaxation. Although both calculations predict non-collinear configurations with energy values slightly above that of a collinear ground state. In some cases, the energy differences between two collinear (or non-collinear) solutions with different spin orientation axis is only under the value of one meV. The calculated orbital local moment arrangements are clearly similar to the spin magnetic local moment ones and show a correct dependence on the dimensionality aspects of the system when changing the spin axis quantization direction.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the magnetocaloric effect (MCE), relative cooling power (RCP) and crystalline structure in Sb substituted CrTe1-xSbx (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.2) alloy. The Rietveld refinement of the XRD pattern of CrTe1-xSbx showed the emerging of pure hexagonal NiAs structure with P63/mmc (194) space group with increasing Sb substitution. We detect a slight increase in the basal plane a-lattice parameter, with a much larger reduction in the c-axis. Magnetic isotherms were measured in the temperature range of 50–400 K. The results revealed an increase in the maximum entropy change |SM(T,H)| with Sb-substitutions in the temperature range (~285–325 K). Moreover, The RCP values increased by about 33% with 20% Sb substitutions. These findings suggest that CrTe1-xSbx alloys can be used in room temperature magnetic cooling at fraction of the coast of pure Gd element the porotype magnetic material for magnetic refrigeration.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In magnetic recording the signal-to-noise ratio (SNR) is a good indicator for the quality of written bits. However, a priori it is not clear which parameters have the strongest influence on the SNR. In this work, we investigate the role of the Gilbert damping on the SNR. Grains consisting of FePt like hard magnetic material with two different grain sizes d=5 nm and d=7 nm are considered and simulations of heat-assisted magnetic recording (HAMR) are performed with the atomistic simulation program VAMPIRE. The simulations display that the SNR saturates for damping constants larger or equal than 0.1. Additionally, we can show that the Gilbert damping together with the bit length have a major effect on the SNR whereas other write head and material parameters only have a minor relevance on the SNR.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Polyphase induction machines (IMs) have become the best candidate for high power applications as they offer many advantages over their counterparts of the three-phase. This paper proposes a new performance analysis of a polyphase IM with any number of phases in stator or rotor. This paper deals with the performance of the magnetic field and electrical torque. Control is a main part of the machine operation and it depends on the machine inductance; therefore, this paper deduces the polyphase machine inductance in terms of the machine configuration. Also, the magnetic equivalent circuit of the polyphase machine has been defined. In addition, the effect of mutual inductance produced due to the unequal number of phases in stator and rotor is illustrated on the equivalent circuit. To verify the proposed algorithms, a systemic model was designed by using two software (Finite Element Method Magnetics (FEMM) and MATLAB).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The negative thermal expansion (NTE), magnetic and electronic transport properties of Mn3Ga1-xAgxN (0 ≤ x ≤ 1.0) with antiperovskite structure were systematically investigated. Our results indicate that the introduction of Ag in Mn3Ga1-xAgxN can effectively tune the coefficient of NTE from –232.57 × 10−6/K (x = 0, △T = 22 K) to −19.76 × 10−6/K (x = 1.0, △T = 15 K). Correspondingly, the ΔStotal associated with the different amplitude of the lattice contraction at the phase transition gradually decreases from 23.9 J/(kg·K) to 10.9 J/(kg·K) with increasing Ag content. The substitution of Ag in Mn3Ga1-xAgxN also affects significantly the magnetic properties and results in the magnetic evolution from antiferromagnetic (AFM) to ferrimagnetic (FIM) with increasing Ag content. Thus the magnetic transition from ferromagnetic to paramagnetic was observed at high doping level (for x = 0.8 and 1.0). Above transition temperature, the temperature coefficient of resistivity (TCR) can be tuned by Ag substitution and the lowest TCR value is 148.1 ppm/K when x = 0.8. The possible mechanism for the observed tunable TCR is discussed. The obtained results are helpful for understanding the chemical doping effects on the physical properties and the strong correlation effects in Mn-based antiperovskite compounds.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Thermal interaction in an electron-phonon-magnon system in a ferromagnetic Ni film is investigated using a time-resolved pump-probe technique with thermoreflectance and magneto-optical Kerr effect. A nanoscale Au/Ni bilayer is used to induce thermal excitation of Ni in two ways: direct heating of Ni and indirect heating of Ni via Au. By comparing experiments and thermal modeling, we obtain the coupling parameters for electron-phonon, electron-magnon, and phonon-magnon pairs: 8.55 × 1017, 1.0–1.3 × 1017, and 0.8–1.1 × 1017 W m−3 K−1, respectively. In particular, we find that the phonon-magnon coupling parameter plays a significant role as a fast heat dissipation channel from magnon to phonon during the initial few picoseconds. In addition, both direct and indirect heating can be explained by similar coupling parameters with a variation less then 30%. Consequently, we conclude that the heat exchange between electron, phonon, and magnon is the dominant mechanism for the ultrafast demagnetization.© 2020 The AuthorsPolycrystalline samples of the intermetallic compounds R2PdGe6 (R = Pr, Nd, Gd-Er) and R2PtGe6 (R = Tb, Ho, Er) have been studied using X-ray diffraction as well as magnetometric and neutron diffraction measurements. All compounds have an orthorhombic crystal structure of the Yb2PdGe6-type (space group Cmca) and are antiferromagnetic with the Néel temperatures ranging from 4.9 K for Er2PtGe6 up to 48 K for Tb2PdGe6. The magnetic properties and specific heat data collected for Nd2PdGe6 show the presence of an additional phase transition below TN at T = 4 K. Based on the neutron diffraction data, the magnetic structures have been determined for R2PdGe6 (R = Pr, Nd, Tb, Dy, Ho) and R2PtGe6 (R = Tb and Er). Both the magnetic properties and neutron diffraction data indicate that the magnetic moment is localized on rare earth atoms. The magnetic unit cell is equal to the crystal one, however, individual compounds show different types of magnetic orderings. Magnetic moments in Pr2PdGe6 form a non-collinear antiferromagnetic structure at low temperatures with magnetic moments confined to the (0 0 1) plane. The low temperature magnetic structure in Nd2PdGe6 is a collinear antiferromagnetic one with moments parallel to the b-axis and coupled ferromagnetically within the (0 0 1) plane, while along the c-axis the moments follow the + − − + sequence. With increasing temperature, a transition to a modulated magnetic structure is observed in Nd2PdGe6 at T = 4 K. The magnetic moments in R2PdGe6 (R = Tb, Dy, Ho) and Tb2PtGe6 assume a non-collinear antiferromagnetic order within the (0 0 1) plane with the + − + − sequence of signs of the moments in the neighboring planes along the c-axis. The Er moments in Er2PtGe6 form a collinear magnetic structure with magnetic moments oriented along the a-axis and coupled ferromagnetically within the (0 0 1) plane. Along the c-axis the moments follow the + − + − sequence. The magnetic structures determined here are discussed on the basis of the competition between the RKKY-type interactions and influence of Crystalline Electric Field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric properties of the J1–J2 transverse Ising model are studied by the Correlated Cluster Mean Field approximation. We focus on the particular case J1=1 and J2=-1. The model exhibits a complex phase diagram where three phases were identified: superantiferromagnetic, mixed and paramagnetic. The change in entropy, the cooling ratio and the adiabatic temperature were calculated; we distinguish two types of magnetocaloric effect: normal and inverse. The magnetocaloric properties of the model are discussed as a function of temperature, transverse and longitudinal fields.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The metal magnetic memory (MMM) method is a nondestructive testing method to inspect the early damage of steel structures. A four-point bending fatigue beam was inspected by this method during the whole fatigue life. The self-magnetic-leakage field (SMLF) values were measured during the test of the Q345B steel beam. Frequency of 3 Hz and stress ratio of 0.2 contributed to the fatigue life of 100,180 cycles. Test results indicate that both the normal and tangential component of the SMLF values can identify the stress concentration and the crack zones. The gradient can reflect the degree of damage. Furthermore, in order to study the change law of the SMLF values in the crack zone, an improved magnetic dipole model considering the crack dimensions and shape is proposed. The model predictions are in very good agreement with the corresponding test results. Lastly, three characteristic parameters, i.e. average ΔHp(y) field values, resultant magnetic field value H and magnetic parameter m, were extracted from the test data. These parameters can judge the fatigue stage and the damage degree of the specimen. Therefore, the research lays the experimental and theoretical foundation for using the MMM method to inspect steel structures under fatigue bending loads.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The electronic band structure of Ce2RuGe was studied by means of X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy and ab initio calculations. The compound was recently reported to bear non-magnetic ions Ce1 and magnetic ions Ce2 located at 2a and 2b Wyckoff positions, respectively, in its orthorhombic unit cell. As a result, Ce2RuGe exhibits antiferromagnetic ordering below TN=12 K coexisting with valence fluctuations. The results of our electronic structure investigations corroborated the diverse nature of 4f electrons in this material and showed that its unique physical behavior is a direct consequence of different strength of f-ligand hybridization at the Ce1 and Ce2 sites.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Structure and magnetoimpedance (MI) properties of Permalloy films electrodeposited on Indium Tin Oxide (ITO) coated on glass substrate have been investigated. Microstructure and magnetic measurements confirm the composition and formation of single phase films with varying thickness. The MI values increased from 2.8% to 50%, while the frequency at which maximum MI is observed shifted to lower frequency when thickness of the NiFe film is increased. Present results show that MI is not only weak but also exhibits a sign change in the lower frequency range. It is shown that the magnetoinductive component is dominant at lower frequencies. Thickness and frequency dependence of MI values are compared with numerically calculated results on the basis of Maxwell's and Landau- Lifshitz equations. It is found that the thickness and effective conductivity of the film play a significant role in variation of MI values. We have attempted to extract the relative magnetic permeability (μr), the damping factor (α), the angle between the equilibrium state of magnetization and easy axis (θ) and the magnetic anisotropy field (Hk) by fitting the experimental MI data to the standard equations. Experimental results are consistent with the physical parameters obtained from the phenomenological model. The relative permeability values extracted from the MI data corroborate well with magnetic measurements of literature.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The crucial role of high Bi-content on magnetic properties of ambient pressure synthesized double perovskite La2−xBixMnCoO6 (x = 0, 0.5 and 1) has been investigated. Structural characterization was carried out using X-ray and electron diffraction analyses as well as HAADF-STEM imaging, which confirm the monoclinic structure with P21/n space group for all compositions. A comprehensive dc-magnetization and ac-susceptibility studies unravel the complex magnetic features of parent La2MnCoO6 and its associated changes upon substitution of La by Bi. Both the ferromagnetic TC and reduced magnetization with increase in Bi-content, originated from weakening of ordered Mn4+—O—Co2+ superexchange interactions. Bi-substitution also leads to suppression in magnetic disordering, which should strengthen the ferromagnetic state. These antagonist effects i.e. suppression of disordering and lowering of TC can be related to the evolution of Mn3+—O—Co3+ (e1—O—e1) vibronic ferromagnetism of smaller exchange stabilization. The local lattice distortion due to stereoactive 6s2-electron pairs of Bi3+ possibly results in cooperative lattice distortion favouring the stabilization of Jahn-Teller active intermediate-spin state Co3+ and high spin Mn3+. It is suggested that Bi-substitution favours the reaction Co2+ + Mn4+ = Co3+ + Mn3+ to the right side, which is otherwise biased to left by 0.2 eV.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.It is investigated the behavior of the coercivity as function of the temperature in SmCo 2:17 type magnets. These magnets are a 5 element alloy with Sm, Co, Fe, Cu and Zr. The magnets have a peculiar nanostructure, where the nanocrystalline grains of the main ferromagnetic phase - rhomobohedral Sm2(CoFe)17 - are enveloped by a cell boundary Sm(CoCu)5 phase. The samples present different behavior as function of temperature, which is attributed to different copper content inside the Sm(Co,Cu)5 cell boundary phase. It is found that the experimental hysteresis curves of high coercivity magnets can be theoretically described by a mean field Stoner-Wohlfarth model. It is observed a spring effect: When a magnetized sample is exposed to reversal field of the order of −1.5 Tesla, the magnetization returns to near the remanence value. The microstructure that results in high coercivity SmCo 2:17 type magnets is discussed in detail.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Currently, plastic/rubber/silicone based shoe inserts are used as preventive approach against diabetic foot which are non-degradable, non-absorbent and contains magnet protrusions, making them highly uncomfortable. These are discarded and thrown away after their service life, causing soil and marine pollution. Thus, the objective of this study was to evaluate polyvinyl alcohol/carboxymethyl cellulose (PVA/CMC) based magnetic hydrogels prepared by physical crosslinking as an alternative for diabetic shoe inserts. Hydrogels prepared by moist heat treatment with different concentration of strontium ferrite nanoparticles (MG) are evaluated based on their structural, physico-chemical, morphological, thermal, mechanical, thermo-mechanical, swelling behavior, surface wetting, magnetic and rheological properties. It was observed that incorporation of MG resulted in improvement in overall properties. Infrared spectroscopy revealed strong hydrogen bonding interaction between CMC and PVA. The surface micrographs showed uniform dispersion of MG throughout PVA/CMC matrix. The results showed the improvement in flexibility and tensile strength of the PVA/CMC hydrogels with the incorporation of MG by ~40 and ~20%, respectively. Moreover, the magnetic hydrogels could absorb ~300% moisture of their original weight which is necessary to avoid growth of microbes on skin. Thus, PVA/CMC/MG hydrogels can be considered as a biodegradable alternative for diabetic shoe insoles.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The crystallographic and magnetic properties of the polycrystalline intermetallic compound Dy2AgIn3 are presented. The compound crystallizes in the hexagonal CaIn2- type structure (space groupP63/mmc). The magnetic susceptibility data reveals a Curie–Weiss (CW) law behavior above120K, with a calculated effective magnetic moment μeff=10.63±0.29μB/Dy3+and a Curie paramagnetic temperatureθp=17.5K±0.5K, demonstrating the dominance of ferromagnetic (FM) couplings in the sample. In the temperature range of 60-120Kit exhibits a Griffith's phase like behavior. The dc field cooled (FC) and zero field cooled (ZFC) susceptibility, show field dependent irreversible phenomena belowTr~43K, and the ZFC plots present a cusp glass like maxima at31K. The irreversibility temperatureTradopts aH2/3, field dependence of de Almeida–Thouless type line which defines the stability limits in the H-T plane withTr(0)=44.5±0.5K. The ac susceptibility data shows a relative shift in freezing temperature δTf~0.048±0.004, while near the freezing temperature it exhibits a Power- Vogel-Fulcher law dependency characterized by the dynamic exponentszν=7.4, single flip time τ0=10-6sandTg=24.5±0.65K. These values suggest the formation of cluster spin-glass states (CSG). At low angles the neutron diffraction (ND) profiles display diffuse scattering of antiferromagnetic (AFM) origin which is triggered by the ~5nm- magnetic spin clusters.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Gd1−xAlxMnO3 material was successfully synthesized using the Pechini-modified-sol–gel method at different Al doping concentrations (x = 0, 0.25, 0.75, and 1). The samples were structurally characterized using XRD patterns and SEM/EDS analysis. The sample x = 0 displayed a single-phase, while the other systems displayed a multi-phase structure. Particle size calculated using the SEM images confirmed a successful synthesis of nanomaterials in the range of 97 and 123 nm. FC and ZFC magnetization modes were conducted for the samples, and we noticed a gradual decrease in the magnetization values as the doping increases. However, the doping also resulted in shifting the bifurcation temperature to elevated ones. The compound with x = 1 showed a good increase in magnetization up to around 8 emu/g with a bifurcation temperature of 68 K opening the door for different sets of applications at higher temperatures. The three samples (x = 0, 0.25, and 0.75) present different magnetic phases while decreasing the temperature starting from the paramagnetic phase at room temperature to the antiferromagnetic phase at the bifurcation temperature Tirr, then to the superparamagnetic behavior at very low temperatures TB. While for the sample x = 1 illustrates only two magnetic phases; from the paramagnetic order to the antiferromagnetic phase at Tirr. Griffiths phase was also inspected for different doping concentrations, and a proportional relation was drawn between the Griffiths regime and the aluminum percentage. The isothermal entropy measurements were conducted in a magnetic field between 1 and 7 T. The concentration of aluminum in the samples reduces the produced entropy change but widens the temperature difference. The x = 0 sample shows the highest isothermal entropy change and RCP of 50 J.Kg−1.K−1 and 552 J/kg, respectively, at 7 T. Also, the sample with x = 1 showed a maximum entropy change at 50 K due to the formation of an incommensurate antiferromagnetic phase.© 2020 The AuthorsCrystalline structure, thermal stability and magnetic properties of Hf2(FexCo1−x)11B (x = 0.2, 0.4) alloys were investigated and compared to those of well-known Hf2Co11B parent compound. Fully amorphous ribbons were synthesized by rapid quenching. The increasing amount of Fe resulted in higher thermal stability of the amorphous ribbons, as the crystallization temperature increased from 622 to 632 °C for x = 0.2 and 0.4, respectively. Hf2Co11 (in rhombohedral and orthorhombic structure) and HfCo2 precipitate in Hf2(Fe0.2Co0.8)11B and Hf2(Fe0.4Co0.6)11B isothermally annealed at T = 610 °C. Fe-containing phases, as (FeCo)3B and α-Fe, were also formed. Moreover, annealing at T = 665 °C resulted in the formation of HfCo3B2 phase regardless of composition. The highest value of magnetization saturation was obtained for Hf2(Fe0.4Co0.6)11B melt-spun sample, while the coercive field and anisotropy constant were maximized for Hf2(Fe0.2Co0.8)11B after heat treatment at T = 610 °C.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Production of the intermetallic MnCo0.8Fe0.2Ge phase, interesting as magnetocaloric material, is obtained by using an almost fully amorphous mechanically alloyed precursor. Thermal treatment to develop the intermetallic phase has been reduced in time (from several hours or even days to few minutes), and temperature (from 1123 K to 723 K). Thermomagnetic measurements allow us to analyze the magnetocaloric effect and to compare the results with those obtained from conventional annealing treatments. Close relationship between magnetocaloric properties and crystal size provides further optimization of the system preserving the advantages of the production method proposed.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis paper reports an investigation of the effects of varying different device parameters on the random-dopant-fluctuation (RDF) induced threshold voltage variability (σVT) in junctionless (JL) InGaAs FinFETs. Such investigation is made by means of a 3D numerical device simulator. Both gate length and fin height scaling are found to increase σVT in InGaAs JL FinFETs, similar to that in Si devices, following “Pelgrom's law” [1]. On the other hand, although the scaling of either fin width (Wfin) or effective oxide thickness (EOT) of the gate insulator reduces σVT in Si JL devices due to enhanced electrostatic integrity; such scaling is found to deteriorate σVT in InGaAs JL FinFETs. Decrease in the density of state capacitance, also known as quantum capacitance, with Wfin or EOT scaling is found responsible for the deterioration of σVT in InGaAs devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper combines Zheng-Liu (Z-L) model and modified Jiles-Atherton-Sablik (J-A-S) model to propose a magnetomechanical model, to investigate the relationship between the fatigue damage of the steel bar and the surface magnetic memory signal, and to analyze and predict the variation trends of the magnetization of steel bar subjected to cyclic loading. Then tensile fatigue tests on HRB400 steel bars were conducted and the surface magnetic flux density of the specimens under cyclic load was measured. The experimental results demonstrate that the magnetic flux density of the specimens showed three stages in the fatigue process. The magnetic flux density changed rapidly in the early and last stages of the cyclic loading, and developed slightly in the middle stage of fatigue. The magnetization of the specimens during the first two stages was mainly affected by the magnetomechanical effect, and the magnetization during the last stage was dominated by the magnetic flux leakage effect. According to the proposed model, the magnetization of the specimens during the fatigue was simulated. Combined with the fatigue damage formula based on the magnetic signal, the magnetic signal curve reflecting the first two stages of fatigue damage was obtained. By comparing the simulation results with the experimental results, the proposed model can effectively describe the variation trends of the magnetization of the steel bar during the fatigue.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Properties of noise in operation bandwidth of magnetoresistive readers arising from asymmetric oscillations of magnetization have been studied experimentally using high bandwidth time domain measurements. Different reader geometries, temperatures and external fields were used to identify the main factors leading to noise of this type. We investigate correlation between noise in device operation bandwidth and instantaneous amplitude of thermally excited magnetic resonance, which has been previously shown to correspond to asymmetric oscillations of the free layer. It is also found that waveform skewness may be used as a proxy for this correlation. We propose a routine for identification and clear differentiation of noise due to asymmetric oscillations and random telegraph noise in our experimental samples. We also introduce a method to mitigate the effect and improve the signal to noise ratio.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this study, the phenol red (PR) dye film has been deposited on n-type silicon wafer and SEM, XRD measurements of the film have taken. Then, the PR/n-Si photodiode has been fabricated and (dark) electrical and photoresponse characterization has been analysed. The current-Voltage (I-V) measurements have been carried out at varied light power ranging from 100 mW/cm2 to 400 mW/cm2. Rectification ratios (RR) have been determined as a function of illumination intensities and they are determined as 115.47 for 100 mW/cm2 and 30.26 for 400 100 mW/cm2, respectively. The ideality factor and the barrier height of the Co/PR/n-Si photodiode have been determined as 2.80 and 0.52 eV, respectively in dark. Therefore, it has been seen that the PR/n-Si photodiode performances are strongly dependent on the incident optical power. Namely, the current density has increased remarkably with the power of light at the same reverse bias voltage and this behavior is explained by strong capability of converting a light signal into an electrical for the PR/n-Si photodiode device. Responsivity (R) and detectivity (D*) of the PR/n-Si photodiode are also plotted as a function of illumination intensities for reverse biases and it is found that both parameters are dependent on the illumination intensity. Finally, the capacitance–voltage (C-V) characteristics of the device have been carried out at various frequencies. Obtained experimental results indicate that the PR dye can be used in various optoelectronic applications.© 2020As topologically protected particle-like magnetization configurations, magnetic skyrmions are promising carriers for information storage and processing. However, the inevitable strain field, probably induced in micro-nano manufacture process, could limit their practical applications. Here, we theoretically demonstrate a universal law governing the motion behavior of a single skyrmion under the influence of a spatially-varying strain field without other external fields. We elucidate that its motion is perpendicular to the spatial distribution of the strain field, and that the velocity obeys the quantitative relationship v=χFsε, where χ is the material-related parameter and Fsε=∫my∂yεmydxdy is the driving force induced by the strain field. Based on this theoretical framework, we propose two typical racetrack configurations with the weaken skyrmion Hall effect, presenting themotion along the longitudinal direction in a lateral field and the rotation around the center of racetrack in a radial field. Our findings open a door for understanding the inherent relationship between strain field and skyrmions and provide a basic idea to manipulate skyrmions in the presence of strain field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic, and magnetocaloric properties of iron-deficient (Nd1−xCex)YFe17 alloys in the rhombohedral Th2Zn17–type crystal structure prepared by arc-melting and vacuum annealing have been investigated. Among the investigated alloys, (Nd0.7Ce0.3)YFe17 shows the highest values of magnetic entropy change and relative cooling power, namely 5.45 J kg−1 K−1 and 504 J kg−1 for a magnetic field change of 5 T. The Curie temperature and saturation magnetization of the (Nd0.7Ce0.3)YFe17 alloy are 301 K and 162 emu/g, respectively. The absence of thermal and magnetic hysteresis with relatively high cooling capacity near room temperature suggests that Fe-deficient (Nd0.7Ce0.3)YFe17 carries significant potential for room-temperature magnetic refrigeration.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric effect (MCE) on Ni2−xPtxMnGa (x = 0.2, 0.3 and 1.0) shape memory Heusler alloys around martensite phase transition temperature (TM) is investigated by varying chemical pressure (Pt concentration). The magnetic entropy change (ΔSM) decreases with increasing chemical pressure for various external applied magnetic fields up to 3 T, and the width of thermal hysteresis increases with the increases of Pt concentration. The effect of hydrostatic pressure on both TM and ΔSM for Ni1.8Pt0.2MnGa is also investigated. We observed that the application of hydrostatic pressure increases TM (3.5 K/GPa) and stabilizes the martensite phase. The maximum magnetic entropy change (ΔSmax) of 9.31 J Kg−1 K-1is observed for a field change of 9 T at ambient pressure for Ni1.8Pt0.2MnGa. Further, the application of external pressure leads to the decrease of ΔSmax to 5.52 J Kg−1 K−1 at 0.91 GPa.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The self-sustaining atomic magnetometer has the advantage of high sensitivity and long spin coherence lifetime, based on which we demonstrate a novel method to calibrate the magnetic coil constants precisely. Via non-destructive phase measurement and coherent optical pumping, the spin polarization of rubidium atoms is regenerated coherently and the Larmor precession signal is oscillating continuously. In this stable state, the calibrating capability is achieved by applying current to coils and scan the magnetic components along x- and y-direction. The magnetic field magnitude is obtained from precession frequency and the coil constants can be derived from the fitting equation directly. The constants of coils in the experiment are 246.010 ± 0.034 nT/mA and 197.452 ± 0.025 nT/mA in the x- and y-directions, respectively.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.E- tuning of magnetic behavior is investigated in epitaxial Ni film grown on (0 1 1)-PMN-PT single crystal substrate. Loop-like and butterfly-like Hr-E and Hme-E curves are obtained along [01-1] and [1 0 0], respectively, which is mediated by the combined effects of anisotropic strain and nonvolatile rhombohedral to orthorhombic phase transformation in PMN-PT. The results are further confirmed via E-tuning of domain in PMN-PT using piezoelectric force microscope and E-tuning of magnetic stripe domain in Ni film using magnetic force microscope, as well as E-tuning of XRD. In addition, the highest E-induced Hr shift of 1253 Oe is achieved along [01-1] under electric field of −10 kV/cm. This work is of significance for the potential application in magnetoelectric multifunctional devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The experimental observation of the spiral domain structure has opened a new possibility of the fine control of the domain structure with different magnetization states in magnetic microwires which are the base elements of the magnetic sensors. Here we demonstrate that the tuning of magnetic domain structures in amorphous microwires can be engineered by the combination of tension and torsion mechanical stresses.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effects of different functional groups and dopants on the magnetic interaction and electronic properties of the two-dimensional transition metal carbide, Cr2C, were investigated by using first-principles calculations. We predict that the two-dimensional transition metal carbide Cr2C is a potentially controllable magnetic material. The introduction of surface functional groups as chemical dopants during the synthesis process would have large effects on the electronic properties and magnetic interactions of the Cr2C based materials. The different functional groups were found to have great influence on the electronic structure of Cr2CX2 (X = O, F, OH), including the transition from the metallic state to insulating state. While Cr2CO2 is metallic, Cr2CX2 (X = F, OH) are semiconducting. We studied the electronic and magnetic properties of Cr2CX2 (X = F, OH) and found that the electron or hole doping and N-doping only changed the electronic properties and did not change the magnetic properties, while the metal-doping could both change the electronic properties and magnetic properties of the system, which would have potential applications in nanoelectronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The quaternary interstitial nitrides Nd2Fe14BNδ was synthesized through the gas-solid reaction of N2 gas and Nd2Fe14B powders. It was found that Nd2Fe14BNδ alloy maintains the tetragonal structure (space group P42/mnm) with an expansion of the unit cell. Structure analyses showed the nitrogen concentration (δ) is about 0.352(48) with the volume-expansion ratio (ΔV/V) of 0.6613% in the unit cell. Refinement of neutron diffraction data indicated that the N has a site occupation preference (8:3) for the 4e (0, 0, 0.0652) site over the 4f (0.1000, 0.1000, 0) site. The room temperature saturation magnetization and the magnetocrystalline anisotropy field of Nd2Fe14BNδ slightly decrease by about 6% and 5% as compared to the parent alloy, respectively. The Curie temperature of Nd2Fe14B compound increases from 312 °C to 331 °C after nitrogenation with such a subtle volume expansion, which provides a validation prediction that we may increase the volume-expansion ratio to improve Tc further. Therefore, Nd2Fe14BNδ, with better temperature stability could be obtained.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate experimentally the operation of a spin-wave magnetometer integrated into a circuit with a positive feedback. The circuit consists of the passive magnetic and active electric parts. The magnetic part includes a sensing element, which is a magnetic cross junction made of Y3Fe2(FeO4)3. The electric part includes a non-linear amplifier and a phase shifter. The electric and magnetic parts are connected via micrometer size antennae. Spin waves are excited by two of these antennae while the output inductive voltage produced by the interfering spin waves is detected by the third antenna. Spin waves propagating in the orthogonal arms of the cross can accumulate significantly different phase shifts, depending on the direction and the strength of the external magnetic field. The output inductive voltage reaches its maximum in the case of constructive spin wave interference. The positive feedback provides further signal amplification. It appears possible to enhance the response function, compared to the passive circuits without a feedback, by a factor of ×100 without an increase in the noise level. The experimental data show a prominent response to the external magnetic field variation, exceeding 5×103V/T. The intrinsic noise spectral density of the device can be as low as 10−16 V2/Hz. The estimated sensitivity of the prototype device is 2×10-12T/√Hz at room temperature. We argue that spin-wave magnetometers can potentially be as sensitive as SQUIDs while operating at room temperature.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically investigate spin polarized conductance through nanojunctions made by magnetic domains in a thin films of three dimensional ferromagnetic topological insulator (TI) as a quantum anomalous Hall insulator. Writing of magnetic domains is now feasible in recent experiments. Ferromagnetism induced in such materials can control topological phase of the band structure and as consequence, configuration of the states in each band. By means of band analysis, it is demonstrated that in topologically non-trivial bands with non-zero Chern number, there exists a change in spin dominant states among Brillouin zone while spin polarization of trivial bands shows dominant of one spin type. Indeed, there is an interplay between topological invariant of the band spectrum and contribution of the spin states in conductance. We show that in-plane magnetization or structure inversion asymmetry result in a k-dependent parity configuration of surface states in ultrathin film topological insulator. In the conduction and valence bands, a nearly perfect spin polarized conductance is found in a nanojunction composed of anti-parallel magnetic domains which is mediated by a layer under application of in-plane magnetization or perpendicular applied bias. This spin polarized region is extendable with the magnetization. To the sake of completeness, proposed polarization in conductance was also supported by interpretation based on spin and parity local density of states along the interfaces of magnetic domain walls. Analysis of the spin-parity states sheds light to the quantum transport through magnetically doped TI thin-film's nanojunctions with different mass terms.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Arrays of interacting oscillators having different individual frequencies can exhibit transitions to synchronization depending on array and individual oscillator parameters. In particular, vortex-based spin-torque nanopillar oscillators have gyrotropic frequencies depending inversely on the free layer disk radius. Here the effect of random distribution of radii on synchronization for chains of oscillators is investigated, since in actual systems of spin torque oscillator's radii will be non-identical owing to fabrication control limitations. The vortex dynamics of linear chains interacting through the dipolar interaction are modeled by the Thiele equations with the free layer radii given by a random distribution about a mean. It is shown that there are two critical current densities for each chain: first, the onset of synchronized gyrotropic motion of the largest radius free layer oscillator, and second, the loss of synchronization as the individual oscillator amplitudes increase. The second critical current density is strongly dependent on the free layer radii of the particular chain. However, the synchronized frequency only weakly depends on the mean radius of each chain, and it is shown to be practically independent of the radii distribution.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Continuous exchange biased bilayers with in-plane antiparallel magnetization were prepared by a pulsed-current, fast-annealing method. The exchange-bias field and ferromagnetic resonance frequency of the bilayers, annealed with different voltages, were obtained using a vibrating sample magnetometer and vector network analyzer, respectively. All annealed bilayers had two exchange-bias fields and two resonance frequencies. The exchange-bias field decreased or even reversed direction, while the resonance frequency increased after annealing. We argue that the transition zone between antiparallel magnetizations had a greater number of rotatable antiferromagnetic spins, and thus, greater rotatable anisotropy, resulting in higher resonance frequencies in the annealed film. Moreover, for samples annealed at different voltages, the narrow area had a greater proportion of rotatable antiferromagnetic spins with a low exchange-bias field and high resonance frequency in comparison with the broad area. A model was proposed to describe these phenomena, which was supported by ion-etching tests.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present here a way to modulate the anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) by anomalous Hall signal and thus measure the domain wall (DW) motion velocity at near-coercivity. We study the magnetization relaxation at the constant field in the longitudinal (Rxx) Hall geometry. We observed asymmetric Rxx peaks that appear at the DW pinning fields. This unusual magnetoresistance behavior is explained by considering the AMR modulation by the anomalous Hall voltage. In the proposed method, using the magnetization relaxation, the real-time DW velocity measurement is much easier in comparison to the other microscopy methods. Moreover, the additional signal from anomalous Hall voltage makes this technique simpler and sensitive for DW velocity measurements, which can be useful for various spintronic sensing applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effects of a random crystal field on the critical behavior of the mixed spin-1/2 and spin-2 Blume-Capel ferrimagnetic model are investigated on the Bethe lattice (BL). The sublattice dipole and quadrupole moments of the model are obtained in terms of exact recursion relations under the effect of the randomly distributed crystal field. It is assumed to be active randomly with probability p or inactive with probability 1-p for given lattice sites. In order to determine the nature of phase transitions, the thermal behaviors of the sublattice moments are investigated for given system parameters. The phase diagrams are obtained on the (D,T) planes for given values of p with q=3,4 and 6. It is found that the model exhibits only the second-order phase transitions and reentrant behavior for 0<p<1. The compensation temperatures, Tcomp, are also observed and its lines are demonstrated on the (D,Tcomp) planes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We reported an investigation on the surface morphology and magnetic properties of flexible NiFe/IrMn exchange biased bilayers fabricated on pre-strained polydimethylsiloxane (PDMS) substrates. Due to the large difference in elastic moduli between the magnetic films and the elastomeric PDMS membranes, the flexible NiFe/IrMn films reveal a one-dimensional wrinkled topography with the wavelength decreasing and the amplitude increasing with the growth pre-strain. Two kinds of magnetic anisotropy configurations with the unidirectional exchange-bias anisotropy parallel or perpendicular to the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy are obtained by controlling the relative orientation between the pinning direction and the wrinkle, which gives rise to the distinct angular dependence of exchange-biased field and coercivity. The magnetic behaviors of the wrinkled NiFe/IrMn bilayers can be well interpreted by numerical calculations based on the Stoner-Wohlfarth model with considering the anisotropy configurations.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we investigate structural, static and dynamics magnetic properties of Co2FeAl (CFA) films, deposited on Si (1 0 0) with Ti buffer and capping layers. We study the evolution of the coercive field, anisotropies, damping constant and linewidth broadening as a function of CFA film thickness in the range 5 nm to 200 nm. We obtain coercive fields weakly dependent on thickness, with values in the range 4.2 Oe to 7.8 Oe. All samples show roughly constant in-plane magnetic anisotropy, and out-plane anisotropy originated from the CFA/Ti interfaces. With increasing thickness we observe the emergence of rotatable anisotropy. We found magnetic damping parameters α between 2.56×10-3 and 3.45×10-3, and inhomogeneous linewidth ΔHo under 10.3 Oe for the whole range of CFA film thickness. These ΔH0 results are small when compared to the values reported for CFA in literature, specially for films with thickness above 100 nm. The present study contributes to a better understanding of the dynamic properties of magnetic CFA films, and open new potential applications in magneto-impedance sensors, RF shielding and others.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Many animals use the geomagnetic field to orient. Among the mechanisms proposed for magnetoreception, the ferromagnetic hypothesis assumes a magnetosensor based on magnetic particles. In this study, magnetic resonance (MR) is applied to 11 Lepidoptera species separated into four body parts: antennae, head, thorax, and abdomen. For the first time, magnetic characteristics of the parts are compared between migratory Urania fulgens and Aphrissa. statira and non-migratory Heliconius ethilla, Anartia amathea, An. fatima and Actinote thalia, species for which we had sufficient specimens for statistical analyses. Spectral characteristics of the magnetic material include the geff factor, linewidth and the high field (HF) component area, as well as, the HF area ratio of these body parts. The broad HF and low field (LF) components, commonly observed in social insect spectra, are present in the Lepidoptera body part spectra. Other unusual narrow lines are superimposed mainly to the HF component, the narrow component at geff ~ 2.05 associated with very small Fe aggregates and the extra component at geff values from 2.13 to 3.03. The relative amount of magnetic material in the body parts are derived from the HF area. The results indicate that only antenna/head ratio of magnetic material amount and the spectral components distinguish migrant from non-migratory Lepidoptera. The extra component showing angular dependence and previously observed in spectra of honeybee abdomens and leaf-cutter ant antennae was observed in the antennae of non-migratory species but not in the migratory ones. Similarities of these attributes with other homing insects suggest that global orientation is as important for butterflies that occupy home ranges, defend territories, and trap-line flowers as it is for long-distance migrating Lepidoptera.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nanocomposites of Lanthanum Strontium Manganite and Cobalt Ferrite with different weight percentages were prepared using the sol–gel method and sintered at 950 °C. Presence of constituent phases of La0.67Sr0.33MnO3 and CoFe2O4 peaks were confirmed from X-ray diffraction and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy studies. Hysteresis behaviour shows room ferromagnetism for the composite samples and their variation in saturation magnetization can be understood on the basis of competing effects between both the magnetic phases. Enhancement of squareness ratio and coercivity indicate the strengthening of exchange-coupling interaction due to closer proximity of hard and soft phases. Metallic state vanishes and resistivity increases with the incorporation of cobalt ferrite into lanthanum strontium matrix. An enhanced magnetoresistance in a wide temperature range is observed for 25% cobalt ferrite added sample and is ascribed to spin-polarized tunneling mechanism. Adiabatic small polaron hopping mechanism is used to explain the resistivity of the composites in the high temperature region.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Heusler compounds have been promising materials for their applications in spintronic, memory and thermoelectric devices. The Mn2CoCr, a full Heusler compound, has been investigated here for its mechanical, thermodynamic and thermoelectric prospective for the first time using full potential linearized augmented plane wave (FP-LAPW) method in support of density functional theory (DFT). The estimation of total energy conferred to Fm-3m structure in ferromagnetic phase, which was in accordance to the others finding. The estimated total magnetic moment was found to be 5.02 (in the units of Bohr magneton), which was in accordance with the Pauling-Slater rule and available data. The electronic structure using generalized gradient approximation (GGA) and modified Becke-Johnson (mBJ) revealed its metallic nature in both the spin configurations. Further, we have calculated the thermodynamic and thermoelectric constants such as specific heat, Debye temperature, Gruneisen constant, thermal conductivity, Seebeck coefficient and power factor. Our predicted value of specific heat at constant volume is 66.6 J/mol.K at 300 K and 0 GPa, which at higher temperature (1000 K) followed Dulong-Petit limit. The power factor was calculated to be 25x1012 Wm-1K−2 at 500 K, demonstrating its suitability in thermoelectric applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper deals with the monitoring of steel wires used for pre-stressed concrete steel strands and their over-stressing. These components, as the main bearing elements, represent high-strength structures that are usually pre-stressed in bridge constructions. This study employs the Barkhausen noise technique to prevent the over-stressing of these wires and demonstrates that Barkhausen noise emission decreases remarkably with increasing degree of over-stressing. It was found that over-stressing beyond the yield strength increases dislocation density, which in turn increases interference between the domain walls in motion. Increasing the pinning strength of the matrix reduces Barkhausen noise emission and an increasing degree of over-stressing can be directly linked with irreversible alteration of Barkhausen noise and extracted parameters such as the number of Barkhausen pulses and their magnitude as well as Barkhausen noise envelopes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the magnetization of a dilute magnetic suspension undergoing a shear flow and a uniform field in the presence of dipolar and hydrodynamic interactions is investigated. Firstly, the problem of a single magnetic particle in a simple shear flow in the presence of an external uniform magnetic filed is examined. From this solution, we study the influence of non-equilibrium effects on the magnetization at condition of strong flows, including the spinning behavior of the particles. Next, we use a non-renormalized cluster expansion in order to derive the magnetization O(ϕ2) in a sheared suspension of non-Brownian magnetic from a solution of a creeping flow problem of two magnetic spherical particles interacting magnetically and hydrodynamically in the presence of a uniform applied magnetic field, where ϕ is the particle volume fraction. The numerical results suggest that under condition of strong flows the aggregative nature of the dipolar interactions may lead to a decrease in the magnetization component in the field direction. In contrast, the dispersive character of the viscous hydrodynamic interactions produces a substantial increase in the same component of magnetization even under the condition of strong flow. This result is attributed to the misalignment produced by the hydrodynamic disturbances on the particle dipoles orientated with the flow direction.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.When designing semiconductor pulse converters of power systems operating in peak load conditions, it is necessary to calculate their characteristics and parameters, taking into account the magnetization reversal processes in the magnetic circuits of transformers and chokes. Magnetic materials of magnetic cores exhibit nonlinear, hysteretic, and dynamic properties due to the presence of classical vortex and additional losses. Various dynamic models, based on the classical Jiles–Atherton (JA) approach, are presented in the literature, however, they are unstable for textured materials and cannot be explained from a physical point of view. These models show certain non-physical situations expressed by the deformation of the hysteresis loop in the saturation region. In this paper, the direct and inverse dynamic hysteresis models are presented, based on the application of the theory of field separation. This approach explains some of the energy aspects of the JA model.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Heusler alloys are favorable candidates for fabricating functional devices and sensors due to their characteristic structural and magnetic properties, which vary at different length scales. In this paper, for the sake of expanding the fields of application and systematically studying the mechanisms at the nanoscale, Ni2MnGa Heusler alloy nanowires were fabricated via the electrospinning method followed by optimized heat treatments. While the nanowires exhibited ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transition near room temperature, anomalies in magnetic behaviors were observed by power fitting of χ−1-T curves disobeying Curie-Weiss law. The Ni2MnGa nanowires exhibited maximum isothermal entropy change of 0.35 J/kgK accompanied by extremely wide working temperature region (150 K), with a peak temperature (305 K) suitable for room temperature applications. Arrott plots and quantitative analysis of field/temperature dependence of magnetic entropy change determined second order magnetic phase transition in the nanowires. Construction of phenomenological universal curves addressed demagnetizing effect on magnetocaloric response, which was compared to the multiphase composition obtained by structural analysis. These novel findings in Ni-Mn-Ga nanowires enrich our knowledge of structure and magnetism of Heusler alloys at the nanoscale and could be taken as reference facilitating future relevant research.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Zn0.5Mn0.5SmxFe2-xO4 (0 ≤ x 0.05) fine powders with average crystallite sizes in the range 12–17 nm were synthesized by glycol-thermal reaction. The as-prepared compounds were subjected to thermal annealing process at 1100 °C, after which the crystallite sizes increased to about 60 nm. XRD analysis confirmed a single-phase cubic spinel structure in all the compounds investigated. TEM images showed nearly spherical particles with uniform particle size distributions. SEM and FTIR have been used to study morphology and confirm phase formation, respectively. The Mössbauer spectrum for Zn0.5Mn0.5Fe2O4 (x = 0) at room temperature may be resolved into two quadrupole doublets indicative of paramagnetic spin state. Sm3+ substituted compounds showed weak sextets in addition to broad doublets attributed to some particle magnetic moments in ordered magnetic phase. The Mössbauer spectra of the compounds annealed at 1100 °C exhibit magnetic split sextets indicative of ordered magnetic phase. The compounds have small coercive fields and high saturation magnetization (40 emu/g to 60 emu/g) which reduce with increasing Sm3+ content due to the paramagnetic nature of Sm3+ ions. Magnetic measurements as a function of field and temperature in as-prepared particles showed superparamagnetic behaviour with average moment of about ≈104μB. The average particle size obtained from the magnetic data corresponds well with that estimated from XRD analysis.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The sense of touch, also known as tactile perception, enables enhanced ambient environment awareness for modern robots. Fe-Ga alloys have demonstrated great potential in tactile sensor applications due to their significant inverse magnetostrictive effect. This study first develops a magnetostrictive sensor unit, consisting of permanent magnets, Fe-Ga wires, and Hall sensors to detect static and dynamic forces, as well as sample stiffness. Numerical models for individual sensor units are derived for force and stiffness detection, respectively. The force measurement range of tactile sensor unit is 0 to 3 N, and the sensitivity is 126 mV/N. A tactile sensor array is then developed and validated on a commercial robotic hand. Parametric studies investigating sensor interference and sensor arrangement are completed using finite element modeling. The tactile sensor array is able to detect stiffness of both monolithic and composite samples with a measurement error less than 8.3%. The magnetostrictive tactile sensor array developed in this study can facilitate precise grasping and intelligent control for future robots.© 2020The effect of a magnetic field on the electrical and magnetic properties of manganese sulfide upon electron doping in the YbxMn1−xS (0.05 < x < 0.2) compound has been investigated. The change in the conductivity type from the Poole–Frenkel to Mott law have been established using the I–V characteristics and the change in the carrier type upon temperature and concentration variations has been observed. The effect of the sample prehistory on the conductivity, impedance, and magnetic susceptibility under the action of a magnetic field in a wide temperature range has been found. The trivalent state of ytterbium ions has been determined using the electron paramagnetic resonance study. The dynamic JT transitions temperature are found by IR method and by the electron paramagnetic resonance. Anomalies of carrier mobility and magneto-impedance were found in the vicinity of the Jahn-Teller transitions. The experimental data are explained by the localization of electrons with the formation of the interstitial orbital momenta and an orbital momentum into the site. The sample prehistory is related to the lifting of the orbital angular moments degeneracy and the direction of the axis of distortion of the octahedrons in a magnetic field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This study investigates the response properties of natural-rubber-based magnetorheological elastomer (MRE) containing two different types of iron powder with different weight content. MREs with different anisotropy were prepared through solution blending and applying a magnetic field during vulcanization. Carbonyl iron particles (S-1640) with round shape and smaller size have greater effect on mechanical stiffening than bigger and irregularly structured electrolytic iron powder (Fe#400) in the MREs with the same weight fraction. The highest anisotropies belong to 1.0 T for S-1640 and 1.5 T for Fe#400 filled MREs. Hence, a lower magnetic field is sufficient to obtain higher magnetic effect in MREs filled with S-1640 iron powder. An external magnetic field has a strong effect on the stress-softening of MREs. S-1640 iron powder has a higher magnetic effect with a lower stress-relaxation rate than Fe#400 iron powder in the MREs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The recently published Mean Field Interacting Superparamagnet Model (MFISP model), which introduces the effective demagnetizing factor NE, is tested in specimens having a random-like spatial distribution of magnetic nanoparticles, where different hierarchies of clustering are present. These specimens are ferrogel PVA/iron oxide beads synthesized by a one-pot route, having spheroidal shapes and sizes of about 1 mm, and chain and disk-like arrays (superstructures) of beads. Raman analyses indicated that magnetic nanoparticles are composed by a mixture of magnetite and maghemite. Beads swell 208% by hydration in about 40 min. The increase of the ac susceptibility as a function of hydration time closely reflects the effect of bead swelling, in agreement with the expected diminution of dipole–dipole interactions. Measured susceptibility is analyzed in terms of the susceptibility χ of non-interacting particles and the effective demagnetizing factor NE of the specimen, which depends on swelling. The Specific Absorption Rate of electromagnetic power by the beads grows with the hydration time in agreement with ac susceptibility behavior. For long hydration times susceptibility and high field magnetization decrease. This is explained by the occurrence of oxidation of magnetite/maghemite to hematite. Isothermal magnetization experiments are performed on each superstructure in two perpendicular principal directions each. Results are consistently described with the MFISP model by considering two hierarchies of clustering: beads themselves and clusters within the beads. From the whole set of experiments, it is possible to estimate values for the volume fractions of particles in clusters and clusters in beads, given by xpc=0.46(15) and xcb=0.16(5). The susceptibility of non-interacting particles, χ=13(4), is also obtained, which results about five times larger than the measured (apparent) one. The MFISP model proves to be a convenient and efficient tool for the analysis of magnetization studies of complex 3d dispersions of magnetic nanoparticles, allowing an experimental determination of relevant physical information, otherwise not accessible by magnetic measurements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports the results of the round robin test (hereafter RRT) of magnetostriction measurement using the test apparatus following IEC 60404-17 from April 2019 to August 2019. The main purpose of the RRT is to identify factors affecting the magnetostriction measurement, and then to estimate the reproducibility of the measurements. Nine anonymous laboratories, whose test apparatuses are a little different from the draft standard, participated in the RRT. In the progress of the RRT, we identified factors affecting the magnetostriction measurement. Finally, the reproducibility of the measurements was estimated. Doshisha Univ. acts as the reference laboratory.© 2020The temperature, doping concentration and magnetic field dependence of the dielectric constant in lanthanum doped barium titanate are studied using a microscopic model and the Green's function technique. A kink in the temperature dependence of the dielectric constant is observed near the Neel temperature. The Neel temperature and the ferroelectric transition temperature decrease with increasing doping concentration. The doping dependence of the dielectric constant shows a maximum value at 0.15. For small magnetic fields the dielectric constant increases strongly, whereas for stronger ones it begins to decrease slightly, i.e. there is a critical field for the transition from spiral cycloidal to antiferromagnetic spin arrangement.© 2020Stimuli-responsive controlled release of drugs from metal complex devices has been receiving great attention, as it provides many advantages such as better delivery efficiency and selective binding. Here in, we report the synthesis of biocompatible CoFe2O4 NHSs of diameter around 200 nm and emergence of intrinsic multiple fluorescence from blue, green to red on modifying their surface with hydrophilic bio-molecule such as folic acid. The surface engineered NHSs also show excellent drug loading and releasing efficiency in different conditions. Both the surface modified and bare hollow spheres showed excellent catalytic activity towards 4-nitrophenol reduction.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In order to study the magnetic properties and giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) effect of FINEMET/Fe50Pt50 composite ribbons. A series of Fe50Pt50 films with different thickness (t) were deposited onto FINEMET ribbons by magnetron sputtering. The results showed that all FINEMET/Fe50Pt50 composite samples maintain good soft magnetic properties. The anisotropy field decreases firstly and then increases with the increasing of Fe50Pt50 layer thickness (0 ~ 117 nm). When the coating thickness is 98 nm, FINEMET/Fe50Pt50 composite samples obtain the smallest coercivity field (0.04 Oe). Its GMI ratio is 122%, which is three times higher than the FINEMET ribbon itself. This clearly indicates that addition of the Fe50Pt50 layer can impact magnetic properties and significantly enhance the GMI ratio, which is analyzed in terms of exchange coupling and dipole interaction between the FINEMET ribbon and coating film. We believe that these results provide a good guidance for GMI effect of soft magnetic amorphous composite materials with high sensitivity magnetic sensors.© 2020The state of the art in cylindrical nano and micro wires is reviewed with particular emphasis on the latest research trends. We analyze some of the key properties for prospective applications including magnetic anisotropy and micromagnetic structure, spin-caloritronics, domain wall dynamics and its control by transverse magnetic field and induced anisotropy, high frequency impedance and magnetic control of the electric polarizability, shape-memory and magnetocaloric effects in Heusler alloys wires. Cylindrical nanowires present specific magnetic domain configurations as complex vortex and transverse domains while the magnetization reversal typically involves propagation of Bloch-point domain walls. Such magnetic behavior offers new perspectives for applications in advanced technologies including spintronics, logic devices and novel magnetic recording media, functionalization and bioengineering and sensor devises. In particular, rapidly solidified glass-coated amorphous nanowires and submicron wires which constitute a novel class of ultrathin soft magnetic materials are attractive for future micro and nano sensors. Amorphous and nanocrystalline microwires prepared by rapid quenching from the melt can present quite peculiar magnetic properties, like spontaneous magnetic bistability associated with single and large Barkhausen jump and magnetoimpedance effect. Magnetic properties of amorphous microwires are related to the value and sign of the magnetostriction constant since the magnetoelastic anisotropy is one of the main sources of the magnetic anisotropy. As-prepared microwires with positive magnetostriction constant show generally rectangular hysteresis loops and fast domain wall propagation. In the case of low and negative magnetostriction, the wires demonstrate inclined hysteresis loops and large magnetoimpedance. To refine the magnetic structure, the easy anisotropy can be adjusted by annealing in the presence of a magnetic field and/or mechanical stress. Thus, the magnetic bistability in negative magnetostriction wires can be induced by annealing. Minimizing the magnetoelastic anisotropy either by adjusting the chemical composition with a low magnetostriction coefficient or by heat treatment is an appropriate route for enhancing the domain wall velocity. Tailoring the magnetic anisotropy by stress-annealing is also a promising method of the optimization of the domain wall dynamics in magnetic microwires. Soft magnetic properties and tunable magnetic structure of amorphous microwires are responsible for the magnetoimpedance effect, which preserves a high sensitivity up to GHz frequencies. This opens up novel applications based on the electric polarization of a finite-length microwire depending on the wire surface impedance near the antenna resonance, including embedded wireless sensing elements, self-sensing composites and selective microwave materials. Heusler alloys demonstrate the huge variety of physical properties that can be obtained by simple change in composition. Naturally, the efforts have been made to produce Heusler-based nano and micro wires to take advantage of variety of their physical properties in a miniature form. In this review, the emphasis is made on Heusler alloy glass-coated microwires.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Additions of zirconium diboride (ZrB2), to small scale (~1 g) arc-melted (AM) and larger scale (5 kg) book mould (BM) cast alloy with the composition Nd2.2Fe14B1.1 (near to stoichiometric Nd2Fe14B) have been shown to be a very effective means of eliminating the free-iron content, which is present as a result of the peritectic nature of the Nd2Fe14B phase. The effect of zirconium diboride in reducing free-iron content has been determined (1) magnetically by means of the Honda-Owen plots on the BM alloys and (2) by image analysis using scanning electron microscopy for both AM and BM alloys. Generally, for the BM alloys, both sets of measurements exhibited good agreement with a progressive reduction in the free-iron content with increasing additions of ZrB2. Without any subsequent homogenisation treatment, zero free-iron was achieved in the AM and BM cast condition, after an addition of just 1 mol% of ZrB2. Closely similar behaviour was observed with up to 1 mol% additions of the other Group 4 diborides, TiB2 and HfB2. High resolution scanning electron microscopy indicated that the diborides were embedded largely within the areas of Nd-rich material.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The intriguing physical properties of SmFeO3 such as spin-phonon coupling and spin reorientation transition (~480 K) make it interesting from fundamental point of view and a suitable candidate for oxide-based spintronic applications. Here, we have studied the temperature dependent structural, vibrational, and magnetic properties of polycrystalline Sm0.9Bi0.1Fe0.9Mn0.1O3 prepared by conventional solid-state reaction method. The compound stabilizes in orthorhombic structure with space group “Pnma” and exhibits no structural phase transitions in the investigated temperature range (300–500 K). Magnetic measurements reveal the weak ferromagnetic–paramagnetic transition at 620 K. Thermal evolution of phonon modes investigated using Raman spectroscopy in the temperature range 300–800 K reveal that Ag(3) phonon mode related to FeO6 vibrations exhibits anomalous behaviour below magnetic transition temperature, which we attribute to spin-phonon coupling. The optical band gap value of ∼ 5.17 eV has been estimated from the analysis of UV–Vis diffuse reflectance spectroscopy using the Tauc relation. The value of ΔEt2u→t2g is estimated to be ~ 2.6 eV for p-d charge transfer transitions in Fe/MnO6 octahedra. The obtained valence states from X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy analysis of all the elements of the sample are in excellent agreement with the expected values.© 2020The present manuscript deals with the magnetic and microwave absorption characteristics of zinc substituted nickel spinel ferrites with chemical formula Ni1−xZnxFe2O4 where x varies from 0 to 1 (Δx = 0.2). The synthesis method adopted is Sol-gel citrate precursor method. Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (VSM) has been employed to determine the magnetic properties. The electromagnetic and absorption properties have been determined using Vector Network Analyzer (VNA) in Ku band (12.4–18 GHz). RL as low as −31.17 dB (~99.92% absorption) has been obtained for composition x = 0.2 at a pellet thickness of 3 mm. Such a low value of RL make these Nickel-Zinc ferrites excellent absorbers, which can work at gigahertz frequencies in different applications such as radar stealth technology.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.To obtain miniaturized, lightweight, and integrated power conversion devices, the core material must be suitable for operation at higher frequencies (in the megahertz range) and must exhibit excellent performance, specifically, low core losses. In this study, MnZn power ferrites, a common core material, were doped with calcium copper titanate (CCTO) using a solid-state reaction method. The effects of CCTO doping (0.0–0.5 wt%) on the structural, magnetic, and dielectric properties of the MnZn ferrites were studied. The addition of 0.2 wt% CCTO to the MnZn ferrites improved the grain uniformity and decreased the porosity; thus, the material exhibited a fine microstructure. In addition, the saturation induction, initial permeability, and resistivity of the MnZn ferrites were increased, and the high-frequency core losses were suppressed. The core losses of the 0.2 wt% CCTO sample were only 495 kW/m3 at 3 MHz, 30 mT, and 25 °C. The lower core losses resulted mainly from reductions in the hysteresis loss and eddy current loss. The real permittivity of two representative MnZn ferrite samples was also investigated. The application of state-of-the-art MnZn ferrites with superior electromagnetic properties in high-frequency power conversion devices is anticipated. This study demonstrates that adding a dielectric material improves the electromagnetic properties of MnZn power ferrites.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the dynamic susceptibility in interconnected artificial spin ice by micromagnetic simulations. The resonance frequencies of five different systems were studied, starting with an interconnected Shakti lattice and introducing deformations to obtain pentagonal tessellations to reach an interconnected square lattice. Both the number of peaks and their frequencies are directly related to the initial magnetization of the system, which depends on the size of the lattice, the morphing parameter, the angle at which a magnetic pulse is applied and the intensity of the external magnetic field. The possibility of controlling frequencies by modifying the magnetic and geometric parameters of the system suggests the possibility of using these lattices in potential magnetic controllable frequency devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Intensive ultrasonic waves can be generated based on the magnetostriction effect. These waves are used in many industries such as engineering, agriculture, and food industry. In this study, nickel as a naturally abundant magnetostrictive material was used in the core of a magnetostrictive transducer. This study aimed to investigate the influence of core geometry on the behavioral performance of the magnetostrictive ultrasonic transducer. The results showed that slightly stretching (elongating) the cross-section of the core increases the maximum radial and longitudinal magnetostrictive forces. Moreover, in tapered cores, by increasing the cone angle up to 30°, the maximum radial magnetostrictive force increased and then decreased. By increasing the cone angle, the maximum longitudinal magnetostrictive force and the coil required voltage almost linearly decreased. A proper ultrasonic transducer should have maximum sound pressure variations in the medium (sample). Thus, the variations of the magnetostrictive force in the longitudinal direction (Z axis) should be maximized. The results indicated that the conical core with a cone angle of 30° has the highest variations of magnetostrictive force in the Z-direction.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The aim of this two-part work is to determine the effective depth from which the magnetic Barkhausen noise is detected. To achieve this, we have tested different materials for which the effect of reading depth is critical. This first part presents results of the measurements of a set of martensitic steel ribbons. The ribbons of varying thicknesses (from 10 μm up to 1 mm) have been measured in different magnetizing configurations (solenoid and yokes) ensuring homogeneous quasi-static magnetization. The Barkhausen noise signal obtained has a standard one-peak profile. The rms intensity of the Barkhausen noise signal rises up to a ribbon thickness of ~200μm when a sample-wrapping search coil is used for detection. However, the practical industrial method of the surface-mounted bobbin coil gives a lower rise of the rms intensity in a smaller thickness range up to ~50μm.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report an interesting phenomenon with respect to the coexistence of martensite phase transformation (MPT) and half-metallic properties in Fe doped Co2VGa Heusler alloys, which is predicted theoretically according to the ab initial calculations based on density functional theory (DFT). The effects of Fe partial substitution for Co, V or Ga atoms on the structural stability, MPT, electronic structure and magnetic properties in Co-V-Ga system alloys have been systematically investigated. It was found that Co2- xFexVGa (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1), Co2V0.75Fe0.25Ga and Co2VFe0.25Ga0.75 alloys are stable in highly ordered L21-type structure. The magnetic analysis indicates that the magnetic moment decreases with the increase of Fe content in Co2- xFexVGa (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1) alloys, whereas it increases with the increase of Fe content for V or Ga partially replaced by Fe atoms. According to the calculated results, MPT can take place in Co2V0.5Fe0.5Ga and Co2VFe0.5Ga0.5 Heusler alloys. All the studied alloys exhibit high spin polarizability, especially in the alloys of Co or V partially replaced with Fe.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Formation mechanism and crystallization kinetics were studied in series of rapidly solidified metallic glasses Fe80- xCoxP14B6 with x = 23, 25, 28, 32, 35 and 40 at.%. As soft magnetic materials, they surpass characteristics of commercial Iron-Nickel Metglas® 2826 alloy: differential permeability of as quenched amorphous ribbons is of about 110,000, the saturation induction μoMs = 1.45–1.5 T, coercive field as low as 4 A/m, Curie temperature above 700 K, and significantly higher thermal stability. Isochronal and isothermal differential scanning calorimetry was employed to record the latent heat developed during crystallization. For both regimes, X-ray diffraction revealed two immiscible bcc α-FeCo and bct (Fe,Co)3(P,B) phases that crystallize from completely miscible amorphous glass matrix. Theoretical description of observed kinetics of crystallization process was convincingly accomplished within Kolmogorov-Johnson-Mehl-Avrami model. Enhanced thermal stability of iron-rich Fe80- xCoxP14B6 glasses that crystalize at higher temperatures relies upon higher crystal/glass interfacial energy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We study the magnetic behavior of a tetrameric magnetic system with four antiferromagnetic couplings(J1-J2-J3-J4), where J4 is the inter-cell coupling and J1,J2,J3 are the intra-cell couplings, by using Green's function theory. The Magnetic-field curves shows that there are three plateaus (M = 0, 1 and saturated magnetization) and two gapless phases distinguished by four critical lines, and the plateaus widen or narrow with the inter-cell coupling(J4), which are further explained using the energy spectrum. In addition, it is found that the magnetic contribution from each site of the unit cell is different due to the competition of the nearest neighboring pair interactions, which is demonstrated by the concurrence of the biparticle quantum state.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The aim of this study is to evaluate a new nondestructive method designated as Low-Field Magnetic Analysis (LFMA) based on the measurement of magnetic flux density for monitoring sigma (σ) phase precipitation in duplex stainless steel (DSS). In addition, the effect of isothermal aging treatment at 800 °C on the metallurgical degradation of UNS S31803 DSS was investigated. It was found a change in the volume fraction of α-Fe/γ-Fe phases due to α-Fe (ferromagnetic phase) eutectoid decomposition to precipitate sigma and secondary austenite (paramagnetic phases). A significant and gradual reduction of saturation magnetization was observed with the increase of thermal treatment time, indicating a decrease in the quantity of α-Fe phase. Two magnetic methods were used to verify the evolution of the σ phase: M−H measurements at 300 K using a commercial magnetometer and LFMA testing. Both methods were sensitive to small percentages of σ phase in the microstructure. Furthermore, our developed technique presents accurate results for low magnetic fields with high sensitivity and reliability.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic nanoparticles have great potential in biomedical and clinical applications because of their unique physicochemical properties. We have synthesized magnetite nanoparticles (MNPs) by coprecipitation method followed by their coating with biodegradable, biocompatible and bioactive polysaccharide chitosan. Complex physicochemical characterization of chitosan-coated MNPs (Chit-MNPs) dispersed in water was performed using various methods to determine their structure, morphology, magnetic and bioactive properties. The experimental evaluation of the specific absorption rate (SAR) of both uncoated MNPs and modified Chit-MNPs was made by calorimetric measurements. The SAR values of prepared samples increased with the applied magnetic fields H up to ~7.9 kA·m−1. Moreover, the SAR values of Chit-MNPs were higher than those of MNPs demonstrating the possibility of their utilization as nanoheaters for hyperthermic treatment. The bioactivity of Chit-MNPs was investigated to characterize their anti-amyloid properties. The ability of Chit-MNPs to interfere with α-lactalbumin amyloid fibrils (αLAF) was studied using ThT assay and AFM microscopy. It was observed that Chit-MNPs are able to destroy α-lactalbumin amyloid fibrils in a concentration-dependent manner.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we obtained experimental and simulated images of in-plane component of the stray field created by a permanent magnet using indicator film technique and magneto-optical Kerr effect imaging system. The applied uniform magnetic field and the presence of the source singular point leads to the appearance of the saddle point. The increase of magnetic field leads to convergence of the two points and they annihilation at a critical field. If a relatively weak magnetic field comparable to the coercivity is applied, magnetooptical image with noticeable hysteresis is formed. For the external magnetic field range exceeding the coercivity, we demonstrated the possibility to derive the topography of the stray field created by the permanent magnet by tracking the position of the singular points.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Spinel ferrites NixZn1-xFe2O4 (x = 0.4, 0.5, 0.6) with grain sizes ranging from tens of nanometers to several hundred nanometers were prepared using the sol–gel and post-annealing processes. X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis confirmed that a crystalline single spinel phase could be formed after annealing the sol–gel processed powders at ≥400 °C. Reflection loss (RL) maps as functions of frequency (100 MHz ≤ f ≤ 15 GHz) and sample thickness were plotted for the Ni-Zn ferrite–epoxy (10 wt%) composites. The RL patterns were systematically modulated by the Ni-Zn ferrite grain size and Ni composition x. The electromagnetic wave absorbing area of RL < -10 dB enlarged toward the upper left side of the map as the grain size increased, and it also gradually stretched in the upper-left direction as x changed from 0.4 to 0.6. The x = 0.6 sample showed the largest negative RL peak under −60 dB at f = 2.9 GHz with a thickness of 5.6 mm. It also exhibited a very broad-ranged electromagnetic wave absorbing performance with a thickness of 3.1 mm, indicated by RL < -10 dB being satisfied in the frequency range of 4–13 GHz.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.MnxFe3- xO4 (x = 0, 0.1, 0.3 and 0.5) nanoparticles were synthesized using the co-precipitation method and its structural and magnetic properties were correlated to the heating characteristics in an ac magnetic field. The effective magnetic anisotropy of the samples measured using electron spin resonance was between 15.3 and 16.5 kJ/m3 with Mn-doping. The effective magnetic anisotropy increased to 31.3 kJ/m3 on doping Fe3O4 with Co. The hyperthermia response of the samples was tested using infrared thermography and the effective specific absorption rate (ESAR) was obtained in the range of 15–21 × 10−9 W/gOe2Hz. The ESAR decreased when the effective magnetic anisotropy was 16.5 kJ/m3, as well as when it increased to 31.3 kJ/m3. The effect of magnetic anisotropy and polydispersity on the hyperthermic efficiency was intensively analyzed employing theoretical models.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Colloidal magnetic fluids (ferrofluids) and its significance with regard to fluid flow measurement is discussed. This concept -which can properly be called as magnetocaloric anemometry, blikewise than hot-wire anemometry takes advantage of the thermal dependence of the electrical resistance of some metals to measure the flow speed, it takes advantage of the thermal dependence of magnetization of superparamagnetic materials. Because the magnetic field is measured by Hall- sensors which are very sensitive to magnetic variations, and because the very small relaxation times of superparamagnetics materials upon variations of the magnetic field, therefore, magnetocaloric anemometers could offer a high sensibility and resolution fluid flow measurement matched only by hot wire anemometry but eliminating its handicaps, namely, high fragility, low durability and need for continuous maintenance which all in all translates into a high cost technology. The mathematical basis of the concept as well as first preliminary experimental data for magnetocaloric anemometry constitute the core of the present work. Additional R&D is required in order to arrive at a reliable practical design for magnetocaloric anemometers.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.With a high anisotropic field, the M-type SrFe12O19 is not considered as a microwave absorber in the frequency range of 0.1–18 GHz. Zn and Ir codoping decreases the anisotropic field greatly. The magnetic resonance frequency falls in the range of 4 GHz − 5.3 GHz in SrFe12-2 xZnxIrxO19. Both the permeabilities and the permittivities increase with the increasing Zn and Ir doping as × ≤ 0.5, and decrease in × = 0.7. The different behavior is due to the impurity in × = 0.7. The high permittivity in × = 0.5 are due to the leakage conduction as deduced from the Cole-Cole semicircles, and so is it partly in × = 0.7 as well. Debye relaxations take function in × = 0.1, 0.3 and also 0.7. The impedance matching and the attenuation factor have the best values in × = 0.5. As a result, the × = 0.5 sample has a very good microwave absorbing property with the single-layer bandwidth (RL < −10 dB) as broad as 12.1 GHz at the thickness of 2.1 mm. If the thickness varies from 1.3 mm to 9.5 mm, the bandwidth with RL < −10 dB covers the full frequency range of 1.5–18 GHz. Compared with the advanced materials reported, SrFe12-2 xZnxIrxO19 is very competitive as both single-layer and multi-layer absorber. The quarter-wavelength criteria explains the relationship between the optimum thickness and the frequency.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the exchange integrals and magnetic anisotropy change in Sc substituted barium hexaferrite BaFe12−xScxO19 (x = 0, 0.5, 1, 1.5, 2) by density functional theory (DFT) calculations. The general gradient approximation (GGA) with on-site coulomb repulsion U (GGA + U) method was used to improve the description of the strongly correlated 3d electrons of Fe. Our calculations reveal that Sc3+ preferentially replace Fe3+ at the 4f2 and 2b sites successively. The total energies of 9 spin configurations are calculated to obtain 8 inter-sublattice exchange integrals for different values of x. Comparison of the exchange integrals between BaFe12O19 (BFO) and BaFe12−xScxO19 (x = 0.5, 1, 1.5, 2) (BFSO) shows that substituting Sc for Fe influences most interactions involving the 4f2 sites. The f1-f2 and f2-k interactions decreases as substitution increases, while the b-f2 interaction fluctuates significantly as x changes. Magnetic anisotropy change of Sc substituted M-type barium hexaferrite (Ba-M hexaferrite) has been studied by using the force theorem method. The results show that Sc3+ in its preferred 4f2 and 2b sites contribute to the decrease of the uniaxial magnetic crystal anisotropy. The magnetic anisotropy of BFSO transforms from uniaxial to planar with transition point in the range of 1 < x < 1.5.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Possible source of the weak ferromagnetism and the metamagnetic phase transitions in the antiferromagnetic systems with octahedral structure, such as perovskites, is identified in the framework of the antiferromagnetic spin-1/2 Ising model on the octahedral recursive lattice. It is shown that the weak ferromagnetism of the studied antiferromagnetic model is directly related to the competition between two qualitatively different kinds of spin loops (frustrated and bipartite) realized within each elementary octahedron. The free energy of the model is found, the magnetization properties of the model are studied, and the phase diagram of the metamagnetic phase transitions in the external magnetic field is determined. The discrete system of the model ground states is found and discussed. The discontinuity of the susceptibility at the metamagnetic phase transitions is studied. The exact expression for the Néel temperature of the antiferromagnetic system is determined and compare to the Curie temperature of the ferromagnetic system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Herein, the polypyrrole coated and Nickel doped mesoporous carbon (MC) composites were synthesized by the Stober and in-situ polymerization methods. Firstly, the carbon mesoporous was derived from silica spheres by impregnated in a water-based solution containing melamine and formaldehyde. Secondly, the nickel doped mesoporous carbon was prepared into the 0.6 g of Ni(NO3)2·6H2O solution and denoted as NiMC. Finally, the core-shell structure composed of NiMC@polypyyrole was synthesized by in situ polymerizations (P@NiMC). The surface characterization results showed that the presence of Ni in mesoporous carbon increased the pore volume, BET surface area and pore size distribution ranges. The dielectric and magnetic properties of MC, NiMC and P@NiMC were measured for the electromagnetic wave absorption performance in the Ku-band. The P@NiMC exhibited better dielectric loss ability compared with MC and NiMC due to the polarization effects. The P@NiMC displayed better electromagnetic wave absorption with a minimum reflection loss of –13.42 dB at 12.4 GHz frequency. In addition, the effective absorption bandwidth (RL < −10 dB) of 1.18 GHz was obtained at a thickness of 3 mm for P@NiMC. This study demonstrated the first report of electromagnetic wave absorption performance of Ni-doped mesoporous carbon which is a promising composite for electromagnetic wave absorption.© 2020Thin film transistors (TFTs) with lateral channels are limited in current density due to the design rule. For many applications with improved integration, the introduction of vertical channels reduces channel lengths while increasing current density per unit surface area. In previous works, vertical TFTs have been designed and manufactured using low-temperature polycrystalline silicon technology (T ≤ 600 °C), with a solid phase crystallization (SPC) based process. In this case, the introduction of an insulating layer between source and drain films has resulted in a significant improvement in the electrical characteristics, mainly in the On/Off state current (Ion/Ioff) ratio. However, the active layer is deposited on the sidewalls obtained by plasma etching, and the etching process results in morphological defects on the sidewalls that adversely affect the electrical characteristics. The purpose of this paper is to understand the origin and effects of these defects using different models. Thus, the transfer characteristics are analyzed in detail, with Suzuki method to calculate the density of states, while subthreshold slope method and Grünewald method are adopted to verify the Suzuki method for the deep and shallow trap densities, respectively. These methods provide an approach for DOS calculation independent of temperature-related measurement.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanowires of diameter d with a concentric cylindrical modulation of larger diameter D can lead to the production of devices with a variety of coercive fields. Besides D, the modulation thickness t and its position z along the axis of the wire are varied in the vicinity of values usually reported in the experimental literature. It is shown that the system can be understood as the combination of a long wire (with its usual properties for large aspect ratios), a short wire with lower coercive field and a wider modulation with a tendency to produce an early vortex configuration that softens the whole system from the magnetic point of view. The triggering mechanism to achieve the reversal at different coercive fields is studied by means of snapshots of the configurations just prior to the reversal itself. Altogether, upon spanning the parameter space (D,t, and z) a variety of hysteresis curves are obtained and a large range of coercive fields are shown to be possible. Micromagnetic simulations by means of Mumax3 solving the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation provide the theoretical framework of this work. Possible extensions of this work are also mentioned.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Weak magnetic field detection is always a challenging topic and sensing systems face a great challenge to be very sensitive in response to magnetic field, in the meantime, to maintain very low overall system noise. Some external auxiliary system could provide significant enhancement to overall signal-to-noise ratio (SNR) such as a magnetic flux concentrator made with soft magnetic material. In this paper, we have systematically studied and built an integrated magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) sensing system to meet these challenges. MTJ sensor design is optimized to achieve high zero-field sensitivity of 5% MR/Oe, which is defined by the slope of the device's transfer loops at zero field, equivalent to 20 mV/Oe with 10 mA driving current. Both deposition conditions and fabrication techniques are optimized for magnetic flux concentrator (MFC) made of soft magnetic material to achieve a magnetic susceptibility of χ = 30,800 and a gain of 4 for a 100 nm thick prototype.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report results of first-order reversal curves (FORCs) measurements for hollow Fe3O4 submicron spherical particles, varying particle size from 400 to 700 nm. For all the samples, the FORC diagrams exhibit a butterfly-like feature of distribution peaks, being characteristic to the vortex formation. With increasing temperature from 10 K nucleation and annihilation fields of a vortex sharply increase and become almost constant above the Verwey transition temperature (Tv∼115 K). This reflects temperature-dependent magnetocrystalline anisotropy, associated with a structural transition at Tv. Above Tv the field range at which a vortex state is stable increases with increasing particle size, indicating that an increasing contribution of demagnetizing fields dominates a vortex stability for larger hollow particles.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Herbertsmithite ZnCu3(OH)6Cl2 was initially proposed to have a “perfect” model for the S = 1/2 kagomé antiferromagnet, but further investigations have revealed its intrinsic shortcomings arising from serious intersite mixing between Zn2+ and Cu2+ ions. Another system YCu3(OH)6Cl3 with a more perfect kagomé lattice has been developed to minimize intersite mixing, but is adversely affected by common parasitic intergrowth inclusions and surface coating of Cu2(OH)3Cl, which led to ambiguous and contradictory magnetic data. Herein we report a new bromine compound YCu3(OH)6Br2[Brx(OH)1− x] (x ≈ 0.51), which not only inherits the almost perfect kagomé lattice from its chlorine analogue but also eludes the impurities from either inclusion or surface coating, resulting in high quality pure single crystals. Single crystal X-ray diffraction data of the title compound does not support the superstructure model suggested for its chlorine analogue but suggests an incommensurate structure. Magnetic measurements demonstrate that the title compound features a strong antiferromagnetic (AFM) interaction with θcw = −74 K at low temperature and no long-range magnetic order down to 2 K. These results suggest that the title compound is a new promising quantum spin liquid candidate, successfully overcoming the above-mentioned shortcomings of herbertsmithite, kapellasite and YCu3(OH)6Cl3.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Efficient solid-state refrigeration techniques have drawn increasing attention due to their potential for improving energy efficiency of refrigeration, air-conditioning, and temperature-control systems without using harmful gas as in conventional gas compression techniques. Research on magnetocaloric lanthanum manganites with near-room-temperature Curie temperature, TC, shows promising results for further developments of magnetic refrigeration devices. By incorporating chemical substitutions, oxygen content modifications, and various synthesis methods, these manganites experience lattice distortions from perovskite cubic structures to pseudocubic, orthorhombic, and rhombohedral structures. Further changes in lattice parameters can also be achieved by the introduction of strain due to lattice mismatches, where TC can be tuned more effectively. Empirical results and previous models through thermodynamics and first-principles have shown that changes in lattice parameters correlate with those in TC, but correlations are merely general tendencies and obviously not universal. In this work, the Gaussian process regression model is developed to find statistical correlations between TC and lattice parameters among lanthanum manganites. Nearly 100 lattices, cubic, pseudocubic, orthorhombic, and rhombohedral, with TC ranging from 40 K to 375 K are explored for this purpose. The modeling approach demonstrates a high degree of accuracy and stability, contributing to efficient and low-cost estimations of TC, providing guidance on thin film structure design and helping understandings of magnetic phase transformations and magnetocaloric effects in lanthanum manganites.© 2020In this work, we synthesized epitaxial Y2NiMnO6 thin film by Pulsed Laser Deposition technique in two different atmospheres (oxygen and argon) and studied their magnetic as well as electric polarization. Room temperature ferromagnetism and ferroelectricity are exhibited by these Y2NiMnO6 thin films, indicating the coexistence of more than one ferroic interaction in this system. Here the surface roughness increases the total surface area and hence the unsaturated surface spins of the films which control both the ferromagnetic as well as ferroelectric order.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, Silvaco Atlas TCAD device-circuit mixed simulation and MATLAB programming are used to compute the reverse recovery processes of silicon PIN diodes. The latter is based on solving the ambipolar diffusion equation (ADE) with the moving boundaries. The results of the ADE-based Fourier expansion (FE) and finite difference (FD) method are first compared with that from the Atlas simulation. It is found that the result from the FE method agrees very well with that from the Atlas simulation, while the result from the FD method is much worse. The reason is attributed to approximating the second-order partial space differentiation by a FD form with a time-dependent constant space step in the FD method. One clear phenomenon is that the voltage in a FD simulation shows a very steeper drop followed by a very steeper rise. To solve this problem, we propose a modified finite difference (MFD) method in which the space discretization step is fixed when solving the ADE by a single-step back-Euler method and the new coordinates of two moving boundaries of the un-depleted N− region are iterated through the zero-value of the boundary carrier density, current and voltage requirement. Then a new grid is set up based on the new boundary coordinates and a cubic spline interpolation is used to transfer p(x, t) from the old grid to the new one. The result from our MFD method agrees very well with those from Atlas and FE simulation. In addition two sets (a slow set and a fast one) of carrier concentration dependent Shockley-Read-Hall recombination life time parameters are used to study the validity of the usual boundary conditions at two boundaries of the un-depleted N− region in the ambipolar diffusion approximation. Our results in some cases the boundary conditions may fail.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The exchange stiffness of Cobalt thin films with various buffer layers (Pd, Pt, Ta, and no buffer) has been studied by Brillouin scattering in the applied magnetic field of up to 175 mT. We found that Pd and Pt buffer layers led to higher exchange stiffness constants more than 12% compared to the Ta buffer layer, whereas, it was difficult to determine the exchange stiffness constant with no buffer layer due to broad spinwave spectra with poor signal-to-noise ratios. The determined exchange stiffness constant value is 25.7 ± 0.1, 25.6 ± 0.2, and 22.7 ± 0.1 pJ/m for Pd, Pt, and Ta buffer layers. We also observed that the Pd-underlayered sample gives us the largest saturation magnetization and in contrast the Ta underlayer shows the relatively smaller values. This observation indicates that the exchange stiffness constant and the saturation magnetization exhibit the same trend on various buffer layers.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The particle-size effects on the exchange bias phenomenon have been investigated in perovskite Nd1-xDyxCrO3 (x = 0.05 and 0.20) compounds, which are obtained via co-precipitation method. The analysis of the X-ray diffraction data through Rietveld refinement show that, independently of calcination temperatures and nominal compositions, samples exhibit a single phase with orthorhombic structure and Pnma space group. The calculated particle average diameters via Scherrer formula range from 50 to 90 nm. The magnetic-field and T-dependencies of magnetization using the field-cooled-cooling protocol are performed. For all samples, the MvsT curves present a first magnetic transition at T ≈ 210 K likely associated with the antiferromagnetic order of Cr3+ ions and a second one at T ≈ 40 K assigned to their spin reorientation. Magnetic hysteresis loops show the presence of a negative exchange bias phenomenon for all samples, whose values of exchange bias field, HEB, decrease with increasing particle size. We argue that this behavior is mainly associated to the uncompensated surface spins, which are dependent on the particle size.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Spherical high-entropy alloys (HEAs) were prepared as a template by the traditional ball milling method, and the pure porous HEAs electromagnetic (EM) wave absorbing material was successfully obtained by etching the template with nitric acid/copper nitrate solution. The crystal structure, chemical composition and distribution, EM parameters and EM wave absorbing performance were characterized in detail. The results showed that the excellent impedance matching, magnetic loss performance and good dielectric loss of porous HEAs were the key factors leading to the excellent EM wave absorbing performance. The effective absorption bandwidth of the porous HEAs samples can reach to 4.48 GHz at the thickness of 1.7 mm, and the minimum reflection loss can reach to −40.2 dB at the same time. The feature of strong absorption at the thin thickness make HEAs a possible new generation of efficient EM wave absorber. The preparation idea and method of the samples also have important reference value.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we propose an alternative model to explain the spontaneous exchange bias (SEB) effect observed in spin glass (SG)-like systems. As in a previously proposed model [1], it is based on the unconventional dynamics of the SG-like moments at the magnetic hysteresis cycle. However, using a reliable estimate of the amount of SG-spins that are relaxing during the cycle, the new model can correctly describe the changes in the SEB observed for measurements performed at different temperatures and different maximum applied fields.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Non-collinear exchange couplings between Py and Co layers (0°⩽φ⩽90°) were achieved in Py(10)/Cu(5)/Co(10)/IrMn(8) (thickness values in nm) spin valves by modifying their layer morphologies using oblique deposition in a confocal sputtering setup. Two series of spin valves were prepared by keeping the sample holder fix during the depositions, except for the Cu spacers that were deposited using either fixing (Series-I) or spinning mode (Series-II). Series-I (Series-II) has Cu spacer layers composed by oriented (non-oriented) grains and Cu/Co interfacial roughnesses relatively rougher (smoother), favoring lower (higher) interlayer exchange couplings and exchange bias fields. The magnetization easy axis of Py and the unidirectional anisotropy axis followed the expected directions, while the Co uniaxial axis is surprisingly dephased by (15±5)° for 0°⩽φ<90°. The angular offset between the Co uniaxial axis and the Py uniaxial (unidirecional anisotropy) axis was more pronounced in Series-I, indicating that the Cu spacer roughness played an important role in the interlayer exchange couplings and also in the Co spin reorientation effect. The magnetoresistance magnitudes were similar to those found in the literature for ordinary Py/Cu/Co multilayers. However, it reduces as the φ-angle increased, an effect associated with the enhancement of the interface roughness due to the misalignment of the oriented grains of adjacent layers.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the local oxidation of SiC (LOCOSiC) isolation using pre-amorphization implantation technology is integrated into the 4H-SiC Schottky barrier didoes (SBD) fabrication to evaluate its isolation ability due to the high sensitivity of SBD to those defects induced by process. Using Ar plasma treatment, the barrier height can be centralized at ~1.1 eV with reduced variation, which lies in between commonly-used SBDs with Ti (1.0 eV) and Ni (1.2 eV), considering cut-in voltage, leakage and breakdown voltage (VBD). Furthermore, at high reverse bias (−200 V), the leakage of the SBDs isolated by LOCOSiC is only ~10−5 A/cm2 at room temperature, 200× lower than that of the SBDs isolated by deposited SiO2, because the smoother topography is beneficial to release the field crowding effect. The maximal VBD achieves 515 V only with simple field plate termination. The electric field simulation suggests that the thermally grown field oxide with better quality retards the breakdown at the edge of the metal pad on field oxide.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The prominent valley splitting of the monolayer MoS2 through coupling with a nonmagnetic and semiconducting substrate LiBeN(1 1 1) with half-Heusler structure is reported on the basis of the First-principles calculation. Despite the nonmagnetism of the bulk phase, the interfacial atoms of the (1 1 1) plane of LiBeN show approximately 0.2μB moment due to unsaturated bonds. The magnetic proximity effect has induced minimal magnetism of the monolayer MoS2 at the interface, which relies on the equilibrium distance between the two materials. Based on the Bader charge analysis, covalent bonds form at the interface of the MoS2/LiBeN(1 1 1) heterostructure. The electronic band of the monolayer MoS2 has achieved a high valley splitting of 64.26 meV, which is equal to a Zeeman field of 58.73 T with spin splitting of 170.02 meV at the K valley and 39.79 meV at the K′ valley, implying its potential application in valleytronics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, an estimation method for the ageing factor of permanent magnets is proposed. It is based on a multi-scale model, which allows estimating the magnetic properties of permanent magnets, combined with the magnetic viscosity theory. Using this method, the necessary measurements can be drastically reduced. The results obtained are compared with measurements, with a satisfactory agreement.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The strong influence of the A-site cationic size mismatch on the electrical, thermal and magnetotransport properties of Pr0.7-xRExSr0.3MnO3 (x=0.0,0.2; RE = Nd, Sm & Gd) pervoskite compound has been reported here. The considerable shifting of the insulator to metal transition temperature (TIM) with the partial substitution of Pr3+ ions by smaller radii rare-earth ions is discussed. The relevance of electron-electron scattering and the application of an adiabatic small polaron hopping (ASPH) model is explained to analyze electrical data. The temperature dependent volume fraction of the metallic ferromagnetic phase obtained from the percolation model of the electrical resistivity demonstrated a well resemblance with magnetic data. Analysis of Thermoelectric Power (TEP) data reveals that electron-magnon scattering is responsible for the thermoelectric transport in the metallic region whereas high temperature insulating region above Tp is well explained by the non-adiabatic SPH model.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this work, the electrical stability of zinc nitride (Zn3N2) Thin-film Transistors (TFTs) under negative bias stress (NBS) and positive bias stress (PBS) is presented. The Zn3N2 TFTs were fabricated on plastic substrates. Spin-on glass was used as gate dielectric. The threshold voltage shift (ΔVT) and its recovery are analyzed during a long stress time and after a period of rest. The hysteresis of the transfer characteristics after the electrical stress is also analyzed. In order to explain the mechanism of instability in the Zn3N2 TFTs, MOS capacitors were fabricated and characterized under NBS and PBS. The behavior exhibited in MOS capacitors under NBS and PBS, is in agreement with the ΔVT exhibited in the Zn3N2 TFTs under NBS and PBS, respectively.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The influence of different types of single-ion anisotropy (easy-axis and easy-plane) on the phase states and on the dynamic properties of non-Heisenberg spin-1 magnet was investigated in the mean-field approximation. It was shown that account of the easy-axis single-ion anisotropy almost does not result in deviation of system's properties from the isotropic case; while account of the easy-plane single-ion anisotropy changes the type of the phase transitions between the dipolar and the nematic phases and results in disappearance of SU(3) point. The phase diagrams of the system were drawn for both types of anisotropy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the framework of the random interaction fields method, the behavior of magnetic susceptibility is described in ferromagnetic materials, antiferromagnetic materials, and spin glasses. Phase diagrams for systems with competing exchange interactions are built. The conditions for the occurrence of different types of magnetic ordering are defined. The ferromagnetic Curie points for different numbers of neighboring atoms are calculated.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Dynamic property of elliptic and spiral domain structures has been studied in magnetic cylindrical microwires. The investigations have been performed using the magneto-optical Kerr-effect and the modified Sixtus-Tonks technique. The direct relation between the domain wall mobility and the domain wall length has been established for two types of domain walls. The domain wall length was controlled by the reversible change of the angle of domain wall inclination caused in turn by such type of the external parameters as axial-circular magnetic field and mechanical torsion stress. The domain wall mobility increases with domain wall length for elliptic and spiral domain walls. For the elliptic domain wall the dependence of the mobility on the domain wall length is linear.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe basic relationships for a Hall plate with N non-symmetric contacts placed in an arbitrary magnetic field are a set of N-1 relationships that are necessary and sufficient for the existence of a complex electrostatic potential function. By the application of the boundary conditions, they turn into a linear system of N-1 compatibility conditions involving the terminal voltages and currents. The construction of the basic relationships requires the positions of the contact extremities on the real axis of the canonical domain (the upper half-plane) as well as the electric and magnetic parameters of the Hall device. The conduction and resistance matrices can be obtained easily from the basic relationships. They give an effective method for predicting the performance of both horizontal and vertical Hall effect devices and provide a useful method for designing these types of planar devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.To contribute to the optimisation of the performances of the nano-devices (storage medium, bio sensors…), we have theoretically studied the structural, magnetic and magneto-optical properties of the Fe ultrathin films grown by epitaxy on semi-infinite Cu(001) substrate using a relativistic approach into the DFT framework. Structurally, we found that the body centered tetragon Fe can be stabilized onto the Cu(001) oriented substrate with a tetragonality ratio larger than the unity. The magnetic behaviour is characterized by an enhanced magnetic moment with respect to the bulk one with a ferromagnetic intra and inter-atomic plane coupling. The polar magneto-optical Kerr effect spectra are characterized by a negative peak in the visible range mainly coming from the d → p interband transitions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We found a non-cos2β angular-dependent magnetoresistance (ADMR) of the face-centered-cubic Co thin films on MgO (001) substrates, where β is the angle between applied magnetic field H and current I. Such angular dependence comes from the fact that the magnetization M cannot be completely saturated in coherent rotation mechanism when H deviates from the direction of easy and hard axes. By taking advantage of the Taylor's series, analytical expressions of the ADMR were derived for both out-of-plane and in-plane configuration. When H is larger than 2 times anisotropic field, the expressions can describe the magnetization-induced ADMR very well, where the maximum error at different angles is less than 5%. The non-cos2β characteristic of the ADMR is helpful to distinguish the contribution of magnetization from others.© 2020The resistivity and magnetoresistance behaviour of the hexagonal intermetallic compounds R2NiSi3 (R = Gd, Dy, Ho, Er, and Tm) are reported here. All the studied polycrystalline compounds exhibit metallic behaviour along with additional magnetic anomalies at low temperatures. A well-defined resistivity minima is observed in Gd2NiSi3 and Dy2Ni0.87Si2.95 at a temperature much higher than their respective magnetic transition temperatures. The anomaly has been ascribed to the charge carrier localization caused by magnetic precursor effect. Magnetic field induced crossover from positive to negative magnetoresistance (MR) behaviour associated with antiferromagnetic ground state is evidenced for Gd2NiSi3 and Er2NiSi3 in the low temperature region. Although Tm2Ni0.93Si2.93 does not exhibit any long range magnetic order down to 2 K, a sudden drop in resistivity behaviour is observed below ~10 K. Presence of short range magnetic correlation observed in a wide temperature range, much beyond their respective magnetic ordering temperatures, has been argued to be responsible for achieving finite negative MR for all the compounds. A subtle resemblance between the observed transport anomalies and the magnetic properties of these systems have been discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have presented dielectric and impedance spectroscopic study of the Cu-doped MnV2O6 spin-chain compounds of nominal compositions Mn1-xCuxV2O6 (x = 0.0, 0.125, and 0.25). The studies indicate increase in dielectric permittivity upon Cu-doping without increasing the dielectric loss. Detailed ac conductivity, complex impedance and complex electric modulus analysis indicate that the charge conduction is mediated by small polarons. The analysis also points out that although Cu-doping results in an increase in the charge carrier concentration yet the increase in permittivity is also felicitated by increase in the hopping range of small polarons even in the high temperature region. Finally, the complex plane plots of impedance and electric modulus hints at two simultaneous intrinsic dielectric phases of different permittivity contributions but of similar impedance.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically investigate the radial-spin-wave induced magnetic vortex switching in the presence of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI). From micromagnetic simulations, we observe a circular-to-radial vortex phase transition by increasing the DMI strength. The radial spin-wave excitation spectrum for each magnetization configuration is analyzed, showing that the frequency of spin-wave mode with a given radial node number monotonically increases (decreases) with the DMI parameter of the radial (circular) vortex. Interestingly, we find that the DMI can significantly facilitate the polarity switching of the circular vortex driven by radial spin waves. Our work provides a new insight into the DMI effect on the vortex dynamics and is helpful for designing fast all-magnonic memory devices.© 2020 Elsevier LtdDevelopment of accurate models for resistive switching devices (memristors) is a research topic of utmost interest. Behavioral models usually employ window functions (WFs) to capture the dependency of the resistance switching-rate on the bias conditions. Several WFs have been published so far, all of them being functions of just the state variable(s), ignoring the effect of the applied signal magnitude in dynamic behavior. In this context, we describe in an extended manner a generalized concept of bias-dependent WFs, designed to enhance behavioral models in capturing rich dynamic time-response of memristors. We present a specific WF formulation and evaluate its effect on the performance of threshold-type models of voltage-controlled bipolar memristor, in simulations with LTSPICE. The obtained results not only reflect the accumulated effect of the applied signal and the proper saturation of the device at voltage-dependent levels, but are also quantitatively in line with experimental data taken from commercial self-directed channel (SDC) memristors of Knowm Inc.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the core–shell magnetic nanowire was described by classical Heisenberg model with single-ion anisotropy and its Faraday effect was simulated by means of Landau–Lifshitz–Gilbert (LLG) equation. The results show that the resonance behavior of the nanowire appears in the circularly polarized microwave field. When the microwave frequency is higher than the resonance frequency of the nanowire, there is obvious Faraday effect in the nanowire, and the rotation angle for different frequencies is almost a constant value, and the value decreases as the temperature increases. In a microwave field with fixed frequency, the Faraday rotation angle changes with the internal magnetic structure of the nanowire, and shows a trend consistent with the magnetization curve. Therefore, we can regulate the Faraday effect of the nanowire by changing their magnetic structure or applying external magnetic field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of Y1− xErxFe2 intermetallic compounds and their hydrides and deuterides Y1− xErxFe2H(D)4.2 have been investigated using X-ray diffraction and magnetic measurements under static and pulsed magnetic field up to 60 T. The intermetallics crystallize in the C15 cubic structure (Fd-3m space group), whereas corresponding hydrides and deuterides crystallize in a monoclinic structure (Pc space group). All compounds display a linear decrease of the unit cell volume versus Er concentration; the hydrides have a 0.8% larger cell volume compared to the deuterides with same Er content. They are ferrimagnetic at low field and temperature with a compensation point at x = 0.33 for the intermetallics and x = 0.57 for the hydrides and deuterides. A sharp first order ferromagnetic-antiferromagnetic (FM-AFM) transition is observed upon heating at TFM−AFM for both hydrides and deuterides. These compounds show two different types of field induced transitions, which have different physical origin. At low temperature (T < 50 K), a forced ferri-ferromagnetic metamagnetic transition with Btrans1 ≈ 8 T, related to the change of the Er moments orientation from antiparallel to parallel Fe moment, is observed. Btrans1 is not sensitive to Er concentration, temperature and isotope effect. A second metamagnetic transition resulting from antiferromagnetic to ferrimagnetic state is also observed. The transition field Bt rans2 increases linearly versus temperature and relates to the itinerant electron metamagnetic behavior of the Fe sublattice. An onset temperature TM0 is obtained by extrapolating TFM−AFM (B) at zero field. TM0 decreases linearly versus the Er content and is 45 ± 5 K higher for the hydrides compared to the corresponding deuteride. The evolution of TM0 versus cell volume shows that it cannot be attributed exclusively to a pure volume effect and that electronic effects should also be considered.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Internal magnetic states and changes in the texture of the magnetization in cobalt nanodisks have been studied using micromagnetic simulations under two different initial conditions: a nucleated Bloch type skyrmion placed at the center of the cobalt disk and displaced 32 nm from the center. Analysis of simulation results clearly demonstrates that variations in values of the anisotropy (Ku) and Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) constants have strong influence on the internal magnetic states and the energy terms of the cobalt nanodisk. Of interest is the nucleation and stability of magnetic skyrmions as a function of the DMI constant. Micromagnetic analysis suggest that the interplay between demagnetizing, exchange and Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya energies induces a diagram with different textures of the magnetization including the Bloch and Néel type skyrmions, incomplete skyrmion and skyrmionium. If the initial Bloch skyrmion state is displaced 32 nm from the center, the diagram for the texture of the magnetization changes, creating a cycloid state for higher values of the DMI constant. The results have been discussed in function of the competition between the energy terms, and the initial magnetic states.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Solid-state refrigeration based on the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) has garnered worldwide attention because of its superior energy conservation and its environmentally friendly impact. Many materials exhibiting magnetostructural/magnetoelastic transitions have been identified by their giant MCE as promising refrigerants. The common feature of these materials is their simultaneous magnetic and lattice transitions; some also undergo negative expansions, i.e., lattice contractions, along with a ferromagnetic (FM) to paramagnetic (PM) transition. For these materials, whether the signs of lattice and spin entropy change are the same or opposite has become a controversial issue, noting that a larger unit cell volume usually indicates softer phonons and therefore a bigger phonon entropy. On the basis of our experiments and published data, we demonstrate that the lattice and spin entropy changes retain the same sign at least for La(Fe,Si)13-based compounds and MM'X alloys with giant MCE, for which the lattice undergoes negative expansion along with a FM to PM transition on heating. The clarification of the sign of lattice entropy change in the total entropy change is of particular importance for a comprehensive understanding of new materials with giant magnetocaloric effect and their design.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The application of magnetic nanoparticles allows labeling the cell for its manipulation via the external magnetic field. In this work, it is proposed to use glass-coated magnetic microwires as a magnetic pin system to create a strong and well-localized magnetic field at the end of such microwires. Magnetic microwires manufactured by the Taylor − Ulitovsky method exhibit tunable magnetic properties correlated with their unique micromagnetic structure. The control of magnetic properties can be achieved by, for example, the chemical composition of the wire: Fe-based microwire shows bistable hysteresis and thus strong stray fields at the ends, while Co-based one demonstrates S-shaped hysteresis with almost zero remanent magnetization because of a closed domain structure. In this research, we discovered by theoretical calculation and experiments the usability of both kinds of microwires for different approaches of cell manipulations.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The microscopic origin of heavy fermions is a central concept in correlated matter where the hybridization between localized spins and conduction electrons gives rise to exotic itinerant quasiparticles with enhanced effective masses. Although the two-fluid model provides a phenomenological description, the coexistence of localized and itinerant characters remains highly debated. Here we report the coexisting two fluids in a prime ferromagnet, UGe2, in which an unconventional superconductivity occurs in a limited pressure range. Except for localized moments, itinerant quasiparticles give an additional magnetic moment, resulting in a first-order-like transition with increasing magnetic field at high pressures. Our findings suggest a collective spin-flip behavior of itinerant quasiparticles, instead of the previously reported metamagnetic transition. Moreover, we record the pressure evolution of the two fluids, revealing a sudden delocalization of part of 5f electrons at PX ≈ 1.2 GPa. The valence instability with strong fluctuations sheds new light on the appearance of superconductivity adjoining ferromagnetism.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this article, we report our theoretical investigation about antiferromagnetic (AFM) DW motion induced by a gradient of magnetic anisotropy energy under a voltage pulse. The dynamics equation for the DW motion was derived. The solution indicates that the DW velocity is higher than 100 m/s, and because of inertia, the DW can keep moving at a speed of around 100 m/s for several nanoseconds after turning off the voltage in a period of the pulse. The mechanism for this DW inertia is explained based on the Lagrangian route. On the other hand, a spin wave is emitted while the DW is moving, yet the DW is still able to move at an increasing velocity with enlarging DW width. This indicates energy loss from the emission of spin-wave is less than the energy gain from the effective field of the gradient of anisotropy energy.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe thermometric behavior of lateral 50-nm thin Silicon-On-Insulator (SOI) diodes are studied down to 80 K, close to liquid-nitrogen temperature. A comparison between PtSi/n-Si Schottky and implanted p-i-n diodes is presented. In this study, the intrinsic region is a moderately-doped n-type region. Key figures are extracted at room and cryogenic temperatures for each diode. A Temperature Coefficient of Current (TCC) of 6 %/K at 298 K and for a bias current of 10 pA/µm is measured for both the Schottky Barrier Diode (SBD) and the p-i-n diode. Based on simulation results, both diode types should demonstrate an increase of the TCC in the cryogenic regime. However, experimentally, only the p-i-n configuration exhibits an increase with a TCC at 81.5 K reaching more than 15 %/K at low forward bias. Some arguments are presented to account for the discrepancy between simulation and experiment, especially in the case of the SBD. Suitability as thermometer for bolometric detection is discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic domain morphology and its evolution process of quasi-two-dimensional (quasi-2D) ferromagnet Cr5Te8 have been studied by microscopic magneto-optic Kerr imaging technique. With variation of external magnetic field, dendritic type domains grow and distribute randomly with negligible pinning effect and obvious hysteresis. Some dendritic domain branches connect to each other with an adjacent angle either 60° or 120°. Moreover, dendritic branches can connect end-to-end to form arched chains and hexagonal rings. Such similarity between macroscopic domain morphology and the arrangement of Cr atoms in the Cr5Te8 crystal indicates that the magnetic domain evolution is tightly related to the in-plane crystal structure, implying a large anisotropy of in-plane magnetic exchange energy in this quasi-2D crystal. These observations provide a microscopic foundation for the understanding and controlling of the magnetic domains in quasi-2D magnets.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we investigate the growth and magnetotransport properties of Co doped topological insulator Bi2Te3 deposited on Si(1 1 1) substrates by means of DC magnetron sputtering. The structure and morphology of the films were studied using X-Ray Diffraction (XRD), Field-Emission Scanning Electron Microscopy (FESEM) and Atomic Force Microscopy (AFM). Magnetotransport measurements were performed with a Physical Property Measurement System (PPMS). The pristine samples have a metallic behavior while the Co-doped are semiconductors. The magnetoresistance curves exhibit a sharp cusp for temperatures below 20 K that correspond to weak antilocalization phenomena and are analysed using the Hikami-Larkin-Nagaoka model. The WAL phenomenon vanishes with temperature increase due to electron-phonon scattering. The doped samples present an ambipolar transport with a change in the sign of the dominant carriers with temperature.© 2020We report an investigation of spin-Hall magnetoresistance (SMR) in Ta/Cr/Y3Fe5O12 (Ta/Cr/YIG) trilayers with different thicknesses of the Cr inserted layer. The Ta/Cr/YIG film with a 1-nm-thick Cr layer shows a maximum SMR of 4.2×10-4 at 100 K, which is an order of magnitude larger than that previously reported in the Ta/YIG or Cr/YIG systems. The enhancement of SMR in the Ta/Cr/YIG is ascribed to the strong spin–orbit coupling (SOC) effect of both Ta and Cr and the anti-oxidation protection by the Ta coating. A negative SMR different from the conventional SMR is found for the Ta/Cr/YIG with the Cr thicknesses of 3 and 6 nm at the temperature below 100 and 260 K, respectively, which suggests the occurrence of the spin-flop coupling between the antiferromagnetic Cr and ferromagnetic YIG moments. Both the anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) and the anomalous-Hall resistance (AHR) indicate an induced ferromagnetism of Cr which is likely due to the spin-flop transition or the uncompensated magnetic moments. Our results suggest that the 3d transition metal Cr can be used as a spin current generator, and the antiferromagnetic structure of Cr can be employed to regulate the transport of spin current.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic, and electronic properties of M13− nPtn (M = Fe, Co, and Ni) clusters are investigated using the plane wave pseudopotential method within the spin-polarized density-functional theory. Some novel lowest-energy configurations, superior to those reported so far, are identified in this work. There exist markedly structural differences among M13− nPtn clusters with the same M/Pt ratios except for M10Pt3, M9Pt4, and M5Pt8. All these clusters display the same trend of atomic distribution, that is, M atoms are preferentially located in the interior and Pt atoms tend to occupy the sites near surface. The magic compositions with better stability are found to be Fe7Pt6, Co6Pt7, and Ni6Pt7. The magnetic moments of M atoms in M-Pt clusters are sensitive to the charge transfer and geometric structure. In comparison to the M clusters, alloying of Pt with M atoms noticeably enhances the magnetic moments of Fe and Co atoms in Fe-rich and Co-rich clusters, and those of Ni atoms in all Ni-Pt clusters. According to the electronic density of states and Bader charge analysis, it is found that with increasing Pt content in M13− nPtn clusters, the spin-up channel has a shift toward higher energy level, and the average amount of charge transferred from M to Pt atoms gradually increases.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A novel method for synthesizing ε-Fe2O3 nanoparticles was proposed. The ε-Fe2O3 nanoparticles were prepared by ball milling of Iron(III) nitrate nonahydrate and hydrophilic vapor phase nano-silica and post annealing. The structure, morphology and magnetic properties of the prepared nanoparticles were studied by X-ray diffraction, Raman spectroscopy, transmission electron microscopy, and magnetic measurements. The results show that the average particle size and magnetic properties of the ε-Fe2O3 nanoparticles can be controlled by the relative amount of Iron(III) nitrate nonahydrate used. With the increase of the amount of Iron(III) nitrate nonahydrate, the ε-Fe2O3 nanoparticle size increases. And the coercivity of the ε-Fe2O3 nanoparticles increases. The magnetic hysteresis loops of the ε-Fe2O3 nanoparticles show clear shifts along the magnetic field axis at 300 K, after the nanoparticles were warmed from low temperature in a magnetic field of 50 kOe. This observation is explained in term of exchange bias effect.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we study the aggregation patterns that we observe in systems composed of two and three magnetic particles interacting magnetically and via solid-solid contact in two-dimensions. We use a discrete element method to take into account solid-solid interactions between pairs of particles. The particles are initially separated and, in the case of three particles, placed in the vertex of an equilateral triangle, and then are allowed to evolve for a given period of time. The final configurations are identified and associated to different levels of magnetic potential energy. We construct bifurcation diagrams for both cases by considering several initial conditions of the orientation of the magnetic dipole and identifying the final state configurations. In both cases, the majority of the final configurations is the aggregation of the particles in chains, but a non-negligible number of initial configurations leads to complete dispersion of the particles. Finally, we explore in more detail the surprising fractal nature of the bifurcation diagram.© 2020The variation of dielectric loss in [1 1 0] -oriented Mn-doped 0.71Pb(Mg1/3Nb2/3)O3-0.29PbTiO3 (Mn-PMNT) single crystals after different annealing treatments, as well as their influence on equivalent magnetic noise (EMN) for magnetoelectric laminate composites, were investigated in this study. Dielectric loss can be reduced significantly in oxygen-sufficient atmosphere and high annealing temperature, and dielectric constant varies little in this annealing process, which is favorable to the decrease of the dielectric loss noise. The temperature dependence of dc conductivity was used to characterize the change of dc conductivity and activation energy, which indicated that oxygen vacancies in Mn-PMNT single crystals can be reduced by the annealing treatment, leading to the decrease of dielectric loss. For the influence of magnetoelectric laminate composites, the EMN is clearly reduced in low frequency range (10 < f < 100 Hz) after annealing treatment, which is in good agreement with the simulation results.© 2020We theoretically investigate the effect of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) on magnetic solitons in anisotropic ferromagnetic wires driven by the adiabatic spin-transfer torque. The DMI changes the formation region of soliton solution and the corresponding phase diagram is given for different types of soliton solutions. Also, it affects the processional frequency and the internal structure distortion of solitons. We show that the DMI decreases the energy for symmetric soliton while increases the energy for antisymmetric one. It implies that the DMI favours the more steady state of magnetization for the case of strong easy-axis anisotropy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Comprehensive studies of magnetic properties of GdCr3(BO3)4 single crystal have been carried out. The integrals of intrachain (J/k = 4 ± 1 K) and interchain (J΄/k ≈ −0.7 K) exchange interactions in the Cr subsystem have been determined and the strength of Cr-Gd exchange interaction (JCr-Gd/k ~ −0.2 K) has been estimated. The values of the exchange field 2HE ≈ 17 T and the effective magnetic anisotropy field HA ≈ 0.05 T of GdCr3(BO3)4 have been estimated. The electric polarization ΔPa along the a axis in the longitudinal geometry of the experiment has been detected. Correlations between the electric polarization and the magnetization of the studied compound have been found. The spin-reorientation phase transition in the magnetically ordered state has been found. This transition exists for the external magnetic field applied along any crystallographic direction and the transition field depends weakly on the direction of the field. Nature of the spin-reorientation phase transition has been discussed. Magnetic phase diagram has been constructed and spin configurations for the low-field and high-field phases have been proposed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This work reports on the design and investigation of a new microwave absorber prepared from the combination of Sr-hexaferrite as a hard magnetic material, FeCo nanoparticles as a soft magnetic material, and polyaniline PANI as a dielectric-loss material. The prepared microwave absorber was characterized structurally and morphologically by X-ray diffractometry and scanning electron microscopy. The magnetic properties of the absorber were studied by vibrating sample magnetometer. Vector network analysis was used to perform the electromagnetic characterization of the absorber, which shows an excellent microwave absorption performance in the X-band. The minimum reflection loss was −22.1 dB at a matching frequency of 8.5 GHz, and the bandwidth under −10 dB was 2.6 GHz at a low loading percentage of 30 wt% and a thickness of 2 mm. The good microwave absorption characteristics were linked to the synergistic effect of combining magnetic and dielectric lossy materials. The effect of the chemical nature of silicon resin matrix on the microwave absorption performance was investigated. The presence of polar Si-O groups in silicon resin enhanced the minimum reflection loss and decreased the matching frequency.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties correlated with crystal structure of soft magnetic ribbons of the nominal composition Fe81.3−xCoxMo0.2Cu0.5Si4B14 synthesized by a melt spinning technique are reported. The crystallization process was monitored by differential scanning calorimetry (DSC) that allows identification of the primary crystallization temperature. Thereafter crystallization process is being optimized by changing heat treatment parameters in order to get best possible magnetic properties. The resulting crystal structure of the properly annealed cores has been investigated by means of X-ray diffraction (XRD) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM) methods. It was found that the structure consists of α-Fe(Co,Si) nanograins with the mean size of 20 nm. Additionally, the magnetic saturation and coercivity from the measured hysteresis loops of studied samples have been determined. The microstructure was further correlated with Co content and nanograins size in order to discuss its impact on magnetic properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Using first-principles calculations, we systematically study Gilbert damping, electronic, magnetic and Curie temperatures of CrScCoZ (Z = B, Al, Ga, In, Tl, Si, Ge, Sn, Pb) quaternary Heusler alloys. Thermodynamical stable is estimated by using formation energy and phase separation, and their elastic constants meet the mechanical stable conditions apart from CrScCoSi alloy. For all alloys, a small Gilbert damping parameters at ambient temperature imply their lower energy loss as spintronics materials. Electronic calculations show that the CrScCoZ have a half-metallic nature, and of which the total magnetic moments obey the Slater-Pauling rule, and the presence of disorder reduces their spin polarization. Analysis of orbital population and density of states confirms that the exchange splitting between eg and t2g states leads to the formation of gap. Based on the calculated sum of exchange interactions, we demonstrate that the Cr(A)-Cr(A) and Co(C)-Cr(A) exchanges play a leading role in interactions, thus determine the Curie temperatures. Curie temperatures in CrScCoZ alloys are evidently higher than room temperature. Overall, we think that CrScCoZ alloys are promising candidates in future spintronic applications.© 2020 Elsevier LtdMonolithic optoelectronic integrated circuits, OEICs are seen as key enabling technologies to minimal power loss criteria. Monolithic OEICs combine, on the same die, cutting-edge optical devices and high speed III-V electronics able to generate terahertz signal targeting beyond-5G networks. Computationally efficient compact models compatible with existing software tool and design flow are essential for timely and cost-effective OEIC achievement. The analog nature of photonic devices wholly justifies the use of methodologies alike the ones employed in electronic design automation, through implementation of accurate (and SPICE-compatible) compact models. This multidisciplinary work, describes an efficient compact model for Uni-Traveling Carrier photodiodes (UTC PD) which is a key component for OEICs. Its equations feature the UTC PD electronic transport and frequency response along with its photocurrent under applied optical power. It also dynamically takes into account the device junction temperature, accounting for the self-heating effect. Excellent agreement between model and measurements as well as model scalability (several geometries have been validated) has been achieved that marks the first demonstration of a multi-physics, computationally efficient and versatile compact model for UTC-PDs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A new magneto-elastoplastic coupling model for ferromagnetic materials is proposed using the equivalent field method. In the proposed model, the components of the equivalent field due to the applied magnetic field, applied stress, and plastic deformation are considered based on the energy theory. Through detailed comparison with the existing models, the proposed model in this paper can more accurately describe the basic nonlinear change of magnetostrictive strain and magnetization under the applied stress and magnetic field revealed by existing experiments. In addition, the effects of applied stress, magnetic field and plastic deformation on the magnetostriction and magnetization of ferromagnetic materials are analyzed based on the proposed theory. In conclusion, the proposed model can more accurately describe the effect of stress on the magentostrictive strain and magnetization, the effects of the applied stress and magnetic field on the magnetic permeability, and the effect of plastic deformation on magnetomechanical characteristics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The Gd6YPd3 alloys were synthesized in various forms/structural states and with various quenching rates, utilizing mould casting and melt-spinning, in order to determine the influence of microstructure on the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties. The magnetic and magnetocaloric properties clearly depend on the grain size and structural disorder. The Curie temperature of melt-spun Gd6YPd3 is equal to 115 K although the rapidly cooled cast (rc-cast) orders ferromagnetically at 305 K. The magnetic and magnetocaloric properties clearly depend on the grain size and varying degree of structural disorder. The rc-cast Gd6YPd3 exhibits -ΔSm value of 4.13 Jkg-1K−1 and relative cooling power (RCP) value of ~ 805 J/kg, for the magnetic field changes of 0–5 T. The structurally disordered Gd6YPd3 ribbon exhibits considerable -ΔSm value reaching 8.18 Jkg-1K−1 and large RCP of ~ 891 Jkg−1. Such significant changes are caused by the modification of spatial range of the ferromagnetic and RKKY interactions.© 2020In creep regime, a magnetic domain wall (DW) is regarded as a one-dimensional object that consists of many small segments. However, observation of such a specific segment motion has remained a challenge due to its small size. Here we present direct evidence of individual DW segment motion by employing electrical Hall measurement. When the DW is moved by a weak magnetic field, we find that the anomalous Hall effect (AHE) resistance, RAHE, exhibits random jumps between two resistance states. We confirm that the RAHE jump appears in various samples but the RAHE jump is absent when the width of sample is narrower than DW jump size. These results imply the existence of a specific segment length that governs the DW creep motion.© 2020Piezomagnetic sensor is a subject undergoing intense study. In this paper, a force-sensitive composite film with two layers was designed, and the force-sensitive properties of the film at σ ≤ 0.2 MPa was studied by inductance measurement. The composite film with a complex force-sensing mechanism can correct the fluctuations in the initial stage of the force-sensitive curve and improve the stability of the force sensitivity at the initial stage. Compared to the force-sensitive properties of Fe78Si13B9 amorphous alloy film, the composite film's is significantly higher. When the thickness of the composite film is 180–250 μm, the film has high force-sensitive properties in the compressive stress interval of 0–0.1 MPa, the force-sensitive curve in the sensitive interval is linear approximation. When the thickness of the composite film is 200 μm and the test frequency f = 1 KHz, the sensitivity of the pressure sensor is as high as 0.27 μH/KPa in a wide pressure interval (0 ~ 0.06 MPa). When the thickness of the composite film is 230 μm and the test frequency is 1 KHz, the sensitivity of the pressure sensor is as high as 0.59 μH/KPa in a wide pressure interval (0 ~ 0.02 MPa). The force-sensitive film is the most stable and sensitive one among the current piezomagnetic force-sensitive films. In addition, it has broad application prospects.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The high-energy collective modes of particle-hole excitations across the spin-orbit gap in Sr2IrO4 are investigated using the transformed Coulomb interaction terms in the pseudo-spin-orbital basis constituted by the J=1/2 and 3/2 states arising from spin-orbit coupling. With appropriate interaction strengths and renormalized spin-orbit gap, these collective modes yield two well-defined propagating spin-orbit exciton modes, with energy scale and dispersion in excellent agreement with resonant inelastic X-ray scattering (RIXS) measurements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The integration of highly crystallized thin films on flexible plastic substrates has so far been limited by the instability of the plastic substrates at high growth temperatures. In this paper, we report a robust and facile method to transfer magnetic Ni thin films onto flexible substrates, which enables the imposition of strain on the substrates to take advantage of the magnetoelastic properties of the films. Ni thin films were grown on water-soluble NaCl substrates by sputtering at high temperature and, thereafter, successfully transferred onto flexible polyethylene terephthalate substrates. Magnetic hysteresis loops with strong magnetic anisotropy were observed for the films grown at high temperatures on NaCl substrates; the anisotropy increased after the films were transferred onto the plastic substrate. The magnetic anisotropy of the transferred films was modulated under bending; this phenomenon of magnetic modulation is more apparent at a small radius of curvature. The modulation of magnetic anisotropy in magnetic thin films on flexible substrates using our innovative thin film transfer method presents significant potential for application in future flexible multifunctional devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Effects of Sr substitution at A-site in ordered perovskite Ba3−xSrxMnNb2O9 (x = 1 and 3) have been investigated using X-ray diffraction, magnetization, dielectric/magnetodielectric and neutron diffraction measurements. The parent compound Ba3MnNb2O9 having a large spin (S = 5/2) is known to exhibit type-II multiferroic properties with quasi 2D triangular lattice antiferromagnetic ground state. A slight perturbation in exchange interaction due to substitution of smaller size isovalent ion at the A-site in Ba3−xSrxMnNb2O9 (x = 1 and 3) has been found to alter the ground states drastically and hence the multiferroicity. The crucial role of various fluctuations (quantum and/or thermal), weak lattice distortion induced by Sr substitution and slight imbalance between different fluctuations in determining the ground states and the multiferroicity is discussed and compared with the results of smaller spin compounds (S = 1/2 or 1).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The rotor and the stator of electrical machines consists of an assembly of soft magnetic laminates typically fabricated by punching from the thin sheets. In this work, the effect of edge deformation on the magnetic properties of laminates resulting from the punching of Fe49-Co49-V2 alloy thin sheets is investigated. Ring samples with varying circumference to area ratios, defined by a CTAR index, were made by punching and subsequently annealed to optimize the magnetic properties. The magnetic properties of the annealed samples were investigated for its correlation with the microstructure. It was found that the magnetic performance of Fe49-Co49-V2 alloy decreases with increasing volume of edge deformation, corresponding to an increasing CTAR index. The deterioration in the magnetic properties can be attributed to the high density of recrystallized grains along the edges of the Fe49-Co49-V2 samples. These recrystallized grains are significantly smaller than those away from the edges and pose a higher degree of restriction to the magnetic domain wall movement. The decrease in magnetic properties from edge damage can be mitigated by increasing the annealing time to allow for grain growth at the edges.© 2020The effects of oxygen content in graphene nanoplatelets (GNPs) on the microstructure and magnetic properties of hot-deformed (HDed) Nd-Fe-B magnets were investigated in this work. The GNPs were heat treated at 500 °C to effectively reduce the oxygen content from 27000 ppm (GNP-R) to 7768 ppm (GNP-H). Compared with adding the same amount of GNP-R, the GNP-H doped magnet possessed finer and better texture grains at the contact interface of original powders. The coercivity of GNP-H doped magnet was enhanced from 14.16 kOe to 16.62 kOe, and the remanence increased from 13.18 kGs to 13.61 kGs. Owing to the high thermal conductivity of GNP-H doped magnet, the heat transferred between the grains more quickly and thus restraining the grain growth. Therefore, the GNP-H doped magnet got a higher coercivity. The observation of microstructure revealed that the adsorbed oxygen on the surface of GNP-R reacted with Nd-rich phase. It would result in the oxidation of Nd-rich phase and the decreasing of Nd-rich phase at the grain boundaries. Because of inadequate liquid Nd-rich phase, the Nd2Fe14B grains were difficult to complete the dissolution-reprecipitation. Consequently, a high oxygen environment would deteriorate the orientation of grains.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have observed cross over from Ferromagnetism (FM) to Anti-ferromagnetism (AFM) accompanied by spin lattice coupling in La0.7- xBixSr0.3MnO3 as La is partially replaced by Bi (0.25 ≤ x ≤ 0.40) through structural, magnetization and electrical resistivity studies. Ferromagnetic metallic (FMM) phase observed in x = 0.25 sample transforms to antiferromagnetic insulating (AFI) phase with increasing Bi content (x = 0.40). The step like behavior in M(H), i.e. the metamagnetic transition, describes the field induced antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic transition in x = 0.30 and 0.35 samples. The irreversibility in the field dependent resistivity and magnetization suggests the competitive phase coexistence, between AFM and FM phases, in x = 0.30 and 0.35 samples. The anomaly in the structural parameters across the electrical and magnetic transition observed from the analysis of synchrotron X-ray diffraction data, at low temperatures, establishes a strong interplay between spin lattice coupling in all four samples studied here. The present study thus clearly brings out cross over from FMM to AFI state as Bi concentration increases in La0.7- xBixSr0.3MnO3.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We manufacture membranes based on cotton fabric impregnated with a mixture of honey and carbonyl iron microparticles, with volume fractions of 2.5,5 and 10vol.%. An experimental setup is built to show that in a static magnetic field with intensities up to 37 kA/m the transmission of white light radiation generated by the light-emitting diodes (LEDs) of a LED lamp, is controllable. In addition, in a static magnetic field superimposed on a low and medium frequency electric field, magnetodielectric and magnetoresistive effects are induced. They depend on the volume fraction of the magnetizable phase, on the magnetic field intensity and on the frequency of the alternating electric field. However, they are independent on the incident light radiation. Due to the combined therapeutic effects of honey, carbonyl iron powder, magnetic field, and low and medium frequency electric fields, the results obtained in this work can be used for fabrication of devices that exploit the observed effects for the treatment of various diseases.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Rare-earth iron garnet (RIG) thin films with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) property have recently attracted a great deal of attention for spintronic applications. In this paper, thin (YBiLuCa)3(FeGe)5O12 garnet films were prepared on gadolinium gallium garnet (GGG) substrate by liquid phase epitaxial (LPE) method showing large PMA property. Microstructural properties, chemical composition, magnetic and anomalous Hall effect (AHE) properties of the films were discussed in detail. And we found that the PMA property of this kind of films was mainly controlled by stress-induced anisotropy and growth-induced anisotropy, which were mainly affected by growth temperature. As the growth temperature decreased, the films turned from tensile stress to compressive stress, however, the growth-induced anisotropy increased and would further dominant PMA. By analyzing AHE curves, the thinner films were easier to realize magnetization reversal due to the influence of domains width and interface reflection.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We developed nanocrystalline powders with high Fe contents through methodological and compositional innovations. The Fe-Cr-Cu-Si-B-Sn powders exhibit high Bs of 1.55 T–1.60 T and core losses of 4800–8000 kW/m3 at 2 MHz under 30 mT, P0.2/3M. The Cu clusters provide a high number density of nucleation sites, leading to the formation of powders with nanocrystalline structures. It is found that high number density of Cu clusters are realized by distribution of sub-nanometer Sn clusters, especially near the surface. The addition of Sn enables the maintenance of a stable supply of nucleation sites regardless of powder diameters i.e., a wide variety of quenching rates is accepted.© 2020 The AuthorsIn the present work, we report the preparation of multiferroic PbZr0.52Ti0.48O3 (PZT)/CoFe2O4 (CFO) nanocomposites using a new synthesis technique that can maximize the surface area of contact, and hence, the interfacial coupling between the ferroelectric (PZT) and ferrimagnetic (CFO) phases. The samples have been characterized using X-ray diffraction (XRD) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM), and the physical (magnetic and dielectric) properties have been investigated. XRD confirms the presence of the desired PZT and CFO phases in the samples without any undesired secondary phases. We also observe a reduction in the particle size of CFO in the nanocomposites as evidenced by a line broadening of the XRD reflections corresponding to the pure CFO phase. The nanocomposites show hysteresis loops and ferrimagnetic-like behaviors in their M vs H curves at room temperature, even for samples with very low fraction of the CFO phase. The coercivity of the nanocomposites is marginally larger compared to that of pure CFO, which can be due to the change in magnetic anisotropy of the CFO phase due to its reduced particle size in the nanocomposites. Room temperature polarization versus electric field measurements show a significant increase in the coercive field after the incorporation of CFO inside the PZT matrix. This work illustrates a simple, cost-effective synthesis technique that can be used to prepare nanocomposites of functional materials with desired room temperature functionalities and enhanced interfacial coupling between the two phases.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic exchange interactions between L10-MnGa and ultrathin Co film with Ta capping layer were studied using the first-principles calculations. An oscillation of magnetic coupling from antiferromagnetic (AFM) to ferromagnetic (FM) couplings was observed with increasing the thickness of Co layers. The oscillation period is two monolayers, which was attributed to the quantum well states mainly confined in the Co layers. The appearance of AFM and FM states of L10-MnGa/Co/Ta correspond to the odd and even number of Co layers, respectively. In contrast, the oscillation was completely reversible with that in L10-MnGa/Co without Ta layers, clearly indicating Ta capping layers strongly affect magnetic coupling behavior between L10-MnGa and Co. The related mechanism was discussed by analyzing the spin resolved energy bands and charge densities. The results are useful to understand the magnetic coupling interactions and the confinement behavior of spin electrons in multilayer films, benefiting to develop new magnetic nanostructures.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the magnetic properties, thermal spin fluctuation and the spin wave spectra of a 2D tetragonal ferromagnetic monolayer with Heisenberg model including single-ion anisotropy are studied using functional integral method. Influence of exchange interaction at edge on these properties of the monolayer is also considered. The model is applied for a new robust ferromagnetic monolayer with the 2D tetragonal structure, Co2S2, in which the exchange interaction between magnetic atoms and non-magnetic atoms is included due to hybridization between Co 3d states and S 3p states.© 2020 Elsevier LtdA spatial systematic mismatch, occurring in the integrated circuit manufacturing process, leads to differences in parameters for two or more identical devices. It is widely accepted that placing devices into symmetrical patterns reduces the spatial systematic mismatch between their parameters. In this paper, a novel method based on linear and nonlinear parameter gradient modeling for the assessment of pre-arranged matched structures has been proposed. The direction of a parameter gradient against a layout topology on a wafer is unknown. The pre-arranged layout pattern is rotated against the modeled parameter gradient. In each step of the rotation, for example, with a 1-degree resolution, the mismatch between parameters is calculated. The peak mismatch value is then used for the comparison of the different pre-arranged patterns. The proposed method is independent of technology.© 2020This work investigates the magnetic properties of the Bi-based bulk Bi2(Se1−xTex)3 tetradymites. The samples were prepared using the melting technique, and all composites are crystallised in the R3m Rhombohedral structure. The lattice cell volume increases monotonically with the Te introduction due to the larger size of Te in comparison with Se. The electrical resistivity data show a metal–semiconductor transition at a certain temperature (Tm) that arises from the overlapping between the 6p and 6s bands. The metal-like behaviour below Tm is in correspondence with the semiconducting degeneracy state, and the empirical analysis has confirmed the metal characteristic scattering mechanisms. The resistivity of the pristine Bi2Se3 compound decreases with the low Te doping level, then increases monotonically with the further Te amounts. This behaviour can be attributed to grain size effect and the change in carriers concentration and mobility. The magnetic measurements have shown the non-pure diamagnetism for the Bi2(Se1−xTex)3 composites, in disagreement with several studies, and show the coexistence of a paramagnetic component. This paramagnetic component arises from the orbital magnetisation, where, the electrons abundance (due to Te and the electron source defects) bends the electronic band, forming 2-dimensional electron gas state that leads to the spin-orbital magnetisation (the source of orbital magnetisation).© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis paper investigates the local variability in nanoscale triple-gate junctionless FinFETs utilizing an analytical symmetric and continuous compact model combined with Monte Carlo simulations. Initially, the device parameters are extracted from the experimental transfer characteristics, such as threshold voltage, ideality factor, low-field mobility, source-drain series resistance, channel length modulation factor and mobility degradation factor. Then, statistical analysis is performed to calculate the mean values and standard deviations of the differences of the aforementioned parameters for the local pairs and large number of devices with reference to the mean value of all dies. Monte Carlo simulations allow the compact model to reproduce successfully the drain current local variability. Most important process parameters have been considered and assessed as variability sources, by using the error propagation formula and exploiting the proposed drain current compact model. Successful application to experimental data, revealed the extent of the variabilities in most important process parameters of the devices (sources of variability).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We reported a systematic study on the correlated gyrotropic motion of a chain of multiple skyrmions coexistent in an elliptical thin-film ferromagnetic nanodisk. A theoretic model with modified massless Thiele's equations has been set up. The analytical solutions of the model have suggested several gyrotropic eigen modes for the two-skyrmion and three-skyrmion systems with their unique relative configurations among skyrmion cores. Using micromagnetic simulations, we have confirmed the existence of all these analytic modes and their characterized behaviors. In addition, by applying an in-plane exciting magnetic field in the simulations, we exhibited several spin wave modes at higher resonant frequencies with mixing feature of azimuthal and breathing modes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the effect of Ar ion irradiation on the microstructure and soft magnetic behaviors of Fe80CoxB14-xSi2P3Cu1 (x = 0, 2, 4) amorphous alloys by using X-ray diffraction (XRD), differential scanning calorimetry (DSC) and soft magnetic performance analysis. With increasing Co content, the alloy shows decreasing radiation resistance, i.e., more degree of nanocrystallization induced by irradiation. It is found that after irradiation with fluence of ~9.0 × 1014, the coercivity is reduced from 7.6 A/m to 7.0 A/m, but increases again with further increase of irradiation fluence due to the formation of larger nanosized α-Fe(Co) grains. And with increasing irradiation fluence, the saturation magnetic flux density first decreases slightly from 1.65 T to 1.64 T, and then increases gradually to 1.68 T. Further, the core loss and effective magnetic conductivity were tuned obviously by irradiation, which has been discussed in term of stress relaxation and nanocrystallization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The CoFe2O4 cobalt ferrite nanoparticles were synthesized by the hydrothermal method. At the reaction temperature of 200 °C, the particle sizes were controlled in the range of 22–41 nm by varying the reaction time tr from 2.0 to 15 h and the spontaneous magnetization Ms of samples was increased from 68.6 to 78.2 Am2/kg. The X-ray diffraction diagrams of obtained samples showed their pure ferrite spinel structure. The highest coercivity Hc value of 184.5 kA/m was achieved by tr = 8 h (denoted by CFO). The sample was synthesized with a time reaction of 2 h which was reduced to form CoFe2 (denoted by CF) nanoparticles by H2 flow 300 mL/min at 380 °C. The CFO/CF powders were milled by the high energy mechanical ball milling in a SPEX 8000. After milling for 2 h, the Ms and Hc values of the CFO/CF nanocomposite powders with 10 wt% CoFe2 nanoparticles fraction were 81.5 Am2/kg and 192.4 kA/m, respectively. The microstructure and magnetic properties of all samples are discussed in detail.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the work, a composite material, which is an iron coating on a copper microgrid with a mesh size of 50 μm, is investigated. Iron coatings were synthesized by electroless deposition using arabinogalactan as a reducing agent. Samples were investigated using transmission electron microscopy, Mossbauer spectroscopy and ferromagnetic resonance methods. Magnetic anisotropy in the grid plane was studied by measuring the FMR spectra. The results of the study are discussed by modeling the composite as a wireframe system of magnetic tubes.© 2020 The AuthorsThe work represents the extended theoretical model of the electrical conductance in nanoscale magnetic point-like contacts. The developed approach describes diffusive, quasi-ballistic, ballistic and quantum regimes of the spin-resolved conductance that is important for further development of the contact Andreev reflection spectroscopy, heterojunction models, scanning tunnel microscopy techniques. As a benefit, the model provides a unified description of the contact resistance from Maxwell diffusive through the ballistic to purely quantum transport regimes without residual terms. The model of the point contact assumes that the contact area can be replaced by a complicated object (i.e. the tunnel barrier or complicated one with nanoparticles, narrow domain wall, etc.), where the potential energy profile determines its electrical properties. The model can be easily adapted to particular contact materials, its physical properties and species of the contact area.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Large twists of a soft tube (hollow cylinder) in helical magnetic fields are presented for the first time. Such a phenomenon is usually denoted as the Wiedemann effect. The tube is fabricated from a soft magnetoactive elastomer material with the shear modulus of about 56 kPa. The composite material comprises 80 mass% of micrometer-sized iron particles embedded into a polydimethylsiloxane matrix. The circular magnetic field is generated by an electric current in a straight wire passing through the inner hole of the tube. The maximum value of approximately 350″/cm is observed in a longitudinal magnetic field of a few kA/m overlapped with a circumferential magnetic field of about 1.4 kA/m on the surface of the inner hole. A pronounced hysteresis in the dependence of the Wiedemann effect on the circular magnetic field is found. The ways to enhance the Wiedemann twist in magnetoactive elastomers are discussed. The observed large effect is promising for application in magnetic-field controlled torsional actuators, in particular for soft robotics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Using an ultrathin metallic layer of Mg at the CoFeB|MgO interface has been emerged as an appealing solution to efficiently enhance the tunneling magnetoresistance and thermal stability while reducing the resistance-area product and effective damping of CoFeB films for efficient and low-power dissipated MTJ. However, it is still a great challenge to significantly enhance the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) using Mg interlayer in CoFeB|MgO structures and reveal the behind mechanism, for continuously scaling down the MTJ structure. Here, we investigate the effect of ultrathin Mg insertions of 0.2 nm, 0.4 nm and 0.6 nm on PMA at CoFeB|MgO interface for the CoFeB thickness range of 1–1.5 nm and compare the results with an identical structure without insertion. We observed that upon inserting ultrathin Mg layer, the effective anisotropy turned to out-of-plane even for thicker 1.5 nm CoFeB layers which favors in-plane anisotropy without Mg insertion. We also observe a reasonable increase in the interfacial anisotropy energy along with the effective CoFeB thickness for the structures with Mg insertion. The effect that Mg insertion layer helps reducing the dead layer was revealed accounting for the PMA enhancement mechanism. Our results provide a more detailed explanation for the enhancement of PMA through Mg insertion, which may offer a guidance for the development of CoFeB|MgO based MTJ structure with higher thermal stability and lower switching current.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Full potential linearized augmented plane wave method is used to study the structural, electronic, magnetic and elastic properties of SrO doped with d-block atoms titanium and cupper using DFT technique. Ti0.125Sr0.875O and Cu0.125Sr0.875O super cells were constructed by doping 3d transition metal atoms Ti and Cu with 12.5% of concentration in SrO host compound. Cohesive and formation energies were calculated which indicates the stability of the compounds. For magnetic stability, volume optimization was performed which revealed that compounds are stable in ferromagnetic phase. Elastic parameters were determined to see the hardness and stiffness of the compounds. It has been predicted that compounds are brittle and anisotropic in nature. Analysis of DOS and band structure reveals the half-metallic characteristic of the compounds. Resulting supercells are ferromagnetic with a hundred percent spin polarization carrying magnetic moment 2.00276 μB and 0.99455 μB respectively. Prediction of half-metallic ferromagnetism with spin polarization makes the compounds could be used for spintronics applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and critical behaviours of an Ashkin Teller spin-1/2 model magnetic thin-film systems are studied as part of the Monte Carlo simulation method, based on the Metropolis algorithm, in a simple cubic lattice. The effect of the interaction with the exchange coupling J4 (surface and bulk) is studied. In addition, the phase diagrams present different ratios of the surface exchange interaction at the special point (Rs=J2s/J2b)sp, at which all the films thickness have the same critical temperature, these temperatures can be below, above or equal to the critical system bulk temperature. First and second order transitions appears in the system. Moreover, to the special point descriptions, we found another partially ordered phase at high temperature for certain values of the parameter's interaction. Finally, the effective surface exponents are computed.© 2020 The AuthorsMagnetic force microscopy (MFM) can be considered as a standard tool for nano-scale investigation of magnetic domain structures by probing the local stray magnetic field landscape of the measured sample. However, this generally provides only qualitative data. To quantify the stray magnetic fields, the MFM system must be calibrated. To that end, a transfer function (TF) approach was proposed, that, unlike point probe models, fully considers the finite extent of the MFM tip. However, albeit being comprehensive, the TF approach is not yet well established, mainly due to the ambiguities concerning the input parameters and the measurement procedure. Additionally, the calibration process represents an ill-posed problem which requires a regularization that introduces further parameters. In this paper we propose a guideline for quantitative stray field measurements by standard MFM tools in ambient conditions. All steps of the measurement and calibration procedure are detailed, including reference sample and sample under test (SUT) measurements and the data analysis. The suitability of the reference sample used in the present work for calibrated measurements on a sub-micron scale is discussed. A specific regularization approach based on a Pseudo-Wiener Filter is applied and combined with criteria for the numerical determination of a unique regularization parameter. To demonstrate the robustness of such a defined approach, a round robin comparison of magnetic field measurements was conducted by four laboratories. The guideline, the reference sample and the results of the round robin are discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Electronic phase separation is a frequent ingredient of the physics of manganites for which the colossal magnetoresistance (CMR) phenomenon is at debate. We investigate the switchable magnetoresistance (MR) effect of the Ruddelsden-Popper (RP) oxide Ca4Mn3O10 (CMO), which shows a metal-to-insulator transition (MIT) at 70 K (TMIT). The static (DC) and dynamic (AC) magnetic susceptibilities of CMO indicate an unusual magnetic phase coexistence below the Néel temperature (TN) i.e., at TMIT, which we describe as a glassy magnetic behavior. Furthermore, by means of synchrotron X-ray diffraction, we observed a structural anomaly directly associated with the MIT. Hence, the onset of glassiness correlates with a slight structural distortion. Interestingly, CMO displays a large positive magneto-resistance (PMR) effect (up to 550% at 4 K) in the metallic state below TMIT, while a small negative magneto-resistance (NMR) effect (-3.5% at 112 K) in the insulating region above TMIT. At TMIT, the PMR switches to NMR behavior. PMR is probably induced via enhancing the exchange interaction by localization of itinerant moment resulting in formation of magnetic polarons, whereas NMR is possibly due to reduced electron-spin scattering. This appears to be a special type of magnetoresistance, different from regular observations, and may open a new avenue in searching for exotic phenomena in manganese-based CMR materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The physical properties of Mn3Si2Se6 have been investigated using single crystals grown by iodine-assisted vapor transport. The material possesses a ferrimagnetic ground state and the properties are similar to those in the isostructural compound Mn3Si2Te6 . In these trigonal materials, the dominant magnetic exchanges are antiferromagnetic and intrinsically frustrated, leading to a variety of competing ground states. In Mn3Si2Se6, the Curie temperature is TC = 67(1) K, which is slightly lower than that of Mn3Si2Te6 where TC = 78 K. The anisotropy field is also smaller in the selenide relative to the telluride. In both materials, short-range correlations likely exist well-above TC. Neutron single crystal diffraction data on Mn3Si2Se6 suggest a collinear ferrimagnetic structure with the moments tilting out of the ab-plane in zero-field. Finally, the magnetization of vapor grown Mn3Si2Te6 is shown for comparison; these vapor grown crystals do not show a sharp onset of magnetic anisotropy above 300 K as was previously observed for melt grown Mn3Si2Te6 crystals.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the magnetocaloric and magnetoelectric properties of a new type of the magnetoelectric composite that consisted of Heusler-type magnetic microwires embedded in a polyvinylidene fluoride piezoelectric polymer matrix fabricated using a modified solvent casting technique. The maximum of the adiabatic temperature change ΔT of ~ 0.04 K was observed around 276 K with narrow hysteresis accompanied with a maximum of magnetoelectric effect. Observed temperature dependences of the magnetocaloric and magnetoelectric effects can be associated with magnetic (paramagnetic-ferromagnetic) phase transition. The measurements of the magnetocaloric effect in modes with different frequencies (0.5–20 Hz) of the modulated magnetic field exhibit a reduction of ΔT about 38%.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the relationship between the microstructural and coercivity changes of Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnets was investigated. A Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnet prepared using a fine Zn powder with a low O content exhibited a high coercivity of 2.7 MA m−1, whereas a Zn-free magnet displayed a low coercivity of only 0.31 MA m−1. The raw commercial Sm-Fe-N powder contained an oxidized layer at the surface of the powder with a thickness of approximately 13 nm. In the Zn-free Sm-Fe-N magnet, O diffused into interior of Sm2Fe17N3 grains to generate coarse α-Fe grains with diameters of several tens of nanometers in the oxidized layer. In the high-coercivity Zn-bonded magnet, a Zn-rich region existed at the surface of the Sm2Fe17N3 grains. In the Zn-diffused region, Fe, Zn, Sm, and O were detected via transmission electron microscopy / energy-dispersive X-ray analysis, and this region contained fine grains of Γ-FeZn, α-FeZn, and Sm-O. The non-magnetic Γ-FeZn phase served to magnetically isolate the soft magnetic α-FeZn phase from the Sm2Fe17N3 phase, resulting in the Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnet with high coercivity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The dynamic susceptibility spectra of torus nanoring with a perpendicular or canted external DC magnetic field are studied by means of micromagnetic simulation. Due to the shape anisotropy of the torus nanoring, the system has a vortex spin structure when there is no external DC magnetic field, and the imaginary part of the dynamic susceptibility shows a single resonance peak. With the increase of DC magnetic field which is perpendicular to the plane of the ring, the resonant frequency decreases firstly and then increases monotonically. When the angle between the direction of the DC magnetic field and the center axis of the nanoring increases, the imaginary part of the magnetic susceptibility gradually shows one low frequency and three high frequency resonance peaks. By calculating the dynamic magnetic susceptibility of different parts of the nanoring, the corresponding region of each resonance mode is determined. Finally, we also discuss the effect of size on the magnetic susceptibility of the torus nanoring.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We suggest a model of synthetic ferrimagnetic semiconductor structure based on GaAs-AlGaAs quantum well doped by two Mn delta-layers. The coupling between the delta-layers is mediated by extra holes, and can be switched between ferro- and antiferromagnetic one by gating the structure. A proper choice of Mn concentrations in the delta-layers and of local degree of disorder enables fabrication of a ferrimagnetic structure supporting ultrafast switching of magnetization by short pulses of electric bias without an external magnetic field. The switching mechanism in the structure relies on kinetic spin exchange between the two delta-layers which is mediated by exchange scattering of electric-pulse heated holes by magnetic ions within the layers. Owing to specific interplay between characteristics of the exchange scattering, spin decay times, and the heat withdraw in the suggested synthetic ferrimagnetic semiconductor, the necessary parameters of electric-bias pulse are within the technologically accessible range, and do not contradict typical thermal kinetics of semiconductor structures.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, spin properties of monolayer MX (M = Ga, In and X = S, Se, Te) in the presence of strain are studied. Density functional theory is used to investigate spin properties. The effect of spin-orbit coupling on the band gap is investigated, the results indicate the spin-orbit coupling has a higher effect in the compressive regime. Also, spin splitting in the conduction and valence bands respect to strain are compared for six materials. The location of conduction band minimum (CBM) imposed different type of spin splitting. These materials with mirror symmetry can display the Rashba effect while M valley is located at CBM. Strain tunes the conduction band minimum in three valleys (K, M and Γ valleys) and determines which spin effect (spin splitting, Rashba splitting or no spin splitting) has occurred in each strain for every material. Lastly, the relation between the Rashba parameter and the atomic mass is explored and it is observed that there is a linear correlation between atomic mass and Rashba coefficient.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Electronic and magnetic properties of several 3d transition metals (Ti, V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co, Ni, and Cu) doped SnO2 by means of ab initio calculations. First, we successfully reproduced the experimental band gap (3.60 eV) of bulk SnO2 within GGA + U scheme. Our results show that calculated formation energies of doped systems strongly depend on the dopants atomic numbers (Z). It is found that Ti-doped SnO2 structure exhibits non-magnetic insulating behavior, while V-, Cr-, Mn-, Fe-, and eeCo-doped systems illustrate magnetic semiconducting states within both (GGA and GGA + U) schemes. Ni-doped SnO2 holds non-magnetic/magnetic semiconducting nature for GGA/GGA + U methods. Surprisingly, Cu-doped SnO2 displays magnetic metallic behavior having 85.3% spin-polarization within GGA scheme, while like half-metallic character is obtained for GGA + U. Hence, the present work indicates that Cu-doping is an effective way to induced interesting magnetism in SnO2, which have potential applications in spintronics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have systematically explored the pressure dependence of magnetism, electronic structure, elasticity and lattice dynamics of the ferromagnetic L10-FePd crystalline alloy by employing first-principles calculations. All predicted properties of the ground state are well consistent with available experimental and theoretical results. The total magnetic moment decreases slowly with pressure before the ferromagnetic collapse critical pressure of about 164 GPa and then sharply decreases near the 164 GPa, and the (C44-C66) value changed from positive to negative. The phonon dispersion relations and phonon densities of state are also investigated at zero and high pressures. Owing to the spontaneous magnetization of the system, the ferromagnetic L10-FePd crystalline alloy is dynamically stable at pressures below 171 GPa (above which the magnetism completely disappears). When the pressure was greater than 171.4 GPa, the system dynamics became unstable. The calculated elastic properties indicate that the L10-FePd alloy is mechanically stable up to 180 GPa. The ferromagnetic L10-FePd crystalline alloy has good ductility and metallicity outside the ferromagnetic collapse pressure region, but the L10-FePd crystalline alloy has an abnormal phenomenon of a sudden sharp increase in brittleness near 162 GPa. We found this anomaly from the Pugh ratio B/G and Poisson's ratio of the system and the change of Cauchy pressures (C12-C66) and (C13-C44) with pressure, and this anomaly was analyzed with compression factor and magnetoelastic force.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this report, a highly dispersity and smaller size of Ag nanoparticles were directly embedded into/onto the hollow-porous Fe3O4 magnetic microspheres (Fe3O4/Ag MMPs) by a novel thermal co-reduction method, which used both NaBH4 and trisodium citrate dihydrate as reducing agent to reduce the AgNO3 to Ag nanoparticles. The structural, morphological and magnetic properties of the obtained Fe3O4 and Fe3O4/Ag MMPs were characterized by various techniques, including FT-IR, XRD, XPS, FE-SEM, TEM, VSM and so on. The catalytic performance of Fe3O4/Ag MMPs was examined towards the reduction of p-nitroaniline into p-phenylenediamine in fresh NaBH4 solution, which employing UV–vis spectrophotometer at 380 nm to continuously monitor the reaction progress. The characterization and experimental results indicated that Ag nanoparticles were successfully anchored both in the inner and outer of the hollow-porous Fe3O4 magnetic supports with a weight percent of 31.33%, in addition, the Fe3O4/Ag MMPs remained a high saturation magnetization value of 50.53 emu/g. More importantly, Fe3O4/Ag MMPs had excellent catalytic reduction properties, which fitted well with the first-order kinetics equation and the corresponding apparent rate constant k was 0.45 min−1. The enhanced catalytic properties of Fe3O4/Ag MMPs may be ascribed to the numerous loading of Ag nanoparticles, which were highly monodispersed and stable in an aqueous solution, as well as the remarkable synergistic effect between Ag nanoparticles and hollow-porous Fe3O4 magnetic microspheres.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt ferrite was epitaxially crystallized on acicular seed iron oxide particles with different lattice constants and same particle shape to analyze the effect of the lattice mismatch on magnetic properties. The coercive force obtained by crystallizing 27 vol% of cobalt ferrite was approximately 530–640 kA/m, which tended to increase with the decrease in the difference of lattice constants between the seed particles and cobalt ferrite, which is different from the results for thin films. The obtained coercive force was higher than that considering the contribution of anisotropy from the cobalt ferrite crystallized on the seed particles. In the acicular iron oxide spinel particles, the epitaxial growth of cobalt ferrite was considered likely to occur with a smaller difference in the lattice constants of the seed particles and cobalt ferrite. The high coercive force of the cobalt ferrite crystallized iron oxide particles strongly suggested the influence of exchange coupling between the seed iron oxide particles and cobalt ferrite layer.© 2020Varying degrees of strain were observed in L10-Mn56Ga42 powders via low-energy mechanical cryomilling, and the relationship between coercivity and strain was analyzed in detail. With increasing milling time, the powders do not show obvious variations in grain size and cell parameters, but a large strain is induced into the powders, leading to a remarkable enhancement in coercivity. A maximum coercivity of up to 6.7 kOe was accomplished for 20 h milled powders, with a high residual strain of about 0.96%. The initial magnetization curve indicates that the coercivity mechanism is mainly governed by the domain-wall pinning process where strain-induced defects act as pinning centers. Studies on heat treatments show that the strain-induced coercivity contributes to over 50% of the total coercivity, and a moderate annealing can eliminate the strain, changing the coercivity mechanism to a nucleation process.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This work is a complex investigation of the system of magnetic anisotropic ellipsoidal nanoparticles based on the molecular dynamics computer simulations. Such approach allows defining all advantages and disadvantages of the high-technology usage of these particles. We studied two orientations of the dipole inside each particle: directed along and perpendicular to the main axis of rotation. We determined the particle's anisotropy influence on the self-assembly, microscopic and macroscopic properties of the system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A simple scheme is presented to account for preferential orientation effects in the DC magnetic response of polycrystalline samples of anisotropic high-spin molecules, like single-molecule magnets. A single additional least-squares parameter is introduced in the fitting of isothermal magnetization vs. field data to describe the leading part of a non-spherical distribution of anisotropy axes. The procedure is shown to afford an accurate D parameter and is potentially applicable whenever complete powder averaging cannot be achieved.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.La2CoMn1-xAlxO6 (0 ≤ × ≤ 1.00) samples were synthesized by sol–gel method, and their crystal structure and magnetic properties were investigated. X-ray diffraction reveals a structural transition from monoclinic (space group P21/n) to rhombohedral phase (space group R-3c) with Al content increasing. As envisioned and expected, the remanent magnetization Mr and ferromagnetic (FM) transition temperature TC dramatically decrease with the increment of Al doping, which is due to the destruction of the long-range Co2+-O-Mn4+ FM super-exchange interaction induced by Al ion doping. However, abnormally increase of coercive field HC and effective magnetic moment μeff appear for × = 0.25. The results of infrared spectrum, Raman spectrum, and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy illustrate that this anomaly can be attributed to the spin-state transition of Co3+ ions from intermediate spin (IS) to high spin (HS) state with × increasing to 0.25, rather than the valence changes of the magnetic ions. This spin-state transition is probably due to the increase of crystal symmetry with high disorder and the suppression of Jahn-Teller distortion. The suppressing Jahn-Teller distortion favors the stability of the HS state of Co3+ ions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Exchange-coupled ferromagnetic/antiferromagnetic (FM/AF) bilayers are widely used in spin valves, magnetic tunnel junctions and spin–orbit torque devices. While most studies focused on AF layers exchange coupled with single FM layer, the exchange interaction with FM multilayer were not well understood. In this work, [Co/Ni]n/PtMn multilayers with different PtMn thickness were prepared. Polycrystalline face-centered cubic Co, Ni, and PtMn phases were evidenced by the grazing incidence x-ray diffraction measurements. At room temperature, the [Co/Ni]n/PtMn multilayers show similar soft ferromagnetism as the reference [Co/Ni]2 layers. Reducing the temperature results in broadening of the hysteresis loops, and exchange bias was not observed until 100 K. Temperature-dependent DC magnetization and AC susceptibility revealed blocking temperatures of 210–240 K and a spin freezing temperature of 140 K. This work has revealed the temperature evolution of exchange interaction in [Co/Ni]n multilayer interfacing with A1-phase PtMn. The results are important for understanding the physical process of the establishment of exchange coupling in various FM/AF interfaces.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present an optical method of determining the spin diffusion length of ferromagnetic metals. It is well known that the ultrafast demagnetization of ferromagnetic metals can generate spin accumulation on normal metals in a ferromagnetic metal/normal metal structure. Through varying the thickness of the ferromagnetic metal, we measure the spin accumulation on the normal metal and analyzed the results in two different approaches: the quantitative analysis and the relative analysis of the spin accumulation. From both analyses, we determine the spin diffusion length of 7.0, 4.6, and 3.3 nm for the ferromagnetic metal of Fe, Co, and Ni, respectively.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.To achieve a broad bandwidth microwave absorption at a thin thickness, oriented flakey FeCoNd (F-FCN) is proposed in this work. The orientation leads to the enhancement of permeability and diminishment of permittivity. More importantly, the aligned distribution enhances interface polarization and dipole polarization at specific frequencies and hence generate resonance peaks in permittivity spectra. As a result, percentage bandwidth is gravely broadened from 31% to 56–66% after orientation with thin thickness of 1.5 mm, which is superior than most of the similar absorbers. In addition, because of the morphology anisotropy induced by orientation distribution, microwave absorption performance can be effectively tuned within the range of 6–15 GHz which covers nearly 80% of the C-Ku bands at 1.5 mm by adjusting the angle between the absorber coating surface and the oriented flakey FeCoNd particles.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we report a facile and economical route for the synthesis of nano structured iron carbide (Fe3C). An in situ thermal decomposition of ferric nitrate salt coated on free carbon in spark plasma sintering (SPS) equipment was employed. The effect of process parameters on the formation of Fe3C and the associated magnetic properties are discussed in detail. A set of experiments were carried out at temperatures ranging between 600 and 900 °C, by keeping the pressure and reaction time constant at 60 MPa and 2 min respectively. The reaction mechanism of formation of Fe3C nanoparticles (NPs) was investigated using X-ray diffraction (XRD) studies and it reveals that the nitrate salt decomposes to Fe3O4, which subsequently convert to Fe at 800 °C through carbothermal reduction. These Fe atoms subsequently react with graphitic carbon and convert to Fe3C at 900 °C. The average size of the Fe3C nanoparticles obtained through this route is 25 nm. The effect of C:Fe ratio reveals that up to 1:2 ratio the reaction parameters of 900 °C, 60 MPa and 2 min reaction time is sufficient for the formation of Fe3C NPs. However, for 1:3 ratio the reaction time in SPS has to be increased to 15 min for the formation of Fe3C NPs. This shows that a longer time is required for the complete reaction of C and Fe atoms as the Fe content in the sample increases.© 2020This study reports on the preparation of yttrium iron garnet thin films using three different solvents via a sol-gel method, followed by a spin coating technique and an annealing process at 750 °C for 2 h in the air. The three different solvents were water-ethanol, water-methanol and water. The microstructure analysis using an X-ray diffractometer revealed that the films prepared using a water-alcohol solvent crystallized into YIG single phase at a low annealing temperature (750 °C). The film thicknesses are in the range of 200 nm to 400 nm. The film prepared using a water-ethanol solvent has the smallest crystallite size. All films are soft ferrimagnetic at room temperature and the film prepared using a water-ethanol solvent exhibits the highest saturation magnetization value (162 emu/cm3).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Looking at the importance of exchange bias (EB) studies in novel magnetic systems, magnetic nanocaps consisting of antiferromagnetic (AF)/ferromagnetic (FM) layers were synthesized using nanosphere lithography, followed by ion beam sputtering. For this, CoO/Co/Si and CoO/Co/polystyrene nanosphere (PS) (800 nm diameter) ultra-thin and thick films were prepared by in-situ oxidation. Room temperature magnetization measurements exhibit a clear distinction between the films on PS and those on plane base Si substrate (reference films). Low temperature field cooled measurements on CoO/Co(5 nm)/PS film show a negative EB in both original (−37.4 mT) and trained hysteresis loops (−31.4 mT). However, corresponding reference films show larger EB values in comparison with those of PS substrate counterparts. Due to a higher Co layer thickness, the CoO/Co(100 nm)/PS film shows a lower EB value (−18.2 mT) in comparison with its corresponding CoO/Co(5 nm)/PS ultra-thin film (−37.4 mT). However, for the corresponding reference films, the ultra–thin film shows a higher EB (−68.5 mT) than the thick film (−12.6 mT), which is a generally observed behavior. The overall results are discussed in terms of the curvature induced modifications in the microstructural properties, which cause drastic changes in the magnetic properties of such nanostructures.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Stress-annealing allows considerably modify magnetic properties of Fe-rich glass-coated microwires. Varying the stress-annealing conditions (temperature, time and stress applied during the annealing) we can observe either remarkable improvement of magnetic softness and giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) effect. Observed changes have been attributed to the transverse magnetic anisotropy. An improvement of the circumferential permeability in the surface layer of metallic nucleus is evidenced from observed magnetic softening and remarkable GMI effect rising. We assumed that stress-annealing leads to an increase in the outer domain sheath with transverse magnetic anisotropy rise in expense of inner axially magnetized core typically existing in as-prepared Fe-rich microwires. Consequently, stress annealing enabled us to design the magnetic anisotropy distribution beneficial for optimization of the GMI effect and magnetic softness of Fe-rich magnetic microwires.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The influences of annealing temperature and mass fraction of gas-atomized FeSi powders within a range of 0 ~ 16 wt% on the soft magnetic properties of Fe-based powder cores, prepared by cold compacting the mixture of the water-atomized FeSiBCCr amorphous powders with diameter of 23 ~ 75 μm and the FeSi powders with size below 13 μm, has been systematically investigated. Loss contribution analysis for the corresponding Fe-based compound powder cores was also conducted. The core–shell structure of magnetic powders was characterized using scanning electron microscopy, energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy analysis, and fourier transform infrared spectroscopy. The inter- and intra-particle eddy current losses have a much less impact on the total energy loss as compared to the hysteresis loss and residual loss in the entire testing frequency range. The residual loss is frequency to the power of 1.509 ~ 1.760. As compared to the FeSiBCCr amorphous powder cores, the effective permeability was enhanced by 17.8% with no-degraded DC-bias property over 63.2% of percent permeability at an applied field of 7960 A/m, while the core loss was reduced by 11.1% for the Fe-based powder cores doped with 12 wt% of the micron-size FeSi powders annealed at 763 K for 0.5 h. The compound Fe-based powder cores with excellent magnetic properties could contribute to minimization of the electrical and electronics components with high efficiency in the high power application field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Well-crystallized CoFe2O4 nanowires are grown by electrodeposition into anodic alumina oxide (AAO) membrane. The XRD and EDS analysis confirmed the synthesis of pure CoFe2O4 with average grain size ranging from 30 to 22 nm. The SQUID investigations revealed that the nanowires electrodeposited at −1.2 V exhibit a large remanent magnetization and high permanent internal magnetic field along the wire axis. The microwave studies emphasized a gyromagnetic resonance around 42 GHz. In addition, numerical simulations performed by HFSS showed good agreement with experimental results. As a consequence, such electrodeposited nanocomposite is a promising candidate for high-frequency microwave devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Micromagnetic simulations are employed for predicting the behavior of magnetic materials from their microscopic properties. In this paper we focus on hysteresis loops, which are computed by assuming quasistatic conditions: i.e. the magnetization distribution remains at equilibrium while the applied magnetic field is slowly varied. The dynamic behavior of micromagnetic systems is governed by the Landau-Lifshitz equation. In order to apply the dynamic equation to a quasistatic problem, it is necessary to artificially decouple the relaxation dynamics from the time-scale of the variation of the applied field. This decoupling is normally done in an iterative fashion: the field is considered fixed until the equilibrium point is reached, and subsequently updated. However, this approach is indirect and also has the potential issue that a system might switch to a different equilibrium configuration before the previous equilibrium becomes unstable, which is a behavior not possible in the quasistatic regime. Instead, here we derive the differential equation, which directly describes the evolution of the equilibrium states of the Landau-Lifshitz equation as a function of the external field, or any other externally varied parameter. This approach is a more rigorous description of quasistatic processes and inherently enforces the system to follow a given equilibrium configuration until this disappears or becomes unstable. We demonstrate this approach with simple examples and show it to be as or more stable than the previously used approaches.© 2020 Elsevier LtdA comprehensive analysis of the MOSFET subthreshold swing for a 2D subband with exponential band tail of states is first proposed. Then, a compact analytical expression for the subthreshold swing as a function of temperature is derived, well accounting for both its cryogenic temperature saturation and classical higher temperature increase. Moreover, a generalized subthreshold swing calculation applicable to the situation where the MOSFET drain current should be evaluated from the conductivity function within the Kubo-Greenwood formalism is developed.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we investigated an anomalous hump in the bottom-gate amorphous-InGaZnO thin-film transistors. The hump in the subthreshold region appeared at elevated temperature and disappeared after N2 atmosphere annealing. The anomalous hump phenomenon is attributed to the existence of both main current path composed by electron and parasitic current path induced by positive charges formed by adsorbed H2O molecules. With the increase of the testing temperature, the hump effect becomes significant since the formation of positive charges is strengthened by heat. This hump can be weakened by negative bias temperature instability stress at high temperature due to the charge-trapping mechanism.© 2020 Elsevier LtdA comparative investigation on device characteristics of AlGaN/GaN high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs) with SiNx, SiOx, and SiON passivation by using plasma enhanced chemical vapor deposition (PECVD) technique is conducted. The electrical performance of passivated GaN HEMTs are evaluated through DC current-voltage, pulsed current-voltage, and small-signal measurements. Obvious increases of 10.5% in drain current and of 8.6% in transconductance are observed for SiON passivated HEMT as compared with both the SiOx and SiNx passivated HEMTs. The SiOx passivated device is found to have lowest gate leakage current as well as off-state drain leakage current as compared to SiNx and SiON passivated devices. However, the pulsed I-V measurement shows a severe current collapse for SiOx passivated HEMT caused by the introducing of deep traps when compared with the SiNx and SiON passivated devices. Moreover, the small-signal measurement shows that the SiON passivated HEMT has a higher cut-off frequency due to the improvement in transconductance, which makes it a promising passivation layer for GaN based high power HEMT applications.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe effect of different point defects in CdZnTe (CZT) crystals on carrier transport performance were discussed. The energy level and concentration of the traps were determined by the photo-induced current transient spectroscopy (PICTS). By adding the infrared light illumination into the PICTS experiment, the effect of sub-bandgap light on defects was observed. Meanwhile, several DC photoconductive experiments were done under different wavelength lights were used to explore the effect of the different defects on carrier transport properties of CZT crystals. Furthermore, the energy spectrum test was used to investigate the effect of sub-bandgap light on the energy resolution of CZT detectors. The data results showed that sub-bandgap light could effectively change the ionization state of defects. The doubly ionized Te antisite (TeCd 2+) had the greatest effect on mobility-lifetime product(μτ) of electrons owing to its stronger ability of capturing electrons and energy level located around the midgap. While the secondary ionized Cd vacancy (VCd 2−), as considered as a hole trap, had the greatest effect on μτ-product of holes. Consequently, choosing suitable infrared light can improve the detection performance of CZT crystal effectively.© 2020Twin-roll thin strip casting process (SC) has been utilized in laboratory to fabricate typical high-permeability electrical steel (HPES) such as 1.5 wt% Si and 6.5 wt% Si steel with ideal crystallographic orientation and excellent permeability after a series of heat treatments. Whereas, there exists a problem associated to the cracking sensitivity in high temperature mushy zone, which further restricts the industrial application of SC to produce HPES. Mechanical behavior of 1.5 wt% Si and 6.5 wt% Si steels in high temperature mushy zone were comparatively studied by Gleeble-3800 physical simulation system under strain rate 3 s−1, systematically. The high temperature brittle region composed of zero strength temperature (ZST) and zero ductility temperature (ZDT) in the mushy zone were quantitatively determined, and the critical strain threshold associated to hot crack initiation in the brittle region were further evaluated following empirical model proposed by Y Won. Results show that the tensile strength and fracture ductility in the mushy zone are both closely associated with the varying volume fraction of network-shaped structure during solidification, and are decreased with decreasing solid fraction concerning studied 1.5 wt% Si and 6.5 wt% Si steels. The high temperature brittle region corresponding to the studied 1.5 wt% Si and 6.5 wt% Si steels in mushy zone are separately confirmed to be 1459 ~ 1465℃ and 1390 ~ 1427℃, and the thresholds of critical strain for hot cracks initiation in high temperature brittle region are calculated to be ~ 1.18% and ~ 0.24%, respectively. Considering from perspective of width of high temperature brittle region and critical strain threshold for hot crack initiation, the cracking sensitivity of 6.5 wt% Si steel in the mushy zone is more serious compared to 1.5 wt% Si steel.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effect of doping of divalent Sr2+ and Zn2+ ions on the structural and magnetic properties of cobalt ferrite was investigated. For this purpose, the samples with the composition of Co1-x-ySrxZnyFe2O4 (where x = 0.0, 0.01, 0.05, 0.3 and y = 0.0, 0.05, 0.1, 0.4, 0.5, 0.7) were synthesized by using the spontaneous gel auto-combustion (Pechini) technique. The effect of the presence of these dopants on the average of crystallite/grain size, lattice parameter, density, the purity of the formed phase, and morphology of the synthesized nanoparticles was determined. Although formation of spinel ferrite was confirmed in the all samples, the secondary phase of SrFeO2.86 was detected for the samples containing high values of Sr (=0.3). Also, thermal DTA-TG analysis showed that the formation enthalpy of the doped-samples was increased. FE-SEM micrographs showed a semi-spherical morphology, regular and well-distributed nanoparticles in the samples with high values of these dopant elements. According to the FTIR data, simultaneous doping of Sr2+ and Zn2+ ions caused to a slightly shift in spectrum. The magnetic characterization of the synthesized samples revealed that the simultaneous doping of Sr2+ and Zn2+ ions in cobalt ferrite drastically changes the magnetic parameters of cobalt ferrite. For instance, the saturation magnetization and coercivity values were changed from 72 to 4 emu/g and from 1019 to 5 Oe, respectively. Furthermore, the hard magnetic behavior of cobalt ferrite changed to the superparamagnetic behavior in the doped-samples.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the magnetization states under the spin-transfer switching effect are investigated in a nanopillar device composed of a half-metallic Heusler Co1.5Fe1.5Ge alloy with a four-fold in-plane magnetocrystalline anisotropy. A comparative study with a half-metallic Heusler alloy of Co2FeAl0.5Si0.5 and a typical material of Fe is realized by numerically solving the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert (LLG) equation with the Spin-Transfer Torque (STT) contribution, using micromagnetic simulations. Our ultimate goal is to elucidate the origins of the intermediate state (IS) that occurs during magnetization switching by deeply examining the effects of magnetocrystalline anisotropy and shape anisotropy on the magnetization states through analyzing and comparing various switching processes. Our simulation results showed that the magnetization switching via a single-step under low current densities is possible at certain critical cross-sectional dimensions of the ellipse that are adjusted to increase the demagnetization field against the four-fold in-plane magnetocrystalline anisotropy. As well, we provided in this paper a set of appropriate geometric dimensions which allow the magnetization to reverse via a single-step by overcoming IS with minimal spin-polarized current densities.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The detailed magnetization behavior of RFe2O4 (R = Yb and Tm) have been investigated in a wide range of magnetic fields. In low temperature region, the temperature dependence of magnetization shows that the strength of the interaction between R 4f and Fe 3d ions is directly related to the R3+ ions, a distinct phase transition was observed at ~53 K in YbFe2O4 and no obvious one was observed in TmFe2O4 even cooling to 1.8 K. The possible interaction between R 4f and Fe 3d ions and their evolution with magnetic field were investigated by pulsed high magnetic field. Based on the structures of both FeO5 trigonal bipyramid and RO6 octahedron of RFe2O4, the competition between ferromagnetic double-exchange and antiferromagnetic superexchange among the R-R, R-Fe and Fe-Fe, especially the interplay between R and Fe ions, are discussed. The different R-Fe magnetic interaction betweenYbFe2O4 and TmFe2O4 is experimentally verified by impedance spectroscopy and dielectric spectroscopy. Finally, the high field magnetic phase diagrams of RFe2O4 (R = Yb, Tm) are proposed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Microstructure characteristics are important for the high-performance Sm2Co17-type permanent magnets to achieve high intrinsic coercivity (Hcj) and large magnetic field at the knee-point (Hknee). In this work, the correlation between microstructures and magnetic properties has been systematically studied. The different microstructures were obtained by two procedures: by adjusting the aging temperature and optimizing the Zr content. On one hand, with increase of aging temperature from 1063 K to 1103 K, the cell size and the lamellar phase density increase from 75.1 nm and 0.014 1/nm to 101.5 nm and 0.043 1/nm, respectively, and the average peak Cu concentration at the cell boundaries reaches 21.9 at% which is helpful for obtaining relatively high Hcj and Hknee. As the aging temperature increases further to 1143 K, a much larger cell size and with incomplete cell boundaries results in an irregular distribution of Cu concentration at the cell boundaries. In this case, the Hknee is low even though the magnet shows a high Hcj. On the other hand, the increase of Zr content also promotes an increase in both the lamellar phase density and the average peak Cu concentration at the cell boundaries, giving rise to high Hcj and Hknee. Taking into consideration the aging temperature and Zr content, one can conclude that a lower aging temperature and lower Zr content produce a lower lamellar phase density and average Cu concentration at the cell boundaries and this leads to a lower Hcj and Hknee of the magnets. To further confirm this correlation between the microstructures and magnetic properties, a magnet of Sm(CobalCu0.062Fe0.285Zr0.016)7.6 was aged at a higher temperature of 1143 K to increase the lamellar phase density. As expected, the lamellar phase density increases from 0.008 to 0.013 1/nm; however, the cell size increases simultaneously from 142.5 to 247 nm. The magnet exhibits a much higher but uneven Cu concentration at the cell boundaries. As a result, the Hcj increases from 1.64 to 10.18 kOe, while Hknee just increases from 1.09 to 3.91 kOe.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.SmFeO3 and SmFe0.9Mn0.1O3 single crystal samples grown with a floating zone technique have been investigated under static and pulsed high magnetic fields along all principal crystallographic axes. Comprehensive investigation on magnetization (behavior) show that the spin switch transition and spin reorientation transition among the Sm3+ and Fe3+/Mn3+ sublattices is highly anisotropic. Especially, with the applied magnetic field along a-axis, a field induced multi-step transition was observed in SmFeO3 around compensation temperature (TComp1 ~ 3.9 K), which was not observed in Mn doped SmFe0.9Mn0.1O3 (TComp2 ~ 9.3 K). The experimental results show that the Jahn-Teller (J-T) Mn3+ ions has an important effect on anisotropy and affects the spin-reorientation and high field magnetization behavior. The study provides a clear picture to show the dominate effects between rare earth ions and transition metal ions on the complicated magnetization behavior.© 2020 The AuthorsPolycrystalline perovskite La0.55Sr0.45MnO3 has been prepared by the conventional solid-state reaction route using planetary ball milling technique. The structural properties have been investigated using XRD and SEM data. Rhombohedral structure with space group R-3c of the sample is confirmed by room temperature XRD investigation. Microstructure and chemical composition were determined by Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM), which includes an energy dispersive X-ray diffractometer (EDX). The study of the dielectric properties of the sample reveals that La0.55Sr0.45MnO3 possesses a high dielectric constant at room temperature and at low frequencies. The real part of the dielectric constant ε’ is also observed to be strongly dependent on the temperature and the best properties are found in the sample at room temperature for which ε’ ≈104 up to f = 4x106 Hz. The dispersion of dielectric constants at low frequency is explained in the light of Maxwell–Wagner model. A pronounced increase in Capacitance C is observed from 273 K to 298 K and likely to be caused by the redistribution of ions due to the thermal agitation. The resistivity decreases with increasing temperature indicating that the sample has a semiconductor-like behavior. The constant value of μ’ over a wide range of frequency indicates the compositional stability and the range of the suitability of the perovskite. A significant decrease of ac permeability has occurred around 298 K indicating a magnetic phase transition from ferromagnetic to paramagnetic state. Low temperature magnetization measurement reveals paramagnetic to ferromagnetic (FM) transition upon cooling at TC = 244 K. But the FM state coexists with the residual canted AFM (anti-ferromagnetic) state rather than a pure FM state. Presence of external field H favors the FM phase which expands at the expense of the AFM phase. Thus M−H measurement reveals high saturation magnetization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The antisymmetric Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) in noncentrosymmetric systems leads to various nonuniform chiral magnetic textures. Polarized neutron scattering is a powerful method for investigation such chiral distributions. The most used technique is a small-angle neutrons scattering (SANS). Multilayered magnetic films with the interface induced DMI (iDMI) can't be investigated by SANS because of their small volume. The appropriate technique is a polarized neutron reflectometry. Within the framework of the continuum theory of micromagnetics, we explore the impact of the iDMI on the polarized neutrons reflection from multilayers with random magnetic anisotropy. It is shown that the iDMI gives rise to a polarization-dependent asymmetric term in the reflection.© 2020 The AuthorsSpintronics is one of the emerging fields for the next-generation nanoelectronic devices to reduce their power consumption and to increase their memory and processing capabilities. Such devices utilise the spin degree of freedom of electrons and/or holes, which can also interact with their orbital moments. In these devices, the spin polarisation is controlled either by magnetic layers used as spin-polarisers or analysers or via spin–orbit coupling. Spin waves can also be used to carry spin current. In this review, the fundamental physics of these phenomena is described first with respect to the spin generation methods as detailed in Sections 2 ~ 9. The recent development in their device applications then follows in Sections 10 and 11. Future perspectives are provided at the end.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Due to their wide use in industrial and commercial devices, it is important to accurately and effectively model permanent magnets, leading to better magnet designs and more desirable magnetic characteristics. In recent decades, researchers have derived equations describing magnetic fields, forces, and torques, but these are usually limited to cuboid or ring-shaped magnets. Some authors have derived magnetic field equations for polyhedral magnets, allowing more general magnet shapes, but these are either not fully simplified or computationally inefficient. This paper presents a new set of simplified and exact equations describing the magnetic field produced by an arbitrarily-shaped polyhedral permanent magnet with constant uniform magnetisation and a relative permeability of unity. These equations were implemented in Matlab code and validated using finite element simulations and literature. These equations are significantly faster than finite element simulations, and can therefore be used for efficient optimisation of magnet geometry or topology, real-time simulations, and for approximation of curved surfaces of permanent magnets.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Path dependent resistivity (ρ) relaxation behavior of FeRh0.46Pd0.54 is studied in magnetic field (H) – temperature (T) parameter space. It shows that within the hysteresis region of zero field ρ – T curve, relaxation rate for AFM to FM forward transition during cooling is one order higher than the reverse transition during warming. However, below the hysteresis region, kinetics of the transition dominates and relaxation behavior depends on the path followed in H-T space to reach the measurement point. These measurements show that at low temperatures relaxation rate for AFM to FM transformation decreases irrespective of metastable phase fraction and it is maximum around 75 K. This is in contrast to relaxation behavior of supercooled/superheated metastable sate where relaxation rate depends on the available phase fraction for the transformation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effect of 3d transition metal (TM) dopants (Sc, Ti, V, Cr, Mn, Co, Ni, Cu, Zn) on the structural, electronic, and magnetic properties of ferromagnetic Bi2Fe4O9 is studied in detail using first principles calculation. Bi2Fe4O9 is an important mullite type material which appears as a prominent secondary phase owing to high volatility of Bi during synthesis of BiFeO3. All 3d TM dopants are found to favorably substitute octahedrally coordinated Fe in comparison to tetrahedrally coordinated Fe in Bi2Fe4O9, wherein the doping energy of 3d TM dopants with number of d electrons ≤5 is less than that with number of d electrons greater than 5. The electronic properties of 3d TM substituted Bi2Fe4O9 reveals introduction of electronic states in the band gap implying the formation of electron/hole traps. Importantly, substitutional doping at Fe site by Zn is found to be inducing p-type conductivity in Bi2Fe4O9, thereby, pointing to a novel way of introducing p-type doping via substitution, where Bi2Fe4O9 in pristine form is a multiband semiconductor or a charge transfer insulator. Further, Ni atom tends to couple antiferromagnetically to the nearby Fe atom. The present study comprehensively provides an insight into the possible effects of 3d TM dopants on Bi2Fe4O9.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, we investigated the correlation between structure, microstructure, optical, electrical, dielectric and magnetic properties in composites based on ferrimagnetic Sr0.92Ca0.04Mg0.04Fe12O19 (noted SrCaMg) and ferroelectric BaTiO3 (noted BTO) phases in different ratio. Series of (1-x)BaTiO3/xSr0.92Ca0.04Mg0.04Fe12O19 mixtures (with x = 0.00, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75 and 1.00) were synthesized. The constituents were selected by taking into consideration the perspective ferroelectric and ferrimagnetic characteristics of BaTiO3 and Sr0.92Ca0.04Mg0.04Fe12O19, respectively. X-ray diffraction (XRD) investigations showed the co-existence of tetragonal BaTiO3 (noted BTO hereafter) and Sr0.92Ca0.04Mg0.04Fe12O19 hexagonal ferrite (noted SrCaMg HF) phases in the produced composites. The phase content of ferrimagnetic SrCaMg HF phase is increasing with increasing x content. The lattice parameter ‘a’ for both BTO and SrCaMg HF phases is almost constant with increasing the x content. However, the lattice parameter ‘c’ is decreasing for BTO phase and increasing for SrCaMg HF phase. The crystallites size (DXRD) is decreasing for BTO phase and increasing in SrCaMg HF phase as the x content increases. The homogeneous distribution of different phases was confirmed via scanning and transmission electron microscopies analyses and the corresponding selected area electron diffraction (SAED) patterns. On increasing the content of SrCaMg hexaferrite phase, the grains size of BTO phase is decreasing. The band gap energy (Eg) values were determined from the analysis of UV–vis diffuse reflectance spectra. BTO nanoparticles (x = 0.00) displays Eg value equal to 3.27 eV. It is found that Eg value is reduced with increasing the concentration of SrCaMg hexaferrite phase reaching values of 3.21, 3.08, 2.91 and 1.23 eV for x = 0.25, 0.50, 0.75 and 1.00, respectively. The saturation magnetization (Ms) and remanence (Mr) were increased with increasing the concentration of SrCaMg HF in the composite. Ms and Mr values are increased from about 0.09 and 0.02 emu/g for x = 0.00 to around 68.8 and 44.7 emu/g for x = 1.00. Compared to x = 0.00 sample, the coercivity (Hc) was increased sharply from 400.5 to 3295 Oe for x = 0.25 and then slightly diminishes with further increasing x. It was noticed that the dielectric properties of various composites depend largely on the x content that alters the microstructure of composite. This was discussed with respect to the microstructure and temperature effect.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles of lanthanum-strontium manganite were synthesized via sol-gel method. It was investigated that La1- xSrxMnO3 (0.23 ≤ x ≤ 0.25) precursors were formed by complexing reactions during the synthesis and pyrolysis of polymer sol. X-ray diffraction data showed that single-phase crystalline nanoparticles began to form in one-stage at 600 °C; the level of crystallinity increased with the growth of the treatment temperature. It was shown that the heat treatment effected on the morphology of the particles. Magnetic fluids based on La1- xSrxMnO3 (0.23 ≤ x ≤ 0.25) nanoparticles were prepared and it was shown that heating efficiency of magnetic fluids in an alternating magnetic field strongly depended on their crystallochemical properties. It was established that La1-xSrxMnO3 (0.23 ≤ x ≤ 0.25) nanoparticles obtained at 800 °C had optimal crystallochemical properties and morphology, possessed high heating efficiency in an alternating magnetic field and are expected to be promising for investigations as the inducers in magnetic hyperthermia.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The dielectric response of La1.67Sr0.33NiO4 single crystal varies with the frequency, temperature and magnetic field has been investigated. Experimental results show that the dielectric constant reaches 104 at high temperature region, and the low temperature dielectric behavior confirms that the electrical transport behavior follows a variable-range-hopping (VRH) model. The dielectric behavior varies with the external magnetic field where the magnetic field induced phase transition of charge order (CO) is companied with the change of the dielectric behavior, indicating a magnetoelectric properties of the charge ordered compound of La1.67Sr0.33NiO4. Therefore, the coexistence of Ni3+ and Ni2+ ions makes the CO, which responds orderly at high temperature under the action of external magnetic field may contributed to the observed magnetodielectric behavior.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Density functional theory and kinetic Monte Carlo method are applied in our study to describe formation, stability and magnetic properties of atom-wide wires on vicinal metal substrate. We present temperature ranges of atom-wide wires’ formation for different systems. The lifetimes of nanowires were determined, and their stability was discussed. Our calculations for both ferromagnetic Fe and Co wires decorating Pt(775) step edge show that the easy magnetization is in the plane perpendicular to the wire, while for Cu(775) it is oriented along the wire. The wire properties obtained from our simulations will be useful both for creating a new generation of materials and for explaining the experimental data.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report here the electronic structure calculations of the magnetic moment, magneto-crystalline anisotropy energy (MAE), and density of states (DOS) of Gd-metal, GdAl2, GdAl3, GdCo2, GdCo3, and GdCo5. From the DOS, the exchange splitting energy is derived to map ferrimagnetic to paramagnetic phase transition (Curie temperature, TC). The employed theoretical method here is based on advanced density functional theory, specifically the linearized augmented plane wave method (LAPW) within the local spin density approximation (LSDA), including spin–orbit coupling (SOC) and Hubbard model parameter (U). DOS analysis of both Gd-Al and Gd-Co systems reveals a strong correlation between exchange splitting energy and TC. The Gd-Co system exhibits an enormous exchange splitting energy among Co-3d electrons, vastly overwhelming the vanishing Gd 5d exchange splitting. These findings suggest that exchange splitting of Co-3d electrons plays a key role in the ground state magnetism and magnetic transition temperatures in these materials.© 2020 Elsevier LtdA simple model is proposed for the Back Enhanced SOI MOSFET in triode region. This model is based on a conventional MOSFET model in series with resistors and antiparallel Schottky diodes. A robust parameter extraction method, based on lateral optimization, is also presented. The dependence of the extracted parameters with the back-gate bias is studied.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Skyrmioniums are exotic magnetic configurations that have several potential applications, as devices for magnetic recording, in Spintronics. In this work, using micromagnetic simulation, we show that it is possible to switch a skyrmionium in an isolated nanodisk. First, we have obtained the ground state of the nanodisk for a fixed value of perpendicular anisotropy constant Kz and for several values of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya exchange constant Dint. Next, in order to obtain the frequencies of the spin wave mode, we have calculated the power spectrum of the fluctuations of the spatial z-component of the magnetization for values of Dint where the ground state of nanodisk is a skyrmionium. Our results show that applying oscillating perpendicular magnetic field pulses with a frequency equal to that of the spin wave mode, and tuning the values of the intensity of the applied magnetic field and its duration in the sub-nanosecond range, one can switch the polarity of the skyrmionium in the nanodisk. We have also obtained, from the micromagnetic simulation of the process of inversion of polarity of the skyrmioniums, the several intermediate magnetic configurations of the nanodisk, revealing the full complexity of this phenomenon.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Mn3O4 octahedral nanocrystals with a size of about 10–12 nm are synthesized and further assembled into colloidal superparticles via a microemulsion-based approach. The synthesized typically colloidal superparticles have a spherical shape with an average diameter of about 115 nm, and their sizes are affected by the surfactant concentration and ultrasonic time. The nanocrystals in the typical superparticles have more compact configuration with reduced interparticle distance compared with un-assembled powders. Magnetic measurements reveal that although the typical superparticle sample and two un-assembled powder samples have basically the same Curie temperature, the colloidal superparticles exhibit a higher blocking temperature. In addition, a larger coercivity of about 9881Oe is also observed at 5 K for the colloidal superparticles. The interface pinning effect to the flipping of spins due to the formation of spherical superparticles may need to be taken into account for the enhanced coercivity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.BiFeO3 is the most important type-I multiferroics, with a different origin of ferroelectricity (Bi-site) and magnetism orders (Fe-site). However, the magnetoelectric coupling effect is poor due to the huge differential between ferroelectric Curie temperature TC and Néel temperature TN. In this work, the crystal structure, ferroelectric and magnetic properties of BiFeO3-based ceramics were investigated by tuning the substitution amount of A and B sites. The XRD and Raman analyses confirmed the phase transformation from polar rhombohedral R3c to non-polar orthorhombic Pbnm with increasing substitution amount of A-site. DSC analysis indicated that the Curie temperature TC decreased linearly with increasing A-site substituted content, and the magnetic transition temperature TN decreased linearly with increasing B-site substituted content. Meanwhile, for BF008-01 sample, the obviously thermal hysteresis observed in DSC curves indicated the first-order ferroelectric transition. For other samples, the Curie temperature was hard to detect due to the relaxor ferroelectric characteristics. The ferroelectric properties obtained by PUND method indicated the enhanced ferroelectricity, which can be attributed to the decreased leakage current. The magnetic properties were improved, and the maximum remnant magnetization Mr was obtained at BF008-01 sample, where Mr = 75.4 emu/mol. The magnetic properties are mainly affected by the substitution content of B site and the structure of BiFeO3-based ceramics. This work realized the precise regulation of TC and TN of BiFeO3-based ceramics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we elaborate analytical theory of domain wall dynamics close to the angular momentum compensation point based on non-linear dynamic equations derived from the effective Lagrangian of a ferrimagnet. In the framework of the proposed model, we explore dynamic processes in the Walker and post-Walker regimes. Analysis of the precession angle and domain wall's velocity oscillations in post-Walker regime in a ferrimagnet is performed. We show that although spin oscillations quench the dynamics of domain walls near the Walker breakdown field, a further increase of the driving magnetic field increases domain wall speed and mobility. An anomalous behavior of domain wall dynamic properties near the angular momentum compensation point in ferrimagnets (unlimited enhancement of the domain velocity, vanishing of effective dynamic mass) is discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A scanning magnetic microscope based on an off-diagonal magnetoimpedance sensor is presented. As a sensor, we use a 4 mm segment of glass covered microwire, having a metallic core diameter of 13.5 μm and CoFeCrSiB composition and a pick-up coil wound around the microwire containing 70 turns. The magneto-impedance sensor is fixed perpendicular to the surface of the sample, in such a way that the distance between the tip of the microwire and the sample is about 200 μm. The relative movement of the sample and the GMI sensor is carried out using a non-magnetic X-Y positioner. Measurements are taken inside the magnetic screen. For test measurements, samples in the form of the letters IWMW – of the conference abbreviation are used. The samples were made based on thin copper wire, Fe-rich amorphous ferromagnetic microwires and printed by laser-jet printer. Clear magnetic images were obtained on all samples, which demonstrates the high practical potential of the proposed method.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Recently, a numerical evaluation has been reported of the magnetic field distribution above a hexagonally distributed spikes pattern of a magnetic liquid free surface. To support the theoretical predictions, as well as numerically obtained results, the measured values of the magnetic field above the magnetic liquid free surface are disclosed in the article. The measurement technique is performed by scanning a magnetic field induction with a Hall sensor at a close distance above the free surface (spikes). The results show that the experimentally obtained magnetic field is distributed in a similar way as a free surface, thus, a quality image of spikes can be reproduced by the magnetically-based technique introduced in the article.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a physics-based scalable formulation for interface trap generation in the vicinity of the emitter-base spacer oxide interface in advanced SiGe HBTs. Aging tests were performed for various emitter dimensions to investigate the scalability of the dynamics of hot-carrier degradation. An improved formulation of the bond dissociation rate is also proposed incorporating a scaling rule depending on the avalanche current density. The hydrogen diffusion through the EB spacer has been modeled using an RC ladder network and has been scaled according to the hydrogen diffusion volume. Its accuracy has been validated over a wide range of aging tests and various geometry features.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a series of Fe25+2xCo27.5-xNi27.5-xP14B6 (x = 0, 2.5, 5, 7.5 and 9) high entropy alloys (HEAs) were fabricated via melt-spinning and copper-mold casting, and their phase formation, thermal stability and magnetic properties were investigated. It was found that different phase structures were formed in this alloy system, depending on the variation of composition and cooling rate (Ra). Either a single amorphous phase or multiple phases containing solid-solution phase + compound phase complex were formed in these HEAs depending on Ra. Meanwhile, for Fe30Co30Ni30P7B3 alloy, only a simple solid-solution phase was formed under the fabrication of this work, indicating its insensitivity to Ra. This phenomenon provides a clue to the selection of the desirable phase structure and tailoring magnetic properties by adjusting the composition and Ra. Among this present alloy system, Fe25Co27.5Ni27.5P14B6 alloy ribbon exhibits the lowest coercivity (Hc) of 1.42 A/m, while Fe43Co18.5Ni18.5P14B6 alloy ribbon has the highest magnetic saturation (Bs) of 1.0 T. For Fe30Co30Ni30P7B3 alloy, the Hc decreases from 429.84 A/m to 114.50 A/m by rapid solidification. This work suggests a new route to overcome the restrictions of compositional design by equiatomic ratio to improve soft magnetic properties of HEAs in a wide compositional space.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we report on the controlled fabrication of a self-assembled line network in highly epitaxial BiFeO3 thin films on top of LaAlO3 in the kinetically limited grown region by RF sputtering. As previously shown in the case of manganite thin films, the remarkable degree of ordering is achieved using vicinal substrates with well-defined step-terrace morphology. Nanostructured BiFeO3 thin films show mixed-phase morphology. Besides typical formation following (100) and (010) axes, some mixed phase nanodomains are detected also in-between the regular line network. These particular microstructures open a playground for future applications in multiferroic nanomaterials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A new one-pot highly efficient synthesis method implemented using an industry-oriented roboticized coating device was designed and developed for obtaining high quality SiO2-coating on the surface of commrercial Fe78Si13B9 (FeSiB) amorphous flaky powder at the room temperature. Hereinto, the conventional instilling method was modified as directly pouring the ultra-diluted precursor by anhydrous ethanol into the reaction mixture, favorable for both simple operation and shortening the total manufacture time to 1.9 h (including the drying time of about 0.7 h). Comparison and analysis on the soft magnetic properties of the FeSiB amorphous powder cores insulated using different precursor concentration within the range of 0 ~ 0.25 ml/g were investigated in detail. SEM, EDS, and FTIR were employed to characterize the core-shell structure of magnetic powders. The increment of pinning sites induced by the raising precursor concentration can cause a reduction in effective permeability, while result in the increases of hysteresis loss and excess loss. The eddy current loss contributes only about 13.5% ~ 18.1% of total core loss for the coated powder cores under the TEOS concentration over 0.09 ml/g, indicating that the corresponding magnetic composites have a good electro-insulating layer. This work offered a referable idea for efficiently coating other inorganic insulations on the magnetic powders within different shapes.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis paper introduces the integrated generator and its design verification. In order to analyze the output performance of the thermoelectric generator, the design verification is carried out using ANSYS finite element simulation. In the simulation of traditional thermocouple structure, the maximum power factor is 8.99 × 10−3 μWcm−2K−2. In the simulation of I-shaped thermocouple structure, the maximum power factor is 11.39 × 10−3 μWcm−2K−2. It verifies that compare with the traditional thermocouple, the I-shaped thermocouple can increase the maximum power factor. The thermoelectric-photoelectric integrated generator is fabricated by one multi-step MEMS process. The bottom of integrated generator is the light energy collector. The top of integrated generator is the thermal energy collector. Polyimide is coated on the upper end of the thermopile to make the heat transfer smoothly. It also make the temperature difference between the front side and back side larger. In the experiment, the thermoelectric and photoelectric properties of the generator are tested at room temperature. The maximum power factor of the generator is 7.81 × 10−3 μWcm−2K−2. The photoelectric efficiency is 7.58%. The I-shaped thermocouple structure reduces contact resistance and increases the maximum power factor of the thermoelectricity. In practical use, this generator can power portable sensors.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Interfacing ferromagnetic materials with topological insulators is an intriguing strategy in order to enhance spin-to-charge conversion mechanisms, paving the way toward highly efficient spin-based electronic devices. In particular, the use of large-scale deposition techniques is demanding for a sustainable and cost-effective industrial technology transfer. In this work, we study the magnetic properties of the Co/Sb2Te3 heterostructure, where the ferromagnetic Co layer is deposited by atomic layer deposition on top of the Sb2Te3 topological insulator, which is grown by metal organic chemical vapor deposition. In particular, broadband ferromagnetic resonance is employed to characterize the Co/Sb2Te3 system and the reference Co/Pt heterostructure. For Co/Sb2Te3, we extract an effective magnetic anisotropy constant [Formula presented], which is an order of magnitude higher than in Co/Pt [Formula presented]. The large difference in the Keff values observed in Co/Sb2Te3 and Co/Pt is explained in terms of the different Co crystalline structures achieved on top of Sb2Te3 and Pt, respectively. Interestingly, the Co/Sb2Te3 system displays a relatively large Gilbert damping constant (α = 0.095), which we suggest as possibly due to spin pumping from the Co layer into the Sb2Te3 topological insulator.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The phase formation in the La-Zn-substituted M-type hexagonal ferrite series Sr1−xLaxFe12−yZnyO19 with 0 ≤ x ≤ 1 (x = y) and 0 ≤ x ≤ 0.5 (x ≥ y) was investigated. Single-phase ferrite compositions were obtained for x = y < 0.4. The lattice parameters of Sr1−xLaxFe12−yZnyO19 exhibit a linear variation with x, i.e. a0 slightly increases and c0 decreases with x. In addition, substituted ferrites with x > y were prepared as single phase materials for x ≤ 0.5. For those compositions with x > y ferrous ions are formed for charge compensation. The saturation magnetization at T = 4.2 K slightly increases with x to reach a maximum of 110 emu/g for x = y = 0.3. For fixed La-concentrations x (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.5) Ms increases with Zn-concentration y up to the ferrite composition at the maximum solid solubility limit ymax.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the magnetization in a ferromagnetic/antiferromagnetic Co/NiO bilayer from room temperature (RT) to 200 °C. Using polar magneto-optical Kerr effect (PMOKE) based magnetometry, we observe the temperature-induced spin reorientation transition of the Co layer at 150 °C (from out-of-plane to in-plane state). Zero field cooling (ZFC) down to RT leads to the appearance of a micrometer size domain structure and demagnetization of the sample. The remanence magnetization after the ZFC process strongly depends on the temperature from which the cooling process starts (onset temperature). The domain structure and its evolution under the external out-of-plane magnetic field were studied with magnetic force and PMOKE microscopies.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, Terfenol-D/epoxy particulate composites with low eddy current loss are prepared using the particle phosphatizing treatment method. A compound phosphate coating of Tb, Dy and Fe is present on the Terfenol-D particle surface after phosphatizing treatment, identified by surface morphology, composition and chemical status analyses. As a result, the DC resistivities increase by 2–3 orders of magnitude, and the interparticle eddy current loss of the particle phosphatized composites significantly decreases. Moreover, the magnetostriction of the particle phosphatized composites remains at the same level as those of the uncoated state. This research provides an approach to preparing Terfenol-D/epoxy magnetostrictive composites with low eddy current loss for high-frequency applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The present work aims to investigate the flow of a non-symmetric ferrofluid undergoing a uniform magnetic field in axial symmetry through both theoretical and experimental approaches. The magneto viscous effect is investigated for a fully developed laminar flow. The governing equations are made non-dimensional in order to identify the physical non-dimensional numbers such as the Péclet number, the particle volume fraction and the parameter of effective applied magnetic field. A regular perturbation method is used to obtain new asymptotic solutions on the limits of very low and very high Péclet numbers. Additionally, numerical integration of the equations system provides a solution for the entire range of Péclet. The magnetization profiles and more global quantities like wall viscosity and the relative viscosity are determined. The numerical and asymptotic solutions present an excellent agreement in the application range of the asymptotic solution. Finally, the magneto viscous effect in capillary flow is also determined through an experimental investigation, showing a very good agreement with the asymptotic solution corresponding to the limit of a low Péclet number.© 2020We systematically investigated the local crystallographic texture, magnetic domain structure, and the associated magnetic reversal process of different regions, namely fine-grain (FG), coarse-grain (CG), and large-grain (LG) regions in hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets. The FG region possesses the strongest (00 l) texture and plays a dominant role on the magnetic properties. In contrast, the CG region with partially aligned sub-micron grains and the LG region with randomly aligned micro-sized grains exhibit much weaker (00 l) texture, where the reversal magnetic domains primarily nucleate, deteriorating the remanence and the squareness of the demagnetization curve seriously. This finding highlights a new strategy to achieve high energy density in hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets, i.e. maximizing the volume fraction of highly (00 l) textured FG regions and reducing the undesirable CG and LG regions. Our further experiment enhancing the maximum energy product of the magnet from 42.6 to 51.1 MGOe through optimizing the microstructure homogeneity unambiguously demonstrates the general applicability of the strategy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The abnormal temperature characteristics of Hc in Alnico 8 alloys with thermomagnetic heat-treatment conditions are obtained at high temperature. The transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and Lorentz Fresnel images show that the a1 is the finite-nonlinear-dispersed magnetic nanoarray in spatial distribution. The angle dependence curves indicate the easy magnetization direction is still paralleled with the direction of columnar crystal growth and the magnetization reversal model is the incoherent rotation. Meanwhile the high temperature improves the magnetization reversal model from 30 °C to 240 °C and make it nearly steady above 240 °C. The reversal/irreversal reduced curves further reveal that improved magnetization reversal model makes a great effect on the magnetization reversal process. The B-H data and theoretical analysis illuminate that abnormal temperature characteristics of Hc from 30 °C to 240 °C primarily originates from the stronger effect of the improved magnetization reversal model.© 2020First principle calculations were performed to study the effect of Mn-Mn separation and hole carrier on magnetic properties of Li(ZnMn)As. The hole carrier was introduced by co-doping with Cu or C at the site of Zn or As, respectively. The results showed that Mn atoms preferred short-range antiferromagnetic stability for their superexchange interactions. The additional hole carrier induced the transition of ground states from antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic, which was benefit from the hole carrier-mediated double exchange and p-d exchange mechanisms. The values of energy difference exhibited plateau behavior with the Mn-Mn separation, indicating that hole carrier promoted long-range ferromagnetic stability, and ferromagnetic ordering of the system was enhanced by the increase of the hole carrier concentration.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, thermophysical properties of magnetic fluids mixing micrometer size spherical copper particles were investigated experimentally. To examine the behavior of dispersed micrometer size copper particles in the magnetized magnetic fluid, visualization experiments were performed by using a dark field microscope. From the visualization experiments, cluster formations of the copper particles in the magnetic field direction in the magnetic fluid under applied uniform magnetic field were observed. The thermal conductivity of the test fluid was measured by using the transient hot wire method. Thermal conductivity of the magnetic fluid with randomly dispersing copper particles is larger than the thermal conductivity of the base magnetic fluid. In case of the magnetic fluid mixed 12 vol% of spherical copper particles, it was estimated that the thermal conductivity in the field direction increases by 1.7 times or more of the thermal conductivity of the fluid in the absence of magnetic field. The Landau-Lifshitz equation for estimating the relationship between the thermal conductivity and the internal structure was expanded to consider spherical shape of the dispersed particles in the fluid and the particle distribution state was estimated by using the expanded Landau-Lifshitz equation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The spin chain oxide Ba4CoPt2O9+Δ gathers several features that make it close to a 1D Ising S = 1/2 system: (i) it contains only one type of spins, which are associated to a Kramers doublet with a substantial gap from the first excited state; (ii) these spins exhibit a pronounced uniaxial anisotropy; (iii) their easy-axis is perfectly oriented along the spin chain direction; (iv) the spin chains remain uncoupled down to at least 2 K. It is reported that the magnetic susceptibility, the isothermal magnetization and the specific heat in fields up to 9 T can be well accounted for by the theoretical predictions for 1D Ising S = 1/2 systems, yielding consistent set of values for the Landé factors and the intrachain coupling. The presence of missing spins associated to the oxygen overstoichiometry is taken into account, as well as the polycrystalline nature of the samples which requires to consider angular averages of the anisotropic physical properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present a simple, scalable, and low-cost route for producing aqueous colloids of nanometer size Fe cores coated with iron oxide and stabilized with sodium citrate. The Fe cores were obtained by mechanosynthesis by means of a highly exothermic solid-state reaction between FeCl3 and Mg, in a dispersive inert NaCl medium. The optimal experimental conditions for achieving a full reaction were determined with a Retsch 2000 oscillatory mill. Then the production yield was successfully 16-fold scaled using a rotatory Fritsch Pulverissete 7 mill. To provide biocompatibility and facilitate colloid stabilization, the Fe cores were coated with a Fe-oxide shell produced by chemical coprecipitation, and finally, the system Fe/FeOx was functionalized with sodium citrate in water. The so-obtained Fe/FeOx@Cit (4/3 < x < 3/2) nanoparticles have a mean size of about 11–12 nm, specific saturation magnetization around 130 Am2/kgFe and ζ -potential of −40 mV. The time dependence of the reaction progress could be described by a simple function of the mass ratio of milling balls to processed material and time. The resultant colloids are excellent candidates for biomedical and environmental remediation applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Electronic structure computations of pure Pd and Pd-based core–shell clusters were studied employing auxiliary density functional theory (ADFT). For this investigation icosahedral clusters with 13 and 55 atoms and octahedral clusters with 19 and 44 atoms were employed to analyze the change in the properties of the Pd and M@Pd core–shell clusters. All properties calculated for the M@Pd clusters are directly compared with the ones of pure palladium clusters. Spin multiplicities, spin magnetic moments, spin densities, binding energies per atom, segregation energies, and average bond lengths were calculated to understand their changes when varying the size, composition and shape of the M@Pd (M = Co, Ni, and Cu) core–shell clusters. The M1@Pd12 and M1@Pd18 (M = Co and Cu) clusters exhibit changes in the spin multiplicity and spin magnetic moment with respect to the Pd13 and Pd19 clusters, respectively, whereas the Ni1@Pd12 and Ni1@Pd18 clusters maintain the same properties as their pure Pd counterparts. The spin multiplicities and spin magnetic moments of the M6@Pd38 and M13@Pd42 (M = Co, Ni, and Cu) clusters greatly differ from their pure Pd counterparts. This study reveals that the Pd-Pd bond lengths are shorter in the M@Pd core–shell clusters compared to the ones of pure Pd clusters. This work demonstrates that the binding energy per atom of the M@Pd core–shell clusters is greater than the binding energy per atom of the pure Pd clusters. The calculated segregation energies indicate that 3d atoms prefer to be in the center of core–shell systems.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of a real system of magnetite nanoparticles with controlled interparticle distances via a silica shell are modeled by the modification of existing theoretical models that describe ideal non-interacting superparamagnetic systems. In this work, the variation of the blocking temperature as a function of the interparticle separation is explained through a phenomenological model where the interaction is taken into account through a dipolar field that modifies the intrinsic anisotropy field of the system. Moreover, it is observed that the field-dependent magnetization of the studied samples does not fulfill the universal scaling law of superparamagnetic systems, in which the magnetization is well described by the classic Langevin model, even for the less interacting samples. However, when the actual temperature of the system is modified by a temperature factor comprised by two terms that account for dipolar and anisotropy contributions, the magnetization curves satisfactorily comply with the scaling law. The results suggest that the interaction increases the anisotropy barrier and the developed approach allows to distinguish the effect of this contribution from the anisotropic contribution on the magnetic properties studied in this system. By means of this study it is demonstrated that models like the Interacting Superparamagnetic model must be carefully used to describe correctly a non-interacting system because the latter can account for a false interaction that is not present from blocking temperature measurements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Large magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy (MAE) is an important requirement for applications in spintronic devices. Here, we focus on layered cobalt oxyhalides Sr2CoO2X2 (X = Cl, Br) with unusual square planar coordination, which are naturally expected to possess a strong MAE. Based on density functional calculations, we find Co ions adopt a high spin state due to the large spin-exchange splitting and exhibit a sizable orbital moment of about 0.6 μB for both compounds. The in-plane nearest-neighbor exchange interaction J1 is antiferromagnetic coupling, and at least one order of magnitude stronger than other exchange interactions, which results in the observed G-type magnetic ground state. As expected, Sr2CoO2X2 have a giant MAE of about 13 meV per Co atom, and the magnetic moments prefer to lie in the ab plane, which is largely originated from the unique crystal field environment and could be explained by perturbation theory.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic glass state has been proposed and studied in the ferromagnetic (FM) compounds undergoing the first-order FM-antiferromagnetic (AFM) transition. In this work, we have unequivocally demonstrated the occurrence of magnetic-glass-like transition during the field cooling process in the ferrimagnetic (FIM) Mn1.975Cr0.025Sb alloy showing a first-order FIM-AFM transition. The magnetic, resistance and relaxation studies characterize the formation of a nonergodic magnetic glass-like state at low temperature arising from the coexistence of AFM and kinetically arrested FIM phases above a critical applied field. The magnetic field-temperature (μ0H-T) phase diagram based on magnetic and resistance measurements further evidences the generality of onset of glassy behavior in the first-order magnetic transition materials, in which the transition temperature shifts strongly with increasing applied field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nanostructured Fe-Co-Mn-Ti-B alloyed powder samples were prepared by mechanical alloying. The structural and magnetic properties are investigated by using x-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy, transmission electron microscopy, electron dispersive x-ray spectroscopy and also vibrating sample magnetometer. After 80 h of milling time, the grain size attains the lowest value about 30 nm. The coercivity values show almost an increasing trend up to ending stage of milling time. The magnetic characterizations of annealed milled sample for 100 h milling time at 900 °C demonstrate low coercivity (~33 Oe) and relatively high saturation magnetization (~138 emu/g) values.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization curve of the commercially available ferrofluid EMG909 is measured. It can adequately be described by a superposition of four Langevin terms. The effective dipole strength of the magnetic particles in this fluid is subsequently obtained by a graphical rectification of the magnetization curve based on the inverse Langevin function. The method yields the arithmetic and the harmonic mean of the magnetic moment distribution function, and a guess for the geometric mean and the relative standard deviation. It has the advantage that it does not require a prejudiced guess of the distribution function of the poly-disperse suspension of magnetic particles.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We study the electronic structure and magnetism of monolayer 3d transition-metal ditellurides MTe2 (M = Ti, V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co and Ni) in trigonal prismatic H- and/or octahedral T-phase by means of the first-principles calculations. The results show that H-VTe2, T-VTe2, H-FeTe2 and T-MnTe2 monolayers exhibit intrinsic ferromagnetism, and the others have no ferromagnetism. The exchange splitting of V, Mn and Fe 3d orbitals is responsible for ferromagnetism. The exchange constant and the Curie temperature are estimated by using 2D Ising model and mean field theory. Among the four ferromagnetic monolayers, the H-VTe2 monolayer has the largest exchange constant and the corresponding Curie temperature is near room temperature. Calculations also show that the T-VTe2, H-VTe2 and H-FeTe2 monolayers have in-plane easy magnetization direction, while the easy direction of the T-MnTe2 monolayer is perpendicular to the layer. Moreover, we analyze the relative exchange strength of the four ferromagnetic monolayers based on the competition between the through-bond ferromagnetic interaction and the through-space antiferromagnetic interaction according to the Goodenough–Kanamori rules. The magnetocrystalline anisotropy is explained qualitatively based on the second-order perturbation theory from the spin-orbit coupling between 3d orbitals of M atoms.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A study about coercivity as a function of the temperature is presented for nickel nanowires in porous alumina membranes. Changes in coercivity values in temperatures between 50 K and 300 K and results by X-ray diffraction (XRD) suggest that, the effects are motivated by the antiferromagnetic phase transition of small clusters of nickel oxide on the nanowires surface. This is supported by the temperature range at which the antiferromagnetic transition of NiO occurs and the possibility of interaction Ni/NiO by exchange coupling. The temperature value for spontaneous antiferromagnetic ordering of NiO, decreases with the diminution of the clusters size. The lower Néel temperature reported for these clusters is 50 K, which is in agreement with the coercivity diminution presented in the present paper. The effects of magnetostriction, magnetocrystalline anisotropy and dipolar interactions coexist with our proposal (local pinning due to exchange), giving a high complexity to the coercivity temperature behavior of these nanowires. Finally, our hypothesis was corroborated by the XRD analysis, confirming the existence of peaks belonging to the Ni and NiO phases.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The theoretical study considers chiral spin textures induced in a 2D electron gas (2DEG) by magnetic skyrmions. We calculate the electron gas spin density as a linear response to the exchange interaction between the 2DEG and the magnetization field of a magnetic skyrmion. Two physically distinct regimes occur. When the size of the skyrmion is larger than the inverse Fermi wavevector kF -1, the spin density response follows the magnetization profile of the skyrmion. In the opposite case of a small skyrmion the emerging spin structure of 2DEG has a characteristic size of kF -1 and the response becomes non-local, it can be viewed as chiral Friedel oscillations. At that, the emerging spin structure of the oscillations appears to be more complex than that of the skyrmion itself.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The paper re-examines the use of physical Cauer circuits (CCs) for modeling magnetization processes in a ferromagnetic lamination and in a hollow thick-wall cylinder taking into account magnetic nonlinearity of their materials. The saturation is shown to be the main reason for the absence of conventional skin effect inherited from the linear eddy-current theory. It is shown that flux densities in the outer and inner layers of a lamination become comparable in magnitude when the material is operated at moderate and high average flux densities. In this typical case and contrary to common practice, there is no need to use CCs with non-uniformly discretized sections. It is shown that simple uniform CCs can be more accurate than circuits obtained using non-uniform discretization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Double perovskite Bi2FeMnO6 (BFMO) oxides are promising candidate for single-phase multiferroic system. However, up to date only a limited works are carried out to synthesize the BFMO ceramics, and most of them have the issues of impure phases. In this work, we report on the structural, dielectric, magnetic, and optical properties of single-phase BFMO ceramics synthesized by solid-state reaction method. The BFMO ceramics crystallized in a rhombohedral structure with R3c space group, and their grains exhibited polyhedron morphology with average size of 15.0 µm. X-ray energy dispersive spectroscopy revealed the ceramic grains with atomic ratio of Bi:Fe:Mn equal to 2.0:1.16:0.90. XPS spectra of Fe 2p and Mn 2p core levels confirm the mixed chemical valence states of Fe (Fe2+ and Fe3+) and Mn (Mn3+ and Mn4+) in the BFMO ceramics. O 1s XPS spectra reveal the oxygen existing in the forms of lattice oxygen and oxygen vacancies while bismuth is present as Bi3+. Dielectric measurements demonstrate that the BFMO ceramics have much high dielectric constant (in the order of 104) in the frequency below 102 Hz but decrease fast with increasing the frequency. The same phenomenon appeared for the dielectric loss. A dielectric relaxation behavior with activation energy of 0.34 eV was observed in the BFMO ceramics, which was due to the thermal motion of the oxygen vacancies. The BFMO ceramics exhibit antiferromagnetic nature but a weak ferromagnetic behavior at 2 K. Sharp cusp peaks were observed in the zero-field-cooling (ZFC) curves and bifurcations between the field-cooling (FC) and ZFC curves were observed. Both of them shifted to low temperature as increasing the external applied magnetic field, indicating a spin-glass like behavior in the system. UV–Vis absorption spectra demonstrated a broad absorption peak in the wavelength range of 300–800 nm and a direct optical band gap of ~1.23 eV for the BFMO ceramics. Such narrow optical band gap as well as the high dielectric constant at room temperature enable the BFMO ceramics to be promising candidate used for solar cells, sensors, bolometer and optoelectronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The Co2FeSn full Heusler alloy nanoparticles were synthesized using co-precipitation method. The as-prepared sample was annealed at various temperatures (700 °C, 750 °C, 800 °C, 850 °C, and 900 °C) for 5hrs in N2 gas atmosphere. The formation of fcc superlattice in L21 disorder structure of the synthesized Heusler alloy was confirmed using x-ray diffraction pattern. The calculated average grain size of prepared Co2FeSn Heusler alloy nanoparticles using Scherrer's formula was found to be 13 nm. Interpretation of the result obtained, From the VSM measurement, the coercitivity was found to be low (Hc = 340 Oe) indicating the soft ferromagnetic property of the produced alloy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A three-dimensional (3D) framework of covalently-bonded layers of bimetallic inorganic oxide, CuMoO4, interlinked by electron-rich organic ligands, which is semiconducting and also ferromagnetic, has been prepared. The structure [Cu(3,8-phenanthroline)0.5MoO4] consists of molybdate tetrahedra corner-shared with clusters of edge-sharing {CuO5N} octahedra. The injection of charge carriers into the inorganic layers by phenanthroline induces different magnetic orderings at different temperatures, orderings which are not found in the structurally-similar [Cu(4,4ʹ-bipyridine)0.5MoO4]. The temperature dependence of the susceptibility shows two low temperature magnetic transitions: weakly ferromagnetic-coupled spins below 15 K coexisting with an antiferromagnetic structure below 10 K. Specific heat capacity shows a finite ground-state electronic specific heat coefficient, γ = 0.094 J/mol·K2, that is higher than that of the bipyridine counterpart (0.068 J/mol·K2), confirming an increase in the electronic density-of-states in the phenanthroline system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Amorphous ferromagnetic Fe-based microwires (MWs) have a magnetic structure consisting mainly of a single longitudinal domain and small closure domains at both ends. A rectangular hysteresis loop is then observed according to the fast domain wall propagation along the microwire. This type of material is a good physical example of the idea of a magnetic relay hysteron as described in Preisach model of hysteresis. The hysteron was defined as a mathematical operator acting on the field and producing rectangular loops whose superposition gives out the hysteresis loop. The hysteron idealization is frequently used to describe and interpret FORC (First Order Reversal Curve) diagrams by comparison with Preisach plane. The central idea of this work is to study the FORCs of a real physical sample that behaves closely to the ideal hysteron, both isolated and interacting with a twofold aim. On one hand, providing a better understanding of FORC measurements, and, on the other, analyzing the magnetization reversal processes in microwires with rectangular hysteresis loops. While for a single microwire the behaviour is that expected for a hysteron, both in the hysteresis loop and in the FORC diagram, the magnetostatic interaction between two microwires breaks with the ideal behaviour due to the change in the domain wall mobility at the end of the wires.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The rotational relaxations exist in magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) exposed to AC excitation magnetic field, including Brownian rotational relaxation and Neel rotational relaxation. The magnetization of MNPs exposed in AC magnetic field may be affected by rotational relaxation (Brownian relaxation play a dominated role when frequency is less than 1 kHz), and phase lag of magnetization harmonics are existed. In this paper, we employ a Fokker-Planck Equation, which describe accurately AC magnetization dynamic (dominated by Brownian rotational relaxation), analyze the difference of AC magnetization based on Fokker-Planck Equation and Langevin Function, study magnetization harmonic and phase lag dependence on Brownian rotational relaxation, impose a simple, empirical harmonic model. The simulation and experiment results show that the harmonic model can describe accurately AC magnetization when the Brownian rotational relaxation is dominated in MNPs. It is expected to be useful for improving MPI and MNPT.© 2020The crystal and magnetic structures of the frustrated Co3O4 spinel oxide have been studied by means of neutron diffraction at high pressures up to 8.7 GPa in the temperature range 5–300 K. At ambient pressure, a coexistence of the long range ordered antiferromagnetic (AFM) phase and short range disordered phase below TN = 33 K was observed. At pressures above 2 GPa, a suppression of the magnetically disordered phase and stabilization of the AFM phase, characterized by rapid increase of the Néel temperature in 1.5 times from 33 to 51 K with a pressure coefficient dTN/dP = 2.1 K/GPa occur. The observed phenomena are analyzed in terms of the competing nearest neighbor and next nearest neighbor magnetic interactions. In addition to the A-O-B-O-A nearest neighbor superexchange, an important role of the A-O-O-A next nearest neighbor superexchange interactions in magnetic behavior of Co3O4 is pointed out.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A new equiatomic quarternary Heusler compound TiZrMnAl has been theoretically predicted. Two possible structural configurations are considered under the site preference rule and their equilibrium lattices have been derived. Electronic band structures identify TiZrMnAl compound as the spin gapless semiconductors in both two structure types. The total magnetic moments of TiZrMnAl are both equal to zero with the partial moments of Ti and Zr antiparallelly aligned to that of Mn. This integral value of total moment follows the Slater-Pauling rule in the form of Mt = Zt − 18, where Mt represents the total magnetic moment and Zt is the total number of valence electrons. The mechanical and dynamic stabilities of TiZrMnAl have also been validated and strong elastic anisotropy is further revealed with the calculated directional dependent Young's modulus and shear modulus for both structures. Besides, the effect of random swap disorder between Ti and Zr atoms has been examined and it is found that through the whole swap range, TiZrMnAl maintains its fully compensated spin gapless semiconductivity, which is a very good property for possible applications in spintronic devices. Lastly, the uniform and tetragonal strains have been accessed and their effects on the electronic and magnetic properties have been studied. This systematic study can provide a comprehensive reference for the further development of Ti and Zr based quarternay Heusler compounds and even inspire other relative studies for the exploration of new spin gapless semiconductors.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report an unusual angular dependent magnetoresistance (ADMR) in single-crystalline Co films grown on Al2O3(0 0 0 1). The Co film with a thickness of 4.4 nm shows nearly zero anisotropic magnetoresistance for arbitrary magnetization orientations, and the sign of the ADMR reverses with changing Co thickness. By systematically measuring the Co-thickness-dependent anisotropic conductance in single-crystal Co/Pt, Pt/Co, and Pt/Co/Pt, we reveal that the ADMR of the Co layer grown on the Pt underlayer is significantly different from that of the Co layer grown on Al2O3(0 0 0 1). Our results suggest that the transport properties of the Co layer as a function of Pt thickness must be considered in order to better understand the spin Hall magnetoresistance in the Co/Pt bilayer.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The features of spin wave processes in a layered structure based on two magnonic crystals (MC-1 and MC-2) separated by a dielectric layer have been studied theoretically and experimentally at different levels of input power. The theoretical model has been developed for the cases of magnetic field oriented in-plane and out-of-plane to MC surfaces in order to identify the mechanisms of nonlinear interactions. Two types of nonlinear switching are implemented in the structure MC-1/MC-2 with increasing input power. Depending on parameters of the structure the input signal can exit from three (“double nonlinear switching”) or two (“single nonlinear switching”) outputs. This feature allows to consider MC-1/MC-2 structure as a basic element in a multifunctional device for the spatial separation of signals with different power levels.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A B-site disordered double perovskite La2CrNiO6 is synthesized by citrate-gel combustion method. The material is showing an orthorhombic Pbnm crystal structure which doesn't change upon cooling to 15 K and with an applied field of 50 kOe. Upon cooling from room-temperature to 15 K, a nearly linear dependence in the volume of the crystal structure with temperature is observed until 100 K, which is around the ferrimagnetic transition temperature of the material. The disordered Cr and Mn introduced inhomogeneous magnetic interactions, leading to Griffiths-like phase (GP) and spin glass state in the material. The material shows an exchange bias effect, owing to the GP and spin glass state. Mott's variable range hopping is the conduction mechanism of the insulating disordered double perovskite La2CrNiO6.© 2020 Elsevier LtdJunctionless Transistors (JL) and One-Transistor (1T) DRAMs are concepts that come out in order to improve the scalability of logic and volatile memories, respectively. In some recent papers, Floating Body (FB) DRAMs (a class of 1T-DRAM) and JL transistors have been joined in order to propose a solution to overcome the scaling limit of the conventional 1T-1C DRAM cells. In this paper they are discussed in detail the physics of operation and the performances of FB-DRAM cells based on JL transistors including the effect of Trap-Assisted-Tunneling (TAT), neglected in most of previous works. As expected, TAT severely limits the retention time due to the large doping, in particular during HOLD operation. The discussion is supported by 2D device simulation on a double gate junctionless transistor including the effect of statistical variability induced by random dopant fluctuations, and the technology (bandgap, lifetime) scaling. It is found that the cell, at least at the nanoscale, can work only by independent gate operation, having maximum performance when the bottom gate works at the limit of the BBT bias region during READ, and that at a gate length as large as 100 nm and fin width of 10 nm the cell can sustain the high doping induced variability to a retention time in the order of 1 ms, while the use of materials with higher bandgap (~1.3 eV) than Silicon can improve the retention time to the order of 10 ms. However several concerns remain on their actual use related to the necessary bias level and to the impact of the actual technologies on the lifetime, which strongly affects TAT degradation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanotubes have been widely studied because they are promising candidates to be part of devices based on spintronic and magnonic technologies. However, the experimental techniques used to prepare such structures cannot guarantee the generation of perfect elements, and some geometric imperfections can appear. In this direction, the existence of a bent in a nanotube could change the magnetic properties of a device. In this work, we analyze the influence of curvature on the magnetic properties of a bent nanotube. Our results show a strong dependence of the magnetization ground state on the curvature, the thickness, and the length of the bent nanotubes. Also, we obtained the critical thickness where the transition from the so-called in-surface to the vortex state occurs. For thick tubes, we observe the in-surface state, and for thin structures, the vortex configuration is the lowest energy state. These results could be useful for the development of magnetic devices with bent nanotubes.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe impact of channel flattening process, dozen digital etching (DDE), which is several dozen cyclic treatments of plasma oxidation and oxide wet etching, on device performance and reliability of Ge(1 0 0) nMOSFETs has been systematically investigated. It was found that DDE improves not only electron mobility but also Positive Bias Temperature Instability (PBTI). The PBTI degradation was found related to the pre-existing bulk traps inside gate stack instead of interfacial traps generation. DDE is considered a promising technique for constructing ultra-scaled Ge 3D channel architecture such as nanowire or nanosheet for high performance CMOS devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Two different sets of multiferroic nanocomposites i.e., (1-x)Bi0.85La0.15FeO3-(x)BaFe12O19 with x = 0.00, 0.05, 0.10, 0.20, 0.30, 0.40, 0.50 and 1.00 have been synthesized by the solid-state reaction method and high energy planetary ball mill techniques. The peaks in the XRD patterns can be indexed to R3c crystal symmetry of Bi0.85La0.15FeO3 and P63/mmc crystal symmetry of BaFe12O19. It suggests the absence of any major chemical reaction between the two phases. Moreover, it is assumed thatBi0.85La0.15FeO3 and BaFe12O19 crystal symmetries are present in the composite independently. Magnetic properties have been improved significantly due to the incorporation of BaFe12O19 in the composites. Vegard's law suggests that the experimentally observed magnetizations are higher than that of theoretically calculated value. The difference between the theoretical and experimental magnetization as well as the anomaly in the magnetic hysteresis have been explained by considering the magnetic interaction correlation length between Bi0.85La0.15FeO3 and BaFe12O19 magnetic phases. The hysteresis loop width (ΔH) versus M plots has been introduced to understand the magnetic interaction (exchange bias) between Bi0.85La0.15FeO3 and BaFe12O19. Magnetocrystalline anisotropy increases with the increase in the percentage of BaFe12O19 in the composite.© 2020 Elsevier LtdConductivity and work function of the conductive polymer, poly(3,4-ethylenedioxythiophene)-poly(styrenesulfonate) (PEDOT:PSS), has been investigated for a top electrode of the solution-processed organic solar cells (OPV). It has been found that both conductivity and work function could be changed by adjusting the mixing ratio of different commercial grade PEDOT:PSS such as PH 1000 and AI 4083. A 2:1 vol ratio of PH 1000 and AI 4083 mixture provided the conductivity of 443 S/cm (corresponding sheet resistance (Rsh) of 260 Ω/sq) and the work function of 5.09 eV. Therefore, this PEDOT:PSS mixture may work as both a hole transport layer (HTL) and anode electrode of the OPV. For verifying, all-solution-processed bulk heterojunction (BHJ) inverted OPVs were fabricated using developed PEDOT:PSS conductive polymers as both HTL and anode top electrode. Under the AM1.5G spectrum calibrated 100 mW/cm2 illumination, fabricated all-solution-processed OPV provides a best photo-conversion efficiency (PCE) of 2.04% accounted from an open circuit voltage (Voc) of 576 mV, a short circuit current (Jsc) of 6.91 mA/cm2, and a fill factor (FF) of 51.2%. In addition, the final OPV exhibits semitransparency due to no metal electrode on top and transparency of the conductive polymer.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The common approach to create a uniform magnetic field in the μT range is placing a coil set inside a magnetic shield. One of the main obstacles to achieving the requested uniformity can be a field distortion caused by the shield. We derive an approximate expression for the magnetic field generated by circular coils enclosed in ferromagnetic cylinders, the most used shield geometry. The main advantage of the expression over the known approximation is considering the finite permeability and the finite thickness of the cylindrical shield. To model the cylinder end caps, we propose the finite thickness mirror method, which extends the method of mirror image to the case of finite thickness. The cylinder barrel is modeled as an infinite tube and its effect on the field is analytically solved. The error of the expression and its dependency on the observation point and the shield geometry are discussed. Compared with finite-element simulations our analytic method is consistent within a relative error of less than 0.3% for practical shielding setups. The expression enables the rapid optimization of shield-coupled coil sets with a custom-designed objective function. To show the applicability of our method, we present simulations for the direct selection of the optimum spacing of a coil pair to match the given dimensions of a cylindrical shield.© 2020 Elsevier LtdWe present experimental results for junctionless nanowire transistors (JNTs) with different gate alignments to the nanowire. Devices with nanowire source/drain extensions (NSDE) show high series source/drain resistance due to the low doped nanowire extensions, which causes lower drive current and larger device performance variations comparing with devices in which the gate electrode overlaps with the source/drain contact pads (GSD). Due to the improved on-current GSD devices exhibit much higher cutoff frequency. The high fringing field in the NSDE JNT results in degradation of SS. An optimized “dumbbell” shape JNT structure is proposed to further improve the device performance. Our preliminary simulations demonstrate higher on-currents but also larger parasitic capacitances for the dumbbell JNT. However, the RF performance of the dumbbell JNT is still improved with a factor similar to our experiments. Much smaller fringing field for the dumbbell JNT is expected from the simulation, which can cause less device variations.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Temperature-dependent electrical resistivity [ρ(T)] of Mn site doped La0.5Ca0.5Mn1−xMoxO3 (x = 0.03 and 0.05) manganites are measured under various hydrostatic pressures. At ambient pressure, x = 0.03 and 0.05 samples exhibit insulating to metallic transition (TIM) at 72 K (81 K) and 89 K (101 K) during cooling (warming) cycles. The differences between TIM’s of cooling and warming cycles shows hysteresis in ρ(T), and suggests the presence of first-order transition in both samples. The application of external pressure reduces the magnitude of resistivity, whereas it increases TIM of both samples. At the same time, the width of the hysteresis has reduced by the pressure, and get suppressed at 2.65 GPa and 2.54 GPa for 0.03 and 0.05 samples respectively. It indicates the change of first-order to second-order phase transition under pressure in both samples. ρ(T) under various pressures are separately analyzed with respect to TIM. In the insulating region (above TIM), pressure reduces the activation energy but increases the density of states at the Fermi level. In the metallic region (below TIM), pressure reduces various scattering factors between subatomic particles. Hence, metallicity of both samples is enhanced under pressure. First principles calculations are performed with various pressure region, and this study validates the experimental observation of pressure-enhanced conductivity in La0.5Ca0.5Mn1−xMoxO3 (x = 0.03 and 0.05) systems.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We studied effect of viscosity on harmonic signals of magnetic nanoparticles (MNP). Harmonic signals are measured when an excitation field with amplitude (~3 mT) and frequency (~10 kHz) is applied, where the relaxation mechanism of the used MNP is affected by the coexistence of Brownian and Néel processes. Viscosity dependence of amplitude and phase of fundamental, third and fifth harmonics are measured when viscosity changed from 0.89 mPa·s to 12.6 mPa·s. The measured viscosity dependences are discussed in terms of field dependent relaxation time of MNP. We also discuss a method to determine temperature and viscosity from the measured harmonic signals.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the framework of piezoelectric/ferromagnetic patterned heterostructures, the purpose of this work is to electrically control the magnetic properties by tuning the morphology, especially by modifying the magnetic shape anisotropy through patterned strain. We have thus designed and studied a heterostructure with bottom nano-striped and top full film electrodes. ZnO piezoelectric and CoFeB magnetic materials were chosen to respond at critical criteria of its geometry. In addition, numerical simulations and magnetostatic calculations were performed to understand the reproduction of the pattern across the multiferroic heterostructure. Calculations have shown that the geometry of the heterostructure presents strict constraints, as for instance the distance between stripes versus the piezoelectric thickness. This study is a preliminary step towards reversible patterning of magnetic properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We study the dynamics of one-magnon states coupled to the underlying harmonic oscillations of a linear lattice. We consider that small amplitude oscillations affect linearly the exchange couplings. Within an adiabatic approximation, the magnon dynamics is governed by an effective modified nonlinear Schrödinger equation. We provide a detailed numerical study of the magnon self-trapping transition. We accurately determine the critical nonlinearity χc above which a finite fraction of an initially localized spin excitation remains trapped. To this end, we analyze relevant quantities such as the return probability, participation number and Shannon entropy. We also follow the soliton dynamics showing that its velocity vanishes as v∝(χc-χ)1/2. The return probability is shown to be discontinuous at χc while the participation number displays a kink singularity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we used the ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) technique to measure the contributions for the magnetic relaxation in Y3Fe5O12 textured films deposited onto (001) Gd3Ga5O12 by magnetron sputtering. Through the numerical fitting of the angular dependence of the in-plane FMR linewidth measurements we identified the contribution of the Gilbert, two-magnon and mosaicity relaxation mechanisms. Regarding to the line broadening due to two-magnon mechanism, we interpreted it as a result of rectangular defects distributed over the film plane. The overall defects were decomposed into three crystallography direction chosen according to the in-plane FMR resonance field experimental results. We observed the two-magnon scattering rate being relevant for YIG thickness below 150 nm. Although it is also present for thicker samples, the Gilbert mechanism dominates with mosaicity being very important to corroborate the shape of the angular dependence, but with small amplitude. We point out the relevance of our finding regarding two-magnon scattering effect in YIG thin films, directly impacting in an overestimation of the spin pumping contribution to the FMR line broadening in YIG/ heavy-metal systems.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.La3+ ion doped in nickel nanoferrite with different compositions were prepared by sol-gel route and characterized by different techniques. La3+ ions substitution induces dislocation and deformity in lattice to soften the lattice. XRD patterns confirmed the polycrystalline nature of nanoparticles with no extra phase as per JCPDS card no. 071–1232 with increase in lattice constants on substitution of larger ionic radii La3+ ions at Fe3+ sites. ν1 Fe-O stretched vibrations of A- (Tetrahedral) and ν2 Fe-O of B- (Octahedral) complexes are observed at 598 cm−1 and 419 cm−1 respectively in IR transmission graphs. The broadening of both stretching vibrational modes with La3+ ion content is attributed to the reduction in grain size arising from the lattice distortion by cation distribution, interactions among nanoparticles and La3+ ion concentration. On increasing La3+ ion concentration, the variations in the intensity of ν1band are more pronounced as compared to ν2band which confirms the preferred substitution of La3+ ion at octahedral site by expanding the B-site radii. FESEM micrographs exhibit the homogeneous and agglomerated nanoparticles pattern of these doped analogues. EPR spectra exhibit broad ferromagnetic signal with no characteristic peak of SPM feature. The peak to peak line width and g-value increases on increasing La3+ ion concentration in samples. These morphological and magnetic properties can be exploited for their use in the development of stable ferrofluid for heat sink application and as sensing electrode in chemical/bio sensors.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this article we analyze by modeling two possible mechanisms for magnetization switching using spin orbit torques, which have been reported to cause field-free deterministic switching in experiments. Here we compare the field-free magnetization switching due to a tilt of the anisotropy direction against the use of an antiferromagnetic bias field. Simple results obtained analytically show that a bias field not only causes the magnetization reversal but also reduces the corresponding energy barrier. The critical current required for magnetization switching is analyzed on the basis of a macrospin model. It is shown that although the field-free deterministic switching caused by a tilt of the anisotropy is more robust than the bias field in the development of memory elements, a compromise between requirements has to be adopted when selecting the parameters for specific applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.High efficient nonmagnetic materials for generating and detecting spin currents are extremely sought after for prospective spintronic devices. We investigate the spin pumping and inverse spin Hall effects (ISHE) in Y3Fe5O12 (YIG)/ Pt1-xSnx (x = 0.06, 0.11, 0.17, 0.23, 0.28) bilayer using a coplanar waveguide based broadband ferromagnetic resonance setup. We find that the measured effective spin mixing conductance geff ↑↓ and spin Hall angle θSH strongly correlate with the Sn content. A large spin Hall angle θSH = 0.089 ± 0.001 is obtained in a Pt0.77Sn0.23 alloy film while θSH = 0.055 ± 0.001 in pure Pt thin film under the same conditions. This enhancement of spin Hall angle is due to skew scattering from the Sn impurities resulting from spin-orbit interaction. Meanwhile, the spin Hall (SH) resistivity of the spin current induced by Sn impurities in Pt has been revealed. The SH resistivity of Pt1-xSnx remain pretty low values (0.17–1.1 × 10−9 Ω⋅m), which are promising for construct high-speed spintronic devices exploiting the spin Hall effect.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper introduces and investigates the dynamics of a thin magnetostrictive actuator with quintic nonlinearity. The energy balance method is used to carry out the motion equation of the system. The analytical solutions and amplitude responses of the system are exanimated using the multiple time scale method. The dynamical behavior of the system is explored with the help of common nonlinear tools such as bifurcation diagrams with Lyapunov exponents, time series plots, phase portraits and basin of attraction. The bifurcation diagrams reveal that the system under study exhibits complicated dynamics including crisis route to chaos, multistability and antimonotonicity. To validate the theoretical and numerical analyses, an electronic circuit capable to describe the dynamics of the system is designed and implemented in PSpice software. A very good agreement is observed between PSpice based circuit simulations and theoretical/numerical results.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The purpose of the research is the construction of the analytical model for description of a number of topological objects in a two-sublattice antiferromagnet with uniaxial magnetic anisotropy and Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) including vortices, antivortices, skyrmions, antiskyrmions, skyrmioniums and their bound states, which are the exact dynamic solutions of the nonlinear Landau-Lifshitz equations. “Relativistic contraction” of skyrmion-like topological object size in the direction of motion is demonstrated for “subcritical” case when its velocity is less than spin wave velocity in antiferromagnet. Lorentz-like “supercritical” transformation are found for skyrmion-like magnetic structures moving with velocity greater than spin wave velocity in antiferromagnet. In particular, the results of the analytical model are applied for an antiferromagnet in the form of cylindrical nanoshell; in this case, there are more than one solution of the nonlinear Landau-Lifshitz equations for the same boundary and initial conditions. It means that vortices, skyrmions, skyrmioniums and their bound states represent the ground state and the excited states in an antiferromagnetic cylindrical nanoshell. The particular cases of the exact static solutions of the nonlinear Landau-Lifshitz equations include the well-known one-dimensional solutions such as Bloch domain, Neel domain wall, Shirobokov domain structure, antiferromagnetic vortices, two-dimensional Belavin-Polyakov soliton, three-dimensional Hodenkov soliton and target type soliton. The results of this paper can be used for further development of theory of the antiferromagnetic soliton and skyrmion physics. Besides, the exact dynamic solutions of the nonlinear Landau-Lifshitz equations can serve as the reference solutions for testing the results of micromagnetic simulations.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This note is to correct a typographical error in proofreading the paper “A new high temperature magnetic oscillation in the Group VI Dichalcogenides”, NJM Horing, J. Magnetism and Magnetic Materials 499 (2020) 166026. A factor of the fugacity ([Formula presented]) was inadvertently omitted on the right hand sides of Eqs. (8) and (9), which are now correctly given as [Formula presented] and [Formula presented] Notwithstanding these corrections, all the other equations and results of the paper are correct as originally presented, including the finding of a new high temperature magnetic oscillation in the Group VI Dichalcogenides. Declaration of Competing Interest. The authors declare that they have no known competing financial interests or personal relationships that could have appeared to influence the work reported in this paper.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The solid-state reaction method was used to fabricate Pr0.65Ca0.25X0.1MnO3 manganite compounds with X = Cd, Sr, and Pb. X-ray diffraction (XRD), magnetometry, and impedance spectrosco py technique are used to study the structural, magnetic, electrical, and dielectric properties. The X-ray diffraction reveals that all samples crystallize in the orthorhombic system. The magnetic measurements on all samples show the presence of charge ordering transition at high temperature followed by an antiferromagnetic transition. From dc-conductivity analysis, all samples display the presence of semiconductor behavior. It is observed that the lowest obtained value of the activation energy (Ea) corresponds to the Pb-doped sample. The activation energy deduced from the dc-conductivity (Ea)σ matches very well with that estimated from relaxation time (Ea)relax, indicating that the relaxation process and the electrical conduction are related to the same origin. For each X dopant, the ac-conductivity is obeyed to the Jonsher law. The analysis of the impedance spectra highlights the presence of non-Debye relaxation phenomenon. Dielectric results show that the Pb doped sample has better dielectric properties than Cd and Sr doped ones. The dielectric properties are strongly dependent on both temperature and frequency. Dielectric constants decrease with frequency, and their behaviors have been interpreted based on space charge polarization according to Maxwell-Wagner's two-layer model. The observed high conductivity and high dielectric permittivity values suggest that our compounds may be suitable for applications in electronic devices.© 2020We report a theoretical study of microstructure, magnetic properties, and their relationship in relatively concentrated Fe-Cr alloys in both Fe- and Cr-rich regions. Annealing of initially random systems at 500 °C for times of the order of 106 s substantially changes their microstructure. In both systems, solute atoms form clusters with their sizes increasing with time according to power law, with exponent being close to 0.2. For the Fe-32 at. % Cr alloy, magnetization and the Curie temperature increase with increasing annealing time and cluster size. At large simulation times, the Curie temperature approaches its value for Fe-15 at. % Cr, the concentration of completely phase-separated iron-rich alloy. For the Cr-25 at. % Fe alloy, precipitation also results in an increase of magnetization and the Curie temperature, although characteristic times are about one order of magnitude greater.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The method of searching for the profiles of the gradient dependence of the material parameters of matter on the coordinates that allow the exact solution of wave equations, developed previously for electromagnetic and elastic waves, was generalized to spin waves in gradient ferromagnets. Such profiles were found and exact solutions of the wave equations for a ferromagnet with uniaxial magnetic anisotropy β(z) or exchange α(z) varying in space were obtained. The obtained solutions were used to develop the theory of spin-wave resonance in gradient thin magnetic films. The dependences of the eigenfunctions mn(z), the frequencies of the discrete spectrum ωn, and the high-frequency susceptibility χn on the number of spectral levels n were found. The cardinal differences between the spin-wave spectra of films with gradients β(z) and α(z) are shown. The variable anisotropy β(z) changes the shape of the energy potential of the magnetic film and leads to a change in the discrete spectrum for frequencies ωn(n) lower than the frequency of the gradient potential well or potential barrier ωc. The variable exchange α(z) does not change the shape of the energy potential. Spin-wave oscillations occur in a rectangular potential well created by the surfaces of the film, regardless of profile α(z). The discrete frequency spectrum ωn(n) is quadratic on n, or has negligible deviations from the quadratic, for all n. An analytical expression for the effective exchange parameter is obtained. Exact solutions of the Schrödinger equation with spatially dependent effective mass m(z) were found for the profile of m(z) inverse to the function of α(z).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A systematic magnetic study of the double perovskite oxide Y2CoMnO6 (YCMO) has been performed. A monoclinic P21/n phase of YCMO was synthesized using a sol-gel method. Neutron diffraction (ND) measurements evidence the onset of long-range ferromagnetic (FM) ordering at TC ~ 76 K, which persists down to 5 K. The presence of 25% antisite disorder, estimated from the ND data, leads to the appearance of short-range antiferromagnetic (AFM) interactions. The existence of thermal hysteresis due to competing interactions between FM and AFM phases is observed in the M vs. T measurements. The pinning of magnetic domain walls at the Co/Mn antiphase boundaries results in a metamagnetic-like behavior. The field dependence of thermomagnetic irreversibility and the nature of virgin curves indicate the occurrence of a kinetic arrest phenomenon, which is further verified via cooling and heating of the system in an unequal fields (CHUF) protocol. In full agreement with the ND data, a detailed analysis of critical exponents near the paramagnetic (PM)-FM phase transition also establishes YCMO as a long-range interacting mean-field system. A careful examination of the temperature- and field-dependent magnetic entropy change yields an in-depth understanding of coexisting magnetically ordered and disordered phases in YCMO, leading to a comprehensive magnetic phase diagram of this multifunctional double perovskite system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we study the phase diagram of a frustrated Heisenberg model with the additional next nearest neighbor four-spin interaction accounting for the spin–lattice coupling in order to understand the magnetism of iron tellurium. The experimentally identified bicollinear ground state that is always degenerate with the plaquette state in any Heisenberg-biquadratic models [Glasbrenner et al., Nat. Phys. 11, 953 (2015)] and the first-order phase transition are well reproduced, strongly confirming the essential role of the four-spin interaction related to the spin–lattice coupling [Bishop, Moreo, and Dagotto, Phys. Rev. Lett. 117, 117201 (2016)] in explaining the magnetic properties of iron tellurium. Moreover, based on the linear spin-wave theory, specific magnetic excitation in strained iron tellurium is predicted, appealing for experimental verification.© 2020The dependences of static and dynamic magnetic properties on both substrate deposition temperature (TS) and film-thickness (d) for (FeCo)-(AlSi) alloy thin films are discussed in conjunction with structure. The samples of a multi layered type (FeCo)-(AlSi) alloy thin films were fabricated at Ts by DC sputter-deposition onto (1 0 0) MgO substrates by using two targets of Fe75Co25 and Al50Si50. For the first time, the DO3 phase in the quaternary alloy films are realized for TS at around 400 ℃ with d larger than 25 nm. The order parameter (S) was estimated by taking into account crystal structure factor, absorption factor, multiplicity factor, temperature factor, and Lorentz polarization factor. It is found that S increases with d, becoming nearly 1 for d larger than 50 nm. Observations by high resolution transmission electron microscopy support this result. The coercivity (Hc) and effective damping parameter (αeff) decrease with increasing d and remain nearly constant, approximately 4 Oe and 5 × 10−3, respectively. The result that HC decreases with increasing S suggests that (FeCo)-(AlSi) thin films with the DO3 phase are an attractive candidate for future high frequency device applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Epitaxial La0.67Sr0.33MnO3 thin films play important roles in several applications due to their half-metallic conductivity and high spin polarization. Since these properties are very sensitive to minor structural changes arising from slightly different growing conditions it is important to understand their effect on the electronic and magnetic properties of the resulting samples. Here, we study two sets of La0.67Sr0.33MnO3 thin films, thicker (90 nm) and thinner (7 nm) ones, focusing on the influence of laser fluence and post-annealing oxygen partial pressure on their electronic structure and magnetism. Regardless of the preparation conditions, the thicker films present a tensile strain that leads to MnO6 octahedral deformation as detected by Raman active modes. The thinner films exhibit sizable in-plane magnetic anisotropy which depends on the sample preparation that leads to distinct surface morphology and electronic properties (Mn4+/Mn3+ ratio).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Low temperature Mössbauer spectroscopic and magnetization measurements were performed on a crystalline sample of Fe-gluconate. Fe atoms were revealed to exist in two “phases” i.e. a major (~90–94%) and a minor (~6–10%). Based on values of spectral parameters the former can be regarded as ferrous and the latter as ferric ions. A sub spectrum associated with the ferric “phase” shows a significant broadening below ~30 K corresponding to ~7.5 kGs. A magnetic origin of the effect was confirmed by the magnetization measurements. Evidence on the effect of the magnetism on the lattice vibrations of Fe atoms in both “phases” was found. The Debye temperature, TD, associated with the vibrations of Fe2+ ions is by a factor of ~2 smaller in the temperature range below ~30 K than the one determined from the data measured above ~30 K. Interestingly, the TD-value found for the Fe3+ ions from the data recorded below ~30 K is about two times smaller than the corresponding value determined for the Fe2+ ions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The exchange bias effect in FeNi/FeMn/GdxCo100-x films with a pinning antiferromagnetic FeMn layer and an exchange-biased ferrimagnetic amorphous Gd-Co layer was studied. The FeNi layer allows the formation of the fcc lattice of FeMn, i.e. the antiferromagnetic γ-phase of FeMn. The Gd content was varied within 15–25 at. % in order to obtain different temperature dependences of the spontaneous magnetization Ms(T) of the Gd-Co layer. The magnetic properties of the films were determined from hysteresis loops measured in the temperature range 5–350 K. A correlation between Ms(T) and the temperature dependences of the exchange bias field HebGdCo(T) was established. In particular, it was shown that there is an inversion of the sign and sharp increase of the value of HebGdCo near the magnetic compensation state. The first one is a consequence of the minimization of the spontaneous magnetization of Gd-Co layer at the compensation temperature. The second one shows the predominance of the exchange interaction of the antiferromagnetic layer with the cobalt magnetic sub-system of the ferrimagnetic layer as a contribution to the interlayer exchange coupling.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The interfacial Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya Interaction (iDMI) in ferromagnetic (FM)/heavy metal (HM) structures has been under intense investigation due to the interesting observation of many novel chiral structures such as domain walls (DWs) and skyrmions. In all the studies so far, the iDMI is present in the whole of the FM layer. In this study, we report our investigations on a FM nanowire where iDMI is confined to a nanoscale region. We observe that the local modulation of magnetic properties results in oscillations of DWs under the influence of spin-transfer torque (STT). For such oscillations, the nanoscale iDMI acts as a restoring force. We have studied the dependence of oscillation frequency upon the current density, geometrical parameter (width of nanoscale iDMI region), strength of iDMI and magnetic parameters such as anisotropy constant (Ku), exchange constant (A) and saturation magnetization (Ms). The variation in the above-mentioned parameters results in the tunability of oscillation frequency within a few GHz. Moreover, the amplitude of oscillations is also tunable with the width of the nanoscale iDMI region. These observations make this study potentially useful for applications in neuromorphic computing.© 2020The magnetocaloric property and magneto-resistance (MR) of Gd83Cu9Al8 metallic glass (MG) showing a second order ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transition have been investigated. A large maximum magnetic entropy change of 9.7 J/kg.K under a field change of 5 T was obtained, indicative of its attractiveness as magnetic refrigerants. Importantly, a linear relationship was observed between magnetic entropy change, ΔSm, and MR in both the ferromagnetic and paramagnetic states, which is different from that of the reported rare earth based MGs and intermetallics. The diversiform relationships of MR vs ΔSm in MGs imply the complexity of their underliying mechanisms. The linear ΔSm-MR relationship sheds new light on the magnetocaloric effect of MGs, and can guide the design of amorphous magnetic refrigerants.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.By the single crystal inelastic neutron scattering the orthoferrite HoFeO3 was studied. We show that the spin dynamics of the Fe subsystem does not change through the spin-reorientation transitions. The observed spectrum of magnetic excitations was analyzed in the frames of linear spin-wave theory. Within this approach the antiferromagnetic exchange interactions of nearest neighbors and next nearest neighbors were obtained for Fe subsystem. Parameters of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interactions at Fe subsystem were refined. The temperature dependence of the gap in Fe spin-wave spectrum indicates the temperature evolution of the anisotropy parameters. The estimations for the values of Fe-Ho and Ho-Ho exchange interaction were made as well.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the irreversible magnetic behavior of Ni0.5Co0.5Fe2O4 nano-ferrite has been discussed with varying the temperature. The nano-ferrite discussed in present work synthesized using sol gel technique. The formation of the phase of Ni0.5Co0.5Fe2O4 was confirmed using X-ray diffraction (XRD), and their Rietveld refinement shows it crystallized into cubic structure with lattice constant 8.3541 Å under space groupFd3-m. The homogeneity and the morphology of the sample was analysed using FESEM along with EDAX measurement. The irreversibility of Ni0.5Co0.5Fe2O4 was studied in three modes ZFCW, FCC and FCW using field dependent magnetic measurements in temperature range of 2 K–300 K under the presence of 50 Oe. However, the magnetic hysteresis of sample was studied at different temperature T = 5 K, 50 K, 100 K, 120 K, 200 K, 300 K from varying the field upto ±5 Tesla. Further, the asymmetry observed in the magnetization and demagnetization curve gives the value of Hm, which increased with lowering the temperature due to magnetic crystalline phase as well as the micro-strain of the sample. Finally, retentivity, coercivity and saturation magnetization of the present sample makes it a potential candidate for magnetic memory devices, magnetic resonance imaging, medical diagnosis applications.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we report a high-performance lateral GaN Schottky barrier diode (SBD) with a low turn-on voltage (VON) of 0.39 V and low reverse current. Meanwhile we have proposed a model to comprehend the leakage current mechanism in this GaN SBDs. The reverse current transport mechanism was analyzed by temperature-dependent current–voltage (T-I-V) measurements. The results indicate that reverse current is dominated by thermionic emission (TE), Frenkel–Poole (FP) emission and trap assisted tunneling (TAT) near zero bias, at low and high reverse bias, respectively. The thermionic field emission (TFE) is found to be the main mechanism near the breakdown voltage (BV). The comparison shows Al2O3 passivation layer can effectively reduce leakage current.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The phenomenon of ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) is still being widely used for determining the magnetocrystalline anisotropy constants of magnetic materials. We show that one can interpret the Smit-Beljers equation as the relationship between resonance frequency and curvature of the spatial distribution of free energy at resonance. Subsequently, taking this relationship into account and using cross-validation of numerical solutions of the Smit-Beljers equation (Tomczak and Puszkarski, 2018) we show how to determine accurately all the relevant constants related to the tested sample from a single FMR experiment. Specifically, three examples are given of calculating such constants from FMR data: we use historical Bickford's measurements from 1950 for bulk magnetite, Liu's measurements from 2007 for a 500 nm thin film of a weak ferromagnet (Ga, Mn) As, and Wang's measurements from 2014 for an ultrathin film of YIG. In all three cases, the constants we have determined are consistent with the results of other measurements. In the fourth numerical example, we show, using Heinrich et al. FMR measurements for ultrathin Co film, that the presented method can also be a test for the correctness of the assumed form of the ferromagnet free energy at resonance. Eventually, in the fifth numerical example, the unambiguity of the determined parameters in the present approach is briefly discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic field of a homogeneously magnetized cylindrical tile geometry, i.e. an angular section of a finite hollow cylinder, is found. The field is expressed as the product between a tensor field describing the geometrical part of the problem and a column vector holding the magnetization of the tile. Outside the tile, the tensor is identical to the demagnetization tensor. We find that four components of the tensor, Nxy,Nxz,Nyz and Nzy, can be expressed fully analytically, while the five remaining components, Nxx,Nyx,Nyy,Nzx and Nzz, contain integrals that have to be evaluated numerically. When evaluated numerically the tensor is symmetric. A comparison between the found solution, implemented in the open source magnetic framework MagTense, and a finite element calculation of the magnetic flux density of a cylindrical tile shows excellent agreement.© 2020A modified magnetron sputtering setup was used to fabricate planar nanowire (NW) arrays of Co. The structural characterization of these polycrystalline Co NW arrays confirms the coexistence of both hcp and fcc phases, in which their relative fractions depend on the Co deposition time as well as the presence (or absence) of a bcc nanowire seed layer, as shown for tungsten case. A model to explain how the Co nanowires grow is proposed: hcp Co phase is firstly stabilized on the vicinal sapphire substrate (or W seed layer), but as the NW thickness increases, a structural relaxation leads to the fcc Co phase. While different contributions to the magnetic anisotropies are considered, we find that the magnetic properties are dominated by shape effects with an easy axis oriented along the average direction of the wire axis. Thicker NW arrays also have a significant contribution from the magnetocrystalline anisotropy. From the behavior of the temperature dependent magnetization, we find that for thicker nanowires the magnetization reversal is governed by a curling reversal mode, whereas thinner nanowires switch their magnetization via coherent rotation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic skyrmions and skyrmioniums are exotic magnetic configurations that have several potential applications in Spintronics. In this work, using micromagnetic simulations, we show that it is possible to create metastable skyrmions and skyrmioniums in an isolated cobalt nanodisk, that has as its minimum energy configuration a single domain with perpendicular magnetization. First, we have determined the ground state of the nanodisk and the frequencies of the spin wave modes of skyrmions and skyrmioniums for different values of perpendicular uniaxial anisotropy constant Kz and Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya exchange constant Dint. Next, in order to create a skyrmion or skyrmionium, we have applied an oscillating perpendicular magnetic field with a frequency equal to that of the spin wave modes. Our results show that it is possible to switch from single domain to skyrmion or skyrmionium, tuning parameters such as the intensity of the applied perpendicular magnetic field, and its duration.© 2020In ferrimagnetic spinels AB2O4 the magnetic structure is strongly influenced by lattice distortions, geometric frustration and the electronic properties of the cations at the A and B sites. Here, we report a comprehensive study on the temperature dependence of the magnetic structure of CuCr2O4 and Cu0.9Ni0.1Cr2O4 using neutron diffraction. CuCr2O4 undergoes a first continuous magnetic transition around 155 K into a canted long-range spin order on the Cr sublattice established by an antiferromagnetic and a ferromagnetic mode. Below 130 K a second transition occurs into a ferromagnetic order on the Cu sublattice resulting in a ferrimagnetic spin arrangement. Correlations between the appearance of magnetic modes and changes in the lattice geometry at different temperatures are discussed giving insight to magnetoelastic coupling. The occurrence of a ferromagnetic Cr mode above 130 K questions the common interpretation that a strong antiferromagnetic coupling between A and B spins in ferrimagnetic AB2O4 spinels is responsible for spin canting. From our neutron diffraction measurements of Cu1−xNixCr2O4 we identify a spin reorientation for the ferromagnetic modes with a nickel content between x = 0 and 0.1.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.It is extremely promising but challenging to synthesize Nd2Fe14B magnetic nanopowders by chemical methods, because of the chemical instability of them. Here, we report an inexpensive and facile bottom-up strategy to synthesize the chemically homogeneous Nd2Fe14B nanoparticles. The Nd-Fe-B precursors were prepared by hydrothermal method using neodymium nitrate hexahydrate, iron nitrate hexahydrate and boric acid as raw materials. Subsequently, the precursors were oxidized by annealing at 800 °C for 2 h. The prepared oxides were mixed with CaH2 and heated to 900 °C under a mixing flow of 5% H2/95% Ar gas. After the reduction- diffusion annealing process, Nd2Fe14B nanoparticles were obtained and washed with water and ethanol. The as-synthesized nanoparticles have a mean size of 35 nm, a saturation magnetization of 107 emu/g and a coercivity of 1.2 kOe.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization response including dipole–dipole interactions of a pair of macrospins following the sudden alteration of a dc magnetic field is calculated from the stochastic Gilbert-Landau-Lifshitz equation by reducing the overall task to an infinite hierarchy of differential-recurrence relations in the time domain for the statistical moments (averaged products of spherical harmonics in this case), which is exactly solved in the frequency domain by matrix continued fractions. The greatest relaxation time and dynamic susceptibility are then compared with the corresponding results for two exchange-coupled spins using the same exact method. For a given interaction parameter dipole–dipole coupling in the circularly symmetric configuration considered has a much more pronounced effect on the magnetization dynamics than exchange coupling principally manifested by a greater increase in the relaxation time.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt\Nickel multilayers with low perpendicular magnetic anisotropy are optimized for the lowest achievable coercivity while retaining the highest possible total magnetic moment, still supporting single-domain states. This optimization is done to achieve a vital clock-field reduction in nanomagnetic logic devices with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy, enabling highly efficient on-chip field clocking. It is shown that sub 10 mT coercivities are achievable utilizing a Ta2\Pt1.5[Co0.2\Ni0.4]x8 stack in combination with precise manipulation of the anisotropy landscape via highly localized Ga+ ion irradiation, in order to control the point of domain-wall nucleation. Statistical data is used to assess the Ga+ ion dose-dependent coercivity and provide a detailed insight into the overall switching-field-distributions. Nanosecond field pulsing is used to assess the time-evolution of the nucleation fields, confirmed to be following the Arrhenius model at least down to pulse lengths of 10 ns, resulting in nucleation fields more than twice as high. The obtained findings are then applied to demonstrate the first pNML logic elements fulfilling the requirements for on-chip clocking schemes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The interplay between various competing parameters, for example covalency, non-cubic crystal field, and spin-orbit coupling (SOC) leads to fascinating electronic and magnetic phases of matter. In the present work, the effect of these competing parameters on the ground state properties of the systems with d5,d4, and d3 electronic configurations are studied using atomic and two-site full multi-orbital man-body electronic Hamiltonian. In order to connect with the real world materials, explicit density functional calculations are employed to study the electronic and the magnetic properties of a series of double perovskite iridates Sr2MIrO6 (M = Ce, Sc, Ca) with formal valences of Ir: Ir4+ (d5), Ir5+ (d4), and Ir6+ (d3). All these iridates facilitate a finite noncubic crystal field and strong Ir-O covalency along with large SOC, thereby offering an excellent platform for the present study. Using the symmetry allowed magnetic structures, the magnetic properties of these materials are studied and compared with the available experimental results. The results of the present work are pertinent to describe the electronic properties of a broad family of spin-orbit coupled materials.© 2020 Elsevier LtdInvestigation of the third-order intercept point, IP3 and nonlinear distortion level, NDL for pre-and post-multilayer processed GaAs pHEMTs has been accomplished by employing two-tone intermodulation distortion measurements. The third-order intercept point is a biasing, input power, frequency-dependent term, particularly related to the fundamental and third-order intermodulation distortion component and the study extended from low to high temperatures. The main findings are that the output referenced OIP3 decreased while the input referenced IIP3 increased with frequency at peak transconductance condition and the study further extended to multi-bias operation condition. Within the measured temperature range, the IP3 and NDL modified significantly following the behaviour of IMD3 distortion. This investigation of IP3 is utilized to measure how much distortion is created and referring this to the antenna input gives a straightforward strategy to decide whether or not the spec can be met. On the other hand, analysis of NDL is vital for choosing the most excellent biasing alternative with the entryway measurements of the device to create a compromise agreeing to the desired utilization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Effect of the weak point disorder on vortex matter phase diagram is studied by incorporation of V atoms through magnetic and magnetoresistance measurement in layered NbSe2 single crystal. We observe that the point disorder introduces fishtail effect and the second magnetization peak (SMP) in the M-H curve of V0.0015NbSe2 at magnetic field far below upper critical field (Hc2). 3D Collective creep of elastic flux line lattice (FLL) support the vortex motion below the onset of SMP. However, the crossover from collective to plastic deformation of FLL support the occurrence of SMP effect. Presence of the peak effect in pinning force density near irreversible magnetic field (Hirr) indicates the 2D to 3D distortion of FLL due to lattice softening associated with the rapid reduction of elastic modulus. Magneto transport measurement shows the glassy transition near the zero resistance region. In the glassy region, the flux line shows 2D characteristics. Above zero resistive region, thermally activated flux flow region is well described by Arrhenius relation. It is seen that the activation energy is decreased significantly by the incorporation of V atoms in NbSe2. The magnetic field dependence of activation energy follows a power law of U0(H) ~ H- α where the exponent α changed from 0.5 to a 0.9 at a crossover field of Hcr = ~ 0.7 T, indicating the transition from weak plastic deformation of FLL to the strong entangled state in vortex liquid phase. Finally a vortex phase diagram is constructed demonstrating all the different phases of vortex lattice of V0.0015NbSe2 at different magnetic fields and temperatures.© 2020In this paper, we determine the geometric phase for the one-dimensional XXZ Heisenberg chain with spin-1/2, the exchange couple J and the spin anisotropy parameter Δ in a longitudinal field (LF) with the reduced field strength h. Using the Jordan-Wigner transformation and the mean-field theory based on the Wick's theorem, a semi-analytical theory has been developed in terms of order parameters which satisfy the self-consistent equations. The values of the order parameters are numerically computed using the matrix-product-state (MPS) method. The validity of the mean-filed theory could be checked through the comparison between the self-consistent solutions and the numerical results. Finally, we draw the topological phase diagrams in the case J<0 and the case J>0.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this research, the magnetic and structural properties of the Fe-23Cr-9Co alloy were investigated. The obtained results showed that the existence of non-magnetic phases in the casting structure or the presence of metallurgical defects in the forged structure had a destructive effect on the magnetic properties. The use of different aging methods showed that each of them had a positive effect on the magnetic properties. It was also found that isothermal aging, in the absence of the magnetic field, with the increase in aging time, was only able to enhance the coercive force to a certain extent. The maximum coercive force achieved was 16 Oe. Also, aging by the continuous cooling method increased the coercive force to 18 Oe. Further, the use of thermo-magnetic treatment produced an anisotropic magnetic effect. In this method, the coercive force was increased with raising the temperature, such that the maximum coercive force of this method was 13 Oe, as obtained at 640 °C. The use of step aging also increased the difference in the chemical composition of α1 and α2 phases, leading to an increase in the coercivity up to 105 Oe.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We study the perpendicular exchange bias (PEB) and spin-orbit torque (SOT) generation in the Pt/Co/MgO heterostructure by changing the thickness of the MgO layer. We show that the oxidation of the beneath Co layer increases with the MgO thickness. Strong PEB is obtained in the Pt/Co/MgO films, which exhibits a much higher blocking temperature compared with that in the Pt/Co/CoO films. Furthermore, it is found that the MgO thickness has significant effect on the SOT generation. Maximum values of the SOTs are obtained with a 0.8 nm-thick MgO layer, which decreases by increasing the MgO thickness from 0.8 to 1.6 nm. Our results shed a light on the essential role of the MgO layer in the heavy metal/ferromagnet/MgO heterostructure, a typical material system in spintronic devices, and provide a way to manipulate the magnetic properties and the SOTs by oxide layers.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) of a high-entropy Gd19Tb19Er18Fe19Al25 amorphous microwires fabricated by melt-extracted method are investigated systematically. These microwires exhibit a second-order phase transition from ferromagnetic to paramagnetic states at the Curie temperature of 97 K. The zero-field-cooling (ZFC) and field-cooling (FC) magnetization curves are irreversible when the temperature lower than the Curie temperature due to the spin glassy freezing behavior. The peak magnetic entropy change (ΔSM pk) for a field change from 0 to 5 T reaches ~5.94 J/kg∙K. In accordance to two criteria refrigerant capacity, the values of refrigerant capacity (RC) and relative cooling power (RCP) reach ~569 J/kg and ~733 J/kg at a field change of 5 T, respectively. These results suggest that the melt-extracted Gd19Tb19Er18Fe19Al25 microwires exhibit good MCE and have great potential to use as one kind of high temperature magnetic refrigeration material.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We studied the magnetization (Ms) of 60 nm thick polycrystalline Fe4N thin films deposited using reactive dc magnetron sputtering. The optimum substrate temperature (Ts) to grow an stoichiometric Fe4N phase is about 673 K, in agreement with earlier works. However, at this Ts, we found that significant intermixing is taking place at the substrate-film interface, affecting the Ms of Fe4N film, adversely. We performed secondary ion mass spectroscopy (SIMS) measurements to extract the extent of such intermixing. It was found that Si from the SiO2 substrate get interdiffused into Fe4N film forming an undesired interface extending up to almost half of the film. As a result, the average Ms of Fe4N film get reduced by about 25% as compared to its theoretical value. To prohibit such intermixing, we placed thin layers of Ag, Cu, or CrN as a buffer layer between the substrate and Fe4N film. Such buffer layer suppress the extent of interdiffusion remarkably. From SIMS measurements, we found that among all buffer layers, CrN is most suitable as it reduces the extent of intermixing to a minimum level. Magnetization measurements performed using bulk magnetization and polarized neutron reflectivity (PNR) methods also clearly revealed that the Ms was the highest when CrN buffer layer was used. From these results, it becomes apparent that the intermixing taking place at the substrate-film interface plays a vital role in affecting the Ms of Fe4N thin films. To further suppress such intermixing an attempt was also made to bring down the Ts from 673 to 523 K. Obtained results are presented and discussed in this work.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic ordering in rare earth metals is well established for ambient pressure crystal structures, however, little is known about the magnetic ordering in their corresponding high-pressure crystalline modifications. Holmium (Ho) was studied in a large-volume diamond anvil cell at the Spallation Neutron Source to high-pressure up to 20 GPa and to low-temperature to 10 K. We have conducted two independent high-pressure low-temperature experiments under non-hydrostatic and quasi-hydrostatic pressure conditions respectively. The ambient pressure hexagonal close packed (hcp) phase of holmium shows two magnetic transitions below 10 GPa one to an incommensurate Antiferromagnetic (AFM) phase and another to a conical-Ferromagnetic (c-FM) phase. In contrast, alpha-Samarium-type (α-Sm) phase above 10 GPa and the double hexagonal close packed (dhcp) phase above 19 GPa show only one FM transition marked by the appearance of a magnetic peak at 3 Å and the concurrent enhancement of nuclear peaks below 30 K. These new transitions observed by neutron diffraction can be accounted by a commensurate superlattice formation along c-axis in both the α-Sm-type phase and the dhcp phase.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.For the integration with other parts of spintronic devices, it is desired to minimize the size of skyrmions to a nanometer scale. To provide a theoretical guidance for this endeavour, we established an extended NdJ relationship between the skyrmion size and fundamental magnetic properties of two-dimensional hexagonal ferromagnetic lattices, including multiple exchanges between different neighbors (J1-J4), Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interactions (d1 and d2) and on-site magnetic anisotropy energy. We demonstrated the applicability of this approach through density functional theory and spin spiral calculations for several interface, e.g., Co/Gra, Rh/Gra, Co/Pt3 and MgO/Co/Pt3, and showed that the size of Néel skyrmions can be effectively reduced by either enhancing d or more conveniently reducing J through cancelation of Jis.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.To study the relationship between the exchange bias effect and the resonance frequency of magnetic nanofilms, FeNi and FeNi/FeMn exchange-coupled films were fabricated on a silicon substrate by magnetron sputtering deposition. The static and dynamic magnetic properties of the multilayer films were investigated using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and a vector network analyzer (VNA). The VSM results indicate that after introducing the FeMn layer, the exchange bias field increased to 62 Oe and the magnetic anisotropy field shifted from 6 to 107 Oe. The VNA results show that the resonance frequency increased from 0.72 to 2.8 GHz, originating from the interface exchange coupling strength. In addition, as a probe for the surface and interface structure, a time-of-flight polarized neutron reflectometer was used to observe the microstructure of the multilayer films. The diffusion with a 2.5 nm thickness between the multilayer films was observed by the polarized neutron reflection experiment, further illustrating that the exchange bias effect is derived from the interaction between the FeNi/FeMn layers. It is concluded that the magnetic induction of a FeNi layer is 0.98 T through fitting the data obtained from the polarized neutron reflection experiment.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Integration of superior electronic property of graphene and magnetic property of transition metal (TM) to achieve promising materials with excellent electronic and magnetic properties is an interesting area of research. Intrinsically, charge transport in pristine graphene and magnetic property in nanophase TM are well studied subjects. However, these properties deviate drastically from their intrinsic counterpart due to strong interaction at the interface when TM nanostructures are grown on graphene surface. So far no serious effort has been given to look at this issue. Therefore, in the present work, graphene sheet is decorated by Co nanosheets of average lateral dimension of ~15 nm to explore the basic understanding of charge transport, magnetism and magnetoresistance in these integrated structures. Very interesting metal–insulator transition is observed. The charge transport is explained by electron–electron interaction in the insulating regime as arising due to quantum interference and electron scattering in the metallic regime. The materials also show a high coercivity and a transition from giant linear positive magnetoresistance to nonlinear negative magnetoresistance. High coercivity in the present sample arises due to charge transfer, surface pinning and strain created at the graphene/Co interface while positive and negative magnetoresistances are explained on the basis of electron–electron interaction and electron-spin scattering respectively.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The objective of this study is to investigate the magnetocaloric effect in Fe68+ xCr12− xSi8B12 (x = 0, 4 and 10) ribbons prepared by melt spinning technique. X-ray diffraction and Mössbauer spectrometry show that the ribbons are amorphous and the average hyperfine field is very affected by chromium concentration. The temperature dependence of the magnetic entropy variation was calculated from the magnetization data. It was found that the Curie temperature of the sample increases with decreasing Cr content. The Maximum of magnetic entropy change (-ΔSm max) of μ0H = 2 T is about 1.06, 1.37 and 2.26 J.kg−1. K−1 for x = 0, 4 and 10, respectively. Arrott plots are investigated to conclude the nature of the magnetic transition, which are second-order ferromagnetic to paramagnetic phase transition near the Curie temperature. Theoretical investigation of the magnetization and the magnetocaloric effect are reported of which the maximum value of magnetocaloric change(-ΔSm max) and the relative cooling power (RCP) parameters are determined.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present here the improved crystallographic/geometric compatibility and magnetocaloric reversibility by measurement of magnetic entropy change using different protocols in 10% Pt substituted Ni2Mn1.4In0.6 magnetic shape memory alloy. The substitution of Pt reduces the thermal hysteresis about 50% to the Ni2Mn1.4In0.6. The origin of the reduced thermal hysteresis is investigated by the crystallographic compatibility of the austenite and martensite phases. The calculated middle eigenvalue of the transformation matrix turned out to be 0.9982, which is very close to 1 (deviation is only 0.18%) suggests for the crystallographic compatibility between the austenite and martensite phases in Ni1.9Pt0.1Mn1.4In0.6. A very small thermal hysteresis and crystallographic compatibility between two phases in this alloy system indicate a stress-free transition layer (i.e. perfect habit plane) between the austenite and martensite phase, which is expected to give reversible martensite phase transition and therefore reversible magnetocaloric effect (MCE) as well. The calculated value of the isothermal entropy change (ΔSiso) using the magnetization curve under three different measurement protocols (i.e. isothermal, loop, and isofield measurement protocol) is found to be nearly same indicating a reversible MCE in the present alloy system. Our work provides a path to design new magnetic shape memory Heusler alloys for magnetic refrigeration and also suggest that any of the above measurement protocol can be used for the calculation of ΔSiso for materials satisfying geometrical compatibility condition.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.X-ray diffraction, heat capacity and magnetic measurements are performed on single crystals of Mn2- xMgxBO4 (x = 0.5, 0.6 and 0.7) with the warwickite structure. The monoclinic symmetry is found for all samples with the space group P21/n. The M1 site is occupied by trivalent Mn ions while the M2 site is occupied by a mixture of divalent Mg and Mn ions. Regular cation and charge distributions are observed, which is unusual for heterometallic warwickites. The local octahedral distortions of M1O6 show the monotonic dependence on the Mg content and are in accordance with the Jahn-Teller distortion. All samples are found to undergo long-range antiferromagnetic ordering with rather low transition temperatures of TN = 16, 14 and 13 K for x = 0.5, 0.6, and 0.7, respectively. The ordering of local octahedral distortions, caused by the strong electron-phonon interaction of the trivalent Mn ions, is proposed to stabilise the cationic ordering and, as a result, the long-range magnetic ordering in the material.© 2020Current-induced magnetization switching is mainly realized by spin-transfer torque or spin-orbital torque, which usually requires an extremely large current density (more than 105 A/cm2). Here we report a low-energy consumption, stable and reliable, thermal assisted current-induced magnetization switching in devices based on ferrimagnetic RIG (Rare earth garnet ferrite, where R represents rare earth element Dy or Tb). The remanent magnetization of DyIG (Dy3Fe5O12) and TbIG (Tb3Fe5O12) could be switched by applying an external voltage of several volts (corresponding current is tiny and on the order of only 10−3 A/cm2). The remanent magnetization switching of RIG is attributed to the temperature variation (ΔT) induced by the thermal effect of current. The temperature variation ΔT could reach 4.8 K for DyIG at 2 mA/cm2, and could reach 6.54 K for TbIG at 2.4 mA/cm2. The remanent magnetization could be switched from −0.037 to 0.013 emu/g for DyIG, and could be switched from −0.07 to 0.17 emu/g for TbIG. This work might provide a novel way for thermally assisted magnetization switching in ferrimagnetic system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The Ising one-dimensional (1D) chain with spin S=1/2 and magnetoelastic interaction is studied with the lattice contribution included in the form of elastic interaction and thermal vibrations simultaneously taken into account. The magnetic energy term and the elastic (static) energy term based on the Morse potential are calculated exactly. The vibrational energy is calculated in the Debye approximation, in which the anharmonicity is introduced by the Grüneisen parameter. The total Gibbs potential, including both the magnetic field, as well as the external force term, is constructed and from its minimum the equation of state is derived. From the Gibbs energy all the thermodynamic properties are calculated in a self-consistent manner. The comprehensive numerical calculations are performed in a full temperature range, i.e., from zero temperature up to the vicinity of melting. In particular, a role of magneto-elastic coupling is emphasized and examined. The numerical results are illustrated in figures and discussed.© 2020The effect of adding of 0.13 wt% Cr on the primary recrystallization and magnetic properties of high permeability grain oriented silicon steel was studied. The results show that trace Cr refined both primary and secondary grains. The reduction of final grain size resulted in decrease of 5.1%, 4.0% and 3.6% in the average of iron loss during magnetization at 50 Hz, 100 Hz and 200 Hz, respectively. Besides the conventional precipitates, there were two kinds of Cr-containing nitrides, i.e., the amorphous (Si, Cr) N formed in the matrix, and the crystalline fcc-CrN formed at grain boundary. These precipitates acted as inhibitors to refine and homogenize primary grains in the thickness direction. The beneficial {1 1 1} 〈1 1 2〉 texture component increased, while the components that cannot form high-energy grain boundaries with Goss grains, such as {0 0 1} 〈1 1 0〉 and {1 1 2} 〈1 1 0〉 at different thickness layers decreased after primary recrystallization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Novel amorphous magnetic-compound powder cores (AMPCs) composed of a mixture of water-atomized FeSiBPNbCr amorphous powder and FeCo alloy powder were successfully fabricated through cold pressing. FeCo alloy powder, which exhibits a high magnetic flux density (Bs) of 2.35 T, can improve the Bs and DC bias performance of the AMPCs. Compared to raw amorphous powder cores, the Bs and DC bias performance of AMPCs containing 30% FeCo alloy powder were improved by 35% and 24%, respectively. The core loss (Pcv) was maintained lower than 1000 mW/cm3, at a maximum magnetic induction of 0.1 T and frequency of 100 kHz. Novel AMPCs with high Bs, low Pcv, and good DC bias performance meet the needs of the new high-frequency large-current devices and have wide application prospects.© 2020 The AuthorsThe extension of results concerning the calculation of the external (geometric) demagnetizing factor obtained for rod like samples to strip-like ribbon samples is investigated. To match the experimental determined demagnetizing factors of strips with various length two fitting parameters have been introduced: (i) the effective width of the strip and (2) the internal demagnetizing factor. It turned out that the equivalent rod diameter calculation from the cross-section is valid up to a limited width/thickness ratio. The experimental demagnetizing factor determined from the steepness of the anhysteretic curve was greatly reduced by a uniaxial stress; where from a lower bound for the internal demagnetizing factor could be obtained. We have found that this internal demagnetizing factor is about three times larger than the geometric one for an as cast amorphous sample with Finemet composition.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Zinc substituted magnesium-cobalt ferrite nanoparticles having the basic composition Mg0.2Co0.8−xZnxFe2O4 (x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6 and 0.8) were successfully synthesized using sol–gel auto combustion method. The results show that the doping amount of Zn2+ ions has a great influence on its structure and magnetic properties. X-ray diffraction (XRD) measurements show that Mg0.2Co0.8−xZnxFe2O4 has a good phase formation, and all samples have single-phase cubic spinel structure. The average crystallite size is calculated from Scheller's formula to be between 49 and 54 nm. And the lattice constant increases from 8.38 to 8.43 Å with the increase of Zn2+ ions content. Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) measurements also confirm the formation of the cubic spinel structure of ferrite. The ferrite samples were observed by scanning electron microscopy (SEM) to be spherical nanoparticles. The magnetic properties of the samples have been determined at room temperature by vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The results show that the magnetic properties of Mg-Co ferrite are significantly affected by the doping amount of Zn2+ ions. For Zn-substituted Mg-Co ferrites, the magnetic properties decrease obviously with the increase of Zn content. This rapid decrease of magnetic properties reveals that the magnetic properties of Zn-substituted magnesium-cobalt ferrite have realized the transition from hard magnetic to soft magnetic. Meanwhile, the coercivity is Hc = 21.26 Oe, the saturation magnetization is 4.56 emu/g and the remanent magnetization is 0.03 emu/g for Mg0.2Zn0.8Fe2O4 sample. This also indicates that the ferrite samples prepared have a transition from ferromagnetic behavior to superparamagnetic behavior. The smaller coercivity value confirms that soft ferrite has been obtained. Meanwhile, this transition from hard magnetism to soft magnetism can be used as a potential high frequency soft magnetic material.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this manuscript, the structural and magnetic properties of a 55Mn+ ion-implanted unintentionally doped β-Ga2O3 single crystal are investigated. The implanted Mn+ ions cause crystalline degeneration due to the formation of defects in the surface of the substrate. Room temperature ferromagnetism (FM) is observed in the samples with implantation doses of 5 × 1014cm-2, 1 × 1015cm-2 and 5 × 1015cm-2. The zero-field-cooled (ZFC)/field-cooled (FC) measurement of magnetization reveals that the ion implantation process induces an antiferromagnetic (AFM) phase. The temperature evolution of the remanence asymmetry (ME) demonstrates the typical behavior of the exchange bias effect due to the coexistence of FM and AFM phases. Based on the distribution of Mn+ ions and defects and the relationship between the remanence asymmetry (ME) and the exchange bias field (HE), the single domain and core-shell models are used to investigate the exchange bias system. The formation mechanism of the ferromagnetic order is briefly discussed, which is rather different from the one corresponding to the bound magnetic polaron (BMP) model.© 2020We calculate the energies of the ground and the first excited states of a free polaron and that of a polaron bound to a Coulomb impurity in a quantum dot with harmonic confinement in the presence of Rashba spin-orbit interaction by employing the variation theory of Lee, Low and Pines as modified by Huybrechts for an all-coupling range of the electron-phonon interaction and arbitrary confinement length. We show that in both cases, the Rashba interaction removes the two-fold spin-degeneracy of the first-excited states even in the absence of any applied magnetic field, though the ground state does not show any such spin splitting. The self-energy corrections due to the polaronic effect are however not affected by the Rashba interaction. We also investigate the combined effect of Rashba and polaronic interactions in the presence of an external magnetic field using the Rayleigh-Schrödinger perturbation theory. Application of our results to GaAs and CdS quantum dots shows that the suppression of the phonon-induced size-dependent Zeeman splitting in a quantum dot is reduced by the Rashba coupling.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Noncollinear spin systems with magnetically induced ferroelectricity from changes in spiral magnetic ordering have attracted significant interest in recent research due to their remarkable magnetoelectric effects with promising applications. Single phase multiferroics are of great interest for these new multifunctional devices, being Y-type hexaferrites good candidates, and among them the ZnY compounds due to their ordered magnetic behaviour over room temperature. Polycrystalline Y type hexaferrites with composition Ba0.5Sr1.5Zn2Fe2O22 (BSZFO) were sintered in 1050 °C–1250 °C temperature range. Transverse susceptibility measurements carried out on these BSZFO samples in the temperature range 80–350 K with DC fields up to ± 5000 Oe reveal different behaviour depending on the sintering temperature. Sample sintered at 1250 °C is qualitatively different, suggesting a mixed Y and Z phase like CoY hexaferrites. Sintering at lower temperatures produce single phase Y-type, but the transverse susceptibility behaviour of the sample sintered at 1150 °C is shifted at temperatures 15 K higher. Regarding the DC field sweeps the observed behaviour is a peak that shifts to lower values with increasing temperature, and the samples corresponding to single Y phase exhibit several maxima and minima in the 250 K–330 K range at low DC applied field as a result of the magnetic field induced spin transitions in this compound.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Modification of magnetic domain structure of Ni-C composite thin films has been investigated with the variation in nickel content in the films. Ni-C thin films were synthesized by electrodeposition method with different nickel molar concentration in the electrolyte. Compositional analysis of the films performed by EPMA mapping assured nearly homogeneous distribution of nickel and carbon in the films at a scale much larger than the crystallographic features within the films. GIXRD and TEM studies reveal the presence of crystalline phase of nickel along with diamond and graphite phases within amorphous carbon. Morphological properties studied by AFM showed granular features with variation in roughness. Within amorphous carbon matrix of the films, presence of sp3 and sp2 phases (Ni-DLC) were confirmed by Raman spectroscopy in low nickel content thin films. Stripe magnetic domain structures of varying width and density were observed in the films with change in nickel content without application of external magnetic field at room temperature by magnetic force microscopy. Ni-DLC thin films exhibit the highest domain density of all Ni-C composite thin films.© 2020Inspired by the previous result that serious coercivity deterioration of Sm2Fe17N3 powder during sintering can be overcame by suppressing surface oxidation of the powder, this study aimed to explore the possibility of high-performance Sm2Fe17N3 sintered magnets by a low-oxygen powder metallurgy process. Jet-milling under a low oxygen atmosphere was used to prepare Sm2Fe17N3 fine powders with a low oxygen content as well as high (BH)max reaching 42.8 MGOe (341 kJ/m3). All low-oxidized powders were clearly confirmed to be sintered without coercivity deterioration, and powders with appropriate particle sizes were densified to a relative density exceeding 90% by high-pressure current sintering, despite use of a low sintering temperature below the thermal decomposition temperature. However, the sintered magnets showed an unexpected decline in remanence from the powder, which was caused by a decline in saturation magnetization, and as a result, the (BH)max of the obtained sintered magnets was 24 MGOe (191 kJ/m3).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we propose a device design for efficient voltage control of magnetism. The magnetization of a ferrimagnetic double perovskite may be manipulated by an exchange coupled layer of multiferroic BiFeO3. Bilayers of Barium doped BiFeO3 and ferrimagnetic double perovskite Sr2FeMoO6 have been prepared by pulsed laser deposition motivated by the possibility of strong interlayer exchange coupling. While single layers of each material show high quality we observe that in both stacking orders the first layer decomposes during the deposition of the second layer. The reason for the decomposition are strongly differing growth conditions for BiFeO3 and Sr2FeMoO6. This means that the generation of artificial multiferroic stacks requires careful choice of the constituent materials to ensure the bilayer stability.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Low-temperature properties of Lu2Ir2O7 were studied by means of magnetization, ac-susceptibility and specific heat measurements. Our low-temperature measurements reveal a bifurcation of ZFC and FC magnetization data below 140 K, which is further pronounced as a broad anomaly in the temperature development of specific heat and ac-susceptibility. The anomaly can be attributed to the same physical mechanism as discussed for other A2Ir2O7 with A = magnetic rare-earth element, i.e. to short-range correlations among Ir4+ magnetic moments, rather than to a long-range order of Ir sublattice reported earlier. The ac-susceptibility data revealed a strong frequency dependence of the signal, a paradigmatic sign of a spin-glass transition. The analysis of low-temperature specific heat data brought important information on physical properties of Lu2Ir2O7, in striking agreement with our density functional theoretical (DFT) calculations, concluding relatively weak electron-phonon interaction and semimetallic ground state in Lu2Ir2O7.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, results about the effects of the length distribution in hexagonal arrays of nine nickel nanowires were obtained by micromagnetic simulation. Arrangements with average nanowires length of 500 nm and different length dispersion (σ = 0, 15, 62.49, 92.47 nm) were simulated. The effects of the length distribution on magnetization curves are not relevant and the angular dependence of the remanence and coercivity does not present significant variations. Despite that, for the reversal process, there are variations as the σ value increases. Moment configuration maps showed important information for the reversion, suggesting that hysteresis curves are not sufficient in arrays of nine nickel nanowires.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effect of P content on crystallization behavior, microstructure, magnetic domain structure, and magnetic properties of Fe81.5Si3B13-xP0.5+xC0.2Cu0.8Nb1 (x = 0, 1, 2, and 3 at. %) alloys have been investigated. The results of XRD and DSC suggest that the moderate increase in P content improves the amorphous forming ability (AFA) of the alloys and enlarges the temperature interval to 153 K between two crystallization peaks. The activation energy indicates that the relative increase in P content prompts the precipitation of α-Fe phase and improves the thermal stability. Through optimal annealing treatments, the nanocrystalline alloy with x = 3 exhibits excellent soft magnetic properties (SMPs), including high Bs above 1.65 T, high µe about 19000, low Hc below 3 A/m and P10/50 around 0.12 W/kg. The microstructures of the alloys annealed at optimal conditions were detected via XRD and TEM, the results of which show that harmonizing P and B not only refines grains but enhances the nanostructure homogeneity. The investigation with magneto-optical Kerr microscopy reveals the magnetic domain evolution of x = 3 alloy including stress domain removing, domain differentiating and broadening process.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Single phase NiCr2O4 has been successfully prepared by sol–gel technique. Characterization of crystal and morphology exhibits the tetragonal structure and homogeneous growth with regular crystalline shape. Large dielectric constant of ~2447 is observed at room temperature. The relaxation behavior below room temperature is confirmed through measurements of dielectric constant, dielectric loss, electric modulus and impedance depended on frequency or temperature. The analysis through equivalent circuit simulation demonstrates the influence of grains at low temperature and the common contribution of grains and grain boundaries at high temperature. Moreover, the change in dielectric response indicates the presence of magnetodielectric coupling effect. Two different mechanisms are considered to control the magnetodielectric coupling, yielding the positive and negative coupling coefficient at different temperature ranges. The intrinsic magnetoelectric coupling gives rise to the frequency independent magnetodielectric behavior at low temperature. As temperature increases above 150 K, the large magnetodielectric coupling coefficient depended on frequency is contributed by the Maxwell-Wagner effect. The negative value of magnetodielectric coupling coefficient is attributed to the leakage current. Therefore, both mechanisms of Maxwell-Wagner and leakage are competing as a function of frequency, which results in the coefficient crossover at room temperature. Such features bring NiCr2O4 a step closer to potential applications in areas such as magnetic field sensors, actuators and others.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A brief review of a century of previous work highlights the main discoveries of physical understanding of high µ permalloys and summarizes the main mechanisms and phenomena operating in these modern ternary or quaternary alloys. Applications that remain current, in development or potentially future are then presented with their evolutions, such as shielding or torque sensor applications. In conclusion, we emphasize that versatile and high-level magnetic performance as well as the ability to supply complex parts of the 80Ni-permalloys allow them to remain modern soft magnetic materials always looking to the future.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In-situ formation of potassium zirconium phosphate (KZP) in the insulating coating for grain-oriented silicon steel has been prepared by roller coating technology and heat treatment. The microstructure, adhesion, corrosion resistance and magnetic properties for grain-oriented silicon steel coated with insulating coating featuring a range of KZP mass ratios have been investigated. Results indicate that the corrosion resistance and magnetic properties of grain-oriented silicon steel are improved by the in-situ formation of KZP when the mass ratio, m(KZP)/m(S0) is below 5/100. The lowest iron loss of 1.049 W/kg was obtained with m(KZP)/m(S0) of 3/100 and the highest magnetic induction intensity of 1.938T was achieved with m(KZP)/m(S0) of 1/100. The low thermal expansion coefficient of KZP is likely to contribute to extra tensile stress that improves corrosion resistance and magnetic properties for grain-oriented silicon steel.© 2020 The AuthorsEquations are presented roughly describing the forces between cuboid magnets in normal and lateral direction as a function of their relative position. The equations are adapted to the forces measured with a tensile testing machine and obtained from finite element calculations. From the conservation of energy, a relationship between the magnetic forces in normal and lateral direction is derived. The equations may help designing machines containing solenoids or permanent magnets.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The importance of heat management has been emphasized in various industrial fields and cooling technology of efficiently removing heat is required. The natural convection of a fluid-filled enclosure is being applied in applications such as heat exchangers, solar energy collection, and electronics cooling. In this study, when the same heat source was applied, velocity, temperature, magnetic Rayleigh number, and local Nusselt number in the enclosure were analyzed according to the magnetic field strength and obstacles. The highest heat transfer performance was obtained at 2000 kA/m of rhombus and magnetic field strength. Finally, the optimum point that has a higher heat transfer rate than the reference model was derived by modifying the strength of the magnetic field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In mesoscopic devices, the spin-resolved transport physics induced by Majorana zero mode (MZM) has attracted much attention. Here we study a system consisting of a quantum dot coupled to metallic leads and side-coupled to a local large spin and a topological superconductor wire hosting MZMs. The interplay of MZM and impurity (local large spin) is investigated. By using Hubbard operator Green's function method, we obtain an analytical result for retarded Green's function with finite U. Then we find that in the case of on-resonance and zero Coulomb interaction, the 1/2 signature of MZM at zero energy survives, but the number of peaks in spectral function is dependent on the local large spin. When S = integer, the peak numbers are 2S+3; when S = half-integer, the numbers are 2S+2. Moreover, fraction conductivity arises in the charge conductance at zero energy for S = integer. When Coulomb correlation arises, the peak numbers and heights in conductance are affected, and the MZM-induced symmetry of conductance peaks around zero energy is also destroyed. Our work shows that the interplay of local large spin and MZM generates some interesting results, which may provide additional fingerprints for the detection of MZM.© 2020We performed systematic density functional theory calculations to study the structural stability and magnetic properties of single transition metal adatoms on a WS2 monolayer. It was found that Re adatom takes the hollow site on WS2 and has a large perpendicular magnetic anisotropy energy (MAE) up to ~30 meV/atom. Electronic structure and rigid band model analyses revealed that this large MAE originates from the spin-orbital coupling interaction between the dxz and dyz orbitals in the spin down and through cross spin channels. This work provides a practical single-atom magnetic system for potential applications and gives useful insights for further developments.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Despite many efforts being devoted to simplify the analysis of Synchronous Reluctance Motors (SynRM), the use of analytical methods to calculate torque ripple in these machines remains an ongoing challenge. In this paper, the electromagnetic characteristics of a SynRM are obtained using the combined conformal mapping (CM) and magnetic equivalent circuit (MEC) method. The proposed combination makes it possible to take into account the effects of stator slots and rotor flux barriers (FBs) in modeling of the radial and tangential field components. This is accomplished by introducing virtual currents in the CM model to account for rotor potential drops due to the presence of FBs. These potential drops are calculated using the MEC model. Once specified, the field components are used to calculate the SynRM torque with three FBs. Finally, the accuracy of the proposed method is validated by comparison with finite element analysis results.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic needle probe method is a technique used to locally measure the magnetic state of a magnetic component. This concept has a rich conceptual history, but it has rarely been used in the industrial field. There are mainly two reasons for this: instrumentation limitations and inappropriate sizes of sensors’ geometries. The first limitation has been overcome recently due to large improvements in both the analog and digital electronic fields. In this study, the second limitation, size/geometry is addressed by printing the magnetic needle probe using conductive ink directly on the ferromagnetic element to be controlled. The resulting sensor exhibits a drastic volume reduction. Such improvements allow measurement of the magnetic state of a previously inaccessible magnetic lamination through a magnetic laminated core. This opens up the possibility of measuring in situ magnetic behavior and monitoring many electromagnetic devices such as electric transformers, AC/DC electric motors, or even real-time electromagnetic non-destructive testing of ferromagnetic steel components. Over the past few years, simulation approaches including space discretization methods: finite elements, finite differences, and boundary elements have been proposed to describe the internal behavior of magnetic lamination stacks but experimental results validating these simulations could not be realized due to the aforementioned limitations. The printed magnetic needle probe method (PMNPM) described in this paper can be used to collect such local information and to validate homogenization methods. Experimental validations are proposed by comparing the sum of the laminations magnetic induction, they are individually measured with the PMNPM method to calculate the average induction obtained from a surrounding coil.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In a flow channel we experimentally investigate the stability of the interface between a laminar flow of diamagnetic fluid, and a layer of ferrofluid, resting on top of it. This interface is locally perturbed by means of a bar oscillating with a driving frequency. Measuring the growth rate of the interfacial waves, we explore the stabilizing effect of a homogeneous magnetic field oriented in flow direction. A zero growth rate determines the critical flow velocity. The latter increases with the applied magnetic field and depends sensitively on the driving frequency. The results are described in part by an established, simple inviscid model.© 2020 The Authorsε-Fe2O3 has gained considerable interest due to its intriguing properties and great application potentials. In this work ε-(Fe1− xCrx)2O3 (x = 0, 0.03, 0.075) nanoparticles encapsulated in silica have been successfully prepared by sol–gel chemistry. Synchrotron diffraction confirms that the polar Pna21 structure of ε-Fe2O3 is robust against the substitution of Fe by Cr. The incorporation of chromium is accompanied by a softer magnetic behaviour, and also a gradual decrease in the ferromagnetic signal associated to the super-hard FM2 ferrimagnetic phase. While the Cr substitution has little impact on the low temperature incommensurate transition, it is found that Cr substitution shifts the super-hard and soft ferrimagnetic transitions (respectively, TN2 and TN1) to notably lower temperatures.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The trend in modern experimental physics of magnetic phenomena is the increasing complexity of experimental methods, or a combination of methods to study even well studied “classical” magnetic materials. The development of related sciences (materials science, chemistry, nanotechnology), as well as the emergence of modern highly informative laboratory and research complexes allows simultaneous analysis of both bulk and local magnetic properties on the same samples. At the same time, the samples are subject to increased requirements in terms of chemical purity and degree of structural perfection. The combination of these factors leads to the discovery of new properties of well-known magnetic materials. This is particularly noticeable in the case of heavy rare earth metals, where a high degree of purity and absence of impurities can lead to the appearance of new magnetic phases and phase transitions. It is important to note that the complexity of the experimental detection of some non-collinear magnetic phases causes the need for theoretical analysis and mathematical modelling of the fundamental possibility of the existence of a type of magnetic ordering in rare-earth metals in order to exclude the experimental error. In this paper we present the modeling of the experimental results of high purity single-crystalline samples of Tb and Ho [5,6] trying to find theoretical and phenomenological patters which explain the existence of certain magnetic phases in the series of heavy lanthanides.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we investigate the effect of spin-phonon coupling on continuum spin conductivity in the spin-1 quantum three-dimensional XY model with single-ion anisotropy in the cubic lattice and in the neighborhood of a quantum phase transition by using Schwinger bosons formalism. It is well known that there is a phase transition in the model from a Néel phase to the paramagnetic phase. Since the model with Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction plus single anisotropy term is a source of anomalous effects such as spin Hall effect, it is important to know the spin transport properties of this model.© 2020Rare-earth iron garnet thin films with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) have recently attracted a great deal of attention for spintronic applications. In this study, magnetic anisotropy of epitaxial garnet films was analyzed theoretically, and (YBiLuCa)3(FeGe)5O12 mono-crystalline films with PMA have been successfully grown with liquid phase epitaxial (LPE) method on Gd3Ga5O12 (GGG) substrates. Microstructural properties, chemical composition and magnetic properties of the epitaxial films were discussed in detail. We found that growth temperatures played a significant role in the uniaxial anisotropy of the epitaxial (YBiLuCa)3(FeGe)5O12 mono-crystalline films. Ferromagnetic resonance linewidth of (YBiLuCa)3(FeGe)5O12 films with thickness of 170 nm was 8.06 Oe@12 GHz, which indicated that the epitaxial (YBiLuCa)3(FeGe)5O12 mono-crystalline films had a great potential application in spintronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have combined two complementary techniques, element sensitive ex situ X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD) and in situ polarized neutron reflectivity (i-PNR), to determine the values of evolving magnetic moments obtained from a low symmetry system of hetero-epitaxial Fe monolayers (MLs), as a function of thickness. The samples were grown by magnetron sputtering on face-centered-cubic (fcc) Cu(001)/Si(001). Within experimental errors, we found a corroboration of the modulated moments from the XMCD and of the magnetic anisotropies from magnetization measurements with those obtained earlier from layer-by-layer i-PNR measurements. The modulation was attributed to initial island-like growth morphology assisted monolayer-magnetism during sputtering. Furthermore, analyzing the depth sensitive i-PNR profile of a bulk-like film, we developed a model characterized by monotonic magnetism involving collinear spins. The model is further described by a higher magnetization for the deeper layers, which decreases gradually for the upper layers before attaining saturation at its bulk value within a few MLs. This model contradicts the earlier proposed non-collinear model involving antiferromagnetic units, thus clarifying the long standing ambiguity in the coverage regime. The results have been compared with those existing, following the theoretical parameterized tight-binding model with satisfactory agreement. This study distinguishes the variation of monolayer-magnetism owing to the growth morphology from the layer-by-layer investigation vis-à-vis depth-profiling of bulk-like film. At the same time, it also promises the general possibility of depth-profiling using i-PNR in other complex multilayered systems on high flux neutron sources.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis paper demonstrates degradation of amorphous indium gallium zinc oxide thin-film transistors under AC current stress (ACS), which is unipolar AC drain bias applied with positive static gate-bias stress. Under ACS, a severe hump occurs in current-voltage curves; the phenomenon causes a large negative shift similar to degradation caused by positive gate-bias stress (PGS) and a large positive shift by DC-current stress (DCS). In a saturation measurement, the degradation caused by factors in source region had the greatest effect on the hump phenomenon; this result confirms that hump characteristics are caused by charge trapping rather than by defect-state generation by impact ionization. The changes of threshold voltage shifts were extracted at two current levels, then analyzed by comparing with the results of PGS, DCS, and synchronized AC gate and drain bias stress. Positive shift in high-current level was larger after ACS (+3.80 V) than after PGS (+3.48 V) because current-caused Joule-heat thermally energized additional electrons to be trapped in front channel region. Negative shift in low-current level was larger after ACS (−2.42 V) than after DCS (−1.32 V). Under DCS, the amount of positively-charged species decreased because of neutralization of oxygen vacancies. The flow of current supports electron to be captured in ionized oxygen vacancies and the amount of negative shift is saturated at specific value (−1.32 V) under DCS. The characteristic time constant of stretched exponential curve-fitting reveals clear saturation tendency.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of nanocrystalline Fe77Si10B9Cu1Nb3- xAlx (x = 0 and 1) alloys have been investigated and their structural and electromagnetic parameters have been quantitatively studied by X-ray diffraction, transmission electron microscopy and Mössbauer spectra under one-step and two-step annealing processes. The nanocrystalline structure consists of single α-Fe(Si) phase embedded in a residual amorphous phase. Both saturation magnetic flux density (Bs) and permeability (μ) of the nanocrystalline alloys are increased by substituting 1 at% Al for Nb and one-step annealing, from Bs = 1.41 T to 1.47 T and from μ = 18,000 to 23,000 at 1 kHz, respectively. The two-step annealing has little effect on the Bs, coercivity (Hc) and grain size of the nanocrystalline alloys, but greatly improves the μ of the Al-doped alloy, reaching up to 28,000 at 1 kHz. The improved μ can be attributed to the increased magnetic moment and exchange stiffness constant, homogeneous chemical structure and reduced magnetostriction. The Al-doped nanocrystalline alloy with high Bs, high μ, low Hc and good frequency stability are good candidates for magnetic shielding pieces of wireless charging.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.According to the strategy of isostructural alloying, the magnetostructural coupling was realized by doping appropriate stable hexagonal Ni2In-type FeCoGe alloy into MnNiGe systems, which results in the achievement of large magnetization difference and giant low field magnetic entropy change (ΔSm) in the isostructurally alloyed (MnNiGe)-(FeCoGe) systems. Giant ΔSm as much as −51.3 J∙kg-1K−1 at 296 K and −56.2 J∙kg-1K−1 at 275 K under 5 T magnetic field have been observed in (MnNiGe)0.91-(FeCoGe)0.09 and (MnNiGe)0.89-(FeCoGe)0.11 alloys, respectively. Moreover, the ΔSm of (MnNiGe)0.89-(FeCoGe)0.11 alloy are reached −25.6 J∙kg-1K−1 (2 T) and −43.6 J∙kg-1K−1(3 T), respectively. The observed values of -ΔSM under the magnetic field of 2 T and 3 T are larger than most of the reported MnMX(M = Co, Ni and X = Ge, Si) based systems.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The objective of this study is to co-integrate multiple digital and analog functions together within CMOS by developing a universal magnetic tunneling junction stack (MTJ) capable of realizing logic, memory, and analog functions, within a single baseline technology. This will allow monolithic heterogeneous integration, fast and low-power processing, and high integration density, particularly useful for Internet of Things (IoT) platforms. This unique spintransfer-torque (STT) MTJ is called Multifunctional Standardized Stack (MSS). This paper presents the progress regarding memory, oscillator and sensor functionalities targeted for the technology. We show that a single magnetic stack deposition can be used to obtain these three functionalities on the same wafer.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We consider the influence of the magnetic cation (Ni2+) substitution on the structural and magnetic properties of Ba0.5Sr1.5Zn2-xNixFe12O22 (x = 0.8, 1, 1.5) powders. The powders were synthesized by using the citric-acid sol–gel auto-combustion method. Their ac-magnetization was measured in an ac-magnetic field with an amplitude of 10 Oe and a frequency of 1000 Hz to detect any magnetic phase transitions. A strong influence of the Ni-substitution on the magnetic properties was thus observed. A magnetic phase transition from a helicoidal to a ferrimagnetic spin order at 284 K was observed for the sample Ba0.5Sr1.5Zn0.5Ni1.5Fe12O22. The magnetic-phase transition from conical spin order to hellicoidal spin order was registered at 149 K and 177 K for x = 0.8 and x = 1, respectively. Triple hysteresis loops were observed for all samples at 4.2 K, which indicates the presence of two kinds of ferromagnetic states with different magnetization values.© 2020The microstructure and microwave absorptivity of cobalt ferrite, prepared using different amounts of polyvinylpyrrolidone (PVP) by a facile solvothermal treatment, were investigated systematically. Results showed that the grain size increased as the PVP content increased. However, the hollowness of cobalt ferrite increased initially and then decreased and the hollowness was maximal when the amount of PVP was 40 g. The material showed only cobalt ferrite phase, irrespective of PVP content. The crystallization degree increased with increase in PVP content. Microwave absorption improved significantly due to incorporation of PVP. The material showed excellent microwave absorption performance with 40 g of PVP. For this sample with a thickness of 2.10 mm, the minimum reflection loss was −47.24 dB at 11.52 GHz and reflection loss below −10 dB was 4.56 GHz (10.4–14.96 GHz). Therefore, this absorber has good potential as microwave absorption material with low density, wide effective bandwidth, and strong absorptivity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we propose a measurement procedure to estimate the magnetic moment orientation (MMO) of a dipole. Theoretical analysis indicates that magnetic field in each orthogonal direction Bi (i = x, y, z) is found to be a superposition of its three basic elements Bij (i = x, y, z and j = 1, 2, 3) along certain direction, allowing the obtained dipole signature to be decomposed of 9 basic elements. An orthogonal energy ratio (OER) algorithm is used to infer the MMO by calculating the signal energy distribution along each axis. A standard OER database is developed which provides a reference to be compared with the measured OER. The one having the smallest variance is determined as the estimated MMO. Owing to space symmetric property, it generally introduces 8 possible solutions. Then, a mathematic method is presented to define the common characteristics of the magnetic signature in the 8 octants, which is able to identify the octant of unknown target based on detected Bi field. As a result, the unique MMO can be estimated. The experimental results show good estimation accuracy for the dipole orientation with average error of 3.5°. In particular, the algorithm is independent of changing CPA and velocity, which is demonstrated in simulation and experiment.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Laser-induced magnetization dynamics was investigated in Co/Pt/Co trilayer, with 1 nm thick Co-sublayers, as a function of Pt-spacer layer thickness (dPt) using time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr effect. The magnetization precession parameters: frequency (f), amplitude (A) and effective damping parameter (αeff) dependencies on the external magnetic field (H) were determined as a function of dPt. Three different regions of Pt layer thickness: 0–1.3 nm, 1.3–2.5 nm, and 2.5–4 nm, denoted as regions I, II, and III, respectively, exhibiting distinctly different magnetic properties, were distinguished. It is found that as dPt increases reorientation of Co-magnetizations from in-plane to perpendicular direction occurs at dPt around 1.2 nm. For dPt>2.5 nm magnetization reorientation from parallel to the orthogonal directions due to mixed anisotropies in Co-layers appears. It is found that in the whole dPt range single magnetization precession frequency occurs, despite different effective magnetic anisotropies of Co-sublayers. Simulation of the magnetization precession parameters was performed in an effective magnetic layer model. We found that the observed A(H) behavior is well simulated within the model in region I and III. The αeff(H) correlations with A(H) in different dPt regions are discussed.© 2020Magnetism in Mn1.25Sb is discussed using the combined results of measured structural and magnetic properties and spin-polarized density functional theory calculations. Mn1.25Sb crystallizes in NiAs-type hexagonal structure, where the Mn-atoms occupy the 2a-sites and 2d-sites. The lattice parameter values are a = b = 4.2134 (1) Å and c = 5.6890 (4) Å. From the dc-magnetization measurements, it was understood that the compound exhibits a typical R-type ferrimagnetic behavior. The total magnetic moment follows predominantly T3/2 behavior up to ~60 K and predominantly T2 behavior above 90 K. The values of critical exponents (β = 0.60 ± 0.01, γ = 1.38 ± 0.04 and δ = 3.32 ± 0.01) indicate that the magnetization conforms to the mean-field theory as well as to the 3D- Heisenberg model with local or short-range magnetic interactions. From the DFT calculations, it was understood that the magnetic moment of Mn-atom at the 2d-site (μMn2d =4.09μB) is aligned antiparallel to the magnetic moment of the Mn-atom at the 2a-site (μMn2a =4.47μB). The exchange interaction strength parameter (J) is found to be positive for μMn2a -μMn2a and negative for the μMn2a -μMn2d confirming the presence of competing magnetic interactions in the system.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we present the results of low frequency noise (LFN) characterization of n-MOSFET. We are going to show that the device treated with the new anneal step at the end of the process shows outstanding LFN performance. Results demonstrate that the new implemented process change can improve the noise level up to ∼6x. The LFN variability of the device under test improved up to ∼2x.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The direct sonoelectrochemical method is a new combination of electrochemical and ultrasonic synthesis, in which an iron rod is used as both an ultrasound probe and a sacrificial anode. In the specified pulse of time, the iron oxide nanoparticles are synthesized during the electrolysis process, and in the subsequent time pulse, ultrasound radiation dissociates the Fe3O4 magnetic nanoparticles from the surface. In this paper, iron oxide nanoparticles have been synthesized and characterized by conventional electrochemical and direct sonoelectrochemical methods under low and high current density. The results showed that the use of the direct sonoelectrochemical method could increase the synthesis rate up to 15-fold without altering the purity and phase of the nanoparticles. In the direct sonoelectrochemical method, smaller nanoparticles have been produced. The saturation magnetization in the sonoelectrochemical method is 24.9% and 7.9% more than the conventional electrochemical method at high and low current densities, respectively. Also, the coercivity value in the sonoelectrochemical method is 40.27% and 64.54% lower than the conventional electrochemical method at high and low current densities, respectively.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the electron magnetic resonance (EMR) spectra of annealed Ni50Mn35.5In14.5 Heusler alloy ribbons within the temperature range 240 K⩽T⩽360 K are investigated. In the paramagnetic region, the temperature dependence of the EMR linewidth is governed by the Korringa relaxation process. The g value exhibits a positive shift, which indicates a non-bottleneck regime. The temperature dependence of inverse integrated intensity exhibits a Curie-Weiss like behaviour with TC equals 298 K. The effects of annealing on the magnetic and structural ordering are discussed. Annealing increases the Curie temperature and changes the first-order phase transition temperature. Additionally, the low-field microwave absorption peak appears below the magnetic ordering temperature.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We propose an imaging system for magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) using multiple magnetic sensors based on amplitude modulation. The system was used to obtain two-dimensional images of two MNP samples spaced 15 mm apart at a depth of 30 mm. An AC magnetic field was used at an operating frequency of 5.4 kHz, and a third-harmonic signal generated by the MNP samples was detected using 16 pickup coils. To increase the position information of the MNP samples, the amplitude of the AC magnetic field was changed from 0.24 to 4.8 mT. The third-harmonic signals were subsequently analyzed using nonnegative least squares to image the MNP samples. The results show that the positions of the two MNP samples were estimated with good accuracy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We study a quantum-state transfer protocol across a 1D XY spin-1/2 channel featuring on-site magnetic field distribution following the aperiodic Sarma potential. The scheme is based upon weakly connecting the sender and receiver to the channel at each end. Our results show that such aperiodicity allows for high-fidelity performance as a band of extended states near the band center is created and the outer parts of the system are properly tuned with it. We also evaluate the generation of bipartite entanglement shared among the communicating parties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effect of surface roughness in thin film magnetics on magnetic susceptibility and Dynamic Magnetic Hysteresis (DMH) loops are investigated using Brown's continuous diffusion of magnetic spins model. The magnetic relaxation time of the magnetic thin films is determined by regressing the two-mode approximation for the magnetic susceptibility onto experimental data obtained for Ni45Fe55. There is a moderate linear correlation between the magnetic relaxation time and the surface roughness to the thickness (SRT) ratio. The area of the DMH loops and the non-linear dynamic magnetic susceptibility strongly depend on the magnetic relaxation time and the SRT of the films. The thin films exhibit a strong linear relationship between the coercivity and the SRT ratio, along with a strong logarithmic dependence of the dynamic magnetic susceptibility on the SRT ratio.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Motivated by the recent proposal of Bosonic Dirac materials (BDM), we revisited the Ising model on a honeycomb lattice in the presence of the longitudinal and transverse fields. We applied linear spin-wave theory to obtain the magnon dispersion and its Bosonic Dirac points (BDP). At the vicinity of these BDP, the magnon spectrum becomes linear and its crossing bands are robust against a weak impurity, exactly as occur in the fermionic case. We studied the influence of a weak disorder potential over the dispersive edge states and the BDP. Also, using Effective Field Theory, we calculated the quantum and thermal fluctuations over the ground state of the system. The fine-tuning of the fields reveals to control the localization of the BDP. To verify this experimentally, we suggest the compound Ba2CoTeO6.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The paper deals with the application of the artificial bee colony (ABC) method for hysteresis parameters identification. For the first time, the ABC method will be applied on hysteresis model optimization. For this purpose, two hysteresis models are tested: the first is based on a physical magnetic material behavior, which is Jiles-Atherton and the second is simpler, Fröhlich hysteresis model built on mathematical considerations. This method's robustness will be assessed, by comparing the experimental signals to model results.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The efficient electrical control of the magnetic states of antiferromagnets is one of the main focus in antiferromagnetic spintronics. In this work, the voltage-controlled magnetic anisotropy (VCMA) effect in two representative antiferromagnets L10-type MnPt and MnPd thin films has been investigated by employing first-principles calculations. Our results indicate that both of the MnPt and MnPd films show in-plane magnetic anisotropy and the magnetic easy axis points either along [1 0 0] or [1 1 0] direction depending on the film thickness. The applied electric field in the range of −0.3 V/Å and + 0.3 V/Å (vacuum as dielectric) leads to the change of magnetocrystalline anisotropy of both films at the order of tens of μJ/m2. Especially, for MnPt film with thickness of two unit cells on Pt(0 0 1), it shows that the moderate electric field is able to switch the in-plane magnetic easy axis between [1 0 0] and [1 1 0] directions. For MnPd thin films, the VCMA effect shows generally linear dependence on the electric field and the VCMA coefficients are estimated in the range of 2.7 to 22.6 fJ/V/m. Our calculation results may stimulate future investigations on the VCMA effect of metallic antiferromagnetic films and pave the possible applications in memory device.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present theoretical and experimental investigations on the electronic and magnetic properties of the Fe5-xCoxSiB2 alloys (x = 0, 0.5, 1.0, 1.5, 2.5 and 5). Theoretical calculations show the dependence of the magnetic properties (magnetic moments, magneto-crystalline anisotropy, exchange-coupling parameters, Curie temperature) on the Fe/Co ratio and preferential occupation of Co atoms for 16l crystallographic site. The spontaneous magnetization as a function of temperature was measured and fitted using the Kuz'min function and modified Arrott-Belov plots. The first procedure shows the decrease of the spontaneous magnetization at 0 K with Co content, with obtained values between 8.79 µB/f.u. (x = 0) and 5.97 µB/f.u. (x = 1.5), in agreement with the theoretical calculations. Also, by thermo-magnetic measurements fitted using Kuz'min function Curie temperatures (Tc) have been obtained, which decrease with the Co content, from 845 K (x = 0) to 667 K (x = 1.5). According to the theoretical exchange-coupling parameters calculated for both Fe spins, the decrease of the Tc is mainly related to the decrease of the Fe 16l–Fe 16l exchange interaction. Moreover, the evolution of the magneto-crystalline anisotropy energy (MAE) with Co content shows good agreement between theoretical and experimental investigations. The 3d magnetism character is found to evolve from well localized behavior in the Fe5SiB2 compound, featured by critical exponents typical of Ising systems, to more delocalized upon Co for Fe substitution with larger range interactions and modified critical exponents. This study provides an insight regarding the influence of the Co doping on the stoichiometry and on the magnetic properties of the Fe5-xCoxSiB2 alloys, which have been previously suggested as good candidates for obtaining rare-earth free permanent magnets with enhanced MAE and higher coercivity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we follow up on the pioneering work of Jean-Yves Bigot and Eric Beaurepaire about disentangling microscopic properties in femtosecond magnetization dynamics such as spin and orbital momenta (Boeglin et al., 2010). To this end, we utilize spin-resolved photoemission to distinguish spin polarization and exchange splitting as essential magnetic properties in the ultrafast demagnetization of thin Fe films on W(1 1 0). In laser photoemission (hνProbe=6.2 eV) we find an ultrafast breakdown of the spin polarization after exciting the system with 70-fs pump laser-pulses at hνPump=1.6 eV. Measuring a minority-spin surface resonance close to the Fermi level at 0.12 Å−1 in Γ‾-H‾ direction, we establish a band mirroring effect similar to the ones observed in Eich et al. (2017) and Gort et al. (2018).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present a joint experimental and computational study of the trinuclear basic carboxylate iron complex FeIII2FeIIO(CH3CO2)6(H2O)3, which is a model system for understanding photoinduced ultrafast spin dynamics in magnetic iron-based transition metal oxides. We have carried out femtosecond optical transient absorption spectroscopy of molecules in solution at room-temperature exciting either at 400 or 520 nm and observed a long-lived excited-state absorption (ESA) signal from ca. 400–670 nm. The ESA signal is composed of several broad un-resolved bands at 405, 440 and 530 nm. The decay dynamics are complicated and three exponentials with corresponding decay time constants of τ1=360±30 fs, τ2=5.3±0.6 ps, τ3=65±5 ps and a constant offset (τ4>500 ps) were needed to fit the data over the full wavelength range. The data indicate that the lowest excited state is populated within the duration of the excitation pulse (<120 fs). Highly correlated coupled-cluster calculations can satisfactorily reproduce the experimental vibrational spectrum and highlight the role of the μ3-oxo bridge connecting the Fe ions to create a highly correlated ground-state and identify the excited state as having a mixture of both charge-transfer and ligand-field/d-orbital characters.© 2020The manipulation of spin waves has been essential for the application of spin waves. In this article, we report a Fresnel lens for focusing the magnetostatic surface spin waves on a ferromagnetic film and verify its propagation characteristics by micromagnetic simulation. By coding the phase profile of Fresnel lens on the excitation source, a clear focusing point of the spin waves is observed according to simulation results. Additionally, the focal length can be tuned effectively with external magnetic fields. This work can extend the application scenario of spin waves.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fe-Si-B-Cu-Nb nanocrystalline alloys have been commercially applied at higher frequencies. However, few research works are focused on improving high-frequency magnetic properties for these alloys. In this paper, we reported crystallization behavior, soft magnetic properties and permeability spectra for silicon-rich Fe72.5Si16B7 Cu1Nb3.5-xMx (where × = 1.5 and M = Nb, P, Mo, V) nanocrystalline alloys prepared by crystallization from amorphous precursors. Through the copper roller melting spinning technique, we can attain complete amorphous alloy ribbons when M is 1.5 at.% Nb, P or Mo. After annealing at appropriate temperatures, by comparison with the alloy of M = 1.5 at.% Nb, the alloy with addition of 1.5 at.% P shows a lower coercivity (Hc = 0.8 ~ 1.5 A/m), and a higher effective permeability (µe) at 1 kHz–20 kHz (µe = 116,600 at 1 kHz) while the µe gets much lower at 30 kHz–200 kHz; the alloy with addition of 1.5 at.% Mo exhibits a larger Hc (Hc = 2.9 ~ 3.4 A/m), and a lower µe at 1 kHz − 20 kHz but then the µe becomes higher at 30 kHz–200 kHz (µe = 31,000 at 100 kHz).© 2020Spin-torque ferromagnetic resonance (ST-FMR) is a powerful tool to evaluate spin-torque efficiency (ξFMR), the efficiency of current-induced torque in metallic bilayers consisting of ferromagnetic and nonmagnetic materials. In general, ξFMR can be evaluated from the amplitude ratio between symmetric and anti-symmetric components of the ST-FMR spectrum. However, the ratio is also affected by an unnecessary magnetic field owing to the asymmetric alternating current flow used to excite the ST-FMR. In this article, we demonstrate that ξFMR can be precisely evaluated from the full-angular dependence of the ST-FMR spectrum even though the distribution of alternating current flow is highly asymmetric.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates measurement methods of iron losses of asymmetric minor hysteresis loops of electrical steel sheets by means of a single sheet tester. As inverter-driven electric machines have been increased, consideration of harmonic iron losses is indispensable to design highly-efficient electric machines. In general, measurement of iron losses of asymmetric minor hysteresis loops has been carried out by using a fluxmeter to detect a dc component in addition to ac components measured by means of a B-coil because the asymmetric minor loops are dc-biased. However, the fluxmeter has a drift problem which results in inaccurate evaluation of harmonic iron losses. Therefore, the distorted waveform method which adopts only ac measurement is conceived. Furthermore, the dc-biased method is improved by estimating the dc components from a normal magnetization curve, which is obtained by connecting tips of symmetric hysteresis loops. In order to demonstrate their effectiveness, the iron losses of asymmetric minor hysteresis loops of non- and high permeability grain-oriented electrical steel sheets are measured up to the high flux density region.© 2020In this work, Fe/ZnO soft magnetic composite (SMC) is prepared successfully by sol-gel method combined with a pyrolysis process. Formation mechanism and effect of annealing on magnetic properties for the Fe/ZnO SMCs are studied in detail. The results show that Fe/zinc acetate hydrogel mixture will be decomposed into the Fe/ZnO composites by heating above 340 °C. And ZnO is well coated on the surfaces of Fe particles. The Fe/ZnO composite compact has lower total core loss and better frequency stability of magnetic permeability compared with pure Fe compact. In addition, annealing treatment shows an enhanced effect on the magnetic properties for the Fe/ZnO composite compact such as reduced coercivity and increased permeability. The annealed Fe/ZnO SMCs can keep stable magnetic permeability (26) from 50 Hz to 10 kHz, high magnetic induction (1.65 T) and a relatively low core loss of 91.11 kW/m3 measured under a magnetic flux density of 30 mT at 10 kHz. Therefore, the Fe/ZnO soft magnetic composites prepared by the above-mentioned method provide a great potential application in electromagnetic conversion equipment.© 2020Magnetoelastic anisotropy is one of the most essential and fundamental characteristics in the magnetic anisotropy, which holds the core application and broad prospects in advanced flexible magnetic devices. Here, we determined the stress-coefficient of magnetoelastic anisotropy of Fe, Co and Ni thin films deposited on flexible polyvinylidene fluoride (PVDF) substrate. Owing to an anisotropic thermal expansion of PVDF, a uniaxial stress can be effectively generated and transferred to the magnetic films in-situ by changing the temperature. The magnetic anisotropy constants at different compressive stresses were quantitatively investigated with anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR). Through fitting the AMR curves at different compressive stresses, the stress-coefficient of magnetoelastic anisotropy of Fe, Co and Ni thin films were determined to be (6.31±0.19)×103 erg cm−3 GPa−1, (2.71±0.13)×104 erg cm−3 GPa−1 and (2.46±0.19)×105 erg cm−3 GPa−1, respectively. These values are basic magnetic parameter for magnetic elements, which are helpful for evaluating the performance of magnetic devices under flexible/stretchable conditions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The present work investigates the magnetodielectric behavior of ex-situ combustion derived 7BaTiO3@3ferrite and 3ferrite@7BaTiO3 multiferroic composites. Three different ferrites, such as CoFe2O4, ZnFe2O4, and Co0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4, have been selected for the preparation of multiferroic composites. Distinct microstructural features were observed in 7BaTiO3@3ferrite and 3ferrite@7BaTiO3 composites. X-ray diffraction study confirmed the presence of hexagonal and tetragonal BaTiO3 in 3ferrite@7BaTiO3 composites. Plate-like and spherical BaTiO3 grains were observed in these composites. However, only spherical or polyhedral BaTiO3 grains were found in 7BaTiO3@3ferrite composites, as confirmed from EDS mapping. Also, plate-like BaFe12O19 and polyhedral ferrite grains were detected in all composites. The presence of BaFe12O19 and its effect on magnetic and dielectric behavior of composites was also analyzed in this work. Maxwell-Wagner polarization phenomenon due to charge depletion at the BaTiO3-ferrite interface was found to be prominent in 7BaTiO3@3ferrite composites because of the maximum connectivity of ferrite phases. The main factors for the magnetocapacitance response in the present systems are due to the combined effects of interface-dominated magnetoresistance, magnetostriction of ferrites and microstructure of composites. The variation in magnetocapacitance response of these multiferroic composites may be suitable for potential applications in the field of sensors and devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this research, Ni45Fe55 coatings were deposited on Si and printed circuit board (PCB) substrates using the pulse reverse plating technique. Magnetic characterization of the samples showed that the film deposited on PCB had a poor in-plane anisotropy with a coercivity of about 1.5 Oe along the hard axis. The permeability was found to be around 250 at 10 MHz which is quite low. In contrast, the coating deposited on Si showed excellent in-plane anisotropy with a much higher permeability. Microstructural and chemical composition analysis showed that both coatings were identical. However, AFM measurements showed a very significant difference in the roughness of each substrate. Consequently, it was decided to planarise the PCB surface using Benzocyclobutene (BCB). Magnetic characterization showed that after planarization, there was a well-defined easy and hard axis, the permeability increased to 700 and the coercivity dropped significantly to 0.4 Oe which were targets in this investigation.© 2020One of the persisting goals in the field of femtomagnetism is to study and understand the light-induced ultrafast magnetization dynamics of magnetic model systems and multi-compound materials. The latter offers the intriguing opportunity to tune and control the static as well as the transient magnetic properties of the materials according to the desired field of application. Here, we focus on the ultrafast magnetization dynamics of the technologically relevant FePt alloy doped with different concentrations of manganese (Mn) atoms. We find that the demagnetization time constant τm of FePt decreases significantly upon Mn doping coinciding with a more energy efficient demagnetization process, i.e., the required laser fluence for a certain quenching of the magnetization reduces with increasing Mn concentration. Even more interesting, the characteristic demagnetization time vs. quenching curve does not reveal a single-peak curve as expected from the microscopic three-temperature model, but exhibits a double-hump signature. This peculiar behavior can be explained by the existence of a depth dependent variation of the Mn concentration in the FePt host material. It is caused by the sample preparation procedure using rapid thermal annealing as demonstrated experimentally by layer-sensitive magneto-optical Kerr effect experiments and secondary ion mass spectrometry. Our findings underline the crucial role of the sample preparation procedure for the transient magnetization dynamics of complex magnetic alloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The rapid development of Ce-based magnets has promoted the utilization of rare earth (RE) resources, yet the performance of Ce-based magnets is often undermined due to the easy formation of CeFe2 phase with a cubic MgCu2-type structure. In order to eliminate the CeFe2 phase, the La substitution on Ce in (LaxCe1-x)33Fe66B (x = 0,0.1,0.2,0.3,0.4,0.5) alloys is performed in this paper. It is found that partial replacement of Ce by La suppresses the emergence of the CeFe2 laves phase and promotes the formation of (La, Ce)2Fe14B phase. The inhibition mechanism is ascribed to the reduced phase stability of (Ce, La)Fe2 phase due to the partial replacement Ce by La, which is confirmed by our experiments and DFT (density functional theory) calculation results. Moreover, the La atom is prone to enter the lattice of (La, Ce)2Fe14B phase and expands the unit cell. Both the Curie temperature (Tc) and the saturation magnetization (Ms) of the alloy show a noticeable improvement because of this volume effect, which is consistent with our DFT calculations.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The annealing effects of NdFeB magnets were usually related to the eutectic liquid segregation from junction to grain boundary regions, atoms solid diffusion at grain boundary regions or structure transition of junction phases. In this work, the microstructure and annealing effects of sintered NdFeB magnets with eutectic Pr-Cu boundary additions (0, 5 and 10 wt%) have been systematically investigated. There were two kinds of boundary phases (Cu-lower phase: fcc REO2; Cu-higher phase: h-RE2O3) in Pr-Cu processed magnets. Pr-Cu showed no positive influence on the coercivity of as-sintered magnets and the first-step annealing at 900 °C followed by quenching was also useless. The best annealing temperature (480 °C) for Pr-Cu processed magnets was slightly higher than the lowest eutectic temperature (476 °C). Microstructural investigations demonstrated that the 480 °C annealing showed no influence on the structure transition of boundary phases but changed their distribution patterns. The dominant annealing effect was the formation of strong exchange-decoupling grain boundary phases (GBPs) which were originated from the eutectic liquid segregation. The repeated heating to 900 °C followed by quenching/furnace cooling for optimal annealed (900 + 480 °C) magnet demonstrated reversible eutectic liquid segregation. Annealing under the lowest eutectic temperature (460 °C) was harmful which indicated that the atoms solid diffusion mechanism was not accessible in Pr-Cu processed magnets.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Since Ca2+ is related to a highly versatile intracellular signal to regulate many different cellular processes, the role of Ca2+ and its concentration in red blood cells (RBCs) are very important. Accordingly, in this study, we have elucidated the relationship between pulsed magnetic field (PMF) and intracellular Ca2+ level to understand how PMF affects oxidative stressed RBCs. In addition, the effect of verapamil on RBCs in Ca2+ level, compared to the effect of PMF was investigated because verapamil, as a reducing agent, blocks Ca2+ influx into RBCs. Tert-butyl hydroperoxide (tBHP) was used to induce oxidative stress in RBCs with various concentrations of 0.1 to 400 mM. Our PMF stimulator has the maximum intensity of 0.27 T at a transition time of 102 μs with pulse intervals of 1 Hz. Our result showed that Ca2+ level is remarkably decreased in RBCs treated verapamil, RBCs exposed to PMF after tBHP(0.1 mM) treatment, and RBCs treated tBHP(0.1 mM) after PMF exposure, respectively. This means that PMF not only reduces Ca2+ level of inner RBC effectively but also blocks inhibiting Ca2+ pump ATPase activity. Also it seems that PMF appears to act similar to reducing agent. For hemolysis change in oxidative stressed RBCs with or without PMF, using western blot and gel analysis, it is observed that hemolysis declines in control RBCs and tBHP(0.1 mM)-treated RBCs exposed to PMF, and in verapamil treated sample. The RBC deformability (RBCD) was also improved after PMF exposure. Therefore, the results of the present study support that PMF gives RBCs positive effect consistently in Ca2+ level and plays a role in preventing RBC hemolysis from oxidative stress and improving RBCD. In conclusion, our study suggests a possibility to use PMF as a new modality in improving circulatory regulation in hemodynamic derangements in disease. We need to optimize PMF intensity and stimulated duration for clinical use.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates differential and incremental permeability in non-destructive testing application, evaluated by two different technologies, 1) using a ‘’yoke probe head’’ principal, via a surrounding coil; and 2) via a local receiver coil situated over the sample. The detected signals are simulated using 3D non-linear finite element method. The dynamic vector hysteresis nature of the ferromagnetic part is considered. The incremental permeability is calculated analytically and the profile is compared to measurement data. The FEM computed signals of both NDT technologies are compared to the experimental results, and show good agreement.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.With purpose to investigate influence of magnetically non-active metal layers on the Faraday effect in multilayer Ferromagnetic/Normal metal films, dependences of the Faraday rotation angles of the light polarization plane on magnetic field have been studied in multilayer [Co/Cu] nanofilms. It was revealed that the Faraday rotation φ varies with thickness of the Cu layers dCu. This φ(dCu) dependence consists of the monotonic component, namely a gradual rise of the angle with increase of dCu, and the non-monotonic one represented by two minima. The monotonic changes of the Faraday rotation were satisfactory described in frames of the effective medium method. Two minima are explained with the Co layer's fragmentation due to influence of size electron quantization in the Cu layers on formation of Co clusters during deposition of the films.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Multiphase microwave dielectrics with high electrical quality and adjustable thermal stability of electrical properties have been investigated on the basis of barium polytitanates. The nature of high Q-factor and the opportunity to manage the thermal stability of multiphase systems is explained. Composite resonance elements based on high-quality multiphase dielectric materials and ferromagnetic film have been developed. It is shown that composite resonators are characterized by high Q-factor and the ability to control the resonant frequency by a magnetic field, which allows them to be used in various tunable microwave devices.© 2020 The AuthorThe concept of an effective nuclear magnetic field under Zeeman splitting conditions, also called the truncated field is presented. It provides an alternative description of nuclear magnetism of the polarized spin systems and gives a clear geometrical picture of internuclear interactions showing and elucidating their anisotropic character. This simple approach gives results entirely consistent with the conventional tensorial formalism, which appears to be a direct consequence of the truncated field symmetry. Although, the model entirely relies on classical electromagnetism, it provides an elegant explanation of the dipolar Hamiltonian structure and thus it can be easily adapted to the theory of nuclear magnetic resonance.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A comparative study of the magnetic and transport properties of three Dy-In intermetallic compounds, namely DyIn3, Dy5In3 and Dy3In, is reported. DyIn3 has cubic crystal structure; on the other hand, Dy5In3 and Dy3In crystallize in tetragonal structure, albeit with different space groups. DyIn3 orders antiferromagnetically below TN = 23 K, while Dy5In3 and Dy3In show ferromagnetic-like ground state with much higher ordering temperatures (119 and 125 K respectively). The ferromagnetic compounds show significant magneto-caloric effect around their respective Curie temperatures. On the other hand, the magneto-caloric effect in DyIn3 is low but associated with the change in sign around TN. All the samples show small magneto-resistance, and it is found to be positive in case of DyIn3 at 5 K. The signature of metamagnetic transition in DyIn3 is visible in the magneto-caloric and magneto-resistance data. Efforts have been made to account the observed magnetic phenomena based on Dy concentration and Dy-Dy bond distance in these three compositions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effects of Fe substitution on Mn site of Mn2Sn compound was investigated by means of scanning electron microscopy with X-ray energy dispersive spectrometer, X-ray diffraction, magnetization and magnetocaloric measurements. The produced Mn2−yFeySn series (0.50 ≤ y ≤ 1.75) presented two phases, a major non-stoichiometric Mn2−xSn and a minor Mn3Sn, respectively, with Fe content replacing Mn in each phase. The lattice parameters a and c of Mn2−xSn and Mn3Sn phases decrease approximately linearly with Fe concentration while their transition temperatures increase covering a wide temperature range from 177 K to 546 K (major phase TC1) and 260 K to 704 K (minor phase TC2) resulting in alloys with two distinct values of TC. The magnetization measurements show a ferromagnetic coupling and saturation magnetization increases along the series. The heat flux analyses determined second order of magnetic transitions and magnetocaloric effect was calculated with |ΔS| around 1 J/kg.K. The cooling power was estimated in 85 J/kg. Both values were for µ0ΔH = 2 T. Thereby, for technological devices which have their efficient improved using layered materials, Mn2−yFeySn alloys are valid candidates since the association of its properties allow to yield a powerful magnetic and magnetocaloric material, and, besides, they are low cost, non-toxic, absent of rare-earth and easy to manufacture.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Motor core losses are usually evaluated as the total loss minus known losses, including copper and mechanical losses. However, it is difficult to identify the main cause of core losses based on this evaluation method. In our previous study, we proposed a method for directly evaluating core loss distribution based on heat measurements using a thermographic camera. In this paper, we examine the reliability of thermal measurements using a device that can simultaneously measure core loss both by the general magnetic method and by the thermal measurement method. In the comparison method, the magnetic loss and thermal measurements are conducted simultaneously using an open magnetic path single sheet tester that permits simultaneous direct imaging of a sample with a thermographic camera, and the core loss values are compared and examined. We demonstrate a good agreement between the thermal and magnetic measurement below 10% difference for flux densities higher than 1T.© 2020 The AuthorsWe developed a single and compact fully-loaded waveguide system to characterize the electromagnetic properties of ferrites. A standard characterization procedure with four steps to increasing accuracy is proposed. A preliminary complex permittivity was extracted using the Nicolson-Ross-Weir method in the absence of the bias, while a preliminary saturation magnetization was determined by the ferromagnetic resonant frequency in the presence of the bias. Based on these preliminary data, a suitable bias that guarantees minimum errors can be chosen. Finally, we can retrieve the exact ferrimagnetic parameters, including the saturation magnetization and the linewidth under the consideration of the modal effect and the correction of the intrinsic magnetization. Four samples with distinctive electromagnetic characteristics were tested, and the results agree well with the HFSS simulations and the specifications offered by the vendors.© 2020 Elsevier LtdTunnel Field Effect Transistors (TFETs) are known to be compromised by higher order processes that downgrade their performance compared to ballistic projections. Using a quasi-analytical model that extends the chemistry based Simmons equation to include finite temperature effects, potential variations and scattering, we exhibit that non-idealities like trap-assisted tunneling and Auger generation can explain the observed performance discrepancy. In particular, Auger generation is the dominant leakage mechanism in TFETs at low trap densities. Our studies suggest that possible ways of reducing Auger generation rate are reducing source carrier concentration and increasing the valence band transport effective mass of the source material. In this paper, we specifically investigate the impact of variations of these factors on device performance of staggered bandgap planar III-V heterojunction Tunnel FETs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the structural, dielectric, magnetic-magnetostrictive, ferroelectric-piezoelectric and magnetoelectric (ME) properties of green (Pb-free) Co0.8Ni0.2Fe2O4/K0.25Na0.75NbO3/Co0.8Ni0.2Fe2O4 (CNFO/KNN/CNFO) trilayer laminate (2-2) multiferroic composite structure. Magnetostrictive Co0.8Ni0.2Fe2O4phase was synthesized by the solution combustion technique and the piezoelectric K0.25Na0.75NbO3 phase was synthesized by a solid-state method. The trilayer ME laminate composite structure of CNFO-KNN phases fabricated by silver epoxy adhesive bonding technique. The magnetostrictive Co0.8Ni0.2Fe2O4 phase exhibits a piezomagnetic coefficient of −0.029 ppm/Oe at 1500 Oe magnetic field. The piezoelectric K0.25Na0.75NbO3 showed a piezoelectric charge coefficient of d33 ~57 pC/N. The trilayer CNFO/KNN/CNFO laminate structure reveals the ME coefficient (αME) of 3.06 mV/Oe·cm which is relatively higher than the 0–3 connectivity composite structures. Here, we have discussed the fabrication technique for multiferroic laminate structures for the green magnetoelectric device having αME ~3.06 mV/Oe·cm with their magnetic/magnetostrictive and ferroelectric/piezoelectric properties.© 2020This work reported a carbon layer modified magnetite (Fe3O4) nanospheres (Fe3O4@C) which could be applied in preparing high performance magnetic fluid. The porous Fe3O4@C nanospheres were prepared by calcinating the Fe3O4@Polydopamine (Fe3O4@PDA) precursor in N2 atmosphere. The shear stress of Fe3O4@C-based magnetic fluid was as high as 24.9 Pa at saturated magnetic field, which was about 3.8 times larger than pristine Fe3O4-based magnetic fluid (6.6 Pa). Furthermore, the particle level dynamic simulation was employed to analyze the microstructure evolution and shear stress of Fe3O4@C-based magnetic fluid under applying an external magnetic field. The chain-like model well explained the magnetorheological (MR) mechanism and the simulation results matched perfectly with the experimental data. Since the crystallinity of Fe3O4 was improved during the pyrolysis, Fe3O4@C nanospheres possessed a higher saturation magnetization. The stronger magnetic dipolar forces and chain-chain interactions resulted in a much steadier Fe3O4@C chain-like structure. As a result, it was found that the superior MR performance and high stability of the Fe3O4@C-based magnetic fluid were originated from the core-shell and porous structures of Fe3O4@C. This work proposed a valuable magnetic particle model to prepare high performance magnetic fluid and further understand the origination of MR effects.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper carries out research on perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) of the Pd/Co55Mn25Si20(CMS)/NiO trilayer stack, which is a structure innovatively combining heavy metal (HM)/ferromagnetic (FM) interface (Pd/CMS), FM/oxide interface (CMS/NiO), and FM/antiferromagnetic (AFM) interface (CMS/NiO). The maximum effective PMA energy, obtained from the Pd (6 nm)/Co55Mn25Si20(5.5 nm)/NiO(1.0 nm) trilayer film which is sputter-deposited on glass at a substrate temperature of 350 °C, is 0.695 Merg/cm3. By appropriately increasing the Co content, a wider FM layer thickness range (3–8 nm) that achieved PMA was obtained. The oxide in the traditional FM/oxide structure was replaced by the antiferromagnetic NiO to obtain a wider oxide layer thickness of 0.4–7.6 nm, or even wider.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe lower mobility for p-type Ge based is always an issue due to slow traps generation at the interface of the metal oxide semiconductor (MOS) device which designates the defects in films generated during the deposition process. One of the effective ways to reduce this slow traps generation is to perform post deposition annealing (PDA) at a certain temperature. However, the selection of proper annealing temperature is the key to reduce defects without damaging the film quality. The effect of different PDA temperatures on the slow traps generation mechanism in the GeON passivated Ge MOS device was examined in this work. The XPS spectra show the stable formation of GeON over Ge, while HRTEM does not show any effect of PDA at the interface of GeON/Ge. The slow trap density (ΔNst) in HfO2/GeON/Ge interface annealed at different temperatures was evaluated from the hysteresis curve of C-V sweep as the function of the effective oxide field. The lowest ΔNst (4.01 × 1012 cm−2) was observed for the PDA temperature for 400 ℃. While, ΔNst increased slightly after PDA at 450 ℃. The work suggests that PDA at lower temperatures is essential to realize the high quality interface with lower interface trap density, enhanced mobility and lower CET in Ge based MOS devices. Further, it also helps to reduce the slow traps generations at the interface.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A set of Nickel-Zinc ferrite samples (Ni1- xZnxFe2O4, x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8 and 1.0) were synthesized by the low-energy ball milling method with subsequent thermal treatment. Infrared, Raman and Mössbauer spectroscopies were used to analyze the lattice dynamics and structure of the prepared samples. Infrared studies showed a dominant absorption band ranging from 548 cm−1 to 592 cm−1 associated with cation-oxygen stretching vibrations at tetrahedral sites. The five Raman modes, predicted by factor group analysis, were observed in all spectra. All these spectra changed in symmetry because of the incorporation of Zn into the lattice, and the reordering of Fe, Ni and Zn ions in both, tetrahedral (A) and octahedral [B] sites. It is observed that Fe3+ ions located at tetrahedral sites are gradually displaced to octahedral sites by the increase of Zn2+ ions. Mössbauer spectra were collected for all samples at 295 K and at 18 K. The spectra were properly fitted by using a model that assumes that the average hyperfine magnetic field at the octahedral sites is due to a random substitution of magnetically interacting FeA 3+ ions by diamagnetic ZnA 2+ ions at the tetrahedral sites. It was found that the average supertransfered hyperfine field due to one FeA 3+-O2+-FeB 3+ superexchange interaction was equal to about 0.9 T at 18 K. The zinc contents at tetrahedral sites as obtained by Raman, Mössbauer and XRD techniques are compared and discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report the magnetic behavior of Nb1-yFe2+y (y = −0.05,-0.015, 0.0,0.03) alloys studied through measurements of bulk magnetization and local hyperfine field of 100Rh probe, implanted into the samples. Both bulk and the local probe studies reveal composition driven ferromagnetic ordering, with Curie temperature Tc showing a minimum around y=-0.015, corroborating the quantum critical behavior, reported earlier. As an interesting feature, we observe that the hyperfine coupling constant obtained from the correlation of high temperature bulk magnetic susceptibility and Knight shift data also exhibits a peak near y = −0.015, reflecting a significant change in Fe-3d hybridization with ligand electrons. We believe that chemically induced change in hybridization strength plays a major role in the evolution of quantum phase transition in Nb1-yFe2+y alloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Like full or half-heusler materials, equiatomic quaternary Heuslers (EQH) also display various intriguing physical properties. We carried out the strict and rigorous density functional theory calculations to estimate the stability of novel ferrimagnetic FeMnTaAl alloy. In this work, we considered the thermodynamic, energetic, dynamic and mechanical stability criteria, by evaluating the formation energy, phonon dispersion and elastic constants, respectively, which thereby suggest that the synthesis of FeMnTaAl as bulk phase is likely. Later, the electronic structure, magnetic and transport properties are determined from the ground state parameters. After the structural optimizations, the half-metallic character from spin resolved band structures and local spin moments (1 μB) potentially felicitate its spintronic applications. Conservative estimates of Seebeck coefficient (~85 μV/K at 900 K), lattice thermal conductivity (2.8 W/mK at 300 K) and figure of merit (0.03 at 900 K) have also been put forward in this report. The overall structural stability, ferrimagnetism with large TC accompanied by transport properties will possibly enact the experimental realization for magnetic, thermoelectric or spintronic impressions of this material in future.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.DyMn2O5 is an intriguing multiferroic material showing multiple magnetic, electric and structural transitions. We present here the systematic study on the effect of Sr doping at the Dy site of DyMn2O5 through magnetic and dielectric measurements. Doping of divalent Sr at the Dy site is expected to enhance the Mn4+:Mn3+ ratio and it will also dilute the Dy site. Our study indicates large enhancement in the magnetic anomaly observed close to 43 K, which we believe to be related to the increased ferromagnetic correlations on Sr doping. Gradual increase in coercive field at 3 K with the Sr doping and decrease in bond length of adjacent Mn4+ ions further support the enhancement of ferromagnetic correlations in the system. The parent sample shows a large magnetocaloric effect around 12 K, the magnitude of which found to decrease with increasing Sr concentration. The doping also enhances the anomaly at around 28 K observed in the dielectric permittivity versus temperature data, and this anomaly was earlier claimed to be associated with the spin reorientation as well as a simultaneous transition from one ferroelectric state to other. The electric orderings observed below 25 K are found to be susceptible to the applied magnetic field, and supports the view of Ratcliff II et al. (Phys. Rev. B 72, 060407(R) (2005)) of concomitant changes in the magnetic structure associated with the multiple electric transitions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Electromagnetic components mostly incorporate soft magnetic materials used as flux multipliers. Hence, any reduction in iron loss of the magnetic core yields in saving energy. Among the techniques, the local laser treatment is a non-contact method applied for 180° domain refinement (Patri et al. [1]). The present study reassessed the impact of laser treatment on the magnetic properties of grain oriented silicon steels. Various laser pulse widths are used: an ultra-short pulse laser mainly adapted to the ablation process and a long and short pulse durations used for both irradiation and scribing processes [2]. The power loss is measured with a Single Sheet Tester (150 × 150 mm2). Each type of treatment resulted in a power loss reduction of 15–35% at peak induction 1.5 T and frequency 50 Hz. However, only the scribing and the ablation improved also the apparent permeability. In this work, the laser energy parameters are used to estimate the laser impact on the heat affected zone, the groove depth, the induced thermal stress, and on the internal properties of a magnetic behavioral model: static permeability and dynamic magnetization property [3].© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Micromagnetic simulations have been performed to investigate the suppression of the skyrmion Hall effect in nanotracks with their magnetic properties strategically modified. In particular, we study two categories of magnetically modified nanotracks. One of them, repulsive edges have been inserted in the nanotrack and, in the other, an attractive strip has been placed exactly on the longest axis of the nanotrack. Attractive and repulsive interactions can be generated from the engineering of magnetic properties. For instance, it is known that the skyrmion can be attracted to a region where the exchange stiffness constant is decreased. On the other hand, the skyrmion can be repelled from a region characterized by a local increase in the exchange stiffness constant. In order to provide a background for experimental studies, we vary not only the magnetic material parameters (exchange stiffness, perpendicular magnetocrystalline anisotropy and the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya constant) but also the width of the region magnetically modified, containing either a local reduction or a local increase for each one of these magnetic properties. In the numerical simulations, the skyrmion motion was induced by a spin-polarized current and the found results indicate that it is possible to transport skyrmions around the longest axis of the nanotrack. In practice, the skyrmion Hall effect can be completely suppressed in magnetic nanotracks with strategically modified magnetic properties. Furthermore, we discuss in detail 6 ways to suppress the skyrmion Hall effect by the usage of nanotracks with repulsive edges and nanotracks with an attractive strip.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper introduces an experimental progress of the magneto-elastoplastic coupling phenomenon on magnetic flux leakage signal for ferromagnetic materials. The magnetic flux leakage signal on the surface of medium carbon steel was measured under the combined action of elastic load and plastic deformation. Based on the experimental results, the influences of elastic load and plastic deformation on the magnetic flux leakage signal and their coupling effects were analyzed. A theoretical mechanism of experimental phenomena was explained by the magneto-elastoplastic coupling model and magnetic charge model. The results show that the magnetic flux leakage signal increases with the increase of the elastic load, and the magnetic flux leakage signal increases first and then decreases with the increase of plastic deformation. As the elastic load increases, the effect of plastic deformation on the magnetic flux leakage signal gradually increases. The work in this paper provides a vigorous support for the safety evaluation of engineering structures caused by the combination of plastic deformation and residual stress through magnetic flux leakage signal.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A physico-mathematical model for processing the Mössbauer spectra of the langasite family compounds with a helical magnetic structure was developed. It was shown that the Mössbauer spectra demonstrate high information content and sensitivity to details of the magnetic structure even in the case of polycrystalline samples and in the absence of an external magnetic field. In addition, they make it possible to monitor the dynamics of the magnetic structure in the entire temperature range below the Néel point. As an example, the helical magnetic structure in the langasite Ba3SbFe3Si2O14 was experimentally investigated. It was established that during translation along the c axis, the magnetic moments of iron in the (ab) planes rotate at an angle of 72°, forming a spiral with a period of 5c. The directions of the main axis of the electric field gradient (EFG) and the local axis of magnetic anisotropy were determined, which are very important characteristics of the frustrated magnetic structure of langasites.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe method of fluorine implant directly after a poly gate deposition process step is proposed to improve both electrical characteristics and reliabilities by creating Si-F bonding at a gate oxide interface and negative fixed charged in a gate oxide. Capacitance-voltage (C-V) curve and gate oxide leakage current was used to investigate oxide thickness and flat band voltage (Vfb) shift. Experimental results show fluorine implant induced regrowth of gate oxide ~1 Å and Vfb shift ~−40 mV. Owing to the Vfb shift, ~24 mV of drain induced barrier lowering is improved. Furthermore, gate oxide interface quality was evaluated using charge pumping current and negative bias temperature instability (NBTI), and gate oxide quality was evaluated using time-dependent dielectric breakdown (TDDB). The results show that the fluorine implant process which is prosed in this paper reduced 27% of the interface trap and improved ~0.8 order higher NBTI lifetime. TDDB lifetime showed a slight improvement when using the proposed method. Thus, a controlled fluorine implant step improves both DC electrical characteristics and gate oxide reliabilities. These suggest that the fluorine implant step should be carefully selected when fabricating PMOSFETs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigate generation of exchange magnons by ultrashort, picosecond acoustic pulses propagating through ferromagnetic thin films. Using the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equations we derive the dispersion relation for exchange magnons for an external magnetic field tilted with respect to the film normal. Decomposing the solution in a series of standing spin wave modes, we derive a system of ordinary differential equations and driven harmonic oscillator equations describing the dynamics of individual magnon mode. The external magnetoelastic driving force is given by the time-dependent spatial Fourier components of acoustic strain pulses inside the layer. Dependencies of the magnon excitation efficiencies on the duration of the acoustic pulses and the external magnetic field highlight the role of acoustic bandwidth and phonon-magnon phase matching. Our simulations for ferromagnetic nickel evidence the possibility of ultrafast magneto-acoustic excitation of exchange magnons within the bandwidth of acoustic pulses in thin samples under conditions readily obtained in femtosecond pump-probe experiments.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this contribution, we propose to cope with the problem of soft magnetic materials heterogeneity and non-uniformity in terms of domains structure. This non-uniformity expresses itself with space variations of domains and walls geometry and characteristic properties from the bulk towards the surface. We investigate the possibility of describing and predicting these changes from a mesoscopic point of view. We begin with an introduction of typical subdivisions and define a tensor state variable [Λ2] to represent the diversity of magnetic structures with domains and walls. We then explain the material structuring thanks to an energy balance between the mesoscopic magnetic exchange, magneto-crystalline anisotropy, self-magnetostriction anisotropy, stress induced anisotropy and the dipolar demagnetizing energy. We write every contribution as a function of [V2] = [Λ2]−1. After minimizing the total energy, we derive a formulation compatible with classical numerical methods. [Λ2] is deduced thanks to a partial differential equation and surface boundary conditions. When a time varying field is applied to the material, damping effects occur either in the mass or at the surface. Eddy currents induced within domains lead to consider a volume dissipation energy. The surface magnetic field is also dampened by both the static hysteresis mainly due to defects and the dynamic hysteresis which stems from eddy currents around magnetic walls, added to the an-hysteretic field. The surface magnetic field, magnetic structure, and thus the polarization being known on the external surface, time variations of the volume magnetic structure can be calculated within the mass. Using the static or dynamic magnetic field coupling at the surface, the magnetic polarization can be rebuilt in the mass to calculate the apparent magnetic permeability. Finally, finding the geometry and frequency dependent vector magnetic behavior and iron losses becomes possible. The tensor magnetic phase theory is able to account for the sensitivity of the magnetic structure to the geometry, the macroscopic anisotropy partly influenced by the metallography, the residual or induced stress, some surface effects such as the texture, the rugosity or even any scribing patterns, at a mesoscopic scale. Two test cases for GO and NGO electrical steels are presented. Sensitivity analysis on the test case with GO steel are discussed. Results are then compared to static and dynamic measurements of GO SiFe sheet samples. This paper contributes to the investigations carried out on the geometry dependent magnetic behavior of soft magnetic materials.© 2020The surface of iron oxide nanoparticles was chemically modified before being embedded in a chitosan hydrogel and for the first time, made into a scaffold by three-dimensional printing. The nanoparticles were embedded in the scaffold so that they would not be ingested by the surrounding tissue cells. The effects of the inductive coupling magnetism on bone cells were studied in the presence of an external magnetic force. Results from the FTIR and surface zeta potential analyses suggested that the citrate modification of the nanoparticles was successful. TEM images showed that the modification helped reduce the sizes of the agglomerates from 1237 nm to 408 nm. The negative charge on the particle surface formed ionic interaction with the chitosan in the solution. The smaller and charged particles evenly dispersed in a chitosan solution without blocking the extruding nozzle during three-dimensional printing. With the presence of the inductive coupling magnetism, osteoblast cells had a higher proliferation, type I collagen production, alkaline phosphatase expression, and mineralization (p < 0.01). The morphology of the osteoblast cells appeared normal and elongated. At the end of 21 days the cells proliferated into the interconnected pores as seen in the SEM images. Inductive coupling was shown to have invoked additional osteogenic responses in bone cells aside from the positive effects from the external magnetic force. The novel magnetic scaffold provided a potential alternative for bone tissue repair using magnetic therapy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Laser-induced magnetization precession is investigated in Ni-Mn-Sn Heulser alloy film using pump-probe all-optical technique. The studies are performed as a function of external magnetic field H applied at various angles θH with respect to the sample normal. Strong dependence of precession parameters, frequency f, amplitude A and effective damping αeff on H and θH was found. For H>3 kOe and θH<25°, two precession modes, identified as Damon-Eshbach (DE) and first-order standing spin wave (PSSW) modes were observed. The values of wave vector k=0.37 μm−1 for DE mode and exchange constant Aex=0.22 μerg cm−1 for PSSW mode have been determined. The A(H) increases up to six times as θH decreases from 55° to 5° and exhibits a maximum at around H=1.8 kOe for each θH. From experimentally obtained exponentially decayed αeffH dependencies, intrinsic damping α0θH is estimated to ≈0.025. The dependencies of the magnetization precession parameters have been well simulated in the frame of phenomenological approach, based on Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Mesoporous nanocrystal BaF2 nanopowders (NPs) have been obtained with the pulsed electron beam evaporation (PEBE) technique. The transformation of the structure and morphology of BaF2 nanoparticles (NPles) induced by thermal annealing in air at temperatures of 200, 400, and 900 °C has been monitored with the XRD, SEM, and HRTEM methods. The HRTEM analysis has shown the presence of three polymorph phases (cubic, octahedral, and hexagonal) in the unannealed NP. Upon the transition into the nanoscale, diamagnetic (DM) BaF2 (in the volume state) has demonstrated both paramagnetic (PM) and ferromagnetic (FM) responses at room temperature. The thermal analysis (TA) has confirmed the strong adsorption of CO2 while synthesizingthe BaF2 NP via PEBE method and adsorption of different NOx oxides following irradiation of the BaF2 NP (in air by 700 keV electrons) The appearance of the FM contribution in the diamagnetic BaF2 NP after annealing at a temperature of 600–900 °C is likely associated with the achievement of the percolation threshold with an increase of the BaO oxide concentration. This is in agreement with the well-known theoretical predictions of d0 magnetism in N-doped (C-doped) BaO. The appearance and variations of the FM contribution to the BaF2 NP irradiated by 700 keV electrons are likely connected with an increase of the NOx oxide concentration (due to an increase of the time of electron irradiation), which confirms the hypothesis on the appearance of the FM response in solid-state N (C)-BaO solutions. The FM decrease with time is indicative of the surface character of d0 magnetism in the barium fluoride under study.© 2020 Elsevier LtdBetavoltaics is a potentially attractive solution for ultra-long lifetime power sources. However, reliability of such devices depends on the radiation hardness of the semiconductor system. III-N semiconductors (nitrides) are known to be unusually strongly bonded materials, able to withstand relatively high doses of radiation. Gallium nitride structures can be grown either on sapphire templates with high dislocation density or on GaN substrates which ensures much better quality and perhaps performance of the final device. Therefore, the interest of this paper is to explore. p-i-n GaN junctions grown on various types of substrates and to find the best system for future betavoltaics batteries. Within the present work we demonstrate the design, modelling, and the tests of betavoltaic structures based on GaN p-n junction. The structures grown on high quality GaN substrates showed better efficiency at small excitation than counterparts grown on sapphire with power conversion efficiencies up to 3%. We do not observe any degradation in the studied structures after reliability testing, that consisted of electron irradiation in a scanning electron microscope or directly using Ni-63 radioisotope and also in an electron accelerator. All experiments indicate suitability of GaN for the construction of betavoltaic cells.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fe-6.5 wt% Si alloy (high silicon electrical steel) is an ideal core material for making motors and transformers with low noise and low power loss. Controlling microstructure and texture is key to improving the magnetic properties of high silicon electrical steel. In order to improve the warm rolling and cold rolling workability of high silicon electrical steel, in this paper, 0.03 wt% Nb is added to the alloy, and a strip sample with a thickness of 0.13 mm was prepared. The effect of annealing temperature on microstructure, texture and magnetic properties of the samples was studied. The results show that annealing at 800 ℃–1300 ℃ for 1 h, with the increase of annealing temperature, the {1 0 0} texture content of the sample decreased from 9.47% to 1.09%, {1 1 0} texture content gradually increased from 1.26% to 33.1%, {1 0 0}+{1 1 0} texture content increased significantly from 10.73% to 34.19%. Nb-rich precipitates are formed in high silicon electrical steel with a size of about 100 nm. When the annealing temperature is lower than 1200 ℃, the Nb-rich precipitates can inhibit the grain growth. When the annealing temperature is higher than 1200℃, the Nb-rich precipitates dissolves and the pinning force to the grain boundary is weakened. The 0.13 mm Nb-microalloyed high silicon electrical steel strip has good magnetic properties at 800–1300 °C for 1 h. At 1200 °C, the grain growth and iron loss decrease due to the dissolution of the Nb-rich precipitates, so that the sample has a high comprehensive magnetic property: B8 is 1.31 T, B50 is 1.61 T, and P10/50 is 0.411 W/kg, P10/400 is 5.416 W/kg.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In rotating electrical machines, cutouts in the rotor laminations control the magnetic flux density distribution in the d- and q-axis of the magnetic core. Guiding the magnetic flux by cutouts leads to very narrow bridges in the electrical steel. However, at the same time, this can limit the maximum speed of a rotor e.g. due to the material's maximum allowed mechanical stress. Therefore, the centrifugal forces confine the achievable power density. The aim of this study is the examination of the effect of flux-barriers fabricated by mechanical embossing on the magnetic properties of non-oriented electrical steel. The embossing process causes a static residual stress distribution and thereby a reduction of the permeability resulting from Villari's effect. The non-oriented electrical steel samples are embossed with varying distances between the barriers and measured at different angles to the barrier edges on a single-sheet tester. A comparison with respect to their directional and embossing geometry-dependent effectiveness as magnetic flux barriers is carried out. A correlation of the results with measurements of the local flux density, obtained by neutron-grating interferometry, is performed in order to enable a consideration of the mechanical embossing on the local magnetic flux density distribution.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Medium-frequency transformers are used in high power electronic dc/dc converters. In case of the three-phase dual active bridge topology (DAB3), a six-step voltage is applied to the transformer. In this study, a 200 kVA three phase power transformer prototype is using 0.18 mm thick high permeability Grain Oriented Electrical Steel (GOES) at B = 1.5 T and f = 1000 Hz. The prototype has been designed and built in link with a transformer manufacturer. In this paper, a complete test bench is set up to validate GOES as a suitable material for medium-frequency transformers. The efficiency of the components is evaluated at different operating points.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the fabrication of BaFe12O19 (BaM) thin films by radio-frequency sputtering and the influence of substrate orientation on structural, microstructure and magnetic properties were carried out. Measurements pointed out the deposition time and power have no significant effect over stoichiometry in the studied condition, producing films with satisfying Fe:Ba rate confirmed by EDX analysis. The orientation of the Si substrate showed to be essentially correlated with in-plane orientation of BaM phase. Both Si (1 0 0) and (1 1 1) substrates privileged in-plane orientation of the c-axis of BaM and atomic force microscopy found needle-like grains spread randomly onto substrates, although Si (1 1 1) substrate exhibited higher magnetic anisotropy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The increasing part of intermittent renewable energy requires significant modifications of the electric grid. The introduction of smart nodes, where the power transfer can be adjusted in real time in addition to the classical voltage change and the galvanic isolation, becomes an important asset for the grid balance. Transformers associated with power electronic converters can ensure this function; they are known generically as Solid-State Transformers (SST). Their high specific power also opens opportunities for railway application. SSTs can be operated at high frequencies (a few tens of kHz), with ferrite or nanocrystalline cores operating at low flux densities. The paper proposes a complementary approach that consists in using transformers built with grain oriented electrical steel (GOES) wound cores, operating at medium frequencies (few kHz) and high flux densities. The reported work focuses on experimental assessment aiming to show that this option is now open for designing SST cells, which can be associated to reach bigger units.© 2019Ni-Mn-Sb Heusler alloys exhibit a large magnetocaloric effect due to the magnetic structure coupling and are potential candidate for practical application. In this work, the effects of Al substitution for Sb on the magnetocaloric and magnetoresistance properties are investigated in Ni46Co4Mn38Sb12− xAlx (0 ≤ x ≤ 2) serial alloys. The results demonstrate that the critical temperature of martensitic transformation gradually increases with increasing Al concentration while the temperature interval between the beginning and ending of martensitic transition decreases till x = 0.5, then increases with further increasing of Al, resulting in the similar nonmonotonic behavior on both magnetic entropy and magnetoresistance for Ni46Co4Mn38Sb12− xAlx (0 ≤ x ≤ 2) series. Maximum value of 17.8 J/kg K and −25.8% at 30 kOe is obtained respectively for magnetic entropy and magnetoresistance in Ni46Co4Mn38Sb11.5Al0.5, for the greatly narrowed temperature interval of phase transition after Al substitution© 2020The present work aims to investigate the mechanism of glass formation and correlates it to the soft magnetism of Ni-substituted Fe-B-Nb alloys. The impact of ferrous Ni on the mechanism of glass formation and soft magnetism of Fe-based bulk metallic glasses was critically analyzed. By quantifying glass forming ability and soft magnetic characteristic for varying degrees of substitution, we observe a maximum in glass forming ability together with a minimum coercivity, which we suggest is due to an increased atomic packing density of the glassy phase. Interestingly, a monotonic increase of Curie temperature with increasing substitution of Ni was observed, which could be attributed to a reduction of an antiferromagnetic Fe-Fe interaction in the glassy iron-rich matrix. The overarching goal of this study is to explore the underlying mechanisms of enhanced glass forming ability, improved soft magnetic properties, and increased Tc of Ni-substituted Fe-based glassy alloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.For magnetic materials, a quantitative description of exchange correlation and critical temperature would be of significance for the electronic devices operating at rather a high temperature. In this work, we fabricated the composition of Sr1− xCaxFe12O19 hexaferrites with a conventional ceramic method. According to the experimental lattice constants, the crystal and electronic structure were optimized employing the density functional theory (DFT), generalized gradient approximation (GGA), and local spin density approximation (LSDA). The GGA + U and LSDA + U methods were adopted to improve the description of strongly correlated 3d electron of Fe. Thirteen independent exchange correlations in these systems were determined by establishing the relationship between total energy of different collinear spin configurations and exchange integral with the Heisenberg model. Derived from the calculation of random-phase approximation (RPA) and mean-filed approximation (MFA), we evaluated the critical temperature of hexaferrites, as compared with the experimental result.© 2019Graphene grown on copper foils by chemical vapor deposition can be directly deposited or transferred to the desired substrates. When a CVD-grown graphene sheet is transferred, its surface may be affected by the handling process and environmental conditions. Defects and contamination on the graphene surface induce unstable electrical characteristics, like in the neutrality point, also known as Dirac point. For this reason, it is hard to quantitatively analyze the results due to an inconstant Dirac point. To overcome this fabrication problem, this study proposes a method to reduce the defects and preserve the initial characteristics of the material, minimizing the damage during the graphene transfer. A high-quality graphene sheet was transferred onto several pairs of electrodes to maintain the original electrical properties. In the device structure proposed herein, the error range of the Dirac point was less than ± 1 mV. We confirmed the transfer characteristics of our device by detecting the hybridization of complementary DNAs to probe DNAs immobilized on the graphene active layer. Also, this new structure can be used to analyze biological samples using different bioreceptors in each channel. Maintaining the detection region may guarantee the stability of graphene properties as an active layer.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This work introduces a generalization of the form of the spin-orbit interaction, the generalized spin-orbit interaction (GSOI). It expresses the magnetic field induced by two charged particles moving with a non-zero relative velocity as a field defined at all points in space, and exists in the reference frames of both particles. This is in contrast to spin-orbit interaction theory, in which the generated magnetic field is defined at only one point in space, and exists in the reference frame of one of the two particles. At the macroscopic scale, it is shown that the GSOI theory implies the same form of the Ørsted magnetic field produced by a current-carrying wire. However, the theory is incompatible with the microscopic form of the Biot-Savart equation that implies that a charged particle induces a magnetic field by having a non-zero velocity. The implications of the GSOI theory on properties of the Ørsted magnetic field in current-carrying atomically thin two-dimensional materials, such as graphene, are discussed. The framework established in this paper aims at re-imagining classical physical concepts in light of an advanced microscopic understanding.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of the compound-type cobaltites LnACoO3 (Ln = Lanthanide and A = alkaline-earth) are extremely dependent on the structural deformation, which can be induced by either chemical substitution or applying pressure. These two approaches are not equivalent because the atomic substitution changes the ratio of Co3+ and Co4+. It is well known that the additional electron of Co3+ plays a fundamental role in the magnetic and electric properties of these materials. Thus, the pressure is a way to influence the magnetic and electric properties considering only the structural deformation. In this work, pressure was applied to deform the structure of Nd0.5Sr0.5CoO3 and, thus, to elucidate its effect on the structural and magnetic properties. The findings show that even under pressure of 50 kbar, no structural phase transition was detected, but the unit cell volume significantly decreases by 2.8% and the Co-O1-Co bond angle increases by 2.6%. However, the elasticity parameter (defined as the Co-O apical distance divided by the square root of the octahedral basal area) remained constant over the pressure range. The magnetic properties were evaluated up to 10.9 kbar, and the findings show that TC varies with a rate of 0.5 K/kbar, and that the magnetic entropy change of the compound remains almost constant at a value of −2 J/kg K for 5 T of magnetic field variation. The Co3+ and Co4+ ions were found to be in an intermediate spin state and remain the same over all studied pressure interval. To conclude, the structural deformation induced by the high pressure seem to not affect the magnetic properties, and the elasticity parameter is a useful tool sensitive to this change. These results indicate that, for strongly correlated electron system, the ratio of Co3+ and Co4+ is much more critical for changing the magnetic properties than the structural deformation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Depth-dependent spin rotation of the Fe spins upon magnetisation reversal of the ferromagnetic layer in polycrystalline Fe/FeMn exchange-biased bilayers were investigated by using 57Fe probe layers and angular hysteresis loops constructed from in-field 57Fe conversion electron Mössbauer spectroscopy (CEMS) measurements and magnetometry. Our results provide evidence for the formation of an exchange-spring-like domain wall structure inside the ferromagnetic Fe layer during magnetisation reversal along the forward branch of the hysteresis loop (H values varying from positive to negative), and coherent reversal along the recoil branch (H varying from negative to positive). This result implies asymmetric magnetisation reversal for each branch of the hysteresis loop, as indicated by depth-resolved CEMS and vibrating sample magnetometry. These results are relevant for the development of more precise quantitative models for exchange bias in polycrystalline metallic systems with Mn-based antiferromagnets such as those used in spintronic applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A phenomenological model with a biquadratic coupling between two order parameters is studied in materials that exhibit both a stable magnetization and a stable electrical polarization. The model makes it possible to transfer the coupling of the order parameters from the displacement modes towards the fluctuation modes and to reconsider the problem in terms of two independent order parameters each characterizing a given sub-system. In this new configuration, both phase transitions are second order phase transitions and the results show clearly the possibility of mixed phases. Since the calculations appear to be general to any two order parameters coupled biquadratically, two-dimensional multiferroics are provided as analysis support in order to demonstrate the usefulness of the approach. We clearly show that, the magnetoelectric coupling is conditioned by a dependence between the magnetic and ferroelectric transitions through the order parameters fluctuations.© 2020The effect of Hf and B additions on the phase stability, microstructure and magnetic properties of the metastable SmCo7 (1:7H) ribbons has been investigated with a combined approach of experimental measurements and first principle DFT (density functional theory) calculations. A series of (Sm0.12Co0.88)95Hf5−xBx (x = 0, 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5) alloys were arc-melted in a TIG (tungsten inert gas) arc melting furnace, followed by melt-spinning onto a copper roller at a wheel velocity of 40 m/s. Characterization based on X-ray diffraction indicates that the major phase is SmCo7 having meta-stable (TbCu7-type) structure. From the total energy calculations using DFT, the phase stability of (Sm0.12Co0.88)95Hf5−xBx ribbons have been confirmed. Moreover, Hf and B addition results in an effective grain refinement; average grain size being as low as ~ 80 nm. The reduction in grain size leads to significant changes (increase or decrease) in magnetic properties depending on the Hf/B ratio. The coercivity value (Hc) varies between 7 kOe and 12 kOe as x (at.% B) increases from 0 to 5 at.%. The experimental coercivity values have been compared with the computed anisotropy energies. The saturation magnetization (Ms) increases from ~ 54 emu/g to 77 emu/g with increasing B concentration (x).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic thin films with ultra-low damping constants (α) are intensively studied for applications in spintronic devices. We report here the influence of the sputtering conditions (deposition power and temperature) on the magnetic properties of Fe80Co20/Ta bilayers deposited on MgO (0 0 1) and Si (0 0 1) which have been studied using ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) and magneto-optic Kerr-effect (MOKE) techniques. We have found that for the studied fabrication conditions the samples deposited on MgO (0 0 1) have [1 0 0] epitaxial growth with a cubic anisotropy field Hc ~ 300 Oe, while those sputtered on Si (0 0 1) grow polycrystalline with a small uniaxial anisotropy due to the deposition conditions. With measurements at different excitation frequencies we have determined exceptionally low damping values for ferromagnetic conductors (α ~ 3 × 10−3), which makes the Fe80Co20/Ta system an excellent candidate for future applications in spintronic devices. From the analysis of the dependence of the FMR linewidth on the orientation of the applied magnetic field and the excitation frequency in FMR experiments, we were able to separate the contribution of the different relaxation mechanisms (Gilbert damping, two magnon scattering and mosaicity) to the linewidth and to explain quantitatively the observed behavior.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Modeling the effect of multi-axial mechanical stress on the iron losses of an M400-50A grade non-oriented electrical steel sheet is studied. By utilizing the statistical loss theory, the total measured iron losses are first segregated to hysteresis, classical eddy current and excess losses. Then, the stress dependency of the excess losses is modeled by correlating them to the hysteresis losses under multi-axial stress. This correlation, coupled with a magneto-elastic invariant based loss model, can be used to predict the iron loss evolution with reasonable accuracy under multi-axial stress when only iron loss data under no applied stress at various excitation frequencies and under only two uniaxial stress levels at quasi-static excitation are available. Consequently, this approach significantly reduces the required measurement data for estimating the iron losses under multi-axial stress.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The Monte Carlo Antiferromagnetic Ising model was used to study the electrical properties and magnetoresistance of manganese oxides due to the charge ordering phase occurring at half doping, x = 0.5. The half-doped manganites have an insulator antiferromagnetic ground state. The internal energy, specific heat, resistivity, the magneto-resistance and magnetization have been investigated with different applied magnetic fields. Our simulation reveals that the resistivity decreases exponentially as the free charge increase to transport from the insulator to conductor phase. The magnetoresistance has positive high values with magnetic field. The obtained insulator–metal transition behavior candidates the half-doped manganites to be very good semiconductors diode junctions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of Mg/Ni doped ZnO were investigated by the first-principles study. The generalized gradient approximation (GGA) in Perdew–Burke–Ernzerhov of the scheme as a form of density functional theory (DFT) utilizing the plane-wave pseudo-potential method was used. Calculations were performed for a constant Ni doping ratio as 5% and different concentrations of Mg varying from 1% to 5%. It was shown that Mg concentrations helped to tune band gap and mediate the ferromagnetic property. 1% Mg-doped structure had a half-metallic ferromagnetic (HMF) state. Meanwhile, metallic behavior (MB) was observed for higher concentrations of Mg (>1%) impurities. It was revealed that Mg-doped ZnNiO possesses ferromagnetic behavior solely for 1% Mg while other doping ratios were showing distinctive phases including antiferromagnetism (AFM). Besides, there is no evidence of a clear connection between the doping concentration of the Mg and the magnetic phase. Ni distant/near oxygen vacancies (Vo) enhanced the FM state; however, distant vacancies led to HMF state for all Mg concentrations. Zn-d, O-p, and Ni-d (dominates) control the spin-up/down channels by hybridization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of the Mn-doped Ho2-xMnxO3 (x = 0.00, 0.05 and 0.10) powders prepared using sol-gel technique. X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis using Rietveld refinement has shown that all the samples crystallize in the bixbyite structure. Scanning electron microscopy has shown that the powders are chemically homogeneous. All samples undergo an antiferromagnetic order at low temperature (≤4 K). The substitution of Mn leads to a slight increase of Néel temperature and decrease in magnetization. Hysteresis curves highlight a second-order feature of phase transition and a reversible magnetocaloric effect. Under a magnetic field change of 20 kOe, the maximum value of the isothermal magnetic entropy change (−ΔSMax) decreases from 16.5 J/kg· K (x = 0.00) to 8.64 J/kg·K (x = 0.10). The large magnitude of (−ΔSMax) as well as the absence of hysteresis loss make Ho2-xMnxO3 a promising material for magnetic refrigeration at low temperature range.© 2020The Stokes–anti-Stokes intensity asymmetry, observed by Brillouin light scattering from surface magnetic excitations in thin FeNi films, has been studied by replacing substrates with different dielectric constant as well as varying the applied magnetic field and the laser incident angle. The experimental results show that the Stokes–anti-Stokes intensity ratio depends upon the applied magnetic fields, the wave vectors and also the material of the substrates used to support the FeNi films. Most interesting is that for a fixed magnetic field and a fixed wave vector, the intensity ratio is much more significant for the FeNi film deposited on Nb-doped SrTiO3 substrate than that deposited on surface oxidized Si substrate. The phenomenon of the different asymmetry is depending on the dielectric constant of the substrates. The tendency is in agreement with the theory.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Double perovskite oxide materials have been attracting people's attention for they are good candidates to present large magnetization by either ferromagnetic or ferrimagnetic interactions. Recently, the long debated magnetic ground state of double perovskite La2CrFeO6 is confirmed by experiments to be ferrimagnetic, which is different from the predictions of the Goodenough-Kanamori rules. In order to gain a fundamental understanding of these anomalous magnetic behaviors of double perovskites R2CrFeO6 (R = La, Ce, Pr, Nd, Pm, Sm, Gd, Tb, Dy, Ho, Er, Tm and Y), systematic researches are in need. In this paper, we calculated the structural and magnetic behaviors of double perovskites R2CrFeO6 by first-principles calculations. The effect of the rare-earth ionic radius on crystal structural parameters (e.g., lattice parameters, monoclinic angles, rhombohedral angles, Cr–O–Fe bond angles and tilting angles) and magnetic ordering temperature are obtained. Our calculations indicate that the magnetic moments of Fe and Cr in R2CrFeO6 oxides present anti-parallel alignment, i.e., R2CrFeO6 are ferrimagnetic. For all the studied R2CrFeO6 oxides except La2CrFeO6 and Y2CrFeO6, the magnetic ordering temperature decrease linearly with the increase of the rare earth ionic radius, which is different from the previously-observed “general” magnetic behaviors in various rare earth based perovskites such as R2NiMnO6 and R2CoMnO6. Moreover, it is worth noting that besides generating tilting angles and thus affecting magnetic properties, rare earth ions can also affect the magnetic exchange coupling of the double perovskite R2CrFeO6 systems in other ways. Our work can provide comprehensive information for understanding the anomalous magnetic properties of double perovskite R2CrFeO6 and would be helpful for the development of new multiferroic materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Standardization of the method of measurement of AC magnetostriction characteristics of grain-oriented electrical steel strip and sheet by means of a single sheet tester and an optical sensor, i.e. IEC 60404-17 Ed.1 [1], has been promoted in the IEC/TC68/WG2 to meet the demand of transformer industry. The relationship between the magnetostriction characteristics of grain-oriented electrical steel and transformer noise is complicated and yet not fully understood. One of basic problems has been the lack of a standard for the magnetostriction measurements. The measurement requires detection of slight vibration of the test specimen at a resolution of 0.01 μm/m or better. In order to ensure this resolution, not only magnetic aspects but also mechanical aspects of the test apparatus, e.g. the influence of friction and external vibrations, have to be specified. The size of test specimen is restricted to 100 mm × 500 mm. The flux closer is a vertical single yoke or a horizontal double yoke. In order to avoid the influence of friction and vibration, no weight is put on the test specimen except an optical target and a clamp to fix the test specimen to the test apparatus. Also, no weight is connected to the end of test specimen to prevent additional vibration modes. The optical target is low mass and made of non-magnetic and non-conductive materials. The optical target and the clamp are placed between opposite pole faces of the yoke. In order to realize a low and constant friction coefficient, an insertion sheet with a thin fluorine resin-impregnated glass cloth adhesive film on its upper surface is placed under the test specimen. A round robin comparison using different test setups in accordance with the draft of standard was carried out.© 2020Magnetic Particle Imaging (MPI) is a new imaging modality that quantifies spatial distribution of superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles in a field of view through their non-linear magnetization response to an applied magnetic field. Liposomes loaded with magnetic nanoparticles (magnetoliposomes) are potential theranostic drug carriers that can combine magnetic properties with drug carrier ability. Prior work suggests that MPI signal can be affected by dipolar interactions between magnetic nanoparticles in close proximity – for instance, in a polymer matrix. Here we evaluate if encapsulating magnetic nanoparticles in liposomes has an impact in their MPI performance. For this purpose, magnetoliposomes were prepared using charge-stabilized iron oxide nanoparticles (IONPs) and their physical, magnetic and MPI properties were characterized. Interestingly, encapsulation of IONPs in magnetoliposomes led to an increase in MPI signal per unit mass.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, Tb70Cu30 alloy is employed as the addition for enhancing the hard magnetic properties of hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets through in-situ diffusion. The magnets with and without Tb-Cu addition were prepared by hot pressing at 700 °C followed by hot deformation at different temperatures using melt spun Nd-Fe-B based powder as the raw materials. Tb and Cu elements were found to diffuse into the magnet after preparation. By adding 2 wt% Tb70Cu30, the coercivity and thermal stability of hot-deformed magnet were significantly improved due to the formation of local high-anisotropy (Nd,Tb)2Fe14B phase and the reduction in grain size. The intrinsic coercivity Hcj increased from 1281 kA/m to 1681 kA/m and the absolute value of temperature coefficient of coercivity |β| decreased from 0.479%/°C to 0.431%/°C for the magnets hot-deformed at 750 °C. It was confirmed that the diffused Tb atom prefers to substituting Nd in Nd2Fe14B type main phase rather than entering into RE-rich phase, and Cu distributes mainly at the grain boundaries. The reduction in crystal orientation was observed for diffused magnets, which is related to the increased rare earth-rich phase, resulting in the decreased remanence. The evolutions of the grain orientation, microstructure and magnetic properties of the magnets prepared at different hot-deformation temperatures were discussed as well.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A series of NixZn1− xFe2O4 (x = 0.5, 0.6, 0.7) were obtained by co-precipitation technique and followed by sintering at 800 °C. The random variation of bond angles resembles possible cation redistribution in the present series of ferrite samples. The cation distributions estimated from Mössbauer analysis are used to find out the net magnetic moment. The magnetic moment n′ B estimated from Neel's sub-lattice model is not consistent with experimental magnetic momet nB. But the magnetic moment (nB ′′) estimated from the Yafet–Kittel (Y–K) model is in good agreement with the experimental magnetic moment nB, supporting the possibility of non-collinear arrangement of spins at B–site. The non-collinear spin arrangement at octahedral (B) site is influencing the magnetization of present series ferrite samples. The increase in saturation magnetization with increase in Ni2+ ion concentration is expected due to the decrease in non-collinear spin arrangement at octahedral (B) site. Higher saturation magnetization of 61.32 emu/g was reported for the composition x = 0.7. The single domain structure of samples is evident from the hysteresis loops, but interestingly nature of hyperfine interactions can be found from the Mössbauer spectra under spectral line intensities. The increase in the blocking temperature (magnetic ordering) is due to the increase in magnetocrystalline anisotropy rather than an increase in particle sizes. The composition x = 0.7 is showing good sensor response for both LPG and acetone. Moreover, its response and recovery times are less comparing to the other two compositions and therefore it is useful for the sensor fabrication.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Based on a 32-atom supercell system, the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of Fe20Cr6Mn6 alloys are calculated and analyzed using first-principles calculations. The effects of interstitial atoms (N and C) on the properties of Fe20Cr6Mn6 alloys are also discussed. In this 32-atom supercell system with an octahedral interstice in the center, there are four different atomic sites occupied by metal atoms (Fe, Cr and Mn). According to the differences of metal atoms at the different atomic sites, the Fe20Cr6Mn6 alloys have been defined as two structural models. Interstitial atoms (N or C) change the phase stability of Fe20Cr6Mn6 alloys. The supercell volumes increase linearly with the content of N (C) in the supercells for each alloy system. The bond lengths of Mn-C/N or Cr-C/N in the octahedral interstice, not as the supercell volume, do not increase linearly with the content of N (C). The spin moments of the Fe20Cr6Mn6 alloys are very small and the magnetic moments of I-Mn-Cx/Nx alloys and I-Cr-Cx/Nx alloys increase slightly. In Fe20Cr6Mn6 alloys, the electrons transfer from Cr atoms to Fe and Mn atoms, and the ability to gain and lose electrons of metal atoms is changed by the addition of C or N atoms. There is an atomic attraction between metal atoms and C or N atoms from bond population analyses.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Rotating diffusion technology is especially suitable for mass production of small-sized magnets. In this paper, a large mass rotating diffusion with 2500 pieces of small-sized magnets was conducted to enhance coercivity. At the same time, the uniformity of the properties was studied. Taking both magnetic properties and yield rate into account, we obtained the optimal parameters of the rotating diffusion at 710 ℃ for 5 h, following a two-stage annealing process at 940 ℃ for 5 h and at 500 ℃ for 3 h. Thus, the coercivity of the magnet could increase from 14.05 kOe to 23.06 kOe. EPMA results show that most Tb enriches the surface of the magnets, and some Tb is diffused into the grain boundary phase forming magnetic isolation during the rotating diffusion process. After the two-stage annealing process, many (Nd,Tb)2Fe14B substitutional phases with higher anisotropy field are formed around the epitaxial layer of the main phase increasing the coercivity of the magnet. Discrete analysis and a linear fit show excellent uniformity of the properties in this massive rotating diffusion process.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The compound Co2NbGa crystallizes in the Heusler-type structure. Magnetization measurements of Co2NbGa have been made under ambient pressure using a SQUID magnetometer. The spontaneous magnetic moment at 5 K and the Curie temperature are 1.81 μB/f.u. and 351 K, respectively. Many magnetic properties of the itinerant electron ferromagnets are explained by the Takahashi's spin fluctuation theory. In the Takahashi's spin fluctuation theory, spectral parameters of spin fluctuations, T0 and TA, are involved in various magnetic properties derived theoretically. In this work, we estimated T0 and TA of Co2NbGa by using the results of magnetization measurements at 5 K: T0 = 2.1 × 103 K and TA = 4.7 × 103 K. This experiment proved that the squared spontaneous magnetization Ms(T)2 is proportional to T2 at low temperature. The TA value estimated from the Ms(T)2 vs. T2 curve is 6.6 × 103 K. Furthermore, the field-induced magnetization M4 around TC is found to be proportional to H/M in the low magnetic field region.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report the structural and magneto-transport properties of co-sputtered MnAl alloy thin films grown on Si (1 0 0) at various substrate temperatures (Ts) ranging from room temperature to 500 °C. Analyses of the X-ray diffraction and DC-Magnetization data reveal that as the Ts of the films is changed, the volume fraction of ferromagnetic τ-MnxAl100-x (50 < x < 60) metastable phase retained in the films changes from 3.7 to 9.5% and the remaining fraction comprises of non-magnetic β-MnAl and γ2-phases. The temperature-dependent longitudinal resistivity variation demonstrates a semi-metallic nature in all these films. The temperature dependence of Hall Effect data further corroborates this semi-metallic behavior. The magnetoresistance (MR) response of these films is measured in the range of 10–300 K, both in the in-plane as well as out-of-plane magnetic field configurations. The out-of-plane MR is significantly larger than in-plane MR due to electron-hole compensation (which stems from multi-band effects) which is discussed further by plotting the Kohler's plot for the thin films.© 2020A model of head-to-head domain wall in the cylindrical amorphous ferromagnetic microwire is proposed by treating a class of exact particular solutions of Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation in cylindrical coordinates, which are obtained for appropriate boundary conditions. It is shown that both the magnetic anisotropy coefficient value in the center of cross-section and the rate of its value change along the radius directly determine the domain wall structure. A flexural planar domain wall is visualized and analyzed under the influence of various parameters of the microwire. A method of anisotropy coefficient estimation is developed: the derived formula for mobility is used to evaluate values of anisotropy coefficient of the wire near its symmetry axis, the length of the head-to-head domain wall can be used for evaluation of radial dependence of anisotropy coefficient. For extraction of anisotropy coefficient the dynamic properties of the head-to-head domain wall propagation are investigated experimentally for microwires with different anisotropy coefficients: in stressed state and after partially stress removed state. The theory fit the measurements with linear dependence of the velocity on the magnetic field. The particular case of planar domain wall, corresponding to radial independent anisotropy coefficient, is also shown for a comparison.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.First principles investigations were carried out to explore the prospects of using silicon carbide (SiC) monolayers in spintronics. The structural, electronic and magnetic properties of Ti, V, Cr, Mn and Fe doped SiC monolayers were studied in detail in framework of density functional theory (DFT). These dopants changed the band structure of SiC by introducing gap states and thus altered the electronic and magnetic character of the host. The results indicated that Ti did not produce any magnetic state whereas Mn and Cr exhibited ferromagnetism (FM), and V as well as Fe displayed anti-ferromagnetism (AFM) as stable configurations in the matrix. The calculated values of magnetic moments are 0 μB, 1.24 μB, 2.37 μB, 3.01 μB, and 2.21 μB for dopants Ti, V, Cr, Mn and Fe respectively in the host. The dopants reveal 3d-2p hybridization with exchange interactions taking place through charge hopping. The analysis indicated that magnetic exchange takes place in Mn:SiC and Fe:SiC via super-exchange whereas in Cr:SiC via double exchange interactions. The Mn doped SiC monolayer appeared to offer highest Curie temperatures with half metallic nature and highest magnetic moment which points to its suitability as potential diluted magnetic semiconductor for different spintronic applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report a comprehensive investigation of La0.2Pr0.4Ca0.4MnO3 to clarify the micrometre scale phase separation phenomenon in the mixed valent manganite (La,Pr,Ca)MnO3. The compound shows multiple magnetic transitions, in which the charge-ordered state is converted into a ferromagnetic state in steps with the application of a magnetic field. The ac susceptibility measurements show that the glassy transition at low temperatures does not depend on the frequency, thus indicating the absence of any spin glass behaviour. Magnetization as well as heat capacity measurements indicate that this low temperature transition is magnetic field dependent. The field dependent resistivity at 2 K shows a sharp drop indicating that the sample behaviour changes from a high resistive state to a low resistive state, corroborating the conversion of charge-ordered insulating (COI) phase to a ferromagnetic metallic (FMM) phase. Our results point towards the existence of phase separation, rigidity of the low temperature glassy-like phase as well as the conversion of COI phase to FMM phase by the application of magnetic fields.© 2020A comprehensive study of relevant aspects of the physics behind in vitro magnetic assisted transfection, or magnetofection is presented. Magnetofection experiments were performed as a function of culture-magnet distance for a fixed time of 30 min, as a function of time for a fixed separation of about 1 mm, and under special geometries chosen to elucidate the relative effects of gravitational and magnetic forces. It is shown that under appropriate conditions, in vitro magnetofection can be performed with almost equal easiness in any desired space direction, even against gravity. Redistribution of magnetic nanoparticles in a colloid, with an initial uniform distribution, was studied with the same experimental setup used in magnetofection experiments, as a function of time, and as a function of culture-magnet relative position. It was found that magnetic nanoparticles tend to arrange into concentrated regions with ring or circle shapes, and that final distribution depends strongly on relative position. Cellular uptake of magnetic nanoparticles was estimated for standard magnetofection and for no applied magnetic field experiments. A consistent description of results is given by comparing magnetofection efficiency, nanoparticles uptake and redistribution experiments. The results presented here constitute novel information that will contribute to gaining deeper understanding of how magnetofection proceeds and how can be improved. They impact directly on in vivo procedures, providing conceptual tools to optimize setup geometry and magnetic field application time.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, grain boundary diffusion was performed on multi-main-phase Nd-Ce-Fe-B sintered magnets using two different diffusion sources. The coercivity of the magnet was increased from 928 kA/m to 1036 kA/m and 1174 kA/m by diffusing Pr81.5Ga19.5 (PG) and Pr81.5Ga14.5Cu5 (PGC5), respectively, and the corrosion resistance of the magnet was also improved after the above diffusion process. Two kinds of continuous grain boundaries with different contrast were observed after the PG and PGC5 alloy diffusion process, and the results of line scan and quantitative analysis indicate that they originate from different intergranular phases that have been melted during the heat treatment. The distribution of Ga element after grain boundary diffusion and its effects on the coercivity of the magnet were especially investigated. It was found that the coercivity enhancement of these diffused magnets is mainly attributed to the formation of continuous grain boundary and non-ferromagnetic grain boundary phase to weaken the magnetic exchange coupling between the 2:14:1 grains, as well as the formation of the Pr-rich shell with slightly higher magnetocrystalline anisotropy due to the partial substitution of the Nd atoms by the Pr atoms, which compensates for the coercivity drop by chemical homogenization due to the heat treatment.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Field-swept 63,65Cu NMR spectra under magnetic fields up to 8.3 T at a constant NMR frequency and temperatures T < 12 K on a single crystalline sample of multiferroic CuFeO2 were measured and analyzed. When the magnetic field is applied along the c axis, a nearly zero internal magnetic field at the Cu site in magnetic ordered state was observed. This is explained by the perfect cancellation of the internal fields produced by the 6 nearest neighbor Fe3+ (S = 5/2) ions, revealing the magnetic structure to be a collinear four-sublattice structure. On the other hand, when the magnetic field is applied along the ab plane, we observed a finite internal field at the Cu sites, which is due to the canting of the Fe moments. Strong change in the NMR signal intensity is observed around 7–8 T, corresponding to the magnetic phase transition from the collinear magnetic to ferroelectric incommensurate states. The ratio of the two magnetic phases significantly depends on the history of the change in the external magnetic field and the temperature of the sample. The details of history dependence of the ratio were discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.X-ray powder diffraction (XRD), Mössbauer effect (ME) spectroscopy and neutron diffraction (ND) were used to study the structural and magnetic properties of CoFe2-xCexO4 nanoferrites, where (x = 0.0 ≤ 0.1). The lattice parameter (a) and particle size (D) were obtained from Rietveld profile method. The particle size decreased with increasing the Ce content (x). The (ME) spectroscopy confirmed the magnetic order in all the studied samples, with the signature of increasing superparamagnetic contribution by decreasing (D). The cation distribution obtained from the (ME) spectroscopy suggested a partial inverse spinel structure for all the samples and the degree of inversion (δ) was calculated. The (ND) measurements for the samples with (x = 0.0, 0.01 and 0.07) supported the partial inverse spinel structure picture suggested by (ME) spectroscopy. The structure parameters obtained from both (XRD) and (ND) were in agreements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present a theoretical analysis of the magnetic phase diagram of CeTi1-xScxGe and GdFe1-xCoxSi as a function of the temperature and the Sc and Co concentration x, respectively. CeScGe and GdCoSi, as many other RTX (R = rare earth, T = transition metal, X = p-block element) compounds, present a tetragonal crystal structure where bilayers of R are separated by layers of T and X. While GdFeSi and CeTi0.75Sc0.25Ge are ferromagnetic, CeScGe and GdCoSi order antiferromagnetically with the R 4f magnetic moments on the same bilayer aligned ferromagnetically and magnetic moments in nearest neighbouring bilayers aligned antiferromagnetically. The antiferromagnetic transition temperature TN decreases with decreasing concentration x in both compounds and for low enough values of x the compounds show a ferromagnetic behavior. Based on these observations we construct a simplified model Hamiltonian that we solve numerically for the specific heat and the magnetization. We find a good qualitative agreement between the model and the experimental data. Our results show that the main magnetic effect of the Sc → Ti and Co → Fe substitution in these compounds is consistent with a change in the sign of the exchange coupling between magnetic moments in neighbouring bilayers. We expect a similar phenomenology for other magnetic RTX compounds with the same type of crystal structure.© 2020 Elsevier LtdElectrical properties of metal-oxide semiconductor (MOS) capacitors were measured with MgO/Al2O3 gate dielectrics deposited by atomic layer deposition (ALD) on GaN. For an Al2O3 (1 nm)/MgO (20 nm) dielectric layer, a leakage current density of 0.25 mA/cm2 at 1 V was measured for the MOS capacitor. A peak capacitance of ~0.1 μF/cm2 was obtained from the C-V measurements with significant hysteresis observed. In addition, a 15-minute forming gas anneal at 450 °C resulted in an increased leakage current density of 1 A/cm2 at 1 V while also increasing the peak capacitance by approximately 30%. To improve the performance, an Al2O3 (20 nm)/MgO (20 nm) dielectric stack was deposited that exhibited a leakage current density of ~1 × 10−5 mA/cm2 at 1 V, which corresponds to ~4 orders of magnitude lower current density than that of the single layer dielectric. Additionally, a 3-layer Al2O3 (10 nm)/MgO (20 nm)/Al2O3 (10 nm) stack also shows a leakage current density reduction of ~4 orders of magnitude, and a reduced density of interface states while remaining a high-k dielectric. The density of interface states was estimated to be between 6.8 × 1011 eV−1 cm−2 and 1.5 × 1012 eV−1 cm−2 for the 3-layer stack using the photo-assisted C-V method.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents the analysis and design of a transformer position sensor for pneumatic cylinder considering temperature stability. Two solenoid coils as excitation coil and pick up coil around cylinder are used for position transducer. The effects of temperature of aluminum cylinder and iron rod with different ferromagnetic materials on position sensor performance are analyzed and measured. We found that the effect of temperature dependence of shell resistivity is dominant, while the effect of permeability change is negligible. Based on the simulations and measurement we suggest simple method of temperature compensation.© 2020The authors regret that: 1). The authors regret that they forgot to indicate gratitude for carrying out the Mössbauer spectroscopy experiment for one sample with x = 0.25 at room temperature and for a partial interpretation of the obtained results. The authors express special gratitude and acknowledgments to Jaroslav Kohout and Tomas Kmječ from Joint Laboratory of Mössbauer Spectroscopy, Faculty of Mathematics and Physics, Charles University, 18,000 Prague 8, Czech Republic. 2). In the Table 2 some new data should be added. To the uncertainties of the fitted parameters listed in the Table 2, it should be added the experimental uncertainty – represented by half of the width of the channel corresponding to ~0.02 mm/s for the Isomer Shift (IS) and Quadrupolar Shift (QS) and to ~0.2 T for the Hyperfine Field (Bhf). 3). New Figure should be added. [Figure presented] This should be Fig. 3b. This Figure contains detailed and refined fitting information from the results of the Mössbauer spectroscopy experiment. 4). Three additional References which have been used in fitting and interpretation of obtained results from the Mössbauer spectroscopy experiment should be added: [62] H. Stepankova, J. Kohout, Z. Simsa, NMR study of Ti-Co, Ti-Mg and Ti substituted hexagonal ferrites with magnetoplumbite structure, J. Magn. Magn. Mater. 104–107 (1992) 411–412. https://doi.org/10.1016/0304–8853(92)90856-j. [63] H. Stepankova, J. Englich, J. Kohout, H. Lütgemeier, 57 Fe NMR in BaFe2-W hexagonal ferrite, Journal of Magnetism and Magnetic Materials 140–144 (1995) 2099–2100. https://doi.org/10.1016/0304–8853(94)01406-x. [64] T. Zak, Y. Jiraskova, CONFIT: Mossbauer spectra fitting program, Surf. Interface Anal. 38 (2006) 710–714. https://doi.org/10.1002/sia.2285. The number of References in the paper should thus be equal to 64.© 2020Magnetic-optical methods are used to investigate the magnetic microstructure of an epitaxial film of (Lu,Bi) substituted rare earth iron garnet. In particular, we focused our study on a bi-dimensional domain configuration, the Néel spike, which is induced and pinned at defects inside the sample or at its edges. Imaging of magnetic domains and domain-walls is obtained by direct magneto-optical interaction in the sample under study. The visualization of the stray-field distribution that is generated by single domain-walls is achieved by means of magneto-optical imaging with an indicator film. Furthermore, magnetostatic calculations were performed in order to correlate the net magnetic charge of the Néel spike domain and domain-walls with the measured stray-field. It results that the measured magnetic field intensity nearby the Néel spike tip is compatible with a Bloch-to-Néel wall transition.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper studies nonlinear dynamic characteristics of a nonlocal two-phase piezo-magnetic beam including geometric imperfections by considering piezoelectric reinforcement scheme. The piezoelectric reinforcement can cause an enhanced vibration behavior of smart nanobeams under magnetic field. All of prior papers on piezo-magnetic nanobeams ignore the influence of geometric imperfections which are substantial because a nanobeam is not ever ideal. Nonlinear governing equations of a smart nanobeam are derived based on refined beam theory and a numerical trend is provided to obtained nonlinear vibration frequency. This research shows that changing the volume fraction of piezoelectric phase in the material has a great influence on vibration behavior of smart nanobeam under electric and magnetic fields. Also, it can be seen that nonlinear vibration behavior of smart nanobeam is dependent on the magnitude of exerted electric voltage, magnetic potential, hardening elastic foundation and geometrical imperfection.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, three dimensional (3D) interconnected Ni1-xCox (0⩽x⩽100%) crossed nanowire (CNW) networks with different scale ratios have been fabricated in order to investigate the influence of size reduction of the whole 3D networks structure on their crystal orientation and magnetic properties. Interconnected porous polycarbonate membranes, each one with different nanopore diameters but with the same porosity, have been designed to obtain porous architectures with different scale ratios. Using these membranes, CNW networks with the same packing fraction of about 22%, but different nanowires (NWs) diameters have been grown by electrodeposition. As a result, the magnetostatic (MS) anisotropy in the saturated state is the same for all the 3D networks, which allows identifying size dependent magnetic anisotropies. Reducing the diameter of the nanowires leads to changes on their magnetic properties, so that Co-rich CNW networks show a magnetocrystalline (MC) anisotropy contribution originated by a preferential hexagonal close packed orientation that competes with the MS anisotropy field. In turn, low diameter Ni-rich CNW networks show an anisotropy contribution of different nature than the MS and MC fields. The strategy presented in this work to accurately separate magnetic contributions leads to a better understanding of the magnetic behavior of complex 3D nanoarchitectures and to their potential use in the development of magnetic, sensing and spintronic applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetotransport properties of mixed valence manganites could, in general, be tuned by controlling their doping concentration. Here we report the variation of magnetotransport properties of Sm0.5Ca0.25Sr0.25MnO3 thin films on SrTiO3 (1 0 0) substrates by tuning the epitaxial strain. We have achieved enhancement of magnetoresistance (MR) upon relaxation of out-of-plane compressive strain. The observed enhancement, explained by considering the small polaron hopping model, is a result of decrease in the activation energy (EA) as well as the disorder energy (WD) due to probable changes in lattice structure, induced by the epitaxial strain. These energies further decrease upon application of external magnetic field. Our experimental findings clearly indicate a pathway to enhance the magnetoresistance just by tuning the strain in oxide epitaxial films grown on substrate of proper lattice parameter, which ultimately might be beneficial for magnetic sensor technology.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the effects of induced field generated by the magnetized wall on the static normal force of magnetorheological fluids have been studied both theoretically and experimentally. Firstly, the magnetic field distributions between two parallel ferromagnetic sheets in a uniform field have been investigated. The magnitude and direction of normal force created by the field gradient in different field regions are calculated based on the Biot-Savart theorem. In an attempt to obtain the correspondences between the magnetization of the magnetized sheets and the magnetic flux density of the field, we designed a uniform magnetic field generator for measuring the induced field of the magnetized sheets. The static normal forces of 30% volume fraction magnetorheological fluids with or without magnetized wall condition have been measured by a commercial plate-plate rheometer, and the field fluctuation at the edge of the magnetized sheet has been validated by controlling the radius of test area. The experimental results indicated that the magnetized sheets with a thickness of 0.2 mm can increase the static normal force by up to 20% when the thickness of suspensions is 0.5 mm. But the increment is limited by the saturation magnetization of material itself, in addition, the non-uniform magnetic field of the magnetized sheets will adversely affect the increase of the static normal force. The experimental results are basically consistent with the theoretical analysis when the radius of test area is 8 mm, but underestimate the field increment for the 10 mm-radius case which may caused by the uneven distribution of particles.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We propose a new mechanism of magneto-optical Faraday and Kerr effects. Our mechanism is based on spin–orbit interaction of conducting electrons of ferromagnetic material with the electric field of the radiation. We estimate the magnitude of magneto-optical effects originated from this mechanism with the magnitude obtained in the framework of standard mechanism, based on spin–orbit scattering of the conducting electrons at the potential of crystal lattice. We discuss the possibility to distinguish this new contribution in the experiment.© 2020The structural, elastic, electronic and magnetic properties of the novel full-Heusler alloys Mn2LiAs and Mn2LiSb are determined to explore their structural stability and half-metallicity. The method used is the first-principles method based on density functional theory. Calculations show that the Hg2CuTi-type structure is more energetically favourable than the conventional Cu2MnAl-type structure and is thermodynamically and mechanically stable for both alloys. The Hg2CuTi-type Mn2LiAs and Mn2LiAs alloys are half-metallic ferrimagnets and have a total magnetic moment of 2.000 μB per formula unit. They follow the Slater-Pauling rule and have an indirect energy gap in the spin-down channels with values of 1.176 and 1.269 eV at equilibrium lattice constants of 5.793 and 6.132 Å, respectively. The half-metallicity is kept within the limits of a wide lattice constant range. The spin polarisation ratio is 100% and the total magnetic moment is 2.000 μB. Mn2LiAs and Mn2LiSb alloys, which can be synthesised via experiments, are promising candidates for spintronic applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we investigated the motion of a skyrmion on an asymmetric disk induced by an out-of-plane spin-polarized current. The appearance of two movement regimes based on disk asymmetry was reported. A tangential component is induced in the restoration force by the asymmetry, which in turn competes with the tangential component of the STT force. For a disk with low asymmetry, a precession motion was obtained and for a disk with high asymmetry, a convergent movement to points of stagnation was reported. These regimes can be understood as a result of competition between restoration forces and STT forces.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the phenomenon of twin interface nucleations in single-crystalline Ni-Mn-Ga samples under coupled magnetic and mechanical loading conditions is studied. First, some constitutive assumptions are proposed and the magneto-mechanical governing system for a single-crystalline Ni-Mn-Ga sample is formulated. Then, by analyzing the connection conditions of some physical quantities, the configurational forces on any ‘fictitious twin interfaces’ can be calculated. Further from the twin interface movement criteria in the governing system, a practical scheme for predicting twin interface nucleations at the macroscopic level is proposed, which is integrated into an iterative numerical algorithm for solving the governing system. To show the efficiency of this scheme, some typical examples are studied. Based on the numerical simulation results, the evolution properties of the configurational forces on the fictitious twin interfaces are analyzed. Then, the critical loading states and the preferred positions for the nucleations of twin interfaces can be determined. The predicted magneto-mechanical response of the sample can fit the experimental results well. Furthermore, the configurations of the sample and the distributions of the associated physical quantities in the sample during the different loading stages can be simulated.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The transition-metal based alloy MnFe4Si3 not only is a potential candidate for room temperature magnetocaloric applications, but also shows a large magnetic anisotropy forming an interesting case study in the search for rare-earth free permanent magnets. However, former polycrystalline and single crystal studies led to major disagreements about the order of the magnetic transition and the magnetocrystalline anisotropy scheme, which are two essential points for the understanding of this alloy. Here, magnetic, magnetocaloric properties and the magnetic anisotropy of MnFe4Si3 (Mn~0.86Fe~4.24Si~2.90) are investigated on a high quality single crystal grown by flux method, and compared to polycrystalline materials. Using the recently proposed criterion of field dependence of the magnetocaloric effect, we show that the ferromagnetic transition is more likely to be of second order, which is fully compatible with the absence of thermal hysteresis at the ferromagnetic transition in the present MnFe4Si3 crystal. The c axis is confirmed to be the hard magnetic axis, both in single crystal and polycrystalline MnFe4Si3, and a large, dominant, K1 anisotropy constant (~−2.5 MJ m−3) is found at low temperatures.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Detection of harmful biological substances in food at the Point of Use (PoU) is very important to the prevention of foodborne diseases. Sample and reagent preparation at the PoU, as a necessary step before detection, is urgently needed. Portable and field-deployable sample preparation microfluidic devices for manipulating particles and biological substances in Newtonian fluids like water have been developed. However, understanding the mechanism of particle focusing and multiplex sorting of particles with various properties in prominent non-Newtonian fluids such as milk, blood, and DNA solutions have lagged behind. Accordingly, we developed a microfluidic device to investigate the effect of inertial, magnetic and elastic forces on the focusing of magnetic (9 and 15 µm) and non-magnetic (15 µm) particles in synthetic viscoelastic fluids with various viscosities. We also demonstrated the application of our studies in Triplex Inertia-Magneto-Elastic (TIME) sorting of these particles with purity and efficiency of more than 92%. The device included a square microchannel with a side permanent magnet, expanding symmetrically downstream to a wider channel to drop the particles velocity for on-chip imaging. We investigated the effect of multiple parameters on the focusing of each particle experimentally and analytically, in order to obtain understanding of particle dynamics and the best recipe in which triplex particle separation could be achieved with high efficiency. The studied parameters included the microchannel dimension, flow rate, fluid viscoelasticity, and magnetic field strength and exposure time. This study provides the foundation for development of devices for separation of bio-substances in viscoelastic fluids, immunologically attached to microparticles. Our device has the potential to be used for on-site sample preparation along with a variety of biosensors to render biodetection possible at the PoU.© 2020 Elsevier LtdAn analytical model for the breakdown voltage (BV) of a Lateral Double-diffused Metal Oxide Semiconductor field-effect transistor with a Multi-Ring structure (M-R LDMOS) is presented. The proposed analytical model is obtained by solving Poisson's equation in cylindrical coordinates, which can reasonably explain the modulation effect of the M-R structure on the surface and vertical electric field distributions at the same time, and accurately describe the potential and electric field distributions of the M-R structure. As well as the lateral, vertical and radial BVs are formulized to predict the breakdown behaviors. In the paper, all the analytical results can be validated by numerical results obtained by Sentaurus Technology Computer Aided Design (TCAD) simulation, showing the accuracy of the proposed model. It is worth noting that the proposed analytical model is applicable to lateral power devices with an M-R structure.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The findings of a 57Fe and 151Eu Mössbauer spectroscopy investigation between 1.8 and 299.5 K of EuFeAs2 and the 14 K superconductor EuFe0.97Ni0.03As2 are reported. In both compounds, the Fe sublattice orders in the antiferromagnetic spin-density-wave fashion with the Néel temperatures and Fe saturation magnetic moments of 106.2(1.9) K, 0.78(1)μB and 56.6(2.2) K, 0.47(1)μB, respectively. The Néel temperatures and the saturation hyperfine magnetic fields of the antiferromagnetically ordered Eu sublattice in both compounds are 44.4(5) K, 294.2(7) kOe and 43.5(1) K, 290.5(1) kOe, respectively. The 3% substitution of Fe by Ni in EuFeAs2 has a dramatic effect on the magnetism of the Fe sublattice and virtually no effect on the magnetism of the Eu sublattice. The presence of Fe and Eu magnetic order in EuFe0.97Ni0.03As2 is direct proof of the coexistence of superconductivity and magnetism. The increase of the magnitude of the main component of the electric field gradient tensor, at both Fe and Eu sites, with decreasing temperature is explained by a T3/2 power-law relation. The Debye temperatures of EuFeAs2, EuFe0.97Ni0.03As2, and the FeAs2 impurity phase are 355(18), 428(14), and 594(25) K, respectively.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fe3O4-intercalated reduced graphene oxide (Fe3O4-rGO) nanocomposites were prepared by an in-situ reduction method. We studied the effect of preparation conditions, including GO:Fe3+ molar ratio and reduction temperature, on the structure and electromagnetic wave absorption properties of the nanocomposites. The Fe3O4-rGO nanocomposites have a typical sandwich structure at a 1:1 M ratio. Increasing the reduction temperature above 500 °C yielded a relatively pure Fe3O4 crystalline phase. Furthermore, changes in the microstructure effectively influence the matching performance of the material. A reasonable molar ratio and reduction temperature yields a composite with improved impedance matching and thickness matching characteristics. At a ratio of 1:1 and reduction temperature of 600 °C, the actual matching thickness of the material conforms to the quarter-wavelength theory, and the input impedance of the material matches the air impedance. As a result, electromagnetic waves enter the interior of the composite unhindered, where they can be effectively attenuated, thereby further improving the wave absorption properties of the material. When the thickness is 3 mm, the maximum reflectance at 8.6 GHz reaches −49.6 dB with an effective bandwidth of 2.72 GHz.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic thin films and multilayers offer many novel physical phenomena with tremendous potential for applications. Various growth processes and methods are in place to make homogeneous films. However, dispersion in local easy axes is an inherent issue which may give rise to an effective random anisotropy in thin film. It is important to investigate the effect of random anisotropy on the magnetic properties of the thin films. In this report we address the aspect of local dispersion induced random anisotropy on magnetization reversal in ferromagnetic (FM)/non-magnetic(NM)/ferromagnetic(FM) stacks. We show that the magnetization reversal is not only governed by the inter-layer interaction but the intrinsic anisotropies also play a crucial role. In this context we have studied the magnetization reversal of Co/AlOX/Co trilayers with various thicknesses of AlOX which acts as a spacer between the two Co layers. Presence of random anisotropy in addition to growth induced uniaxial anisotropy was observed in all the samples. Magneto-optic Kerr effect (MOKE) based microscopy revealed dipolar-coupled layer-by-layer magnetization reversal of the Co layers which was corroborated by polarized neutron reflectometry (PNR) experiments. Micromagnetic simulations confirmed that the presence of random anisotropy in addition to uniaxial anisotropy leads to layer-by-layer magnetization reversal.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization reversal of an individual magnetic nano-structure has been best studied using a μ-SQUID. An optimum inductive shunt helps in eliminating the hysteresis in μ-SQUID's current voltage characteristics, giving thus a direct voltage readout of magnetic flux with high bandwidth and sensitivity. Here we report on a new μ-SQUID magnetometry setup for studying the magnetism of individual magnetic nano-structures. The switching field anisotropy of Permalloy nano-needles was studied using both hysteretic and non–hysteretic μ-SQUID modes. The observed anisotropy fits well the magnetization reversal through curling mode under the Néel-Brown model as well as micromagnetic simulations. The latter show a reversal through vortex nucleation and annihilation whose signatures we observe through minor hysteresis loops in experiments. Some preliminary magnetization reversal studies on Fe3O4 nano-particles using a non–hysteretic μ-SQUID mode are also briefly discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The multitechnique characterization of magnetic nanocomposites NZFO/f-MWCNTs synthesized via co-precipitation method based on Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 ferrite nanoparticles (NFZO) and functionalized multiwalled carbon nanotubes (f-MWCNTs) is reported. The XRD patterns and TEM images confirm the successful formation of composites after synthesis. The crystallites size of NZFO particles in almost non-dependent on treatment route in contrary to microstructure of as-synthesized hybrids. The comparison of XPS spectra of studied nanomaterials reveals the domination of MWCNTs contribution as expected. The iron redistribution/separation confirmed by variation within deconvoluted Fe2p spectra is dependent on calcination process. The magnetic properties in composites is slightly affected by catalyst residuals but the occurrence of superparamagnetic (SPM) state originated from NZFO is sustained.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The Mn55Bi45−xZrx (x = 0, 1, 3 and 5) permanent alloys are prepared by melt-spinning process with subsequently annealing. The microstructure evolution of Mn-Bi-Zr alloys was systematically studied by XRD, DSC and TEM, their coercivity mechanism was discussed by Kronmüller equation and magnetic behaviors were analyzed by FORC. The XRD results showed the proportion of the low temperature phase (LTP) MnBi in the as quenched MnBi ribbons increased with the addition of Zr, and improved by annealed treatment. According to the Kronmüller equation, the coercivity mechanism for the Zr-free and Zr-doped MnBi alloys is explained by the nucleation of reverse domains. The FORCs diagram showed that more than one major peak appeared for x = 0 sample, demonstrating the dispersive distribution of the interaction, resulting from isolated LTP MnBi grains by the Mn matrix from TEM HAADF image, and the dispersive distribution of the interaction led to collapsed hysteresis loop. Comparing to the Zr-free sample, one stronger peak is located at the lower Hc in the x = 1 sample, indicating a concentrated distribution of the interaction, which resulted in a single-phase magnetized loop and the lower coercivity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of ComPtn clusters (m + n = 2–10) are investigated using the plane wave pseudopotential method within the spin-polarized density functional theory. Four different methods are adopted to initialize the structures of Co-Pt clusters before relaxation. The lowest-energy Co-Pt clusters, the majority of which are more stable than those previously reported, are identified. Co atoms are generally located in the interior of the clusters while Pt atoms tend to be distributed near the surface. Furthermore, CoPt2, Co2Pt2, Co4Pt4, and Co6Pt4 are found to be most energetically favorable compositions. The total magnetic moment of Co-Pt clusters with ferromagnetic coupling rises almost monotonically with Co content. The magnetic moments on Co and Pt atoms in Pt-rich clusters are generally larger than those in Co-rich clusters, and both the maximum magnetic moments (2.42 µB on Co atom and 0.95 µB on Pt atom) simultaneously occur in the CoPt5 cluster. Moreover, the variation of magnetic moments, due to the introduction of single Co (Pt) atom into Pt (Co) clusters, has been examined in detail. This study is helpful to further understand the structures and magnetic properties of Co-Pt clusters, and provides a theoretical basis for designing targeted nanoalloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Z-type hexaferrite has attracted considerable attention in the research and development sector especially in high-frequency applications due to its unique soft magnetic nature (basal-plane magnetocrystalline anisotropy) at room temperature. Sol-gel auto combustion synthesized Z-type hexaferrites of compositions Ba1.5Sr1.5Co2-x-yCuxZnyFe24O41 (where x = 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, y = 0.8, 0.6, 0.4) have been studied for structural, magnetic and Mössbauer properties. The Rietveld refined X-ray diffraction (XRD) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM) along with selected area electron diffraction (SAED) clearly reveal that the hexaferrites are single-phased without any impurities. The crystalline structure is confirmed to be hexagonal with space group P63/mmc. The magnetic studies are done by using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) at room temperature indicate the enhanced Ms values with very low values of Hc for all the hexaferrites. The tremendous decrease in Hc value from 4.96 Oe to 2.75 Oe, leads to the formation of extremely soft magnetic hexaferrites at room temperature. These are the lowest Hc values as per reported literature till date. The magnetic measurements are substantiated by room temperature long-range ferromagnetic Mössbauer analysis. The magnetic studies along with Mössbauer parameters are well-explained based on relevant existing theories.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Phase transformation driven soft magnetic properties have been correlated through different stages of nano-crystallization of Co-based amorphous alloys, via transverse magnetic annealing, by combining structural, magnetothermal, domain imaging, and AC/DC magnetometry techniques. The nano-crystallization starts by nucleation and growth process of soft magnetic meta-stable, thermodynamically favored, Co23B6 phase with less nucleation activation energy compared to other stable phases. In the second crystallisation stage, Co2B and Co3B, as a semi-hard magnetic phase, are identified in the alloys, magnetically annealed at 525 and 550 °C, respectively. Field-induced anisotropy dominates over the residual contributions of magneto-crystalline anisotropy of the phases, precipitated after field annealing at 510, 515, and 525 °C. The anomalous loss is significantly reduced as by annealing in a transverse magnetic field due to the reorientation of the preferred magnetisation axis, and consequently, change in dominant magnetization reversal mechanism from domain wall motion to magnetization rotation. In addition, magnetic annealing causes a measurable decrease in the domain width, which, in turn, promotes pinning and inhibits domain wall motion, thus further favours coherent domain rotation as the primary mechanism of magnetization. The combined mechanism of nanocrystallisation and coherent magnetisation rotation accounts for a 70% decrement in the anomalous loss in the so-processed ribbons at 525 °C, which renders them attractive for applications in mid- and high-frequency power supplies and inverters.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report detailed magneto-transport measurements on single crystals of the magnetic Weyl semi-metal Co3Sn2S2. Recently a large anomalous Hall effect and chiral anomaly have been reported in this material which have been suggested to be related to the large Berry curvature between the Weyl points (Liu et al., Nature Physics (2018).). Another effect expected to result from the topological band structure of Weyl materials is the planar Hall effect (PHE). In this work we indeed observe PHE in single crystals of Co3Sn2S2. However, PHE is observed for temperatures ⩽the ferromagnetic ordering temperature Tc=175 K. Therefore we conclude that most likely the PHE can't be connected to the Topological character of Co3Sn2S2. We also did not observe the Chiral anomaly induced negative longitudinal MR.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.To improve the coercivity (Hcj) and thermal stability of hot-deformed (HD) Nd-Fe-B magnets, Pr50Dy20Cu15Ga15 (at.%) alloy powders with minor heavy rare earth (HRE) are introduced. The magnetic properties, thermal stability and microstructure of the HD magnets with different amounts of Pr50Dy20Cu15Ga15 alloy powders are investigated. The Hcj of the HD magnets is enhanced from 1242 kA/m to 1595 kA/m by doping 3 wt.% Pr50Dy20Cu15Ga15 alloy powders. The thermal stability of the doped HD magnet is also improved at high temperatures. The better isolation of Nd2Fe14B grains by rare earth-rich (RE-rich) phases and the formation of local high-anisotropy (Nd, Pr, Dy)2Fe14B hard magnetic phases are the main reasons for the increase of Hcj. Notably, the non-uniform aggregation of RE-rich phases results in the inhomogeneity of magnetic anisotropy, which eventually leads to the large openness of the recoil loops. This study gives an intuitive view on the relationship between microstructure evolution and magnetic properties of the HD magnets.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Based on ab initio calculations, we have studied structural, electronic and optical properties of MoX2(X = S, Se) metal dichalcogenides and their nano-layers (NLs) according to the density functional theory using Wien2k code. The generalized gradient approximation (GGA) and GGA Engel-vosko are adopted to perform the exchange-correlation calculations. The equilibrium lattice parameters of MoS2 and MoSe2 compounds are calculated. The mechanical stability of these compounds is proved using Born condition. Moreover, the ductility and brittleness of MoX2 compounds are studied. The topological phase of MoS2 and MoSe2 bulks and their NLs is studied utilizing band order, Z2 invariant and surface density of states. The optical properties of MoX2 bulks and NLs are studied. The Penn model is satisfied for both MoS2 and MoSe2 compounds by studying their real part of static dielectric function. The increase of the thickness of these NLs leads to the changes in the absorption, reflectivity and energy loss function of these NLs in some specific energy ranges.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The hollow ZnFe2O4@C composites with core-shell structure were successfully synthesized through a simple method. SEM and TEM results illustrate that the hollow ZnFe2O4@C composites are of core-shell structure with an average diameter of about 200 nm. Compare with hollow ZnFe2O4, the as-prepared hollow ZnFe2O4@C composites exhibit excellent microwave absorption properties in terms of the minimum reflection loss, the thickness and the absorption bandwidth. The minimum reflection loss of hollow ZnFe2O4@C composites is −51.38 dB at 15.39 GHz with the thickness of 2.0 mm and the absorption bandwidth below −10 dB is up to 4.10 GHz (12.56–16.66 GHz) with the thickness of 2.2 mm. These excellent absorbing properties are result to the multi-component synergistic effect and its unique structure.© 2020 The AuthorsBi-phasic composite films are generally grown as multilayers that result in layer-by-layer morphology with each layer having a distinct chemical composition. In this work, we report an all-in-one chemical synthesis technique combined with spin-coating to prepare single-layer bi-magnetic LaFeO3 (LFO)-CoFe2O4 (CFO) composite thin films with both phases co-existing in the same layer. The films have been characterized using X-ray diffraction (XRD) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM), and the magnetic properties have been probed using dc magnetometry at room and low temperature. The unique synthesis technique followed ensures homogeneity of the two phases on the nanoscale with grain sizes ~10 nm for CFO and few tens of nm for LFO, as observed from TEM images. XRD confirms the presence of only the desired LFO and CFO phases in the films without any undesired secondary phases. Magnetic hysteresis loops reveal a coercivity of ~0.2 T at room temperature that increases by nearly one order of magnitude at T = 5 K. The all-in-one synthesis technique reported here can be used to prepare different bi-phasic composites in the form of single-layer two-dimensional films as well as zero-dimensional nanoparticles by a suitable modification of the precursors, solvents, and chelating agents.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Heusler alloys with Mn and Co have been found to exhibit interesting electronic and magnetic properties. Mn2CoAl is well known SGS compound while Mn2CoGa has weak half metallic character. By using plane wave pseudo-potential method, we studied the effect of Fe and Cr doping on half-metalicity and magnetism of these compounds. The calculated values of formation of energies and cohesive energies confirms the stability of parent and doped compounds. The doping destroys the SGS nature of Mn2CoAl while the small-scale doping enhance the half-metallicity of Mn2CoGa making it perfect half-metal. In case of Mn2CoAl, the doping decrease the band gap while increase in band width is noticed for Mn2CoGa. The half-metallicity is destroyed in both cases when the doping level is beyond certain degree. Moreover, we have also computed magnetic behavior of Mn2CoZ alloys and we found that total magnetic moments of dopped samples have higher values than that of pristine compounds.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.CoNi alloy is an important absorber and it can combine characteristics of transition metals Co and Ni with various advantages of strong magnetic loss, low cost and easy morphology control. The microporous CoNi@(CoO-NiO) nanoparticles (NPs) of about 45 nm are obtained by using hydrogen plasma metal reaction (HPMR) and dealloying methods. The Al element in Al9Co2, Al70Co15Ni15 and Al14Co3Ni3 phases can be dealloyed by NaOH at 323 K. The CoNi surface would oxidize to CoO and NiO, leading to the core@shell structure. The CoNi@(CoO-NiO)-paraffin wax composite displays high microwave absorption performance with minimum reflection loss (RL) of −38.1 dB at matching thickness of 5.0 mm. The effective absorption bandwidth (RL < −10 dB, at thickness of 2.0 mm) is 5.9 GHz. The RL values below −10 dB cover frequencies of 4.6–18.0 GHz with thickness ranging from 2.0 to 5.0 mm. The effective permittivity modification for a mixture of air and microporous CoNi host, and the large interfacial polarization relaxation of the CoNi@(CoO-NiO) structure contribute much to the enhanced microwave absorption performances.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The turbulence of capillary waves on the surface of a ferrofluid with a high permeability in a horizontal magnetic field is considered in the framework of a one-dimensional weakly nonlinear model. In the limit of a strong magnetic field, the surface waves under study can propagate without distortions along or against the direction of external field, i.e., similar to Alfvén waves in a perfectly conducting fluid. The interaction of counter-propagating nonlinear waves leads to the development of wave turbulence on the surface of the liquid. The computational data show that the spectrum of turbulence is divided into two parts: a low-frequency dispersionless region, where the magnetic forces dominate and a high-frequency dispersive one, in which the influence of capillary forces becomes significant. In the first region, the spectrum of the surface elevation has the same exponent in k and ω domains and its value is close to -3.5, what is in a good agreement with the estimation obtained from the dimensional analysis of the weak turbulence spectra. At the high frequencies, the computed spatial spectrum of the surface waves is close to k-5/2 which corresponds to ω-5/3 in terms of the frequency. This spectrum does not coincide with the Zakharov-Filonenko spectrum obtained for pure capillary waves. A possible explanation of this fact is in the influence of coherent structures (like shock waves) usually arising in media with weak dispersion.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Here we describe the first example of magnetite based sol-gel matrices with structure anisotropy. The materials were synthesized by magnetic structuring of magnetic fluids based on pristine magnetite nanoparticles with a subsequent formation of magnetite hydrogels and drying in mild conditions. The corresponding ferrofluid was synthesized by an ultrasonically-assisted co-precipitation procedure and consisted of 10 nm pristine magnetite nanoparticles (MNPs) dispersed in deionized water. Colloidal stability of the system was maintained by the high value of zeta potential valued +33 mV at pH 7.0. Under the influence of propylene oxide, the surface of MNPs was partially dehydrated and inter-particle Fe–O–Fe bonds were formed leading to gelation of the system. The produced materials had a linear periodic structure with its parameters, such as periodicity, relative surface area, pore diameter, total pore volume, dependent on the magnetic fields applied during their synthesis. Thus, the change of the magnetic field from zero to 515 G led to the elevation of the materials surface area from 125 to 209 m∊2/g.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we report a thorough examination of the critical behavior of the cubic Ni0.3−xCux Zn0.7Fe2O4 (x = 0.0, 0.1 and 0.2) spinel ferrite which are crystallized with different irregular shapes of particle size (spherical,polygonal and cubic). The magnetic transition is ferromagnetic to paramagnetic state for all Cu-doped compounds. Different theoretical analyses, as the modified Arrott plot, Kouvel–Fisher method, and critical isotherm, have been used to identify the values of the ferromagnetic transition temperature TC, and the critical exponents of β, γ and δ. All the obtained values of critical parameters were found to be close to the 3D-Heisenberg theoretical model, which implies short-range magnetic interactions in Cu-doped compounds. The reliability of critical parameters was further checked through different methods, such as the Widom scaling relationship and the magnetic equation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The non-spherical shape (flake-shape) iron particles based magnetorheological (MR) fluid thermal conductivity is experimentally investigated using the hot-wire method. Under the magnetic field, thermal conductivity is enhanced by 20% compared to spherical shape commercial MR fluid having nearly 20% higher volume fraction of iron particles. This enhancement attributes to the larger contact area of the flake-shape particle (when they form a chain), which helps to transport heat quickly. The magnetic nanoparticles of size 6.5 nm were added to this MR fluid for varying magnetic weight fraction and studied its influence on thermal conductivity. The increase of magnetic nanoparticle concentration enhances the thermal conductivity and increases field reversibility. The observed increase in thermal conductivity and low hysteresis losses is attributed to the friction reduction in flake-shaped iron particles in the presence of nanoparticles.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The temporal behavior of magnetization reversal mechanism and domain structures of (Co/Ni) and (Co/Pd) multilayers have been studied using magneto-optical Kerr effect microscopy and magnetometry measurements. The domain size and nucleation field of (Co/Ni) multilayers were found to be reduced as the number of bilayers increases. On the other hand, (Co/Pd)×10 multilayer has a much larger domain size, faster magnetization switching, and a higher nucleation field than that in (Co/Ni). From the imaging of magnetic domains, two different types were observed, namely, dendritic domains for (Co/Ni) and blocks type for (Co/Pd). From time dependence of magnetization reversal at a fixed applied magnetic field, it was revealed that the reversal mechanism in (Co/Ni) multilayer occurs by nucleation followed by domain propagation. Whereas, for (Co/Pd) multilayers, few large domains were observed, and they were found to expand at a faster rate until a complete saturation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we focus on the forming microwave induced phase grating (MIPG) in a crystal of molecular magnets. Firstly, we calculate the energy split of molecular magnet in the present of dc magnetic filed, and the results show that the frequencies dependence of the dc magnetic field are in the microwave frequency range. Secondly, the molecular magnet is subject two strong control magnetic fields (standing wave field and pump magnetic field). When a weak probe magnetic field with the frequency in the microwave range enters the crystal, the two control magnetic fields will modify the transmission and reflection properties of weak magnetic field. The system achieves high transmissivity and a big phase excursion for the weak probe magnetic field and form a microwave phase grating. Under proper parameters condition, the first-order diffraction efficiency of the microwave phase grating reaches 31%, which is close to an ideal sinusoidal phase grating. And the diffraction efficiency of the grating can be adjusted efficiently by tuning the control field intensity, interaction length L and the single photon detuning. Thirdly, we also discuss the effect of Dopper effect on the microwave phase grating.© 2019A spin-1/2 Ising model, defined in the body centered cubic lattice, is used to describe some of the thermodynamic properties of Fep-Alq alloys, with p+q=1. The model assumes, besides the nearest-neighbor exchange coupling, the existence of further next-nearest-neighbor superexchange interactions, where the latter ones depend on the aluminum atoms cluster size. The Ising system so considered is studied by employing Monte Carlo simulations, using a hybrid algorithm consisting of one single-spin Metropolis move together with one single-cluster Wolff algorithm allied, in addition, with single histograms procedures and finite-size scaling techniques. Quite good fits to the experimental results of the ordering critical temperature, as a function of Al concentration in the range 0⩽q<0.7, are obtained and compared to more recent theoretical approaches done on the same alloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents topology optimization for the design of magnetic composite applicable to electropermanent magnet. Here, the magnetic composite is built from a periodic microstructure consisting of air, iron and permanent magnet (PM) materials. The combination of non-magnetic, soft and hard magnetic materials in a microscopic scale enables to produce its own persistent magnetic field like PM material, and also enables the control of the magnetic field by an external current like iron material. This work aims to find the optimal microstructure unit cell layout of the electropermanent magnet, and estimate its cross-property bounds. Here, the cross-property bounds connect the effective magnetic permeability and residual flux density, which are calculated using the asymptotic homogenization method. The design objectives (i.e. desired effective properties) are theoretically studied with consideration of application to electromechanical devices. Then, an multi-objective optimization problem to achieve desired effective properties is formulated and solved with a multi-material gradient-based topology optimization formulation. As a result, the optimal composite unit cell layouts that constitute the Pareto fronts are successfully obtained. From the Pareto fronts, cross-property bounds of the electropermanent magnet are numerically constructed and discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Diluted magnetic semiconductors with room-temperature ferromagnetism (RTFM) opens new prospects for the development of next-generation spintronic devices. For now, the rare earth doping is an effective method to tune the ferromagnetism of semiconductor materials. In this work, we fabricated undoped In2S3 and In2S3: Sm3+ nanoparticles using gas-liquid phase chemical deposition method. UV–visible and photoluminescence spectra demonstrate that the introduction of Sm3+ ions lead to bandgap narrowing and enhanced luminescence intensity. Magnetic characterizations show that all synthetic samples display a ferromagnetic behaviour, and the maximum saturation magnetization of the samples can be tuned by regulating the concentration of doped Sm3+ ions. The RTFM in Sm doped In2S3 nanoparticles derives from the coupling interaction between the localized defect states and Sm3+ ions and is described using bound magnetic polarons (BMPs) mechanism. First-principle calculations reveal that In vacancies and Sm dopants are responsible for the generation of magnetic moments which come mainly from S 3p orbitals around the In vacancy and Sm 4f orbitals. Our results suggest that In2S3: Sm3+ nanoparticles constitute promising semiconductor materials for use in future electronic and spintronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Phase-pure bismuth iron oxide nanoparticles are reported for the first time based on selection of solvent, during sol–gel synthesis, under as-synthesized conditions and without using any stabilizing agent. Two solvents are being used during sol synthesis i.e. acetic acid and ethylene glycol. Nanoparticles prepared using acetic acid as solvent result in amorphous behavior under as-synthesized conditions, whereas BiFeO3 phase is obtained after calcination at 200 °C. Mixed BiFeO3 and Bi2Fe4O9 phases are obtained for nanoparticles calcined at 300 °C. Nanoparticles prepared using ethylene glycol as solvent result in phase pure BiFeO3 even under as-synthesized conditions and this phase persists after calcination up to 300 °C. Presence and stability of Raman bands corresponding to both E(TO) and A1(TO) show BiFeO3 phase. Nanoparticles with diameter of ~15 nm prepared using ethylene glycol as solvent result in ferromagnetic behavior with saturation magnetization of 9.1 emu/g under as-synthesized conditions due to modulation of spiral spin structure. Decrease in magnetic anisotropy constant is observed with increase in calcination temperature. FC/ZFC curves indicate presence of ferromagnetic domains at 80–300 K and cusp in FC/ZFC data is attributed to pinning of magnetic domains. These interesting properties are useful for advanced applications of bismuth ferrite that is also popular as a multiferroic material.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, dielectric and microwave absorption behavior of flower-like Ni/SiC composites has been studied in the 2–18 GHz frequency range. Single-phase flower-like Ni particles were successfully synthesized via a facile hydrothermal method. The synthesized flower-like Ni particles were mixed with SiC using mortar pestle in varying SiC:Ni weight ratios viz. 4:1, 1:1, and 1:4. The phase and morphology of prepared materials were studied using X-ray diffraction and FE-SEM techniques, respectively. The dielectric results show improvement in the complex permittivity and complex permeability values for the prepared composites with the increase in the concentration of synthesized Ni particles in SiC. Improvement in the dielectric properties translates into better microwave absorption behavior for flower-like Ni/SiC composites as compared to pure SiC. The synthesized flower-like Ni/SiC composites exhibited a minimum reflection loss of −31.04 dB and −28.53 dB for samples with 1:1 and 1:4 compositions, respectively. The corresponding −10 dB absorption bandwidth is 3.44 GHz and 2.89 GHz, respectively. The reflection loss results suggest that flower-like Ni/SiC composites may be tuned for optimal operation in C, X and, Ku bands by varying the Ni concentration and the thickness of absorber. In addition, the radar cross section (RCS) studies were simulated using HFSS. The RCS study of perfect electric conductor (PEC) substrate coated with flower-like Ni/SiC composite coatings indicate the effectiveness of the developed composites in reducing the RCS by efficiently suppressing the strong microwave scatterings.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Surface laser treatment of soft magnetic materials, such as GO SiFe electrical steels, is mainly used to reduce iron losses by modifying the static and the dynamic magnetic properties. Laser treatment effect on mesoscopic electromagnetic properties of soft magnetic materials is presented. An experimental procedure using the Single Sheet Tester is performed on a magnetized sheet with specific exciting induction level and frequency. Transient average magnetic flux density through the sample cross-section and its corresponding applied magnetic field are measured. Data are identified in the time-domain with numerical results obtained by solving the diffusion equation using a 1-D discretization approach. The identification strategy requires a material law that includes both non-linear static and dynamic properties and describes the magnetic behavior due to domains and walls dynamics. Next, parametric and physical studies are performed on materials submitted to different laser treatments in order to determine and interpret their effects on the identified magnetic properties and the time response in the sheet's depth. The results show that the static and the dynamic properties can be simultaneously improved. This analysis help to understand the impact of laser treatments on the static and the dynamic behaviour in order to improve the material magnetic performances within magnetic circuits inside electrical machines and transformers.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Soft magnetic SiFe cores of rotating machines or 3-phase transformers tend to exhibit rotational magnetization (RM). RM is of high industrial importance, since causing significant increases of both losses and magnetostriction. However, so far, for the direct detection of RM, not any sensor type was available that could be introduced to the inner of a core in non-destructive ways. This paper describes a promising novel principle that takes advantage from so-called tangential induction sensors, as developed recently. The sensor consists of a nano-crystalline ribbon of e.g. 30 mm × 10 mm × 20 µm size. It is placed on the to-be-inspected region of SiFe lamination, with its long axis in transverse direction. With the up-come of significant RM, the ribbon tends to be strongly magnetized, up to saturation. The sensor principle is based on the finding that the slope of upcoming saturation induction increases with increasing so-called axis ratio a of RM. Aiming for a sensor that can be inserted in a machine core without creating a disturbing inter-laminar air gap, a less than 300 µm thick sensor prototype was manufactured by means of a so-called 2D/3D assembler. On a kapton foil as a substrate, the latter produces a winding of eight silver ink turns round the ribbon that acts as a nucleus of a coil. In instants of upcoming saturation, the spike-like coil signal exhibits an amplitude that is proportional to the axis ratio a of RM, in approximation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we investigate in Fe-Si laminations the core-loss coefficients variation with the flux density within the loss statistical approach framework. We find that the dynamical core-loss coefficients can be linked with the differential permeability defined from the low frequency normal curve. We interpret these variations as the fingerprint of the domain-wall activity (i.e. all the processes involving domain-wall movements, nucleation and annihilation) during the magnetization process. We show that the classical loss variation can be qualitatively described by the macroscopic formulation of the skin-depth, but not quantitatively.© 2020We propose fully valley- and spin-polarized currents in a normal/ferromagnetic/normal MoS2 junction by applying a circularly polarized light in the off-resonance regime in the ferromagnetic (FM) region. It is found that the circularly polarized light and exchange field remove the valley and spin degeneracies of the conduction band edges, respectively. In this situation, by choosing appropriate values for gate voltage, the Fermi level intersects with one valley form one spin channel leading to the fully valley- and spin-polarized currents through the proposed junction. Interestingly, the sign of both valley and spin polarizations can be easily switched from −100% to 100% by varying the intensity of the circularly polarized light and gate voltage. The full valley- and spin-polarized currents provide desirable routines to construct spin/valley filter for MoS2 based devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In micromagnetic simulations, the demagnetization field is by far the computationally most expensive field component and often a limiting factor in large multilayer systems. We present an exact method to calculate the demagnetization field of magnetic layers with arbitrary thicknesses. In this approach, we combine the widely used fast-Fourier-transform based circular convolution method with an explicit computation of the interaction between layers using a generalized form of the Newell formulas. We implement the method both for central processors and graphics processors and find that significant speedups for irregular multilayer geometries can be achieved. Using this method we optimize the geometry of a magnetic random-access memory cell by varying a single specific layer thickness and simulate a hysteresis curve to determine the resulting switching field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Ga substituted YMnO3 has been studied using XPS, dc magnetization and Raman measurements. XPS measurements show mixed valency of 2+ and 4+ for manganese ions, which is consistent with magnetization measurements. XPS and magnetization measurements on Ga substituted samples provide evidence for stabilization of manganese 3+ valency as Ga concentration is increased. The magnetic frustration factor is also found to be influenced by the substitution.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.An equimolar spinel (Al1/6Co1/6Cr1/6Fe1/6Mn1/6Ni1/6)3O4 high-entropy oxide (HEO) was developed as a novel oxide magnetic material. The as-synthesized nanocrystalline powder of high purity and homogeneity was obtained by a facile solution combustion synthesis method with an average crystalline size of about 12 nm. To prove utility, the magnetic property was measured and the as-synthesized nanocrystalline powder showed ferrimagnetism below the Curie temperature 248 K. The long-range ferrimagnetic behavior can be understood by the quite larger super-exchange interactions due to the extreme chemical disorder in the HEO.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the origin of magnetocrystalline anisotropy (MCA) in non-modulated martensite of Ni-Mn-Ga-Co-Cu exhibiting magnetic-field-induced strain up to 12%. Experiments as well as theoretical calculations using density functional theory show that Co and Cu doping or deviation from Ni2MnGa stoichiometry decreases the MCA. As follows from the calculations, the decrease of MCA is much stronger for Cu in Ga sublattice in comparison to Cu in Mn sublattice. The decreasing effect of Co on the MCA is only indirect caused by deficiency in Ni, which is the main element governing the MCA. For further insight, we calculated MCA and magnetic moment as a function of lattice tetragonality c/a. The MCA reaches a maximum at the same c/a where Ni magnetic moment is maximum. However, the tetragonality of equilibrium does not coincide with these maxima. Consequently, in contrast to common expectation, decreasing tetragonality from equilibrium can increase the MCA.© 2019The relationship between quantum mechanics and nanoscale spin dynamics is investigated by analyzing past work in magnetism and beyond. Findings about magnetization dynamics, accumulated throughout the 20th century, are revisited from a unifying modern perspective and related to trends in other areas of physics and technology. Traditional topics, for example spin precession and thermally activated magnetization processes, are discussed with emphasis on characteristic times and length scales, showing that nanoscale magnetization dynamics is very different from atomic spin dynamics. It is shown how these topics are connected to more recent developments such as the Berry phase, the no-cloning theorem, quantum-spin fluctuations, and THz magnetization dynamics in antiferromagnets.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The paper reports on the effect of therapeutic-like irradiation of a water based magnetic fluid with magnetite particles double-surfacted with oleic acid on its magnetic heating characteristics. To assess the effect of irradiation, a quantity of the initial sample was retained as the reference sample. The other part of the ferrofluid was irradiated with a photon beam (with the energy of 10 MeV and the dose of 50 Gy) and with an electron beam (of the energy of 9 MeV and the dose of 50 Gy). The frequency dependence of the complex magnetic permeability, μ(ω) = μ′(ω)-i μ″(ω), was affected only in the case of the electron irradiated sample and over the approximate range of 10–100 kHz. The dynamic light scattering investigation revealed a small increase of the average of the size of light scattering entities and of the polydispersity index of the sample irradiated with electrons compared to the reference sample. Magnetic heating experiments, performed at the frequency of 100 kHz and with various amplitudes of magnetic field, H, (of 25, 50, 75 and 100 Oe) did not reveal significant difference in the heating rate values of the reference sample and of the irradiated samples. Therefore, magnetic hyperthermia can be involved in the therapy plan, in the same period of time as the radiation therapy, provided at the frequency of the alternating magnetic field larger than the frequency corresponding to the Brownian relaxation peak.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In order to deposit isotropic Nd-Fe-B film magnets on metal substrates, a laser beam with an energy density of approximately 3 J/cm2 was defocused on the surface of Nd-Fe-B sintered targets with three densities of 5.69, 6.14, and 6.64 g/cm3, respectively. The different Nd content (Nd/(Nd + Fe)) between each film and the corresponding targets decreased as the density of the targets increased. We have reported that the deposition using a Nd-Fe-B alloy target under the same laser energy density and T-S distance enabled us to obtain the good transfer of composition from an alloy target to a film. It was clarified that the similar result could be obtained in the use of a sintered target with the density of 6.64 g/cm3. Comparison of magnetic properties, normalized demagnetization curves, and microstructure between the films prepared using a sintered target (6.64 g/cm3) and a Nd-Fe-B alloy target, respectively, was carried out. The values of coercivity and (BH)max of the samples prepared by the sintered target were higher than those of the films prepared using the alloy one. Moreover, the use of a Nd-Fe-B sintered target enabled us to improve the reproducibility of squareness in demagnetization curves. It is considered that the results of comparison are attributed to the different microstructure of the films such as the precipitation due to uneven distribution of α-Fe and Nd elements. We also suppose that the formation of microstructure in each film originates from the microstructure of the corresponding targets.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents a study of the effect of cation substitution (Co, Ti) → Mn on the structural and magnetic properties, as well as the magnetocaloric effect of the manganite (La0.7Eu0.3)0.75Sr0.25Mn0.9(Me)0.1O3 (Me = Co, Ti). It has been found that both compositions undergo two successive structural phase transitions from the O'-phase (orthorhombic orbitally ordered) to the O-phase (orthorhombic orbitally-disordered) and then to the rhombohedral phase (R-phase) under heating. The difference in the temperature of structural transitions in Co- and Ti-substituted compositions has been accounted for by the competing influence of the steric effect, the charge state, and the specific features of the electronic structure (the Jahn-Teller effect) of cations. The temperature dependence of magnetization reveals that Ti and Co doped compositions exhibit a ferromagnetic (FM) to paramagnetic (PM) transition at TC temperatures of 102 and 165 K, respectively. The correct expression is proposed for the bandwidth W which is proportional to TC. According to the Banerjee criterion, the magnetic phase transitions in (La0.7Eu0.3)0.75Sr0.25Mn0.9(Me)0.1O3 are of the second order. Magnetocaloric effect (MCE) is expanded in the wider temperature range with higher applied magnetic field. For each composition the peak position (Tpeak) of the magnetic entropy change moves to a higher temperature with the increase of magnetic field. Relatively high RCP values are found for both samples.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A nondestructive testing method based on magnetic Barkhausen noise (MBN) detection is developed to evaluate the microstructural and mechanical properties of hot stamping boron steel with martensite/bainite mixed microstructures. Firstly, boron steel specimens are heat treated by Gleeble thermo-mechanical simulator to prepare mixed microstructures with different bainite fractions. Based on the analysis of MBN signals of these specimens, the relation between MBN characteristics and bainite fraction is investigated. The results indicate that the MBN intensity firstly decreases and then increases with the increasing bainite fraction. The MBN peak shows a positive linear correlation with bainite fraction above 30%. The bainite fraction could be simply evaluated when MBN peak is above 65 mV. Furthermore, according to the assessed bainite fraction by MBN detection, the ultimate tensile strength (UTS) and yield tensile strength (YTS) of hot stamping steel sheets treated by heated tools are calculated and compared with tensile tests. It is suggested that it could be feasible to evaluate the mechanical properties especially UTS of hot stamping parts with martensite/bainite mixed microstructures based on MBN detection.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the consistent tanh expansion (CTE) method and the truncated Painlevé analysis are applied to the Kraenkel-Manna-Merle (KMM) system, which describes propagation of short wave in ferromagnets. Two series of analytic solutions of the original KMM system (free of damping effect) are obtained via the CTE method. The interaction solutions contain an arbitrary function, which provides a wide variety of choices to acquire new propagation structures. Particularly, the breather soliton, periodic oscillation soliton and multipole instanton are obtained. Furthermore, we obtain some exact solutions of the damped-KMM equation at the first time. On the other hand, a coupled equation containing quadri-linear form and tri-linear form for the original KMM system is obtained by the truncated Painlevé analysis, and the rogue wave solution and interaction solutions between rogue wave and multi-soliton for the KMM system are discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The soft magnetic properties of the sintered Mn-Zn ferrites can be stabilized versus changing temperature by addition of CoO in suitable proportion. The material benefits in this case of anisotropy compensation brought about by the Co2+ cations. However, prolonged exposure of magnetic cores to high temperatures, as likely to occur in automotive applications, can be associated with local phenomena of induced anisotropy, resulting in magnetic viscosity and aging. We show in this paper that proper addition of TiO2 in optimally CoO-doped ferrites can restrain aging and the ensuing detrimental effects on loss and permeability. We find, in particular, that on passing from conventional doping with 1000 ppm to 5000 ppm of TiO2, the deterioration of the soft magnetic properties of the ferrite following an aging treatment of 100 h at 200 °C is in good part reduced below a few hundred kHz. It is concluded that this effect chiefly relates to a correspondingly reduced value of the magnetic anisotropy induced by directional ordering at 200 °C. This beneficial effect appears to descend from hindered diffusion of the Co2+ cations by the dissolved Ti4+ cations. The induced anisotropy, however, while leading to increased hysteresis and excess losses, brings about a decrease of the total energy loss at intermediate frequencies, by modifying the distribution of the resonance frequencies and the associated damping of the rotational processes. Little to negligible effects are observed beyond a few MHz.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The use of magnetic field effects on spin-correlated radical pair mechanisms is a new approach for applications to liposomal drug-release technologies. We prepared various types of liposomal nanoparticles from seven kinds of phospholipids, and carried out research into the drug-release potentials of the nanoparticles equipped with possible magnetic controls. Exposures to static magnetic fields were performed using a permanent magnet (0.25 T) or an air-cored coil system (60 mT). Photoirradiations of flutamide-containing liposomal nanoparticles were carried out using an original air-cooled UV-LED irradiation system. Under exposure to the static field, flutamide in the liposomal membrane was excited by an emission wavelength of 325 nm. Soon after the excitation was achieved, the spectral changes with absorbance at 314, 260, and 370 nm were measured continuously. Moreover, we investigated the magnetic field effects on the permeability of the model membrane systems, using a 31P NMR technique. According to our overall results, differences in the field dependence can be surely explained by the formation of a singlet radical pair-deriving cage product, which might have an additional steric hindering factor in the liposomal bilayer structure. The experimental result is discussed in terms of the number of unsaturated double bonds in phospholipids of liposomal membranes. Our liposomal system with reaction field-dependent radical pair mechanisms is a promising new area of research.© 2020Interlayer magnetic coupling has been studied in the epitaxial system consisting of few nanometer thick magnetic layers of cobalt and yttrium iron garnet (YIG) separated by non-magnetic spacers of gadolinium gallium garnet (GGG). The samples were grown by laser molecular beam epitaxy on GGG(1 1 1) substrates. The layer morphology and crystal structure were characterized by atomic force microscopy, X-ray and electron diffraction techniques. MOKE and XMCD methods were applied for element selective study of the magnetization reversal in Co and YIG layers. For the Co/YIG/GGG heterostructures it has been found that magnetization loops of YIG and Co exhibit the same values of coercive field and are of the same shape indicating strong magnetic coupling between Co and YIG layers. In opposite, when YIG and Co are separated by a 1 nm thick GGG spacer layer, the coercive field of Co becomes very different from that of YIG. Moreover the center of YIG loop gets shifted in field whereas the sign and value of this shift depend on the current magnetic state of the Co layer. The magnetic interaction between Co and YIG can be interpreted in the terms of 2–3 Oe magnetic field induced in the YIG layer by the adjacent Co layer. This magnetic field is likely caused by the “orange peel” effect arising due to granular structure of Co layer.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we developed a low-cost, highly sensitive magnetization characterization instrument using a sound card and compared its sensitivity with commercially available measurement techniques. Firstly, we use an RLC circuit to measure the frequency-dependent response of the sound card and compare it with a lock-in amplifier. Then, we construct a simple but versatile measuring instrument, vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) based on audio components, where data acquisition is performed by the sound card and the commercial lock-in amplifier. We test our magnetometry by measuring the magnetic hysteresis of three distinct samples: Nickel bulk piece, perm-alloy thin film with an easy-plane anisotropy, and Co/Pt multilayer with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. We also analyze the magnetizations of three samples for different vibration frequencies and compare the sensitivities of two data acquisition methods. Although the sound card performs slightly worse than the lock-in amplifier at the vibration frequencies lower than 20 Hz due to the frequency cut-off, the sound card provides approximately seven times better sensitivity than the lock-in amplifier does at higher frequencies up to 60 Hz. We found that the sound card based VSM can have a sensitivity as high as 2 micro-emu at 34.7 Hz vibration frequency, which can be suitable for various laboratory and industrial applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Co element was doped in Fe-6.5Si alloy and the corresponding soft magnetic composites were fabricated successfully by conventional powder metallurgy techniques in this work. Saturation magnetization of Co-doped Fe-6.5Si powder increases compared to powders without Co and the coercivity increases because of grain refinement. Co addition is helpful to improve the electrical resistivity of Fe-6.5Si alloy. After doping Co, it shows a significant trend towards a decrease for core loss of Fe-6.5Si SMCs by reducing both eddy current loss and hysteresis loss. The effective permeability of Co-doped Fe-6.5Si SMCs decreases monotony with the Co content changing from 0 to 7.0 wt%. Fe-6.5Si-1.0Co SMCs shows best magnetic performances (100 mT/50 KHz) with core loss of 781.03 mW/cm3 and effective permeability of 103.36.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic flux density waveform is controlled to a sinusoidal wave for quantitative measurement in AC magnetic property measurement. The magnetic characteristics are nonlinear and it is difficult to make the magnetic flux density waveform sinusoidal. Therefore, the magnetic flux density waveform is made into a sinusoidal wave by feedback control (Kaido et al., 1998). Feedback control is performed by differential control, but in the non-linear region of high magnetic flux density, the convergence of the waveform is deteriorated and measurement time is increased. In this research, we succeeded in shortening the control time by using FPGA (Field-Programmable Gate Array) as the magnetic flux density waveform control method. The waveform control method sets various initial conditions in the PC, and is sent to the FPGA together with the target voltage waveform data. The FPGA starts feedback control from the information. The magnetic flux density was measured from 0.1 T to 2.0 T by using a single sheet tester and setting the amplitude ratio and the strain ratio to 0.5% or less using 50A1300 and 50A470. As a result, it has succeeded in significantly speeding up compared with the device which controls the waveform only with the conventional software.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the present investigation, we report the structural, vibrational, electronic and magnetic properties of Mn0.5Zn0.5Cr2O4 nanoparticles fabricated by the solution combustion method and complemented by Density Functional theory (DFT) calculations. X-ray diffraction (XRD), Neutron diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy and Raman analysis confirms the formation of single-phase with spinel cubic structure. The average crystallite size was found to be 8 nm. The theoretical calculations suggest that Zn-doping on the MnCr2O4 matrix induces a unit cell contraction associated with structural distortions along both [AO4] (A = Mn, Zn) and [CrO6] clusters, in agreement with the experimental evidence. These structural distortions contribute to narrowing the band-gap of Mn0.5Zn0.5Cr2O4 from disturbed energy levels in the vicinity of Fermi level. Field dependent magnetization confirms that the samples exhibit paramagnetic nature at 300 K and antiferromagnetic nature at 3 K. In the theoretical context, the exchange coupling constant for pure and Zn2+ substituted MnCr2O4 materials were calculated confirming the dominant antiferromagnetic character of Cr-Cr interactions. The temperature dependent susceptibility reveals that the magnetic transition from paramagnetic phase to antiferromagnetic phase occurs at 19 K (TN). The spin frustration factor of Mn0.5Zn0.5Cr2O4 is found to be 22 K. Hence, our experimental and theoretical result suggests that synthesized materials are useful for low and high frequency applications.© 2020We have investigated the effect of an edge-terminated structure in the anode of a gated ohmic anode AlGaN/GaN lateral Schottky Barrier Diode (SBD) device. The edge-terminated structure in the anode serves as a kind of field plate, which suppresses a reverse leakage current and improves a switching characteristic by reducing trapping effect at the active region. According to our two-dimensional simulation results, the electric field concentration near the edge of the anode was relatively reduced by the edge-terminated structure. For the fabricated devices, it was exhibited that the diode with proposed structure has lower reverse leakage current density without degradation of the forward current density, compared to the diode without the edge-terminated structure. In addition, the pulse response degradation was significantly improved from 16 to 3.5% at the forward voltage of 1.5 V when the reverse voltage of −100 V was applied.© 2020The discovery of the intrinsic magnetism of CrI3 monolayers (Nature 2017, 546, 270) serves as a new platform to regulate electrons. In this study, the electronic structure of the CrBr3 monolayer, a sister compound of CrI3, has been studied based on the first principle calculations and band engineering strategies involving carrier doping, vacancies (Cr vacancy, Br vacancy and the co-presence of Cr and Br vacancies) and in-plane strain. An insulator to half metal character transition could be actualized via charge doping (both hole and electron doping) and Cr vacancy. With co-existing Cr and Br vacancies, the half metallic character is sensitive to the distance between the defects. In contrast, the insulating nature would survive under conditions of Br vacancy defect as well as in-plane strain; however, the cooperation of strain and carrier doping would lead to half metal behavior. With regard to stabilization of ferromagnetic coupling, hole doping, electron doping and tensile strain would be effective; hole doping is more efficient than electron doping, and the co-existence of hole doping and tensile strain would further enable this enhancement.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.To achieve superior microwave absorption and ultra-wide regulation frequency range under a restricted thickness, (FeCo)100−xNdx (0 ≤ x ≤ 15) powders were prepared through a single roller melt spinning technique. The introduction of Nd decreases the crystallinity of FeCo phase and promotes the formation of secondary Nd2(FeCo)17 phase, which results in apparent reduction of electromagnetic (EM) parameters. The correlations between EM parameters and final microwave absorption properties are discussed in detail. It is found that the suppressed EM parameters modifies the coordination between impedance matching and attenuation performance, ultimately leading to superior microwave absorption performance with broad bandwidth of 6.92 + GHz and RLmin of −52.5 dB under thickness of only 1.45 mm. Moreover, due to the dramatic decline of |μr|·|εr| values, the qualified RL of the samples covers almost all the test frequency (2–18 GHz) with thin thickness of 2 mm, showing great practical value in full-spectrum microwave absorption area with a restricted coating thickness.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nonstoichiometric BiFe1−4 x /3ZrxO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 15%) multiferroic ceramics with Fe vacancies were synthesized by using rapid liquid phase sintering process. It was found that nonstoichiometric Zr substitution induced structure distortion, and an appropriate amount of Zr could remove impurity phases. XPS and PAS studies indicated that there was no obvious change in Bi vacancies concentration, but the Fe vacancies concentration increased with increasing substitution amount of Zr. The Fe2+ concentration first decreased and then increased with the increase in substitution amount of Zr, while the oxygen vacancies concentration decreased with increasing substitution amount of Zr. Nonstoichiometric Zr substitution could effectively enhance the multiferroic behaviors of BiFeO3. The evolution of structure and properties induced by nonstoichiometric Zr substitution indicated that Fe2+ concentration was the main source of the leakage current, while Fe vacancies concentration was a key factor that modulated the magnetic performances of BiFeO3. Furthermore, the applied magnetic field dependence of dielectric constant suggested that the magnetodielectric effect increased with increasing Zr substitution amount. The results above imply that nonstoichiometric BiFeO3 composition with Fe vacancies has great potential for exploiting high quality BiFeO3-based ceramics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The understanding of the physics underlying the performances of spin-valve devices comprising organic semiconductors is still incomplete. According to some recent models, spin transport takes place in an impurity band inside the fundamental gap of the organic semiconductor. This seems to be confirmed by recent experiments performed with La0.7Sr0.3MnO3/Alq3/AlOx/Co devices. The reported results suggest a possible correlation between the magnetoresistance and the variable oxygen doping in the Alq3 spacer. In this paper we investigate the electronic and magnetic properties of oxygen molecules and ions in Alq3 films by means of first-principles calculations to establish whether they indeed play any important role for spin transport in La0.7Sr0.3MnO3/Alq3/AlOx/Co devices. The conclusion is that they probably do not. In fact, we show that O2 molecules do not form an impurity band and there is no magnetic interaction between them. In contrast, we suggest that spin-transport may be enabled by the direct exchange coupling between Alq3 - ions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The natural convection of a paramagnetic fluid is numerically investigated in the presence of a magnetic field from a block permanent magnet. One vertical wall of a cavity is partially heated at a constant heat flux to consider a single vertical heated wall. The permanent block magnet is placed behind the heated wall, of which the magnetic field is numerically obtained. Since the magnetic force is remarkable at edges of the block magnet, the magnetothermal force is also pronounced if the temperature difference exists by wall heating. The overlapping magnetothermal force works to repel the fluid. This results in the heat transfer enhancement near the upper magnet edge, and suppression near the lower magnet edge. The suppressing effect becomes remarkable rather than the enhancing one in cases of large magnetic induction, high wall heat flux, and high magnet elevation to the heated wall.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The low temperature crystal and magnetic structures of NdMn0.1Fe0.9O3 were determined on the basis of X-ray and neutron powder diffraction experiments as well as from specific heat and magnetization measurements. The compound crystallizes in the orthorhombic crystal structure, space group Pnma, in the entire temperature interval 20 mK < T < 300 K. The lattice parameters exhibit standard thermal expansion effects for T > 20 K and at lower temperatures the anomalies due to magnetostriction effect were observed. The iron sublattice orders magnetically into 3 different magnetic structures, namely into Γ5 = (Ax, Fy, Gz) for 130 K < T < TN (Néel temperature); Γ1 = (Gx, Cy, Az) for 15 K < T < 130 K and Γ3 = (Cx, Gy, Fz) for 20 mK < T < 15 K. The Nd ions order at temperatures below 1.6–1.75 K into the same Γ3 phase as the iron sublattice at these temperatures. The obtained magnetic structures fit perfectly in between the magnetic phases of closely related NdFeO3 and NdMn0.5Fe0.5O3 compounds. Our study, together with all previously published data, completes the entire magnetic phase diagram of NdMn1−xFexO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) solid solution substitutional system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we investigated FeNi-based alloys synthesized from the cosmic matter of Morasko Meteorite (MM). The fall of Morasko iron meteorite is one of the biggest known in Central Europe and it has been dated to take place about five thousand years ago. It is known that iron meteorites contain hard magnetic tetrataenite phase (L10 FeNi), which has not been synthesized on the Earth in significant amount in the bulk form yet, because of very sluggish diffusion of Fe and Ni atoms below the disorder-order temperature of 320 °C. Firstly we doped the metallic part of Morasko Meteorite with Ni to obtain nearly equiatomic composition Fe51Ni49, which is the composition of pure tetrataenite. Further synthesis steps (melt-spinning, high pressure torsion, isothermal annealing at Ta = 320 °C for τa = 720 h) were undertaken to induce structural disorder and to observe changes in the structure/microstructure of the meteorite melt with nickel and its magnetic behavior. The presence of fcc FeNi with slightly varying lattice constant was confirmed at each step of the treatment. It evolved from the initial value of a = 3.589 ± 0.001 Å in the as-quenched state, through 3.591 ± 0.001 Å after 10 revolutions in the high pressure torsion process, to the maximum value of 3.593 ± 0.001 Å after 30 revolutions of anvils. No significant impact of further application of stress (50 revolutions) was noted, as the lattice parameter changed within the uncertainty limit. After annealing, the lattice parameter decreased to the initial value of the as-quenched sample (a = 3.589 ± 0.001 Å). The observed broadening of the peaks in the X-ray diffraction patterns may be attributed to the presence of microstrains and refinement of crystallites. Both contributions were determined using the Williamson-Hall method. In the initial state, the domain sizes were of about 100 ± 17 nm and diminished to 36 ± 11 nm after application of stress. Further isothermal annealing did not change the crystallites size, which was evaluated to be 35 ± 9 nm. Microstrains in the initial state were determined as (0.039 ± 0.017)10−3 and increased significantly to (0.562 ± 0.060)10−3 after 30 revolutions of anvils. Isothermal annealing decreased microstrains to (0.215 ± 0.071)10−3. After application of stress, the coercivity and remanence were enhanced, while subsequent isothermal annealing caused their decrease. Moreover, severe plastic deformation facilitated saturation of magnetization. As-quenched sample reached saturation at a magnetic field of about 2 T, while for high pressure torsion processed alloy this value was significantly reduced.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Single-phase polycrystalline samples of Ni1−xMgxCr2O4 (x = 0.0–0.50) were prepared by sol gel route and their structural and magnetic properties were studied. Structural transformation from tetragonal (I41/amd) to cubic (Fd3-m) phase is observed at room temperature due to Mg substitution. Mg substitution gives rise to reduction in ferrimagnetic and antiferromagnetic transition temperatures along with a signature of spin glass like phase in samples of intermediate compositions, i.e., for x = 0.10, 0.20 and 0.30. The observed stretched exponential type relaxation of thermoremanent magnetization and the highly frustrated magnetic behavior confirm the glassy magnetic phase. Significant increase in exchange bias field under field cooled condition for the Mg substituted samples is observed. The origin of exchange bias in theses samples is explained by considering exchange anisotropy between the ferrimagnetic and antiferromagnetic components of canted spin. The training effect of exchange bias field is also observed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic and dielectric properties of La0.5Eu0.2Ba0.3− x□xMnO3 (x = 0.00, 0.05 and 0.15) perovskites are investigated. Nano-polycrystalline samples prepared using sol-gel wet chemical method were subjected to annealing in two different temperatures and investigated by powder X-ray diffraction (XRD), magnetometry, and ac impedance spectroscopy. XRD characterizations indicated that all samples exhibited a single rhombohedral phase. The temperature-dependent magnetizations indicate the ferromagnetic transition. The resistivity decreased and the magnetic ordering temperature increased as Ba-deficiency increased. The dielectric constant dependent on frequency shows normal behavior. The samples with a lower sintering temperature show the highest resistivity and dielectric constant. Dielectric anomaly dependent on temperature was observed close to the magnetic ordering temperature, indicating the possibility of ferroelectricity and further magnetoelectric coupling. The dielectric behaviors have been interpreted based on space charge polarization according to Maxwell-Wagner's two-layer model and hopping of charge between Mn3+ and Mn4+ ions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we have investigated the influence of thermal treatment on magnetization processes in the low magnetic field range (Rayleigh region). For this study, rapidly quenched FINEMET ribbons in the as-prepared amorphous state were used. It has been observed that the various annealing temperature lead to the different behavior of a studied material as a consequence of a relaxation of the quenched-in internal stresses in the investigated samples. However, neither of the effects of the atomic diffusion has been observed after low temperature heat-treatments. Moreover, it was detected that the partial elimination of internal stresses has a reduction effect on total magnetic anisotropy.© 2020 Elsevier LtdWe propose a calculation model of current density that causes forward bias degradation from substrate basal plane dislocations (BPDs) in 4H-SiC PiN diodes. The hole concentration above which substrate BPDs expand to single Shockley stacking faults (1SSFs) at the buffer/substrate interface was experimentally evaluated from forward-current stress tests of 4H-SiC PiN diodes by comparison with our model results, resulting in 8.0 × 1015 cm−3. We confirmed the dependence of the current density on the dopant concentration and the hole lifetime in the buffer layer numerically. The model was extended to the case where BPD converted to threading edge dislocations (TEDs) in the substrate, and the relational expression between the depth of the BPD-TED conversion position in the substrate and the current density at which BPD expanded to 1SSF was obtained. The model suggested that it will be an effective technique for suppressing forward bias degradation by shorter lifetime and deeper BPD-TED conversion position in the substrate.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Sigma-phase Fe68V32 compound was investigated by means of Mössbauer spectroscopy. Spectra were recorded in a transmission mode in the temperature range of 5–427 K. They were analyzed in terms of five components associated with five lattice sites using a transmission integral method. The analysis yielded values of the hyperfine magnetic field, Hk, center shift, CSk, and the main component of the electric field gradient, Vzz(k), for each component k = A, B, C, D and E. Based on these quantities and taking into account relative contributions of the components average values of the hyperfine field, <H>, and that of the center shift, <CS>, were calculated. Temperature dependences of CSk and <CS> were used to determine Debye temperatures, TD(k) and <TD>, respectively. From the temperature dependence of <H> the record high value of the Curie temperature equal to 331(1) K was found. Magnetic moments of Fe atoms occupying particular lattice sites were estimated based on the Hk values at 5 K.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents the design and analysis of a new eddy current speed sensor with ferromagnetic shielding. Aluminum and solid iron are considered for the moving part. One excitation coil and two antiserially connected pick up coils are shielded by a thin steel lamination. 3D time stepping finite element analysis is used to analyze the sensor performance with different magnetic materials and compare with experimental results. The compactness, simplicity and excellent linearity with different magnetic materials for the moving part show uniqueness of the proposed speed sensor. The shielding increases sensitivity and reduces the influence of close ferromagnetic objects and interferences on the sensor performance.© 2019We use time-resolved (TR) measurements based on the polar magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) to study the magnetization dynamics excited by spin orbit torques in Py (Permalloy)/Pt and Ta/CoFeB bilayers. The analysis reveals that the field-like (FL) spin orbit torque (SOT) dominates the amplitude of the first oscillation cycle of the magnetization precession and the damping-like (DL) torque determines the final steady-state magnetization. In our bilayer samples, we have extracted the effective fields, hFL and hDL, of the two SOTs from the time-resolved magnetization oscillation spectrum. The extracted values are in good agreement with those extracted from time-integrated DCMOKE measurements, suggesting that the SOTs do not change at high frequencies. We also find that the amplitude ratio of the first oscillation to steady state is linearly proportional to the ratio hFL/hDL. The first oscillation amplitude is inversely proportional to, whereas the steady state value is independent of, the applied external field along the current direction.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.AlCoCrFeNiSi high entropy alloys (HEAs) with variable chromium and silicon content (AlCoCrFeNiSi, AlCoFeNiSi, AlCoCr0.5FeNiSi0.5, AlCoFeNiSi0.5) were prepared by two different methods to determine the influence of cooling rate on the structure and properties of the alloys. The structure of the alloys was investigated using X-ray diffraction method and scanning electron microscopy. The possible formation of a single bcc/B2 phase was confirmed. The addition of chromium and silicon causes significant changes in the structure of the alloys, with new crystallographic phases being formed. The formation of Cr3Si intermetallic phases and segregation of iron was observed for the studied alloys. The magnetic properties were examined using a vibrating sample magnetometer and Mössbauer spectroscopy. The highest saturation magnetization was stated for alloys with a bcc/B2 one phase structure. The Mössbauer spectra confirmed, that ferromagnetic and paramagnetic phases occur in all studied alloys. The highest contribution from ferromagnetic phases was observed for the AlCoFeNiSi0.5 and AlCoCr0.5FeNiSi0.5 HEAs. Additionally, the corrosion resistance of the alloys was investigated in 3.5% NaCl solution. It was noted, that the AlCoCrFeNiSi, in a form of plates, is characterized by the highest corrosion resistance.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Motivated by the recent investigations on the fullerene nanostructures, we study the critical behavior of the ferromagnetic classical Ising model on fullerene-like systems in the absence of any magnetic field by the Monte Carlo simulation. Since the traditional Metropolis algorithm of filliping is often time-consuming near the reduced critical temperature, a novel technique named Pika is introduced which solves this problem. Since the magnetic properties of fullerene-like materials are greatly affected by the particle size and its structure, the effect of various parameters, including system size, spin value, and vacancy defects on the thermal behavior of the systems, are studied. Based on the results, the reduced critical temperature of the system is proportional to its spin values. Furthermore, the reduced critical temperature strongly depends on the number of vacancies in the system. Increment in the number of vacancies in the system near the reduced critical temperature causes a reduction in the heat capacity value. Moreover, in the temperature T = 0, the total magnetization per site reduces when increasing the number of vacancies.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The spin pumping effect of the Ni80Fe20/Rut bilayers was studied by ferromagnetic resonance method. A shutter shift technique was adopted to prepare the wedge-like Ru caplayer on the Ni80Fe20 film with homogeneous thickness and damping constant. Thanks to this special preparation method, the very tiny variation of damping constant due to the spin pumping at the Ni80Fe20/Rut interface was precisely measured and extracted from that of Ni80Fe20 films. Comparing with the conventional monotonically approaching saturation curve of damping constant vs. non-magnetic Ru layer thickness tRu, an additional damping peak was observed. The abnormal damping-tRu curves can be understood as the combined action of spin pumping at Ni80Fe20/Rut interface and spin back flow due to the reflection at Ru surface and Ru/Ni80Fe20 interface.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic anisotropy of single-domain magnetic nanoparticles can influence their behaviour significantly even at temperatures above the blocking temperature as conventionally defined. We compare the magnetic properties of such nanoparticles that are free to rotate, and the same nanoparticles with random but fixed orientations. When free to rotate, the particles show Langevin behaviour as expected, but when the orientations are fixed, their magnetic anisotropy causes deviations from this behaviour. These deviations may be observed directly in the M-H curves. They also cause a step in the M-T curve measured for a zero-field cooled sample of nanoparticles suspended in a solvent at the solvent's melting point. The step occurs because magnetic anisotropy causes M for particles with random but fixed orientation to be lower than for the same particles that are free to rotate when the solvent melts. The size of the step reaches a maximum at a finite applied field. This phenomenon is important because it can be used to determine the fraction of magnetic nanoparticles that are immobilized, for example by adsorption to ice in a freeze-concentrated solution.© 2020 Elsevier LtdSiC devices are suitable for high temperature applications due to its’ wide energy bandgap and high thermal conductivity. Some SiC CMOSFET ICs have been reported recently. However, less literature address the characteristics of SiC PMOSFET. In this work, we fabricated PMOSFET with Local Oxidation of SiC (LOCOSiC) isolation structure and different gate oxidation processes targeting sub-10V operation. Well behaved PMOSFET with suitable threshold voltage (−5.58 V), low subthreshold swing (200 mV/decade), acceptable hole mobility (3 cm2/V-sec), and low off-state current (<1 × 10−12 A/μm at −10 V) is achieved. Temperature dependence of device characteristics are investigated. These results make the implementation of high-performance CMOS a great progress.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Low temperature magnetoresistance and resistivity properties are systematically studied in rare earth based multiferroic nanocomposites La0.7Sr0.3MnO3-TMnO3 (T = Er,Ho) under magnetic fields up to 5 Tesla. Resistivity with temperature exhibits metal-insulator transition. At very low temperature, the sharp upturn of resistivity is observed, which is found to be suppressed by field. The upturn of resistivity is characterized with spin fluctuation of the system. The reduction of the upturn of resistivity with magnetic field ensures the progress of the electrons tunneling. Effective reduction of charging energy is obtained upon an applied magnetic field. Temperature dependent resistivity shows minima at low temperature under different applied magnetic fields. The resistivity fit at low temperature is made with consideration of equally electron-electron interactions concerning (temperature)1/2 term and the Kondo-identical spin dependent scattering for ln(temperature) dependence. Lessening of the spin fluctuation by an applied magnetic field plays a dynamical role in defining the magnetoresistive behavior in samples. Experimental data are analyzed and demonstrated through a simple proposed phenomenological model to provide an insight on the physical mechanism behind the low temperature transport phenomena. The derived surface spin susceptibility is accordance with the temperature dependence of magnetoresistance involving an intergranular surface magnetization. Temperature dependent field cooled and zero field cooled dc magnetization curve having a large bifurcation between them, is a suggestion of a glassy like phase that may be originated from the challenging magnetic exchange interactions. The low temperature glassy magnetic behavior is endorsed to a spin-glass identical frozen state for the surface of the nanoparticles. Magnetic field dependent magnetization study shows an increase in magnetization without saturation in decreasing temperature. The multiferroic nanocomposites exhibit the magnetoelectric coupling, which arises due to the strain mediated magnetostriction behavior of the piezomagnetic phase (La0.7Sr0.3MnO3) in the nanocomposites.© 2020Pure spin current generation and transport in magnetic heterostructures comprising of normal metal (NM)/ferromagnet (FM) interfaces are imperative for future energy efficient spintronic devices. The above properties are considered to be equivalent in terms of spin-mixing conductance and spin pumping efficiency. Correspondingly, the enhancement in Gilbert damping should be equal for every interface with same NM and FM layers. However, this equivalency may break down under certain circumstances, giving rise to anisotropy. Here, we have shown by time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr effect measurements that for W/CoFeB interface, the enhancement in Gilbert damping is dissimilar when the position of W and CoFeB are interchanged. The damping coefficient (α) is 0.010 for CoFeB/W, whereas it is 0.0135 for W/CoFeB. Our in-depth investigation reveals that the precessional trajectory for W/CoFeB system is strongly affected by the induced magnetic anisotropy which is not present in CoFeB/W, leading towards the observed directional spin pumping. This is clearly demonstrated in W/CoFeB/W trilayer where the spin current generated by spin pumping diffuses more towards W underlayer in comparison to W overlayer. Our findings add new insights in the role of ferromagnet/nonmagnet interfaces for controlled generation and utilization of pure spin current for application in advanced spintronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effect of heavy rare earth element (HREE, Tb and Dy) coating thickness on the grain boundary diffusion process (GBDP) of sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets is investigated. The distribution of HREE concentration fits well with the distribution depicted by the dual-trend diffusion model for the magnets with thin HREE coatings. However, when the HREE coating is thicker than a critical value, two new types of structures of HREE distribution, namely, the anti-shell/core structure and the transitional structure, besides the well-reported shell/core structure, appear sequentially around the Nd-Fe-B grains near the close surface of the diffused magnets. The evolution of the microstructures and the magnetic properties of the diffused magnets are further studied on the basis of the dual-trend diffusion model. The coercivity of the diffused magnets with thick HREE coatings slowly improves when anti-shell/core and transitional structures form on the outer layer of the diffused magnets. The ultimate coercivity of the HREE-diffused magnets is the result of the combined action of the above three structures.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we propose a model for the analysis of the current waveform in ferrite power inductors subjected to large-signal square-wave voltage, a typical regime of present-day switch-mode power supplies. This problem is characterized by the non-linear response of the inductor across a wide range of current values, up to the limit of inductor saturation. Consequently, non-linear differential equations must be adopted in the description of the circuit. In this paper, we solve the equations of the circuit through an effective iterative method, by which the current waveform is computed through successive approximations. These results are eventually verified by comparison with experiments performed on a commercial buck-type converter.© 2020 The AuthorsWe report on the photoinduced dynamics of the magneto-optical Faraday effect and the transmittivity of ferromagnetic semiconducting phase of EuO. Excitation with 8-fs laser pulses launches significantly different dynamics of the Faraday effect compared to magnetic refraction. It is argued that the effects are dynamic probes of the magnetization and the exchange interaction in the material which have distinctly different dynamics at the sub-100 fs time scale.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The analytical crossover events in the magnon dispersion relations are discussed. As the available experimental data show, only a few types of magnon dispersion relations are observed for all spin- and lattice-structures. When the magnon spectrum exhibits a finite energy gap at q = 0 the dispersion consists of two q-sections with different functions of wave vector. Such analytical changes indicate that two mechanisms dominate the dispersion relation alternately. For magnon energies of larger than the gap, the dispersion exhibits over a finite q-range a single qx power function of wave vector. Within the experimental error limits, the exponent x is a rational number and is independent of the spin structure, i.e. universal, but depends on whether the spin quantum number is integer or half-integer. As we now know, this is the typical indication that the qx function is determined by the bosons of the continuous magnetic medium. The qx function holds up to the crossover to a sine-function of wave vector for antiferromagnets but to a sine-function squared for ferromagnets. One therefore has to distinguish between the bosonic part of the magnon dispersion relation, at small q-values, and the magnonic part at large q-values. As is well known, sine functions of wave vector are the dispersion of the linear spin chain. Since the linear spin chain is not ordered at any finite temperature it follows that the observed magnons are not indicative of a long-range magnetic order. From the fact that no principal change of the magnon dispersions occurs upon crossing the magnetic ordering temperature it follows that the exchange interactions are not involved directly in the magnetic ordering process. The long-range ordered system is the boson field. At the critical temperature, the boson field orders. Ordering of the boson field is associated with the formation of domains and with the emergence of a magnon gap. In the ordered state, propagation of the bosons is restricted to the few different domain axes. The dimensionality of the ordered boson field can be recognized from the number of the in-equivalent domain orientations. For all lattice structures the boson field within each magnetic domain is perfectly one-dimensional, and aligns all spins parallel. This is the origin of the linear chain dispersion. The mass-less bosons are, however, not visible for neutrons. If the magnon-boson interaction is strong, the q-range of the sine functions is small. It then proves necessary to add a phenomenological phase shift in the argument of the sine function. As a consequence, magnon dispersions cannot be understood considering exchange interactions alone.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we investigate mesoscopic amorphous magnetic rings prepared by ion-implantation. The analysis is carried out combining conventional magnetization vs field measurements alongside MOKE microscopy imaging and, for the first time, first-order reversal curves (FORCs). With the information extracted from the FORC diagram, we can identify the presence of typical onion and vortex magnetic configurations, and also determine with high resolution the fields connected to their formation, stability, and annihilation. Furthermore, depending on the field and history, two different onion configurations exist, characterized by the presence of transverse or vortex domain walls. The FORC data reveal the different reversible/irreversible nature of the annihilation of the two onion configurations, and a signal peculiar of the presence of vortex domain walls. All these crucial information are not accessible with conventional M(H) loops, demonstrating that FORCs offer a unique perspective for the investigation of the physical phenomena of magnetic elements with complex geometries.© 2020The significant enhancement of Brillouin light scattering (BLS) spectroscopy intensity in a ferromagnetic thin film with an additional dielectric anti-reflection layer is experimentally investigated. The anti-reflection layer thickness dependent BLS measurements on ferromagnetic layers are performed systematically. Consequently, we observe that BLS signals are dramatically enhanced by more than 450% at a specific dielectric layer thickness due to the pure optical effect. Because of the large signal enhancements, the errors of the spin wave resonance peak frequencies are noticeably reduced as well. Since many magnetic properties such as the saturation magnetization, the surface anisotropy, and the exchange stiffness constant are determined by the spin wave resonance frequencies from the BLS spectra, the additional anti-reflection layer can help to improve the reliability of BLS experiments. Especially, the BLS signal improvement plays a crucial role in the precise determination of the interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (iDMI) energy density, since the iDMI energy density is calculated from the difference of Stokes and anti-Stokes resonance frequencies, which is typically order of 1 GHz.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Acoustic spectroscopy is used to study the rearrangements of multi-walled carbon nanotubes (MWCNTs) functionalized by Fe3O4 magnetic nanoparticles dissolved in transformer oil under the influence of a magnetic field at various temperatures. Three methods for the application of the magnetic field are used: a jump change, a linear increase or decrease and a constant magnetic field with a change of its orientation to the acoustic wave. The rearrangements of MWCNTs/Fe3O4 to new structures (chains) by the influence of a magnetic field is confirmed by changes in the acoustic attenuation. From the measurement results, the lifetime of the chains after the switch-off of the magnetic field is less than 30 s. Such a rapid change is due to the fact that the nanotube chains are held by magnetic forces, resulting from the same direction of the magnetic moments of bound magnetic nanoparticles. A temperature-dependent hysteresis effect is observed with a linear change of the magnetic field. From our experiments, it follows that the reorientation of MWCNTs by magnetic nanoparticles with the magnetic field was gradual. The effect of the anisotropy of the acoustic attenuation is observed at a magnetic flux density of 200 mT and at various temperatures. Three MWCNT/Fe3O4 concentrations diluted in the transformer oil are used for the measurements and their influences on the structural changes with various developments of the magnetic field are discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present the results of density functional theory (DFT) calculations on the vacancy-defected graphene-hBN (GBN) nanosheet embracing a hexagonal island. Hexagonal shaped h-BN and G islands of varying sizes are respectively patterned in G and h-BN nanosheets for possible uses of GBN hybrid in device applications. Three different types of mono vacancies were formed at various sites of GBN hybrid. Two distinct C mono vacancies, B and N mono vacancy were formed at G/h-BN interface. We additionally formed C mono vacancy in G region, and B and N mono vacancies in h-BN region of the hybrid nanosheet. Possible effects of vacancies and size effects of island on the electronic and magnetic properties of hybrid were examined in great detail. Calculated vacancy formation energies show that N vacancy exhibits lower formation energy than B one. Besides, the interface is the energetically most favorable place, regardless of the type of vacancy. All pristine hybrids with hexagonal islands are non-magnetic semiconductors. However, depending on the type of vacancy and vacancy site, the GBN hybrid can become magnetic with a considerable amount of magnetic moment. Because of the high magnetization energy, the magnetic order is considered to be robust against thermal excitations at finite temperatures. Our results indicated that defective hybrids with G islands have greater potential for magnetic applications. Mono vacancies introduce flat (dispersionless) states near the Fermi level, and these flat energy states lead to localized, integer-valued magnetic moment. In general, no correlation was observed between the island size and the magnetic moment of a defective hybrid. Nevertheless, in the case of C (B) vacancy in G (h-BN) layout, the magnetic moment increases with increasing island size. This result could point to a possible coupling between the defect and hexagonal island.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the interfacial PMA in (Ta or Hf)/TbFeCo/MgO/Ta structures are investigated and the effectiveness of two kinds of heavy-metal Hf and Ta underlayers are explored. The PMA of TbFeCo is found to critically rely on several aspects like Tb-concentration (Tb sputtering power), underlayer material (Ta/Hf), annealing temperature and heating rate of annealing. The crystalline phase of the underlayer is investigated by XRD and resistivity measurements and optimized by changing the film thickness. It was observed that for the Hf underlayer the PMA could be obtained in as-deposited samples irrespective of the Tb-concentration with squareness close to unity. The post-annealing results show improved PMA in FeCo-dominant films; however, the PMA reduces when Tb-content is increased.© 2020 Elsevier LtdWe report for the first time the implementation of SiGe buried stressors in a foundry production process at 28 nm and the observation of an additional benefit of improved short channel behavior (reduced DIBL) that results in at least 15% improvement in Idlin-Ioff independent of any benefit obtained from tensile strain. For RF applications, fT is projected to improve by at least 40% in n-MOSFETs with SiGe buried stressor.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this work, a SPICE compact model of indium-gallium-zinc oxide (IGZO) memristor in consideration of IGZO and electrode materials having non-quasi-statically updated Schottky barrier heights has been developed. In order for compact modeling of an analog memristor with higher accuracy, understanding of its switching characteristics and conduction behaviors needs to be preceded. It has been empirically revealed that they are dependent on metal species of the electrodes and processing approach. The switching characteristics are more weightedly determined by the interface between the switching layer and the metal with lower workfunction out of two electrode metals and interface status has been controlled by an Ar bombardment in this work. In order for identifying the conduction mechanism, a series of device simulations have been performed and the internal electric field distribution over the device structure has been closely investigated. It has been shown that the conduction behaviors are mainly determined by the thermionic emission taking place between Pd electrode and IGZO switching layer. For preparing the model parameters, along with the experimental results, transient measurement techniques have been cultivated at the same time, which has made possible to tell the difference between sets of model parameters obtained by theory and the techniques. In consequence, a highly reliable physics-based modeling for IGZO memristor has been developed through identification of switching and conduction mechanisms and extraction of the model parameters with the simultaneous help of Verilog-A equation build-up, which has demonstrated a plausible agreement with the measurement results.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The present study describes the interaction of an assorted shape of magnetic nanoparticles with lysozyme amyloid fibrils by atomic force microscopy and magnetization measurements. Mixture stability was verified by settling behaviour of NPs dispersions. A fibril solution doped with spherically shaped magnetic nanoparticles reveals the effect of particles’ adsorption on the amyloid fibrils’ surface. However, when spindle-like magnetic nanoparticles were doped, it led to zero interaction activity, which confesses subtle difference in fibrillary interaction with spherical particle that can be explained by diverse size of nanoparticles. Moreover, spherical MNPs showed excellent stability in sLAF, the spindle MNPs were unstable and exhibited limited dispersion.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Hysteresis models allow the prediction of iron losses in materials under complex magnetic excitation, with accuracy depending on their principle and identification procedure. Commonly, to achieve high accuracy, a model may require a broad set of experimental input data, which is in some cases, not easy to obtain. We propose, in this study, a static model focusing on simplicity while still striving for accuracy. Its principle is to represent the variation of the field deviation between reversal curves and a near saturation hysteresis loop. In terms of input data, this model requires the experimental first magnetization curve and a few quasi-static centered hysteresis loops of the material. Following the principle description, the identification procedure, the model validation, as well as a sensitivity study are presented in detail.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fe-based amorphous powder cores based on the industrial flaky FeSiBCCr magnetic powders coated with high-quality inorganic (SiO2) insulating layer via a sol-gel method were successfully fabricated to improve the soft magnetic properties of powder cores. The core-shell structure of magnetic flaky powders was characterized using scanning electron microscopy, energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy analysis, and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy. The influence of annealing temperature on the soft magnetic properties of the FeSiBCCr magnetic flaky powder cores (MFPCs) has been systematically investigated, and the comparisons were made with the conventional FeSiB and Finemet MFPCs at the same preparation conditions. It was found that the reasonable annealing temperature could enhance the permeability and reduce the core loss for the MFPCs. As compared to the conventional FeSiB MFPCs, the FeSiBCCr MFPCs annealed at 773 K for 0.5 h exhibits a higher permeability of 79.19, and lower core loss of 122.26 mW/m3 at 100 kHz for Bm = 0.05 T. Additionally, the FeSiBCCr MFPCs shows a better DC-bias property of 51.30%, and lower raw material cost than those of the Finemet MFPCs. The excellent comprehensive magnetic properties of the FeSiBCCr MFPCs are favorable for achieving the optimal design of powder cores toward practical applications.© 2020Structure and magnetic properties of Al foil and Bi flake were modified by inductively coupled plasma ion doping without bias. It was found that both paramagnetic Al foil and diamagnetic Bi flake after inductively coupled plasma doping with Mn ions exhibited ferromagnetic properties. Mn-doped Al foil and Bi flake had room-temperature coercivity of ~100 Oe and ~300 Oe, respectively. In addition, zero-field cooling and field cooling curves of both samples showed bifurcation behaviors below 300 K. Further microstructural investigations indicated that thin layers with MnAl and MnBi clusters were formed on the surface of Al foil and Bi flake, respectively. These clusters with short range order were supposed to be closely responsible for the magnetic properties change of Mn-doped Al foil and Bi flake.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis work focuses on modeling of near threshold region (Vgs − Vt < a few kT/q) of DG (Double-Gate) MOSFETs with velocity saturation. Accurate modeling of this region is important for design of low-power analog circuits. A non-GCA (Gradual Channel Approximation) model is developed that takes the nonlinear dependence of inversion charge density on quasi-Fermi potential near threshold into account. It has been applied to both n = 1 and n = 2 velocity saturation models. The I-V characteristics generated by the model are consistent with TCAD simulations.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents the determination of the magnetic field dependence of the statistics of nanoparticle one dimensional chains in a 9.3% solid volume fraction ferrofluid, using optical dichroism experiments. It was found that, in a 300 kA/m magnetic field, 4v% of the nanoparticles are contained in one dimensional chains with 2 particles/chain on average. For this purpose, an analytical theoretical model for the influence of the magnetically induced nanoparticle chaining on the linear dichroism in ferrofluids was developed. The model is based on the statistical theory for magnetic nanoparticle chaining in ferrofluids developed by Mendelev and Ivanov. The chains statistics was obtained by means of nonlinear regression of the dichroism data with the theoretical model.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic analogue of electronic gates are advantageous in many ways. There is no electron leakage, higher switching speed and more energy saving in a magnetic logic device compared to a semiconductor one. Recently, we proposed a magnetic vortex transistor and fan-out devices based on carefully coupled magnetic vortices in isolated nanomagnetic disks. Here, we demonstrate a new type of magnetic logic gate based upon asymmetric vortex transistor by using micromagnetic simulation. Depending upon two main features (topology) of magnetic vortex, circulation and polarity, the network can behave like a tri-state buffer. Considering the asymmetric magnetic vortex transistor as a unit, the logic gate has been formed where two such transistors are placed parallel and another one is placed at the output. Magnetic energy given in the input transistors is transferred to the output transistor with giant amplification, due to the movement of antivortex solitons through the magnetic stray field. The loss and gain of energy at the output transistor can be controlled only by manipulating the polarities of the middle vortices in input transistors. Due to the asymmetric energy transfer of the antivortex solitons, we have shown successful fan-in operation in this topologically symmetric system. A tri-state buffer gate with fan-in of two transistors can be formed. This gate can be used as a ‘Switch’ to the logic circuit and it has technological importance for energy transfer to large scale vortex networks.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of polycrystalline Eu0.55Sr0.45MnO3 compound have been investigated. In addition to the field induced meta-magnetic transition, magnetically a mixed ground state (ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic) was observed especially at the low temperature (T < 30 K). Influence of the predominant short range ferromagnetic interaction reflects in its magnetocaloric effect, calculated from Maxwell's thermodynamic relation. However, different nature of the magnetocaloric effect, calculated using Clausius-Clapeyron equation, discussed considering the phase diagram of this material. Our study suggest, in contrast to the Maxwell's relation, magnetocaloric parameter (-ΔS) derived from Clausius-Clapeyron equation gives the reliable value, useful for magnetic refrigeration cycle.© 2020In this work, orthorhombic polycrystalline Tb3NiSi2 and Dy3NiSi2 compounds were prepared and magnetocaloric effect during multiple magnetic transitions was investigated in detail. Tb3NiSi2 compound displays four different magnetic transitions at 94 K, 115 K, 134.2 K, and 140.6 K, respectively. The maximal value of magnetic entropy change are about 4.5 J/kg K and 11.1 J/kg K at 141 K for Tb3NiSi2 compound under a field change of 0–2 T and 0–7 T, respectively. For the Dy3NiSi2 compound, three obvious magnetic transitions are found at 29.3 K, 65.4 K, and 76.6 K and the maximal value of magnetocaloric effect are about 3.6 J/kg K and 10.8 J/kg K at 77 K for a field change of 0–2 T and 0–7 T, respectively. Due to the multiple magnetic transitions, both compounds exhibit the wide refrigeration temperature range and considerable refrigerant capacity. The results reveal that the value of refrigeration temperature range and refrigerant capacity are 66.9 K and 549.1 J/kg for Tb3NiSi2 compound, and 64.0 K and 489.6 J/kg for Dy3NiSi2 compound, respectively. Therefore, R3NiSi2-family compounds have a potential application in middle temperature magnetic refrigeration.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents the high temperature thermal characterization of a Micro-Electro-Mechanical Systems (MEMS) infra-red (IR) thermal source, using non-contact optical approaches, based on IR and thermo-incandescence microscopy. The IR thermal source was fabricated using a CMOS based processing technology and consists of a miniature micro-heater, fabricated using tungsten metallization. The performance and reliability of the IR source is highly dependent on its operating temperature. For short-wave (1.4 µm−2.5 µm) infra-red emission, the operating temperature is in excess of 800 °C. Work will be presented in this paper in which spot temperature measurements (>700 °C) were made on the IR source using thermal-incandescence microscopy. Thermal-optical calibration was achieved by utilizing the known melting point (MP) of different metal micro-particles. Optical measurements were compared to those obtained using an electrical approach. The thermal measurements suggest good temperature uniformity across the micro-heater of the IR source.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of the compound Sm1.2Ho0.8Fe17 and the nitride powders Sm1.2Ho0.8Fe17N2.4 prepared by high energy ball milling under various milling regimes are reported. Magnetic properties of the samples are investigated at 2–300 K in steady magnetic field up to 70 kOe and in pulsed magnetic field up to 600 kOe. The application of high magnetic field reveals the presence of the second-order transition in Sm1.2Ho0.8Fe17N2.4 at 500 kOe. Magnetic hysteresis properties study shows that ball milling enhances magnetic performance of Sm1.2Ho0.8Fe17N2.4 making it perspective for the magnets fabrication.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Laser induced ultrafast demagnetization is a powerful process by which the magnetic moment of a material can be modified on femtosecond timescales. However, to eventually utilize this process in technology, it is crucial that we develop a thorough understanding of the physical mechanisms involved. Based on ab initio simulations, spin-orbit mediated spin-flips have been proposed as one form of ultrafast demagnetization. In this paper, we explore this mechanism in more detail using time-dependent density functional theory (TDDFT) to study demagnetization in bulk Ni. We show why spin-orbit coupling (SOC) causes spin-flips by highlighting the importance of circulating spin currents induced by the coupling between the electronic spin and orbital motion. We present both a mathematical and heuristic picture of how SOC can cause demagnetization. Furthermore, we show that same arguments can be used to understand how the spin angular momentum is transferred to the lattice during laser induced demagnetization in a realistic material.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report a combined theoretical and experimental investigation of half-metallic ferromagnetism in equiatomic quaternary Heusler alloy CoRuMnSi. Room temperature XRD analysis reveals that the alloy crystallizes in L21 disordered structure instead of pristine Y-type structure due to 50% swap disorder between the tetrahedral sites, i.e., Co and Ru atoms. Magnetization measurements reveal a net magnetization of nearly 4 μB with Curie temperature, TC of ∼780 K. Resistivity measurement reveals the presence of localization effect below 35 K while above 100 K, a linear dependence is observed. The majority spin band near the Fermi level clearly indicates the overlap of flat eg bands with sharply varying conduction bands that are responsible for the localization. In-depth analysis of the projected atomic d-orbital character of band structure reveals unusual bonding, giving rise to the flat eg bands purely arising out of Ru ions. Co-Ru swap disorder calculations indicate the robustness of half-metallic nature, even when the structure changes from Y-type to L21-type, with no major change in the net magnetization of the system. Thus, high TC, robust stability, and half-metallic nature make this alloy a promising candidate for further exploration from the point of view of applied spintronics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In bulk SmCo3 nanocrystalline materials with small grain sizes of 10–20 nm, it is a challenge to realize a strong crystal texture that is crucial for them as high-performance permanent magnets. Here we fabricated an anisotropic bulk SmCo3 nanocrystalline magnet with a strong (00l) texture combined with a small grain size of 10–20 nm using a high-pressure thermal compression (HPTC) approach from amorphous precursors. This magnet had an obvious magnetic anisotropy with Mr///Mr⊥ = 1.53 and a maximum energy product of 4.2 MGOe (33.8 kJ/m3) which were obviously higher than those Mr///Mr⊥ = 1.01 and 1.9 MGOe (15.1 kJ/m3) of the isotropic magnets prepared using the same precursors. These anisotropic magnets showed a coercivity temperature coefficient of β = –0.31 %/°C and a remanence temperature coefficient of α = –0.14 %/°C. The deformation and annealing temperatures played important roles on the microstructures and magnetic properties of these anisotropic SmCo3 nanocrystalline magnets. These findings make an important step toward the fabrication of oriented bulk SmCo3 magnets for practical applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper is devoted to the mathematical modeling of the nonmonotonic and nonlinear behavior of the magnetic permeability of inverse ferroemulsion under the influence of a uniform external magnetic field (Dikansky et al., 2011). The presented model is an extension of the model developed for the case of weak external magnetic field (Subbotin, 2018), in which the ferrofluid magnetization law is linear. The nonlinear ferrofluid magnetization law is taken into account via the first-order modified mean-field theory (MMF1) (Ivanov et al., 2001). The results show a good qualitative and quantitative agreement with the experimental data.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The mechanisms that limit the power loss performance in melt-spun amorphous ribbons have been investigated through DC and AC magnetic characterization methods. The measured total power loss is resolved into hysteresis, eddy current, and anomalous losses. The anomalous loss is found to account for more than 90% of the total loss, which significantly reduced by annealing in a transverse magnetic field. This is attributed to the reorientation of preferred magnetisation axis perpendicular to the length of ribbons. Transverse magnetic annealing promotes the relative contribution of domain rotation over domain wall motion during magnetisation reversal process. Magnetic annealing also causes a measurable decrease in the domain width, which promotes pinning and inhibits domain wall motion, thus further favoring coherent domain rotation as the primary mechanism of magnetization. This combination accounts for a 75% decrease in the total power loss in the so-processed ribbons and renders them attractive for applications in mid-and high-frequency power supplies and inverters.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The sequential, multi-stage crystallization and magnetic hardening behaviour of Fe82B14Si2Nb2, Fe83B13Si2Nb2, Fe83B12Si2Nb2Cu1 and Fe85B13Nb2 melt-spun alloys have been investigated. The microstructure-crystallization-magnetic property relationship was established using X-ray diffractometry (XRD), differential scanning calorimetry (DSC), magnetometry, transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and magneto-optical Kerr effect microscopy (MOKE) techniques. The increase of Fe content (>82 at%) of as-quenched ribbons imparts microstructural heterogeneity across the ribbon cross–section; i.e., textured α-Fe crystals at the free surface to hetero-amorphous microstructure in the bulk matrix. The isochronal annealing of hetero-amorphous alloys depicts simultaneous surface and bulk crystallization process occurring before and after the crystallization onset temperature (Tx1) temperature. The annealing temperature range (Ta < Tx1) coinciding with the paramagnetic region of the thermo-magnetic plot, induces irreversible magnetic hardening due to simultaneous coarsening of pre-existing crystal nuclei and exchange de-coupling between nanocrystal and intergranular matrix. The onset of primary crystallization in the pre-crystallized ribbons results in bimodal nanocrystallite distribution having an average crystallite size exceeding the ferromagnetic exchange length of Fe-based alloys. The minor Cu addition alters the growth morphology of pre-existing nuclei from dendrite-like to equiaxed, assisting heterogeneous nucleation and improving intergranular amorphous stability by delaying boride precipitation. The soft-magnetic property deterioration of partially crystallized ribbons is discussed within the framework of Extended-Random Anisotropy models.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, the effect of the partial substitution of Fe by Ti on the magnetic properties, Curie temperature and microstructure of Ce17Fe78- xTixB6 (x = 0–5 at.%) alloys are thoroughly investigated. The results reveal that the optimal magnetic properties of Br = 4.8 kG, Hcj = 5.45 kOe, Hk/Hcj = 0.47, Br/Bs = 0.64, (BH)max = 5.4 MGOe have been obtained for the x = 1 alloy heat treated at Ta. Meanwhile, it is shown that the addition of a small amount of Ti can decline the volume fraction of the paramagnetic CeFe2 phase and contribute to form more magnetic Ce2Fe14B phase, while the grain size of the Ce2Fe14B phase could not be effectively optimized due to the higher optimum treatment temperature Ta. The results of Henkel plot show that the Ti-doped alloy with a higher positive δM value and narrower peak is in charge of the enhanced magnetic properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Type-I Eu8Ga16Ge30 clathrate is a stable functional material with special magnetocaloric properties, mainly derived from the 4f magnetism of Eu ions. However, the influence of cage atoms, especially 3d magnetic atoms, on the magnetic properties of Eu8Ga16Ge30 is still lack of study. Co-doped Eu8Ga15Co1Ge30 was synthesized creatively by using arc method. It's magnetic properties have been investigated and compared with that of Co-free Eu8Ga16Ge30. Because Co ion has magnetic moment, its joining will introduce a new 3d-4f interaction into the lattice. This study can enrich the understanding of RKKY interaction between Eu ions with larger distances. The substitution of Co for Ga atoms on the cage frame results in the decrease of the ferromagnetic ordering temperature (TC) from 34.7 to 31.1 K. By fitting the M−H curves using Brillouin function, the exchange parameter λ was obtained. The decrease of λ from 0.25 to 0.21 T·emu−1·g due to the Co doping is thought to be the inherent reason of the TC decrease. For a magnetic field change from 0 to 3 T, the maximum magnetic entropy change -ΔSM max around TC for Eu8Ga15Co1Ge30 is 5.92 J/kg·K, which is a little smaller than the value 6.0 J/kg·K of Eu8Ga16Ge30. This could be attributed to the decrease of the saturation magnetic moment. The critical exponents β, γ and δ around TC, the -ΔSM(H) behaviors below, at and above TC are analyzed and discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We study planar rectangular-like arrays composed by macroscopic dipoles (magnetic bars with size around a few centimeters) separated by lattice spacings a and b along each direction. Physical behavior of such macroscopic artificial spin ice (MASI) systems are shown to agree much better with theoretical prediction than their micro- or nano-scaled counterparts, making MASI “almost ideal prototypes” for readily naked-eye visualization of geometrical frustration effects.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Ferrite and carbon nanocomposites are regarded to be excellent electromagnetic wave absorbers due to their compatible dielectric and magnetic loss capabilities. In this article, the three-dimensional (3D) Fe3O4@C core-shell nanocomposites with foam-like structure have been successfully prepared, which would greatly promote multiple reflection/scattering of the incident microwave. By adjusting the amount of polymeric precursors, the outer carbon can be perfectly controlled within the average thickness range of 9.1–34.8 nm. Meanwhile, through the synergy between 3D foam-like Fe3O4 core and outer carbon, the impedance matching conditions of the nanocomposites can be improved. Besides, the electromagnetic wave absorptivity of the nanocomposites presents a significant dependence on the thickness of outer carbon. When the average thickness of outer carbon is 28.3 nm, the absorber shows the most excellent performance, and the minimum reflection loss (RL) value is −55.5 dB with 2.5 mm absorber thickness. Especially, when the thickness is tuned from 1.4 mm to 5.5 mm, the Fe3O4@C exhibits efficient absorption (RL ≤ −20 dB) in an ultra-wide band (14.9 GHz). Based on the amazing microwave absorption properties, this nanocomposite can be considered as an ideal absorber.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Surface acoustic wave (SAW) devices have become an important field of interest because of their low power consumption, low cost, and high stability. In this work, we report an experimental work of tuning the intensity of SAW assisted domain wall motion via the insertion of a nonmagnetic-metal Pd layer between [Co/Pd]2 and Py. The results indicated that the velocity of the domain wall motion assisted by SAW can be reduced by increasing the thickness of the inserted nonmagnetic-metal Pd at the fundamental frequency (183.4 MHz). Above or below the fundamental frequency, the response of the device is not obvious. Our study could provide a way for achieving adjustable and stable domain wall motion in domain-wall-based spintronic devices.© 2020The polymer coating influence which used in the magnetic screens manufacture, and the conditions of its formation on the magnetization distribution and magnetic properties of the ribbon from a soft cobalt-based alloy with close to zero saturation magnetostriction was studied. The coating was applied in the temperature range 90–130 °C on the ribbon after heat treatment in air, which formed a state with different signs of magnetostriction saturation. It was shown that the flat compressive stresses induced by the coating contribute to a certain decrease in the maximum magnetic permeability due to an increase in the level of internal stresses, however, for 1–2 years there is no decrease in μmax in the ribbon with coating, which were formed in the temperature range 110–130 °C. The existence of a temperature range in which the coating formation changes the saturation magnetostriction sign was found. This is due to the change in the structural-phase state of the ribbon because diffusion processes by repeated heat treatment during of the polymer coating formation. Diffusion processes that occur at room temperature over time also contribute to changes in the structural-phase state of the ribbon and the λs sign in this state.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Correlation between Cu distribution and magnetic properties was studied for Sm(CobalFe0.28Cu0.07Zr0.02)7.6 magnets prepared by conventional powder metallurgical techniques. It reveals that the micrometer scale Cu distribution homogeneity before aging treatment has a profound influence on the cell structure, nanometer scale Cu distribution, which determines the magnetization and demagnetization behavior as well as magnetic properties of the magnets. By tuning the solution treatment conditions, magnet with optimal magnetic properties (remanence of 11.5 kG, coercivity of 23.4 kOe, and maximum energy product of 30.3 MGOe) was prepared.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Periodic switching of magnetic vortex core driven by alternative magnetic field, applied perpendicularly, is investigated in a curved permalloy nanodisk by using micromagnetic simulation. Modulated by the curvature, the oscillations of the out-of-plane magnetization, caused by the external magnetic field, are confined in the center region, closed to the core, which reduces the threshold switching field down to 3 mT. While, the excitation of radial spin waves after a core switching dominates the reversal process generally in flat nanodisks, making it hard to control the final core polarity. The released spin waves in the center region during the core switching are relatively weak in curved nanodisk with most of radial spin waves dissipated to the thick edge part, resulting in a stable periodic vortex core switching.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) and magnetic properties of Tb(Co0.94Fe0.06)2 alloy were studied. X-ray diffraction pattern taken at room temperature confirms that the sample crystallizes in single phase with rhombohedral structure. The paramagnetic to ferromagnetic phase transition was observed at 304 K near the room temperature. Banerjee criterion and universal scaling of the MCE was employed to confirm the second-order nature of the magnetic transition. Differential scanning calorimetry and magnetic characterizations have shown the absence of thermal and magnetic hysteresis in the paramagnetic-ferromagnetic transition region. The magnetic entropy change for Tb(Co0.94Fe0.06)2 associated with the ferromagnetic transition has been observed over a wide working temperature range (93 K) leading to large refrigerant capacity. The maximum value of magnetic entropy change (−ΔSM) under 5 T magnetic field is 4.3 J/kgK and the corresponding value of refrigerant capacity is 368.7 J/kg. Interestingly, the magnetocaloric performance of Tb(Co0.94Fe0.06)2 alloy is comparable with some rare-earth-based magnetocaloric materials. These remarkable features make this alloy a suitable candidate for magnetic refrigeration at room temperature.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The particle arrangement in magnetorheological elastomers imposes a major impact on the macroscopic behaviour of these smart materials. This paper presents a convenient method to characterize particle structures obtained by X-ray microtomography. A direction dependent approach of the pair correlation function was established, which enables a highly sensitive evaluation of the anisotropy of particle structures found in magnetorheological elastomers. To verify the applicability, the presented method was applied to experimental data exhibiting the magnetically driven transition of an isotropic arrangement of magnetic particles to particle chains. The results provided by the pair correlation function enable a detailed insight in the spatial distribution of the particles and reveal detailed information regarding the progression of the chain formation process.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a cluster Monte Carlo method suitable for both, the first- and the second-order phase transitions in the 3D Ashkin–Teller (AT) model. A cluster algorithm is necessary to verify correctness of the results obtained so far using Metropolis algorithm exhibiting significant critical slowing down. Moreover, metastable states have recently been investigated in this model which can affect the results, especially obtained using the Metropolis algorithm. Our Wolff type algorithm is described and its dynamic critical behavior is demonstrated. Our computer experiments exploit the properties of Binder and Challa cumulants and additionally the one proposed by Lee and Kosterlitz, the last two adapted by us to give clear results for the AT model. The energy distribution histogram method is also independently applied for the first time for the 3D AT model using the Wolff type algorithm. For validation of the previous results and of our algorithm, it is demonstrated that the results of our computations along the line between Ising and Potts points, which are rescaled to their thermodynamic limits, are consistent with those obtained using the Metropolis algorithm. It is also shown that the presented cluster algorithm of the Wolff type significantly reduces the problem of critical slowing down for the 3D AT model, and the dynamic critical exponent reaches values close to zero. As the best strategy, it is suggested to use the cluster algorithm in the critical region and the Metropolis one beyond.© 2019High quality GaAs was epitaxially grown on silicon(001) substrate through a hybrid technique of metalorganic chemical vapor deposition. The hybrid technique was comprised of AlAs nucleation and thermal cycle annealing to take advantages of both methods. The AlAs nucleation improved the surface roughness of GaAs buffer and the thermal cycle annealing reduced the threading dislocation (TD) density of GaAs buffer with small thickness. The GaAs buffer was grown with two-step growth with changing growth temperature and thermal cycle annealing processes. The optimal thickness of AlAs nucleation was determined to be 1.68 nm through systematic study with a series of buffer samples with different AlAs thicknesses. The TD density and surface roughness of GaAs buffer was quantitatively studied through electron channeling contrast imaging and atomic force microscopy, respectively. The growth temperature of GaAs buffer was also optimized to minimize the TD density. High quality GaAs buffer on Si(001) was obtained with a TD density 5.45 × 107 cm−2 with smooth surfaces. The total thickness of the buffer was approximately as thin as 1.5 μm. This study demonstrated a solution for silicon-based laser diodes to fulfill the monolithic integration of III-V on a Si platform.© 2020Approaches to modulate magnetoimpedance (MI) in amorphous wires mostly include annealing, ion irradiation, glass coating and patterning, which are mainly based on induction of transverse magnetic anisotropy. Here, through modulating the magnetization distribution across the wire and outer magnetic shell/ inner core ratio, enhanced magneto- and stress-impedance sensitivity were obtained. Such modulation was achieved by coating a Co-based melt-extracted wire with carbon nanotubes (CNT) and graphene oxide (GO) which induced different level of stresses allowing the increase in outer domain shell volume with helicoidal/circular-type magnetic anisotropy in expense of the axially magnetized inner core. Moreover, through controlling nanocarbon thickness, we demonstrated the validity of high frequency impedance measurements to map the magnetic microstructure across the wire and reveal the core–shell interaction and its contribution to MI. The improvement in transversal anisotropy was evidenced by a drastic increase in MI effect from 170% at 10 MHz for uncoated wire to 400% and 300% for CNT and GO-coated wires, respectively. Finally, by developing a planar model with a four-layer structure, the main features of MI curves were reproduced in the simulated curves. Our results establish a simple platform for the design of microwave materials towards a wide range of sensing applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric effects (MCE) of misch-metal MM2Fe17−xAlx (0 ≤ x ≤ 2) compounds are investigated. The XRD patterns indicate that all the samples crystallize primarily in a rhombohedral Th2Zn17 type crystal structure coexisting with a small amount of precipitation phase α-Fe. The lattice parameters and the Curie temperature (TC) increase linearly with the increase of Al content. This allows the MM2Fe17−xAlx compounds to achieve magnetic refrigeration over the entire room temperature range. The maximum values of entropy changes (ΔSM) for MM2Fe17−xAlx (x = 0, 0.5, 1 and 1.5) compounds with a magnetic field variation of 0–2 T and 0–5 T are determined to be −2.1 J Kg-1 K−1, −1.3 J Kg-1 K−1, −1.9 J Kg-1 K−1, 1.9 J Kg-1 K−1 and −4.0 J Kg-1 K−1, −2.7 J Kg-1 K−1, −3.5 J Kg-1 K−1, −3.5 J Kg-1 K−1, respectively. The relative cooling power (RCP) for all the studied compounds is larger than 90 and 270 Jkg−1 while the full-width half maxima (δTFWHM) is larger than 60 K and 100 K with the field changes of 0–2 T and 0–5 T, respectively. These results indicate that MM2Fe17−xAlx (0 ≤ x ≤ 2) compounds could have higher magnetocaloric cost-performance comparable to the room-temperature magnetic refrigeration materials R2Fe17 (R = Pr, Nd) and Gd with the second-order phase transition (SOPT).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Sintered Nd-Fe-B permanent magnets are the first choice for electro-mechanical devices that rely on hard-magnetic materials to provide strong magnetic fields in a variety of operating conditions. However, the limitations of conventional powder-metallurgy methods regarding the complexity of the magnet's geometry restrict the design freedom for electrical motors. Here, we propose a spark-plasma-sintering (SPS) approach to the waste-free net-shape manufacture of anisotropic Nd-Fe-B magnets. We investigated the effect of the SPS parameters on the density, magnetic properties and microstructure of disc-shaped samples prepared from a rare-earth-lean jet-milled powder. The absence of a grain-boundary phase and the presence of α-Fe in the as-sintered samples were identified as the main factors hindering the development of the intrinsic coercivity. The observed microstructural features were correlated with electrical effects specific to the rapid, non-equilibrium SPS. A post-SPS thermal treatment was found to be necessary for achieving the hard-magnetic properties. Our findings pave the way towards developing an SPS-based sintering procedure with great potential for the manufacture of complex- and net-shape permanent magnets for high-performance electrical devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.During the operation of Claw Pole (CP) machines, and for some operating loads, the magnetic core temperature can reach 180 °C in some hot spots. As a consequence, the core electromagnetic properties may considerably change, impacting the machine performances. In such a case, a deep knowledge of the electromagnetic behavior as a function of the temperature is required. In this paper, we present a dedicated study of the CP rotor made from a forged magnetic steel. In fact, the CP magnetic properties heterogeneity and the claw shape made it necessary to extract specific samples that are characterized with a miniaturized Single Sheet Tester (SST). To that end, this work proposes a specific methodology to characterize the electromagnetic properties of the CP rotor material as a function of the temperature in order to better predict the machine electrical performances, especially regarding the iron losses.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents the Jiles-Atherton model application to selected Fe-based soft magnetic composites (of different types prepared with the intention of verifying the model), with inner demagnetizing fields consideration implemented. The model fits experimental anhysteretic magnetization curves with very good accuracy, obtaining parameters: the effective domain density, the interdomain coupling and the average magnetic moment of effective domain. The parameters are interpreted in comparison to maximum total and differential permeability, inner demagnetization factor and hysteresis losses. The denser effective domain structure with stronger interdomain coupling is found for the decreasing ferromagnetic filler content and mean particle size, together with higher inner demagnetizing fields, leading to lower number of active magnetic objects, reflected by magnetic properties worsening. The relation of magnetic properties to interdomain coupling strength and effective domain density is specific for each ferromagnetic component of composite. The parameters absolute values are found remarkably different from bulk ferromagnets values in literature, pointing out the specific magnetization reversal of composites.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The temperature dependence of the spin pumping process in Fe80Ni20 (Py)/Pt bilayers is analyzed for different Pt capping layer thickness. Samples have been grown by means of dc magnetron sputtering, at room temperature, on top of Si substrates. In order to get an optimized interface between the Py and the Pt layers, the Pt capping layers were deposited In situ. The values of the damping constant, α, obtained for the Py alone samples, around 0.007 at RT, make evident the good quality of the samples. The increase of α due to spin pumping into the Pt layer is clearly appreciated; α values in Py/Pt bilayers are twice the value in Py alone. Spin pumping is confirmed by direct measurements of the inverse spin Hall effect (ISHE) voltage signal (VISHE) measured across the samples. To separate ISHE and spin rectification contributions to VISHE the line shape analysis method has been used and the conditions for its applicability thoroughly discussed. VISHE increases almost linearly on lowering temperature for all the frequencies investigated and smoothly increases as frequency decreases showing roughly a linear dependence with the inverse of the frequency. The Pt layer thickness dependence of α and VISHE suggest a low interfacial spin mixing conductance and high spin memory loss.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Multifunctional Samarium orthoferrites (SmFeO3) nano-particles have been studying extensively due to their applications in digital memory, ultrafast switching, temperature dependent spin valves and sensor applications. Magnetic properties of SFO were investigated by varying particle size, initial magnetic state of material and applied field under Zero Field Cooling (ZFC) and Field Cooling (FC) protocol. It was found that the remnant magnetization, M−H behavior and coercive field are extremely dependent on particle size. It was also found that the magnetic behavior of single domain SFO nanoparticle is completely different to that of multi domain bulk due to uniaxial magneto crystalline anisotropy. The magnetization vs temperature (M−T) behavior of nano-particle depends on unidirectional anisotropy along with uniaxial magneto-crystalline anisotropy of SFO. The Sm3+ spin ordering in nano-SFO compensates to that of Fe3+ spin ordering at higher temperature (~13 K) compare to that of bulk (~4K). The Sm3+ spin unidirectional magnetic anisotropy is more effective in between ~13 K to ~65 K and Fe3+ spin unidirectional anisotropy is effective at higher temperature beyond ~65 K. Magnetically poled nano-particles show completely different behavior to that of non-poled nano-SFO particles at low temperature. In nutshell, the manuscript shows why one can't predict the magnetic behavior of the SFO without knowing its particle or grain size, initial magnetic state of the particle, procedure of measurement, the magnitude of applied field and temperature etc., since all these affects the magneto crystalline anisotropy as well as unidirectional anisotropy of SFO.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of FePt – magnetic nanocomposites prepared by isothermal annealing of melt-spun Fe52Pt28Nb2B18 and Fe51Pt27Nb2B20 ribbons are reported. As it was evidenced the as-cast samples consists of L10-FePt hard magnetic grains dispersed in a predominant soft magnetic matrix composed of A1 FePt, Fe2B and boron-rich (FeB)PtNb residual phases. The applied annealing procedure reflects in temperature-induced structural and magnetic transition of dominated A1 FePt phase into L10-FePt dependent on Fe-Pt composition. As it was shown the Fe52Pt28Nb2B18 ribbon annealed at 700 °C exhibit promising hard magnetic properties at room temperature manifested as reasonably high remanence to saturation ratio (Mr/Ms = 0.68); coercivity (Hc = 0.92 T) and (BH)max = 83 kJ/m3 parameter. Strong exchange coupling between both FePt – based hard and soft magnetic phases was demonstrated by a smooth demagnetizing curve.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Pressure-dependent magnetic properties and magneto-structural phase transitions of the intermetallic Fe2AlB2 compound have been investigated by using spin-polarized density functional theory calculations. From the enthalpy calculations, possible phase transitions are predicted. It is seen that a phase transition from ferromagnetic (FM) to antiferromagnetic (AFM) occurs at 40 GPa, and the other one is from AFM to nonmagnetic (NM) occurs at 96 GPa. To investigate the source of the magneto-structural phase transitions, atomic bonding characteristics, and possible pressure effects on the physical properties of the compound are calculated. And, the structural, electronic, and mechanical properties of FM-, AFM- and NM-phases are considered as a function of pressure on the 0–120 GPa range. Subsequently, the spin-polarized partial and total density of states (DOS), projections of the charge densities, integrated spin densities, magnetization (or net magnetic moment), DOSs at the Fermi level, Mulliken bond overlap populations are studied to present a compact pressure analysis for Fe2AlB2. It is observed that there are sudden changes and discontinuities in the structural and magnetic properties at 40, 54, 59, and 96 GPa pressures as well as the other physical properties, which support the magneto-structural phase transitions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This study presents the application of a smart modeling approach to determine the heating profile of magnetic nanoparticles. The model is validated through the correlation analysis performed between in vitro experiments and in silico modeling. Our results show a good fitting relationship between the two modeling scenarios. The smart model developed, provided the supporting evidence for application in hyperthermia treatment.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.There is increasing interest in the optimization of non-oriented electrical steels for applications under excitation frequencies above 400 Hz. We discuss in this paper the possibility of a new manufacturing procedure, where skin-pass and subsequent heat treatment for recovery are applied as the two last stages of sheet processing. Samples from a commercial non-oriented 3 wt% silicon steel were submitted to 2.5% thickness reduction and were heat treated at temperatures ranging between 600 and 850 °C for 2 h. It is shown that, although the hysteresis loss increases with plastic deformation, the excess loss decreases in such a way that under increasing magnetizing frequencies the total energy loss of the deformed and recovered sample becomes lower than in the starting material. The higher the annealing temperature the lower the frequency at which crossover of the loss curves is observed, as long as full recrystallization does not occur. It is assumed that with the dislocation structures left in the deformed and partially recovered samples one achieves a condition of increased fragmentation of the magnetization process, that is, of increased number of concurring correlation regions (Magnetic Objects). The corresponding decrease of the excess loss component can eventually overcompensate the deterioration of the quasi-static magnetic properties, leading to lower total losses.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigate topological defects in canted antiferromagnetic materials with the orthoferrite as a model system, and demonstrate that a vertical Bloch line (VBL), a topological defect within magnetic domain walls, can couple to the other VBL to form a stable antibonding state. Actually, such a 2pi-VBL is a topologically non-trivial object with a skyrmion number equivalent to that of the skyrmion itself. We demonstrate that transitions to other topological objects are possible only when a strong enough magnetic field is applied; the 2pi-VBL can transform to two-independent pi-VBLs under the magnetic field applied along the orthorhombic a-axis, and it can be annihilated with the magnetic field applied along the c-axis. As long as the 2pi-VBL is in a stable condition, it can be driven by the magnetic field to move straightly with a high speed of about 2000 m/s. This unique property of the 2pi-VBL can provide us with a possibility to exploit it as another topological magnetic defect for the spintronic applications.© 2020In this research, electromagnetic and microwave absorption properties of the hexagonal ferrites with chemical composition, Sr0.85La0.15(CoZr)xFe12-2xO19 (x = 0.00, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75 and 1.00) were studied in the K-band (18–26.5 GHz) and Ka-band (26.5–40 GHz) frequency range. Minimum reflection loss (RL) was successfully optimized in the studied frequency range by tuning sample thickness using quarter-wavelength criterion. Absorption results of synthesized hexagonal ferrites show minimum RL in the range of −18.15 dB to −28.69 dB and absorption bandwidth (−10 dB) in the range of 1.04 GHz to 5.87 GHz. The microwave absorption significantly improved with absorption bandwidth (−10 dB) of 5.87 GHz for the composition x = 1.00 at a sample thickness of 2.2 mm. These newly synthesized ferrites have high potential as microwave absorbing material for military applications such as camouflaging of the target and also as EMI (Electromagnetic Interference) suppressor.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The conventional solid-state reaction method was used to synthesize the xLi0.1Ni0.3Cu0.1Zn0.4Fe2.1O4+(1−x)Ba0.95Sm0.05Ti0.95Dy0.05O3 multiferroic composites. X-ray diffraction patterns confirmed the coexistence of the constituent phases in the composites. Field Emission Scanning Microscopy images showed that the average grain size increased with the ferrite content in composites. The compositional study confirmed that the proportion of the components is well compatible with their nominal compositions. The real part of the initial permeability was found to increase, but the magnetic loss decreased with ferrite content. The dielectric dispersion was observed at lower frequencies on account of interfacial polarization. The maximum dielectric constant of about 6.7 × 103 was found for the value of x = 0.60 at 1 kHz. The ac conductivity followed the Jonscher's power law, and the conduction was due to the small polaron hopping. The impedance spectroscopy analysis confirmed that both the grains and grain boundaries affected the conduction for samples with x = 0.40, 0.50 and 0.60, while only grain boundary was the dominating factor for the other samples. Polarization-electric field curves (P-E) confirmed that the samples up to x = 0.20 had a good ferroelectric nature with a maximum saturation polarization of 0.34 µC/cm2 and the rest had lossy behavior. The highest magnetoelectric (ME) voltage coefficient was found to be 170 × 103 Vm−1T−1 for x = 0.10.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In order to avoid the electromagnetic interference, fabricating the microwave absorber is extremely urgent. In this work, a simple and effective method was used to prepare the MnS2/CNTs (carbon nanotubes) hybridization for microwave absorption. The composite of MnCO3/CNTs was acquired by a wet chemical process, and then the hybridization was vulcanized and transformed into MnS2/CNTs hybridization. By changing the reactant concentration, the composites of MnS2/CNTs with the CNTs ratios of 5%, 10%, 12% and 15% were prepared for the microwave absorption measurement. For the MnS2/12%CNTs composite, the minimum reflection loss (RLmin) reached −63.8 dB at 17.4 GHz with a thickness of 1.4 mm. Furthermore, the maximum bandwidth (RL < −10 dB) was 4.3 GHz (from 12.9 GHz to 17.4 GHz) with the thickness of 1.6 mm. Based on the consequence, MnS2/CNTs composite is a competitive candidate as the high-frequency microwave absorber.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The phase diagrams and magnetization curves of two antiferromagnetic Ising nanoparticles (A and B) under an applied transverse field are investigated by using the effective-field theory with correlations. The nanoparticle B is a size larger than that of nanoparticle A. The effects of size on the magnetic properties are discussed. Some characteristic features, such as the reentrant phenomena, are found in these properties of both systems, when a finite transverse field h is applied. The nanoparticle B exhibits the ferrimagnetic behaviors, such as a compensation point.© 2020This piece was written in memory of Eric Beaurepaire and his two-day visit to Moscow in the late 1990s.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We studied the properties of a magnetometer using high-Tc superconducting coils and an inductance modulation scheme. First, we obtained analytical expressions for the responsivity and magnetic field noise of the magnetometer that could be used for the design of a magnetometer. Next, a prototype magnetometer was fabricated and its performance was measured in liquid nitrogen. It was observed that the measured results agreed well with the calculated results, which indicated the validity of the present design method. We obtained a magnetic field noise of 0.8 pT/Hz1/2 above 25 Hz when using a pickup coil with 50 turns and an average diameter of 25 mm. At low frequencies, the field noise increased when decreasing the frequency, and reached 9 pT/Hz1/2 at 1 Hz. We also discuss the improvement of the magnetometer performance when the size of the pickup coil is increased.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Spin transmission in Cr2O3 films of different crystalline textures is studied experimentally. With Y3Fe5O12/Cr2O3/Pt trilayer devices, a spin current is injected into Cr2O3 by spin pumping from Y3Fe5O12, and the spin transmission is monitored by the inverse spin Hall voltage (VISHE) in Pt. For (0001) plane textured Cr2O3 films, VISHE vanishes quickly below the Néel temperature. However, the VISHE shows a broad shoulder below the Néel temperature for (112‾0) and (112‾3) plane co-textured Cr2O3. Such a difference in the temperature dependence of Cr2O3 can be understood by the different Néel vector orientations with respect to the injected spin moment direction.© 2020An ultrafine-grained FeCoNiCu0.2Si0.2 high entropy alloy (HEA) was designed and produced via melt-spinning. This HEA has Cu-rich cell-like grain structure with the size of 200–500 nm and Si-rich network-like intergranular structure with the width of 10–80 nm, leading to high yield strength and ultimate tensile strength of 820 MPa and 1100 MPa, respectively, as well as good plasticity. Moreover, it also shows high saturation magnetization, low coercivity and high Curie temperature. This ultrafine-grained HEA exhibits excellent combination of mechanical properties and soft magnetic properties among HEAs. Our work provides a novel route for designing high-strength soft magnetic HEAs, which is beneficial for the development of HEAs with soft magnetism and broadening their applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The codoped dilute magnetic semiconductor CuIn0.9CexCo0.1−xTe2 has been successfully prepared by arc melting and vacuum solid-state reaction technologies. CuIn0.9CexCo0.1−xTe2 crystallizes into body centered tetragonal structure with a space group of I4¯2d. The codoping of Co and Ce induces the room temperature ferromagnetism in CuIn0.9CexCo0.1−xTe2. The magnetization of CuIn0.9CexCo0.1−xTe2 are enhanced by codoping Ce and Co into CuInTe2, which is ascribed to the exchanging interaction between 4f electron of Ce and 3d electron of Co. Magnetic measurements show that Co influences mainly on the saturation magnetic moment of CuIn0.9CexCo0.1−xTe2. The high doping ratio of Co and Ce is beneficial for increasing saturation magnetization and the magnetic transformation temperature. Codoping Ce and Co into CuInTe2 can adjust the light absorption bandgap from 0.92 eV to 1.08 eV, which is slightly higher than that of CuInTe2. It shows that the light absorption bandgap can be refined by controlling Co/Ce ratio for the potential application of solar cell material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the epitaxial growth, structural characterization, magnetic and transport properties of body-centered-cubic (bcc) FexMn1−x films on MgO (0 0 1). Reflection high-energy electron diffraction and high-resolution x-ray diffractometry show that the 15-nm-thick FexMn1−x films remain pure bcc when x ≥ 0.71. A secondary phase appears when x ≤ 0.69. The moments of the pure bcc films are found no deviation from the Slater-Pauling behavior, much beyond the reported range of x ≥ 0.84. A dramatic moment deviation occurs with a secondary phase observed. The transport results exhibit a coherent magnetic behavior of the bcc FexMn1−x films up to x = 0.71 (29% Mn).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this present study, soft magnetic composite samples were made from iron-silicon alloys. For the purpose of optimizing 3D printing parameters, preliminary experiments were performed. Metallographic and computed tomography investigations were used to determine the appropriate sintering settings. Besides the microscopic and CT analysis, considering the permeability spectra have been compared to the samples.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A new approach for additive manufacturing of individual implants is the utilisation of hydrogels with stem cells and magnetic micro-particles. Due to the magnetic particles, the implant can be deformed in an alternating magnetic field, whereby a controlled differentiation of the stem cells is possible. In this study, a matrix material of alginate-methylcellulose gel was enriched with magnetite particles. For this novel material system, the Young's modulus, which must be known for the calculation of the strain or the required magnetic force, is yet unknown. In this work, the Young's modulus was determined by tensile testing for the main parameters particle concentration and storage conditions. Furthermore, the long-term stability was investigated. The measured moduli ranged from 9 kPa up to 1332 kPa. The results show that the Young's modulus for this system mainly depends on the presence of calcium ions in the buffer solution. In a solution without these ions, it decreases to 5% of the starting value. An increase of the particle concentration also increases the Young's modulus, but the range depends on the presence of calcium ions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, lutetium iron garnet (Lu3Fe5O12; LuIG) thin films have been grown on Y3Al5O12 (1 1 1) substrates by a pulsed laser deposition and are co-substituted with strong magnetically anisotropic ions of Co2+ and nonmagnetic ones of Si4+. LuIG is a garnet-structured ferrimagnet with an exceptionally low Gilbert damping constant as 10−5. The substitution of Co2+ and Si4+ induces a chemical disorder and competing antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic interactions, which induce a spin glass behavior. When the Co–Si substitution ratio is increased, a spin-freezing behavior is observed below the spin-freezing temperature TG = 190–220 K of the Lu3Fe4Co0.5Si0.5O12 film; this indicates the presence of a cluster glass phase. The film demonstrates a characteristic memory effects in the temperature range 120–180 K, which are below TG; this reveals the presence of a metastable magnetic state in the multi-valley energy landscape with shallow activation energy barriers. Ferromagnetic resonance measurements confirm increased perpendicular anisotropy energy induced by Co substitution and spin-wave characteristics including the inverse spin Hall effect voltage (VISHE). Lu3Fe5-2 xCoxSixO12 films show an increase in damping and a decrease in VISHE at the cryogenic temperature, which are attributed to the impurity relaxation mechanism. Therefore, the Co- and Si-substituted films exhibit strong spin-wave damping at a low temperature, which reflects the spin-freezing dynamics of cluster glass behaviors.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic structure and spin reorientation transition of 45% Mn substituted HoFeO3 have been investigated using bulk magnetization, neutron powder diffraction and specific heat capacity techniques. These studies confirm the presence of antiferromagnetic ordering of Fe/Mn sublattice below 336 K. The spin reorientation (SR) transition (TSR ~ 290 K) where the magnetic structure changes from Γ4(Ax, Fy, Gz) to Γ1(Gx, Cy, Az) is confirmed by Rietveld analysis of neutron diffraction patterns taken at various temperatures. Though the spin reorientation (SR) transition is happening at 290 K, the system is found to be in mixed Γ4(Ax, Fy, Gz) + Γ1(Gx, Cy, Az) phase from room temperature to 275 K. Below 275 K, the sample exhibits a pure Γ1(Gx, Cy, Az) structure in which the weak ferromagnetic component is absent. Bulk magnetization and specific heat capacity measurements also confirm the Néel temperature and spin reorientation transitions and support the neutron diffraction analysis.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The structural, magnetic, electronic, and elastic properties of magnetic semiconductors RbLnSe2 (Ln = Ce, Pr, Nd and Gd) are elucidated using density functional theory (DFT) using both large and small core pseudopotentials for the lanthanide atoms. Magnetic ordering is investigated using spin-polarized calculations, and the higher stability of ferromagnetic configuration is predicted. It is found that the splitting of 4f-Ln states drives the ferromagnetic character of these materials and that the total and partial magnetic moments increase with the energy band gap. The RbLnSe2 compounds are found to be semiconductors with two spin band gap channels (Eg1 and Eg2) in both spin directions. The band gaps of RbNdSe2 and RbGdSe2 suggest their possible usefulness in photoresponse applications. The mechanical stabilities and elastic properties of RbLnSe2 were calculated for the single and poly-crystals and reinforce the suggestion of their potential photoresponse and spintronic technological applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Rare-earth anti-perovskites with oxygen are an interesting magnetic materials family at the boundary between intermetallics and oxides, they however remain largely unexplored. Here, magnetic and heat capacity investigations, as well as density functional theory (DFT) calculations, were carried out on SnOEu3. At low magnetic field (B ≤ 0.5 T), a Néel temperature separates antiferromagnetic and paramagnetic phases at 31 K. When applying higher magnetic field below the Néel temperature, successive transformations toward a ferromagnetic state via a number of intermediate canted magnetic structures are observed and are associated with only modest latent heat and transition entropy. High-pressure magnetic measurements confirm the stable divalent state of Eu up to 1.05 GPa. A direct magnetocaloric effect progressively increases with applied magnetic field above the Néel temperature, reaching −16 J kg–1 K−1 for ΔB = 7 T. On the other hand, the inverse magnetocaloric effect of the field-induced transition below TN saturates at ~+5 J kg−1 K−1. DFT calculations support magnetic instabilities observed experimentally in SnOEu3 and reveal an unusual exchange mechanism and band topology near the Fermi level.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the effects of applying an electric field on the dc and ac magnetic response of Fe89Ga11 thin films (t=6, 11, 17, 22, and 28 nm) that have been deposited on ferroelectric PMN-PT (011) and (001) single crystals. Upon the application of an electric field we have observed that M vs. H hysteresis loops are modified in films grown on (011) crystals, consistent with a positive magnetostriction constant that depends on film thickness. From ferromagnetic resonance experiments at 9.5 GHz we obtained a thickness dependent magnetoelectric coefficient in the case of (011) substrates, showing a maximum dH/dE∼150 Oe.m/MV for t=28 nm, coincident with the estimations made from M vs. H loops. It was found that the direction of easy magnetization could be rotated by 90° upon the application of an electric field only in the case of 28 nm films deposited on PMN-PT (011). In thinner films the magnetoelectric coefficient is too small to overcome the magnetic anisotropy. These results indicate that if magnetostrictive materials are to be applied in straintronic devices the dependence of magnetic parameters with film thickness must be taken in account for optimum performance.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the magnetic anisotropy energy (MAE) in the free-standing Co/Ni (1 1 1) multilayer as both Ni thickness dependence (tNi = 1-4MLs) and number of multilayer repetition times (N = 1–3) by means of a first-principles electronic structure calculation based on spin density functional theory. We included both contributions to the MAE from magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy (MCAE) originating from spin-orbit coupling and shape magnetic anisotropy energy (SMAE) originating from spin dipole-dipole interaction. The MCAE part was evaluated from both methods of total energy (TE) and grand-canonical force theorem (GCFT). The SMAE part was calculated by using a spin density approach (SDA). All MCAE values from the TE are well reproduced by those from the GCFT method. In N = 1, the total MAE (MCAE + SMAE) for tNi showed a perpendicular MAE (PMAE) with a maximum value of 1.67 mJ/m2 at tNi = 2MLs. The PMAE increases with increasing N. The series of tNi = 3MLs showed a linear behavior as N dependence with an increasing ratio of 0.68 mJ/m2, which is in good agreement with experimental measurement. By using the GCFT, we evaluated the atom-resolved and k-resolved MCAEs. The atom-resolved MCAE indicates that the Co/Ni interface is the main origin of PMAE. The PMAE is mainly located at Γ¯-K¯ line in the two dimensional Brillouin zone. This is attributed to large components of the d-orbitals extending along the multilayer plane on Co and Ni near the Fermi energy. We also calculated the SMAE using a discrete approach (DA) and found that there is a reduction of SMAE part in the SDA, compared to the DA. This reduction originates from a prolate quadrupole component of spin density distribution. The present comprehensive study may provide a better understanding of magnetic properties in Co/Ni multilayers as widely used in spintronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fe2MnSn compound was prepared in the form of polycrystalline ingot by arc-melting. In contrast to the theoretical predictions of stable tetragonal Heusler compound, the material crystallizes in a hexagonal DO19 crystal structure and orders ferromagnetically below TC = 586(10) K that is only about half of the calculated value of 1012 K. Magnetic moment 5.87 μB at 10 K is less or about in line with various theoretical predictions. However, electrical resistivity and optical studies reveal no signs of half-metallic behavior predicted theoretically. The change in the slope of the MOKE spectra below 1.5 eV suggests the main influence of a low energy inter-band transition which points to the loss of half-metallicity in agreement with resistivity and optical measurements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Low dimensional films are materials of interest for the changes of the structural, electronic and magnetic properties they undergo, especially when they form interfaces with a substrate. The iron-rhodium (FeRh) alloy is an excellent example. Experimentally, FeRh films are deposited on single crystal substrates like MgO, sapphire or silicon. Particularly, MgO (0 0 1) is an excellent support for FeRh because it is possible to deposit high quality epitaxial films on it. MgO is also highly stable at high temperatures and tensile in-plane strain favors the FM over the AFM state. In order to improve the knowledge of the supported bimetallic systems properties, theoretical calculations using density functional theory (DFT) have been carried out. The different thicknesses considered for the multilayers are 0.6 nm, 0.9 nm and 1.2 nm for both, terminated in Fe or Rh. To complete the study, we present the results obtained on the influence of the termination of the surfaces, the number of alloy layers, the different magnetic configurations (FM – AFM), the charge transfer and the adhesion of the films to the MgO substrate. The analysis of the results shows that as the thickness of the film grows, the adhesion energy tends to an average value of the order of 1.5 J/m2; on the other hand, the AFM coupling facilitates the takeoff compared to the FM coupling. Moreover, comparing the difference between FM and AFM results for different thicknesses, the percentages are slightly lower for. –Rh terminated films. Regarding the out-of-plane relaxation percentages, they depend on the thickness of the film and the magnetic coupling. For the AFM coupling of films -Rh terminated, lower values are observed compared to those obtained for the FM coupling and this behavior is maintained for all three thicknesses studied. However, for the -Fe terminated films as the film grows the relaxations are practically twice those corresponding to the cases of films terminated in Rh tending to tetragonal structures. With respect to magnetic properties, in the three presented systems for -Rh terminated multilayers, the tendency of magnetic moments values for the FM coupling is maintained in around 3.2 μB/at for the case of Fe and 1.0 μB/at for the case of Rh. For AFM the most noticeable difference is the cancellation of the magnetic moments of Rh. However, the situation is different for the Fe atoms in the -Fe terminated multilayers. For 0.9 nm the Fe atoms in contact with the substrate undergo the least relaxation and their magnetic moments are parallel and equal to −1 μB/at. The Fe atoms of the other layers recovered their values of ±3 μB/at. But when the film grows the Rh atoms acquire a small magnetization in increasing order as it approaches to the free surface. The presence of residual ferromagnetism in the interfaces of the FeRh films deposited on MgO (0 0 1) has also been observed experimentally by other groups. In summary, we can conclude that the obtained results are mostly influenced by the surface termination. (-Rh or -Fe).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We analyze the magnetic anisotropy of Ni nanowires with diameters smaller than 5 nm. The nanowires are vertically epitaxied in a SrTiO3(001) matrix which generates huge tensile strains up to 3.6% along the nanowire axis. This leads to an unusual anisotropy, characterized by an easy magnetization plane perpendicular to the nanowire axis. Hysteresis cycles M(H) unveil an overall in-plane isotropy, while an opening of the M(H) cycles and thermal activation measurements indicate the presence of local energy barriers inside the nanowires. Surprisingly, the coercive field Hc(T) decays exponentially with increasing temperature, for both the easy plane and the hard axis. Based on these findings, we provide an analysis of magnetoelastic effects in the nanowires. By considering global averaging over the anisotropy distribution and local averaging according to the Random Magnetic Anisotropy model, we find that the global anisotropy, with its hard axis and isotropic easy plane, is related to the mean strain, while coercivity arises from local strain variations. We evidence that a thermally activated anisotropy softening occurs in the nanowires, in addition to Sharrock's law of thermal reduction of coercivity. Possible mechanisms responsible for this thermal softening of anisotropy are proposed and discussed. Our study eventually allows to identify two major competing effects at play in the present system: an increasing magnetic anisotropy with increasing strain and a reduction of the anisotropy with increasing local strain fluctuations.© 2020 The AuthorsA combined ferrite parametric amplifier and millimeter-wave homodyne interferometer are proposed as an ambient temperature Bell Test. It is shown that the non-linear magnetic susceptibility of the yttrium iron garnet (YIG) ferrite, on account of its narrow line-width Larmor precessional resonance, make it an ideal material for the creation of entangled photons. These can be measured using a homodyne interferometer, as the much larger number of thermally generated photons associated with ambient temperature emission can be screened out. The proposed architecture may enable YIG quantum technology-based sensors to be developed, mimicking in the millimeter-wave band the large number of quantum optical experiments in the near-infrared and visible regions which had been made possible by use of the nonlinear beta barium borate ferroelectric, an analogue of YIG. It is illustrated here how the YIG parametric amplifier can reproduce quantum optical Type I and Type II wave interactions, which can be used to create entangled photons in the millimeter-wave band. It is estimated that when half a cubic centimeter of YIG crystal is placed in a magnetic field of a few Tesla and pumped with 1 Watt of millimeter-wave radiation, approximately 1012 entangled millimeter-wave photon pairs per second are generated by the spin-wave interaction. This means an integration time of only a few tens of seconds is needed for a successful Bell Test. A successful demonstration of this will lead to novel architectures of entanglement-based quantum technology room temperature sensors, re-envisioning YIG as a modern quantum material.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Chiral magnets have been vastly studied in the last years due to their potential applications as information carrying devices. In this work, it was studied the influence of the magnetocrystalline anisotropy term on the magnetic properties of two-dimensional chiral magnets, by means of Monte Carlo simulations. On the obtained magnetic arrangements, a Deep Learning algorithm based on computer vision techniques, was used for the phase recognition in each sample and their later classification. In this way, the low-temperature phase diagrams were built for a given set of anisotropy constants. It was observed that the skyrmion phase can be stabilized by tuning the magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant; in particular, the skyrmion region in the low-temperature magnetic phase diagrams can be increased by using an easy-plane anisotropy term. The machine learning algorithm described in this work can be easily extended to real-world applications, in the analysis and classification of magnetic force or Lorentz transmission electron microscopy images.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we study the effect of the driven magnons on the electronic magnetoconductance of an anti-/ferromagnetic quantum wire which is connected to two magnetic chains. The proposed model is based on Green's function technique within the nearest neighbor tight-binding approach and using a semiclassical approximation for the dynamics of magnetic moments. Due to the existence of the external time-periodic magnetic field, the time-average of the electronic transmission coefficient is presented. This quantity is investigated as a function of external field properties and damping force. The numerical results indicate that the conductance of the magnetic quantum wire has the most decrease at frequencies of external field corresponding to magnonic eigenfrequencies of the center wire. The strong damping forces diminish the effect of the external magnetic field specially at the frequencies corresponding to magnonic eigenfrequencies.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The discovery of ultrafast demagnetization by Bigot and Beaurepaire in 1996 launched the field of ultrafast magnetism – the study of sub-picosecond magnetization dynamics in response to femtosecond laser excitations. In the same year, the discovery of spin-transfer torque switching of magnetic nanostructures [2,3] launched the field of spintronics – the control of magnetic order with electrical currents and voltage, germane to integrated electronic systems. Ultrafast magnetism may be particularly useful to future spintronic memory and logic devices by enabling magnetization switching at much faster time scales than in any existing spintronic technology. However, a number of obstacles stand in the way of integrating ultrafast magnetic phenomena into spintronic devices. To be useful for devices, ultrafast magnetization dynamics must be driven by electrical currents, not femtosecond lasers. The electrical currents need to be sourced by semiconductor transistors, which currently have a minimum gate delay on the order of picoseconds. Readout of the magnetic state must also be electrical, which will likely require a large magnetoresistance from a ferromagnetic tunnel junction. Finally, the switching energy must be minimized, which requires nanoscale device dimensions. This review discusses our most recent advances in addressing these challenges and bridging together the two fields of spintronics and ultrafast magnetism to enable the integration of ultrafast spintronic devices. Our research shows that, not only sub-picosecond optical pulses, but also picosecond excitations in the form of optical and electrical (heat current) pulses can result in the switching of the magnetization direction between two opposite states in ferrimagnetic GdFeCo. We also demonstrate ultrafast single shot switching of ferromagnetic Co/Pt exchange coupled to a GdFeCo layer. Furthermore, we observe ultrafast switching in nanoscale patterned GdCo dots. These achievements pave the way towards the construction of nanoscale ferromagnetic tunnel junctions capable of picosecond magnetization write times and electrical readout.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Diluted magnetic semiconductors (DMS) find applications in spintronic devices due to their excellent magnetic and magneto-transport properties. Designing room temperature DMS, using non-magnetic transition metal oxides and non-magnetic impurities (i.e., having s, p electrons), is a major challenge for researchers. Using state-of-the-art density functional theory (DFT) simulations, we have predicted for the first time, room temperature ferromagnetism (FM) in C – doped MoO3 (O substitution defect). Single C impurity in non-magnetic MoO3, which corresponds to an impurity concentration of 1.04 at.%, induces a magnetic moment of 2.0 μB per impurity with FM coupling large enough to sustain room temperature FM. DFT predictions using the generalized gradient approximation (GGA) exchange correlation functional were verified by a hybrid functional, viz., the Heyd-Scuseria-Ernzerhof (HSE06) functional. The system is stable at room temperature and the computed Curie temperature (TC) is ~565 K. From the relative formation energy it can be inferred that O substituted defect dominates over the interstitial defect; and, C doped MoO3 can indeed be synthesized with O substituted defect in experiments. The induced FM in this hole doped system is mainly contributed by C and O 2p orbitals and we have established that the Stoner criterion is satisfied to switch on FM by introducing spin polarized defect band at the top of the valence band. Stability of the system, practical feasibility to synthesize C doped MoO3 and persistence of FM at room temperature signify that C doped MoO3 can be tailored as room temperature ferromagnets for spintronic applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Using ab initio numerical results, we present a quantitative verification of the proposed contribution to the magnetic coupling in diluted magnetic semiconductors and transition metal oxides originated via successive spin polarizations over dopants and their first nearest neighboring (1nn) anion ligands. This is achieved through an examination of the variation with the magnetization density of both the magnetic moments of 3-d transition metal dopants and those of their 1nn anion ligands in various hosts. These results are then used to derive approximate exchange coupling constants assigned to the magnetic coupling between a dopant and its first nearest neighbor anion ligands for each host-dopant pair. This allows us to justify and/or predict the spin polarization state of an anion ligand which is common to two or three magnetic dopants and, in turn, to justify and/or predict the spin configuration and the intercoupling (ferromagnetic and/or antiferromagnetic) among the atoms of a cluster of dopants sharing common anion ligands.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the doping of the spinel structure Mn-Cr ferrite with cations of the rare-earth Ce. The material was characterized by X-ray diffraction, Raman spectroscopy, high-resolution transmission electron microscopy and saturation magnetization. The magneto-impedance showed a step-like drop in impedance that ranges from 10% to 45% at the highest and lowest biased electric field, respectively. There was no crystal structure deformation detected in the diffraction patterns, but rather the deformation of the crystal field was seen in the Raman spectra. We can conclude that doping a large rare-earth cation in a closed packed spinel structure results more in a distortion in the crystal field of the material rather than in its crystal structure. This crystal field distortion results in non-symmetric splitting of the energy states of the doping cations in octahedral and tetrahedral sites, for which Raman scattering shift is very sensitive, and can be seen also in magneto-impedance measurements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The properties of optimized transverse magneto-optical Kerr effect (TMOKE) of all-types of bi-gyrotropic metamaterials have been investigated and compared for both s- and p-polarized waves. We demonstrated that double-positive and double-negative ones are capable of achieving maximum TMOKEs, but with the opposite signs. On the other hand, single-negative metamaterials could not provide large TMOKE. In addition, a giant TMOKE can be observed in a special case of metamaterials whose are exhibiting near-zero refractive index. A large TMOKE response is important for applications in magneto-optical data storage and high-definition imaging.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Co2Y/BCTO/PANI composite was synthesized using mechanical blending method. The XRD analysis shows that the composite exhibit pure phase of Co2Y barium hexaferrite and bismuth copper titanate (BCTO) which is also supported by Raman analysis. Resonance occurs over the whole frequency region in the spectra of Co2Y/BCTO/PANI composite with dielectric losses dominating the lower frequency region due to interfacial polarization and magnetic losses dominating the higher frequency region as a result of eddy current losses, natural and exchange resonance. The observed values of shielding effectiveness for reflection are higher than those of shielding effectiveness for absorption, this indicates that most of the incident EM wave is reflected rather than absorbed. The Co2Y/BCTO/PANI composite shows total shielding effectiveness value above 20 dB with maximum total shielding effectiveness value of 31.97 dB at 10.30 GHz and matching thickness of 2 mm. The high value of total shielding effectiveness is attributed to good impedance matching between the components of the Co2Y/BCTO/PANI composite as well as higher dielectric losses as compared to magnetic loses.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Co-Zn spinel ferrites with lanthanum (La3+) ion substitutions having formula Co0.7Zn0.3LaxFe2-xO4 (x = 0.0, 0.025, 0.05, 0.075, 0.1) were prepared using sol gel auto ignition route. The structural characterization of the ferrites was performed by the x-ray diffraction (XRD) method. The parameters calculated from the XRD analysis include lattice parameter, density, porosity, crystal size and lattice strain. The nanocrystallinity of the ferrite samples was observed with the crystallites of 20–30 nm size. The scanning electron microscopy (SEM) was employed to analyse the morphology of the ferrite crystals. The size and shape of the ferrite nanocrystals were confirmed from transmission electron microscopy (TEM) images. The crystal planes revealed from XRD calculations were confirmed by the selected area electron diffraction (SAED) analysis of the ferrites. Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) measurements of the ferrite samples were performed to study the magnetic properties of the ferrites. The effects of the La3+ substitution were observed on the coercivity and saturation magnetization of the ferrites. The variation of dielectric properties of the ferrites within 50 Hz to 5 MHz frequency band were studied at room temperature. The dielectric relaxation in the ferrites was governed by the electron hopping between divalent (Fe2+ and Co2+) and trivalent (Fe3+ and Co3+) cations. Remarkable impact of La3+ composition and the crystal size was observed on dielectric constant as well as loss tangent.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we follow up on the pioneering work of Jean-Yves Bigot and Eric Beaurepaire about disentangling microscopic properties in femtosecond magnetization dynamics such as spin and orbital momenta (Boeglin et al., 2010). To this end, we utilize spin-resolved photoemission to distinguish spin polarization and exchange splitting as essential magnetic properties in the ultrafast demagnetization of thin Fe films on W(1 1 0). In laser photoemission (hνProbe=6.2 eV) we find an ultrafast breakdown of the spin polarization after exciting the system with 70-fs pump laser-pulses at hνPump=1.6 eV. Measuring a minority-spin surface resonance close to the Fermi level at 0.12 Å−1 in Γ‾-H‾ direction, we establish a band mirroring effect similar to the ones observed in Eich et al. (2017) and Gort et al. (2018).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Based on the virtue of complete isotropy around a dipole source, the normalized source strength (NSS) is introduced to the scalar triangulation and ranging (STAR) method to replace the original tensor contraction and a new real-time magnetic dipole localization method without asphericity error is proposed in this paper. Firstly, three unknown parameters of bearing vector are estimated by solving the equations about the NSS of six faces of the magnetometer cube. Secondly, the magnitude of magnetic moment vector is estimated using NSS and magnitude of the estimated bearing vector. Thirdly, linear equations about three unknown parameters of unit magnetic moment vector are established using the intermediate eigenvalues and NSS of six faces of the cube, and the least square solution is given. Simulations without and with measurement noises have been done to evaluate the performance of the proposed method. The results show that the proposed algorithm is correct in theory and the estimation results are more accurate than two other improved STAR methods.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We study binary magnonic crystal, where Ni80Fe20 nanodots of two different sizes are diagonally connected forming a unit and those units are arranged in a square lattice. The magnetization dynamics of the sample is measured by using time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr effect microscope with varying magnitude and orientation (ϕ) of the bias magnetic field, which is applied at about 10° angle from the sample plane. Interestingly, at ϕ = 0°, the spin-wave mode profiles show frequency selective spatial localization of spin-wave power within the array. With the variation of ϕ in the range 0° < ϕ ≤ 45°, we observe spectral narrowing due to localized to extended spin-wave mode conversion. Upon further increase of ϕ, the spin-wave modes slowly lose the extended nature and become fully localized again at 90°. We have extensively demonstrated the role of magnetostatic stray field distribution on the rotational symmetries obtained for the spin-wave modes. From micromagnetic simulations, we find that the dipole-exchange coupling between the nanodots leads to remarkable modifications of the spin-wave mode profiles when compared with arrays of individual small and large dots. Numerically, we also show that the physical connection between the nanodots provides more control points over the spin-wave propagation in the lattice at different orientations of bias magnetic field. In particular, the directional propagation of spin-wave is crucial for the application in coupler. Overall, we envision this binary magnonic crystal to have potential applications in magnonic devices such as spin-wave waveguide, filter, coupler, and other on-chip microwave communication devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.To continuously perform pretreatment operations of biological detection reagents, a kind of microfluidic bioseparation chip that integrates mixer, heater and soft magnets for detection of nucleic acid and extraction of molecular proteins with magnetic beads methods is presented in the paper. A specific magnetic field is formed in a desired chamber bonded with PDMS and PMMA sheets by embedding soft magnets of iron powders in the chip, and magnetized by an external magnetic field. Soft magnets distributed in different ways are designed respectively, and the characteristics of the magnetic field, as well as the magnetic trajectory of the magnetic beads are simulated by considering the magnetic-fluid coupling. An experimental platform to observe the capturing of magnetic beads is built and the capture phenomenon for magnetic beads with lattice-distributed soft magnets is also experimentally verified. Based on the experimental data, the capture efficiency of the magnetic beads is calculated with the image processing method. The results show that lattice-distributed soft magnets are more effective than the array-distributed soft magnets for separating the magnetic beads. Furthermore, the lattice-distributed soft magnets can improve the separation efficiency of the detected reagent maintained to be more than 80% when the inlet flow rate increases from 0.01 m/s to 0.05 m/s.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe pseudo-MOSFET configuration is an electrical characterization technique developed for silicon-on-insulator (SOI) wafers. The wide variety of experiments that have been performed to date have also extended recently in the study of out-of-equilibrium phenomena for bio-sensing applications. However, the lack of a full understanding of the ohmic contact behaviour between the probes and the low doped silicon film results in simulation inconsistencies. This work proposes a simulated device structure that is capable of reproducing the behaviour of the device and further extends the experiments into large-signal linear ramps which are also reproduced through simulations.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We systematically studied the structure, electrical and magnetic properties of indium oxide prepared by electrospinning. Resistance studies have shown that indium oxide nanofibers have significant extrinsic effects. Magnetic studies have shown that indium oxide has obvious positive and negative magnetic resistance competition and transformation during temperature change. The conduction mechanism can be described using Mott's variable range hopping conduction and the weak localization effect, where the dimensions of the conduction model are all in three dimensions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.FORCs (first-order reversal curves) diagrams prove to be an efficient experimental technique to investigate magnetic interactions in complex systems. In experiments, as a rule, it is difficult to relate actual microstructural changes to the evolution of FORCs diagrams. Here, using Molecular Dynamics simulations, we calculate FORCs for two simple models of a magnetic elastomer. The simplicity of these models allows to relate directly both, the rigidity of the matrix and the magnetoelastic coupling to the shape and intensity of FORCs diagrams.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present a joint experimental and computational study of the trinuclear basic carboxylate iron complex FeIII 2FeIIO(CH3CO2)6(H2O)3, which is a model system for understanding photoinduced ultrafast spin dynamics in magnetic iron-based transition metal oxides. We have carried out femtosecond optical transient absorption spectroscopy of molecules in solution at room-temperature exciting either at 400 or 520 nm and observed a long-lived excited-state absorption (ESA) signal from ca. 400–670 nm. The ESA signal is composed of several broad un-resolved bands at 405, 440 and 530 nm. The decay dynamics are complicated and three exponentials with corresponding decay time constants of τ1=360±30 fs, τ2=5.3±0.6 ps, τ3=65±5 ps and a constant offset (τ4>500 ps) were needed to fit the data over the full wavelength range. The data indicate that the lowest excited state is populated within the duration of the excitation pulse (<120 fs). Highly correlated coupled-cluster calculations can satisfactorily reproduce the experimental vibrational spectrum and highlight the role of the μ3-oxo bridge connecting the Fe ions to create a highly correlated ground-state and identify the excited state as having a mixture of both charge-transfer and ligand-field/d-orbital characters.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Ni0.4Zn0.6Fe2O4/Pb(Zr0.53Ti0.47)O3 (NZFO/PZT), BaFe12O19/Pb(Zr0.53Ti0.47)O3 (BaM/PZT) and BaFe12O19/Ba0.6Sr0.4TiO3 (BaM/BST) composite ceramics were fabricated by a conventional sintering method. Their magnetic and electrical properties are compared in detail at microwave frequency, including the effect of magnetic field and polarization. In the high frequency of 2–10 GHz, the permeability and permittivity of BaM/PZT and BaM/BST composites enjoy good stability under DC magnetic field. The permeability of NZFO/PZT composites shows a loss peak due to the domain wall resonance under magnetic field, which moves to high frequency with the increase in magnetic field. For polarized BaM/PZT and NZFO/PZT composites, the loss peak of permeability shifts to low frequency and the loss peak of permittivity becomes broadened. These clearly indicate the coupling between magnetic and ferroelectric phases at microwave frequency. The results are helpful for material selection in the design of microwave devices.© 2019We study the relation between the induced anisotropy obtained on nanocrystalline Fe73.0Cu1.1Nb3.1Si15.7B7.1 toroidal cores crystallized under transverse field at 570 °C, and the polarization Jc of nanograins. To do this, an original disposition is used, mixing treated cores with cores made of electrotechnical SiFe alloy, featuring same geometry, using the interfacial magnetic charges to increase the field in treated cores. The field supplied by the coil being μ0Ha=33mT, playing on the proportion between treated and SiFe cores, effective field ranging between 33mT and 230mT were obtained inside treated cores. As a result, the induced anisotropy at the scale of the alloys at the end of crystallization range from Ku=12J/m3 to Ku=20J/m3. To simulate the evolution of Jc during the crystallization process, the configuration of treated and SiFe cores in the sample holder was implemented in Altair FluxT FEM simulation environment with the dedicated polarization laws. Dealing with treated cores, the law Jcor(H) at the scale of the core reflects the law JcH featured by nanograins during the crystallization process. JcH was modelized as a function of the crystallized fraction fc. The relation between the simulated Jc and the experimental final values of Ku/fc (i.e. the anisotropy in nanograins) was then studied. This was done considering the polarization 〈Jc〉 averaged on the entire crystallization process, wondering about a possible memory effect.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Pure phase Sr3Fe2F12 powders were prepared by solid state reaction, which has been confirmed by the X-ray diffraction pattern. The morphology was studied by scanning electron microscope which shows the layered growth. The Fe ions are in +3 valence state from X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy. Two kinks can be observed from temperature dependent magnetization measurements, suggesting two antiferromagnetic transitions. A bifurcation between field cooling and zero field cooling temperature dependent magnetization curves happens below Néel temperature (TN1) of 47 K, suggesting a magnetic relax system. The field dependent magnetization curves show clear hysteresis below TN1, indicating the occurrence of weak ferromagnetism. This is related to the spin canting due to the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya (DM) interaction. The two antiferromagnetic transitions with magnetic relaxation below TN1 are related to the complicated arrangements of FeF6 octahedra, leading to the complicated exchange interaction between Fe3+ ions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and magneto-transport properties of nanocrystalline Nd0.5Ca0.5MnO3 compound are presented. In contrast to its bulk counterparts, with modification of the magnetic grounds state, large magnetoresistance appeared in the presence of comparatively lower magnetic field in nanocrystalline compound. Additionally, the magnetic field induced insulator-metal transition took place in nanocrystalline compound with negligible thermal hysteresis. From application perspectives, observation of the low field magnetoresistance in this compound may be important for several uses in magnetic field sensor related technology. Fundamentally, the influences of the ferromagnetic phase fraction as well as the induced ferromagnetic interaction in nanocrystalline samples on magnetic and magneto-transport properties were addressed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We performed anomalous Hall effect (AHE) measurements in Pt/Tm3Fe5O12 (Pt/TmIG) bilayers grown on (1 1 0) and (1 1 1)-oriented Gd3Ga5O12 (GGG) substrates (Pt/110TmIG and Pt/111TmIG). Qualitative differences were observed in the two sets of samples: at low magnetic fields only Pt/111TmIG displays square AHE loop, while Pt/110TmIG exhibits non-hysteretic AHE behavior. Systematic temperature-dependent AHE measurements in Pt/111TmIG showed double switching events of AHE loops below 30 K, which was attributed to the larger moment of Tm3+ sublattice at low temperatures and was consistent with earlier theoretical calculations [A. Lehmann-Szweykowska et al., Phys. Rev. B 37, 459 (1988)]. Our results confirmed the strong coupling of Tm3+ magnetic moment with the lattice and the crucial role of the interfacial structure, suggesting a way to detect rare earth moment switching in iron garnets by electrical measurements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Co-Zr alloys with Si and B modifications show potential for rare earth-free permanent magnets. In this work, Cr was employed for improving the hard magnetic properties of melt-spun Co78-xZr16CrxSi3B3 (x = 0, 1, 2, 3, and 4) alloys. Their phase constitution, microstructure, and properties have been investigated. The results show that Cr addition can suppress the formation of the soft magnetic FCC-Co phase. The coercivity increased almost linearly with increasing Cr addition, accompanied by decreasing remanence. A high coercivity of 7.7 kOe was obtained in the alloy with 4 at.% Cr substitution for Co, manifesting a 67% coercivity enhancement from 4.6 kOe of the Cr-free alloy. Cr atoms were found to partially substitute Co atoms in the Co-Zr-Cr-Si-B alloys. The size of nanograin decreased with Cr addition alloys, partly due to the precipitation of the secondary Cr phase. After Cr addition, the enhanced positive peak in Henkel plots and the closed recoil loop indicate the improved exchange coupling and consistent magnetic reversal. The alloys with x = 0 and 4 exhibited much lower absolute values of coercivity temperature coefficient, 0.183%/℃ and 0.251%/℃, respectively, and one or two orders of magnitude smaller corrosion current density than that of melt-spun Nd-Fe-B alloys, demonstrating that Co-Zr based alloys have not only excellent thermal stability but also good corrosion resistance. In addition, Cr substitution can further reduce the corrosion rate of Co-Zr alloys in the 3.5 wt% NaCl solution.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.There are few experimental studies on the shear-shear (S-S) mode magnetoelectric (ME) composites, especially near the resonance frequency because of their complex sample preparation and high resonance frequency. What's more, theoretical studies on the S-S mode magnetoelectric composites is still blank. In this article, an equivalent circuit model was proposed to analyze the direct and converse magnetoelectric (DME and CME) effects in an S-S mode ME bilayered composite. Then, the composite was experimentally studied, showing a good agreement with the theoretical predication. The S-S mode has a remarkable field sensitivity and much high DME and CME coefficients, reaching 27.5 V/(cm·Oe) and 3 × 10-6 s/m, respectively, in this simple bilayered composite under the DC magnetic field of 1800 Oe near the resonance frequency. The composite shows a prospect of applications in high frequency ME transducers, energy capture devices and magnetic field sensitive sensors.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic domain structure and magnetostrictive properties of TbxHo1-xFe1.9Mn0.1compounds have been investigated by in-situ Lorentz transmission electron microscopy (LTEM). The magnetocrystalline anisotropy compensation has been realized to be around x = 0.12 based on the easy magnetization direction (EMD) and by evaluating magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant K1, magnetization and magnetostriction. The EMD at room temperature rotates from the 〈1 0 0〉 axis for x ≤ 0.10 to 〈1 1 1〉 axis for x ≥ 0.12, which is detected directly by electronic holography technique. The magnetic domain wall movements were observed by in-situ magnetic field LTEM, and the critical magnetic field Hcr decreases continuously from 100 Oe for the Tb-rich side of x = 0.16 to 60 Oe for the Tb-poor side of x = 0.12, owing to the decrease in magnetocrystalline anisotropy subjected by anisotropy compensation. A high low-field magnetostriction (λa ~ 200 ppm at 1 kOe) is achieved at the critical magnetocrystalline anisotropy compensation point of x = 0.12. This work helps to understand the correlation between magnetocrystalline anisotropy, magnetization process, magnetic domain wall motion and magnetostriction in the C15 Laves phase system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.FeSi/glass composites with different glass content by using low melting glass as adhesive and insulating agent are prepared, and their magnetic properties are investigated. SEM morphology shows that the glass particles between different FeSi spheres deform into flakes after heat treatment, which reveals that glass powder acts as adhesive and insulating agent in the composites. The FeSi/glass composites have high saturation magnetization (up to 210 Am2/kg), low magnetic losses (less than 2100 kW/m3 at 100mT and 100 kHz) and moderate permeability. The moderate eddy current loss obtained by losses separation further indicates that the eddy current between different FeSi spheres is effectively blocked by glass. The advantages of this new preparation process of SMCs are also discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic domain structure of Sr3Co2Z hexaferrite related to crystal orientation is investigated by Lorentz microscopy and electron holography. The sample of Sr3Co2Z, prepared by citrate method, was milled in two different crystallographic orientations by focused ion beam. One of them was prepared with its c crystallographic axis direction parallel to the electron beam at the TEM, and the other one, perpendicular to this direction. In both specimens, Lorentz micrographs revealed some structure domain walls e.g. stripes and magnetic flux-closure. Furthermore, phase micrographs acquired by electron holography revealed magnetic domain structures with 145.3° ± 5.2° domain walls.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fe powders based soft magnetic composites (SMCs) with organic- inorganic multiple-layer coating were fabricated by improved isolation coating followed by pressing and curing. Phosphate and organic resin were selected as the insulting layers. The influences of phosphating process and the composition of organic coating on the magnetic properties of the SMCs and soft magnetic cores have been systematically investigated. The phosphating process was modified for simple and easy operation, suitable for carbonyl iron powders with small particle size. The optimized phosphating method created a complete and continuous phosphate layer on the surface of micron sized particles. Without resin coating, the magnetic cores fabricated with the phosphated powders prepared with 0.5–0.7 wt% phosphoric acid exhibit relatively high permeability and quality factor at high frequency. In addition, a new type of mixed resin with good thermal stability was employed for insolating coating, which provides distinctly higher resistivity and better protective effect than silicone. The optimal content of the mixed resin content is about 3 wt% for fabricating the magnetic cores with low eddy current loss and hysteresis loss by producing a protective layer to isolate magnetic particles and reduce the internal stress. The SMC cores prepared with optimized phosphating process and organic coating exhibit high relative density (93.7%), high electric resistivity (2.23 × 107 Ω·cm), stable permeability (in the frequency range from 5 to 1000 kHz), high quality factor (44.8 at 700 kHz) and relatively low magnetic loss (159.0 kW/m3 at 100 kHz).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report on the broadband characterization of Co74.6Fe2.7Mn2.7Nb4Si2B14 (at%) melt-spun, soft magnetic alloy ribbons after various secondary processing treatments. Ribbons were investigated in the as-cast (melt-spun) condition, after annealing under stress at 50–200 MPa, and after transverse magnetic field (TMF) annealing. The magnetization dynamics of these materials have been studied from 10 to 60 GHz using ferromagnetic resonance (FMR). The in-plane uniaxial anisotropy was determined from the FMR data and permeability extracted for each condition. The permeability determined from broadband FMR was in good agreement with independently determined values using vibrating sample magnetometry and impedance spectrometry of toroidal cores. The effective damping parameter (αeff) of all the samples was close to 0.015 except for the TMF sample, which showed higher damping, possibly due to two magnon scattering.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.History of Fe-based amorphous and nanocrystalline soft magnetic alloys is reviewed and our recent progress in these materials in magnetic devices such as transformers is reported. For lower-rated transformers, a thinner Fe-based amorphous alloy ribbon is found to have an advantage for core loss due to the reduced residual bending stress at the corners of a wound core as well as smaller eddy current loss. For large transformer cores, a prototype Fe-based amorphous alloy ribbon-based stacked core is built using a 142 mm wide commercially available ribbon prepared by tension annealing. With the optimization of glue and joint technique for a stacked core, it is found that core loss of a stacked-core with a polyester glue and a step-lap joint is lower than that of a conventional wound core in the excitation range between 1 and 1.45 T at 50 Hz.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We use a Monte Carlo simulation to investigate the magnetic structures in a bilayer magnetic system containing a locally inverted interlayer coupling region. The stabilization of multiple magnetic structures, including the magnetic skyrmion, is possible in the locally inverted interlayer coupling region. Various factors such as the region area, anisotropy, interlayer coupling strength, and exchange coupling strength affect the properties of the structures, including their size and chirality. We obtain conditions for the stabilization and transitions of these magnetic structures. The Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) and dipolar interaction play prominent roles as they significantly enhance the formation and stability of the structures. An asymmetric feature can arise from the broken inversion symmetry in the structure formation, yielding an interfacial DMI, which stabilizes the skyrmion. It is demonstrated that the dipole interaction also acts as an effective interfacial DMI in the system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, a new general nonlinear magneto-elastic coupled constitutive model was proposed for soft ferromagnetic materials under magnetic field and pre-stress. The model is based on thermodynamic theory of magnetic materials and Jiles theory on magnetomechanical effect, considering demagnetization field. This model can accurately predict the changes of magnetostrictive strain and magnetization under pre-stress; in particular, it can obviously predict the nonlinear change of magnetostrictive strain according to compressive pre-stress. In addition, this model is concise by not including the inverse function of magnetization relationship and the piecewise function of stress in its mathematical form and can be degenerated to the previous general constitutive model for giant magnetostrictive materials. The prediction result by this model is well-consistent with experimental data. In comparison with the existing constitutive models for soft ferromagnetic materials, this model was demonstrated to have obviously-improved prediction accuracy, particularly in the compressive state. In conclusion, the proposed model can fully describe the effect of pre-stress on magnetostrictive strain and magnetization and the effects of magnetic field and pre-stress on Young's modulus and relative magnetic permeability, reflecting the effect of demagnetization field on magnetomechanical characteristics.© 2020A Bubble's behavior in a magnetic fluid is one of the most critical issues in understanding the characteristics of the gaseous-liquid two-phase flow in basic fluid science. In this study, to understand the dynamic behavior of a gas bubble in a magnetic fluid, a bubble detached from a single orifice in a magnetic fluid is investigated using a near-infrared light source with a long wavelength of 800–1000 nm. The surface tension of a magnetic fluid, which is a crucial factor in determining the bubble's characteristics, is also investigated by the maximum bubble pressure method. Based on the visualization measured, it is found that the bubble diameter decreases by applying magnetic field. This is caused by a magnetic body force, that enlarges the bubble in the same direction as the buoyancy force. The measurement of the surface tension of the magnetic fluid shows that the surface tension increases as the applied magnetic field increases. From the measurement of the bubble dynamics, the volume of the detached bubble under a magnetic flux density can be evaluated by a force balance equation with an average error of 16.8%.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.As-cast ingots of Mn100−xZx with Z = Al, Ge, Mn, Fe and Co all have the A13 βMn structure up to some maximum value of x. The magnetic susceptibility of pure βMn is ≈ 9 × 10−4 from 4 to 400 K, but the field-cooled and zero-field-cooled susceptibilities of all doped samples increase at low temperature and they bifurcate at a spin-freezing temperature Tf that increases with x, linearly at first. Point contact Andreev reflection shows evidence of a net spin polarization in a spin glass sample but not in the pure βMn spin liquid. Fixed-moment density functional calculations indicate a very shallow energy minimum (< 1 meV/atom) for the 12d-site Mn moment that extends from x = 0 to 0.4 µB. The minimum energy is interpreted as a lower limit on the zero-point energy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The present work demonstrates the high-frequency core loss performance of Fe-based amorphous and nanocrystalline powder cores, initially produced by gas atomised powder, consolidated using sieved particles ≤20 µm, and isolated by a precise insulating layer of polymer to limit the inter- and intra-particle eddy currents to attain enhanced performance. The large glass forming ability (GFA) of the gas atomised powder, reflected by different glass forming instruments, such as the supercooled region (ΔTX = 54 °C) and the reduced glass transition temperature (Trg = 0.56), is consistent with the substantial amorphisation capability of the alloy. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first-ever report to reveal a large ΔTX in the Finemet-type alloy powders, an essential parameter to gas-atomise the amorphous powders with significantly lower cooling rates compared to the melt-spun ribbons. Further, subsequent annealing of the amorphous powders, between the exothermic events guided by differential scanning calorimetry (DSC), lead to the growth of a fine nanocrystalline structure of grains ≤15 nm, thanks to the positive enthalpy of mixing of Cu with the constituents to act as a nucleation agent, to retain the excellent soft magnetic properties. The DC soft magnetic properties of the powders were significantly improved on thermal annealing, confirmed by hysteretic loops, quantified by reduced coercivity HC <1 Oe of annealed powders at <575 °C, and attributed to the reduced magnetoelastic contribution due to zero/near-zero magnetostriction anisotropy, attained due to the homogenous nanocrystalline structure. The amorphous and nanocrystalline powder cores, consolidated by compression moulding, show ultra-high loss performance, due to the ultra-low coercivity attained on nanocrystallisation, and negligible eddy currents loss, owning to efficient insulation of small particles, for high-frequency power conversion applications, such as voltage regulator (VR), and resonant converters, in automotive industry and data storage centres.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetism in the inherently nanolaminated ternary MAX-phase Cr2GeC is investigated by element-selective, polarization and temperature-dependent, soft X-ray absorption spectroscopy and X-ray magnetic circular dichroism. The measurements indicate an antiferro-magnetic Cr-Cr coupling along the c-axis of the hexagonal structure modulated by a ferromagnetic ordering in the nanolaminated ab-basal planes. The weak chromium magnetic moments are an order of magnitude stronger in the nanolaminated planes than along the vertical axis. Theoretically, a small but notable, non-spin-collinear component explains the existence of a non-perfect spin compensation along the c-axis. As shown in this work, this spin distortion generates an overall residual spin moment inside the unit cell resembling that of a ferri-magnet. Due to the different competing magnetic interactions, electron correlations and temperature effects both need to be considered to achieve a correct theoretical description of the Cr2GeC magnetic properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We examine a magnetic moment subject to a static external magnetic field and a time dependent driving magnetic field. Taking the system in the highly anisotropic limit, like that of a thin film, we lower the complexity of the system so that it may be analyzed for transitions to chaos analytically using the Melnikov method. Guided by the calculation of the Melnikov bifurcation functions we computationally calculated the Lyapunov characteristic exponents for several lines in parameter space and find that the Melnikov method is a good predictor of chaotic motion for sufficiently small external fields. Motion plots and Poincaré sections are also plotted for several parameter space points to observe the transitions to and from chaos around the calculated Melnikov bifurcations functions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Using parametric excitation, we have studied the minimum frequency associated with the backward volume (BV) spin wave branch in a thin film of the ferrimagnetic material yttrium iron garnet (YIG) for the magnetic field lying in plane and parallel to the wave vector as well as for out-of-plane field angles. We find that there is a drastic change in the efficiency of parametric excitation between two different pumping frequency regimes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The saturation magnetization of composites of carbon nanotubes and CoFe2O4 (CFO) magnetic nanoparticles synthesized through a novel one-step process in the presence of a surfactant (sodium dodecyl-benzene-sulfonate) show significant increase, to 208 emu/g. This value of saturation magnetization of the composite is a factor of 3.3 higher than pristine CFO nanoparticles. This is the first time such a remarkable magnetic behavior of CFO/ carbon nanotubes composite is presented. The increased magnetism is attributed to the proximity effect between uniformly distributed ferromagnetic CFO nanoparticles on the surface of carbon nanotubes and hybridization of the π-electronic states of carbon and the 3d-bands of CFO. Scanning electron microscopy images confirm uniform and dense distribution of CFO nanoparticles on carbon nanotubes. Magnetic force microscopy images confirm the formation of uniformly distributed magnetic stripe domains. The sample was characterized at ambient using X-ray diffraction, Raman Spectroscopy, atomic force microscopy, scanning electron microscopy, scanning transmission electron microscopy, and high-resolution transmission electron microscopy. Magnetic properties were characterized by magnetic force microscopy and magnetometry using vibrating sample magnetometer.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report the results of micro-Brillouin-Mandelstam light scattering spectroscopy of thermal magnons in the two-phase synthetic multiferroic structure consisting of a piezoelectric [Pb(Mg1/3Nb2/3)O3](1−x)–[PbTiO3]x (PMN-PT) substrate and a Ni thin film. The experimental data reveal the first two modes of the perpendicular standing spin waves (PSSW) spatially confined across the Ni thin film. A theoretical analysis of the frequency dependence of the PSSW peaks on the external magnetic field reveals the asymmetric boundary condition, i.e. pinning, for variable magnetization at different surfaces of the Ni thin film. The strain field induced by applying DC voltage to PMN-PT substrate leads to a downshift of PSSW mode frequency owing to the magneto-elastic effect in Ni, and corresponding changes in the spin-wave resonance conditions. The observed non-monotonic dependence of the PSSW frequency on DC voltage is related to an abrupt change of the pinning parameter at certain values of the voltage. The obtained results are important for understanding the thermal magnon spectrum in ferromagnetic films and the development of the low-power spin-wave devices and quantum sensors.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have developed a system to measure permeability over a wide frequency range with high sensitivity, which we call the transformer coupled permeameter. In this system, the magnetic sample is sandwiched by two short-terminated coplanar waveguides that form a loosely coupled transformer. In this way, the stimulus signal acting as a background becomes smaller as the frequency decreases, thus significantly suppressing the deterioration of the signal-to-noise ratio (SNR) at low frequencies that most conventional permeameters suffer from. It has been demonstrated that this system can provide a sensitivity high enough to measure the permeability of a single ferromagnetic flake particle comprising a noise suppression sheet over 10 MHz–20 GHz with a high SNR.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Electrical-transport and magneto-transport in bulk nanocrystalline (BNC) La1-xCaxMnO3+δ (x = 1/8 with either δ = 0.00 or δ = 0.06, x = 3/8 with δ = 0.00) (LCMO) manganite system have been studied treating the bulk crystalline (BC) counterparts as the reference systems. Irrespective of the value of δ in under hole-doped (x = 1/8) LCMO, the metal-insulator (M-I) transition (not observed in the BC counterpart) appears at a temperature TMI ≪ TC, where TC is the temperature at which the ferromagnetic (FM)–paramagnetic (PM) second-order phase transition occurs. Oxygen off-stoichiometry makes the M-I transition more pronounced and reduces the overall magnitude of resistivity. Reducing the average crystallite size d below 150 nm, lowers both TMI and TC in the BNC samples with x = 1/8 and δ = 0.00 or 0.06 but decreases TMI while increasing TC in the optimally hole-doped x = 3/8 LCMO. The single-orbital double-exchange model, which predicts the coincidence, or otherwise, of the M-I and FM-PM transitions with some success in the BC LCMO, fails to correctly describe the above-mentioned results in BNC LCMO. The resistivity minima at low temperatures (Tmin), completely absent in BC, occur in BNC LCMO, regardless of the value of x,δ,d and the strength of the magnetic field (H). The mechanism for resistivity, ρ(T), changes from the adiabatic small polaron nearest-neighbor hopping (for x = 3/8) or from the Shklovskii-Efros variable range hopping, SE-VRH, (for x = 1/8), prevalent in BC, to the Mott-VRH in the PM insulating state in the BNC counterparts when d falls below 150 nm. At T < Tmin, the contributions due to the Mott-VRH (present only in the samples with x = 1/8 and δ = 0.00 or δ = 0.06) and the enhanced electron-electron Coulomb interaction (in all the BNC LCMO samples) are responsible for the negative temperature coefficient of resistivity (TCR). By contrast, the coherent electron-magnon scattering accounts for the positive TCR observed at T > Tmin. H suppresses the mean hopping energy difference between the hopping sites but increases the electron localization length. The field-induced enhancement in the localization length far outweighs the field-induced drop in the mean hopping energy difference to produce an increase in the mean hopping distance with H.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Three logic gates based on the one-way edge states in gyromagnetic photonic crystal (GPC) are proposed and analyzed theoretically. The frequency range of the one-way transmission of waveguide is obtained with Finite Element Method (FEM). The relationships between the performance parameters and the structure parameters are investigated. To estimate whether the logic gates are robust, the transmission efficiencies of logic gates with an obstacle in different positions are calculated. Simulation results show that a high contrast ratio (CR) and strong robustness can be obtained. This work is expected to provide guidance to the design of logic gate with high performance.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This work investigates the MCE of alloying Pd or (Mn,Pd) to Gd, which yields the formation of an extra Gd7Pd3 or Gd7(Mn,Pd)3 phase in addition to the Gd phase, forming a composite. The phase coexistence is observed from XRD and SEM/EDX results, whereby the phase fraction of secondary phase increases with the dopant content. The magnetocaloric behavior of the binary samples present two characteristic ΔSM peaks, attributed to the Curie transitions of the coexisting biphases (separated by ΔTC = 45 K). Two minima are observed from the exponent n of field dependence of ΔSM, reinforcing the presence of the Curie transitions of the two phases. The largest phase proportion of Gd7Pd3 observed in Gd80Pd20 sample gives rise to the largest RC value, which is also 10% increase compared to single phase Gd.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The spin-orbit torque (SOT) damping-like (field-like) effective fields and efficiencies, HDL(FL) and ξDL(FL), for the MgO substrate/Fe4N (3 nm)/W (5 nm)/cap metallic heterostructure were determined using harmonic Hall and spin-Hall magnetoresistance (SMR) measurements at various temperatures (T). The resistivity of the W layer was measured to be 40 μΩ cm, suggesting a mixed phase of α and β. The sizable anomalous Nernst component was extracted, and a strong T dependence was found. The resultant ξDL(FL) was estimated to be 0.035 (0.015) at T = 300 K, and 0.045 (0.005) at T = 4 K. The longitudinal MR measurements revealed the negative spin polarization of the conduction electrons in the Fe4N layer. However, no sign reversal of the SOT was observed, as in the case where a CoFeB layer with positive spin polarization was employed. The T dependence of ξDL estimated from SMR measurements was in good agreement with that obtained through harmonic Hall measurements, which was indicative of the sizable spin current injection at the Fe4N/W interfaces due to the spin-Hall effect.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic moments of pristine Group VI Dichalcogenides are analyzed here in the relatively high temperature, low density nondegenerate statistical regime. We find that there is a new oscillation as a function of the magnetic field in this high temperature regime, and that it differs physically from the low-temperature de Haas-van Alphen effect of the degenerate regime.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic steels are widely used in engineering structures such as rail track, oil/gas pipeline and steel hanging bridge. Cracks resulted from manufacturing processes or previous loading will seriously undermine the safety of the engineering structures and even lead to catastrophic industrial accidents. Accurate and quantitative characterization the cracks in ferromagnetic steels are therefore of vital importance. In this paper, the cracks in ferromagnetic steels are detected by the pulsed eddy current (PEC) technique. Firstly, the physical mechanism of the relative magnetic permeability of the ferromagnetic steel on the detection signal of PEC is interpreted from a microscopic level of magnetic domain wall movement. The relationship of the crack width/depth and the detection signal of PEC is then investigated and verified by numerical simulations and experimental study. Finally, the cracks are inversely characterized by using Genetic Algorithm (GA) based Back-Propagation (BP) neural network (NN) considering the nonlinearity of the crack geometric parameters with the detection signal of PEC. The prediction results indicated that the proposed algorithm can characterize the crack depth and width within the relative error of 10%. The proposed approach combining PEC and GA based BPNN has been verified to quantitatively detect cracks in ferromagnetic steel.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.High-efficiency microwave absorption materials are widely used in electronic equipment and communication facilities. This study aims to develop a broad-bandwidth metamaterial absorber based on the magnetic substrate with a central frequency selective surface (FSS). It is however, different from the strategy of expanding the bandwidth for metamaterial absorbers reported in other literatures, in this study, a unique development strategy that involves selecting the most suitable magnetic substrate from a database using genetic algorithm is adopted. By adding an optimized FSS layer to the magnetic substrate, its loss performance and impedance matching performance are considerably improved, and the resulting metamaterial absorber exhibits excellent absorption properties. At a thickness of 3.1 mm, the reflection loss in the range from 2.5 to 17.2 GHz is below –10 dB, which is significantly better than the values reported in previous studies. In addition, the prepared metamaterial absorber possesses excellent absorption characteristics under oblique incidence conditions. The strategy proposed in this study leads to the successful development of a high-efficiency metamaterial absorber and represents a more effective approach than those previously used in the field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The dynamics of domain walls in magnetic cobalt microwires synthesized using electroless technology was studied by the nuclear spin echo method of 59Co nuclei located at the centers of the domain walls of the FCC cobalt phase under the influence of an additional magnetic video pulse. The measured dependences of the intensity of the echo signals on the amplitude of the magnetic video pulse allow one to estimate the pinning and mobility of the domain walls in micro- and nanowires, the anisotropy of its effect during rotation of the sample containing transversely polarized magnetic wires, and also to establish the possible type of domain walls moving in them.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The dispersion relations of surface acoustic waves and spin waves propagating in magnetic [Ni80Fe20/Au/Co/Au]10 multilayers deposited on a silicon substrate have been investigated by high-resolution Brillouin spectroscopy. We measured the spectra of spin waves for two canonical geometries where the spin waves propagate with the wave vector oriented parallel and perpendicular to the direction of static magnetization in-plane magnetized Py layer. We investigated experimentally the crossing of phononic and magnonic dispersion relations and discussed the mechanism of magnetoelastic interaction in this system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we discuss the synthesis of a magnetic PNIPAAm based nanocomposite-hydrogel containing micro-sized carbonyl-iron-particles and the magnetorheological characterization thereof at room temperature. Because of the aqueous environment of the hydrogel, particles have to be protected from corrosion. Additionally, because of the relatively large size of the particles, sedimentation has to be circumvented for a homogeneous distribution. By the use of Laponite as a crosslinker, a physical hydrogel is produced before chemical polymerization takes place, which holds the particles in place during the synthesis.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Recently, the in-field δMR interaction-plot technique has been extended for systems with shifted and asymmetric major magnetization hysteresis loops. In the present work an alternative definition of δMR, allowing a better graphic visualization of this plot, is given. The method is applied to a series of Co/Cu/IrMn films in order to examine the variations, with the thickness of the nonmagnetic Cu layer, of the interactions emerging from the Co/IrMn interface and those coming from magnetic coupling within the Co film. Model simulations indicate that, for the case of symmetric major loops, the effects of the ferromagnet/antiferromagnet exchange coupling might not be identified by interaction plots, being only evidenced by the shift along the magnetic-field axis and the coercivity enhancement.© 2020This study investigates the effect of tensile stress on the impedance of an amorphous Co66Fe4Ta2.5Si12.5B15 wire near the magnetostriction compensation temperature at approximately 170 K. When the wire is exposed to the tensile stress, the wire impedance modulus is found to demonstrate high temperature sensitivity of over 2%/K. This finding can help in designing of temperature sensors.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The present work reports on the structural and magnetic properties of TiO2 P25 Degussa powder doped with cobalt. Dissolution of cobalt in TiO2 matrix was achieved by precipitation of tris(diethyldithiocarbamato) cobalt(III) (CoDtc - Co[S2CN(C2H5)2]3 in chloroform (CHCl3) and consequent thermal treatment. Five different Co atomic percentage contents were chosen, e.g., 0.5%, 1%, 2%, 5% and 10%. It was shown that cobalt atoms are uniformly distributed across TiO2 matrix and exhibit antiferromagnetic interactions at low temperatures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ensembles of elongated magnetic droplets in a rotating field are studied experimentally. In a given range of field strength and frequency the droplets form rotating structures with a triangular order – rotating crystals. A model is developed to describe ensembles of several droplets, taking into account the hydrodynamic interactions between the rotating droplets in the presence of a solid wall below the rotating ensemble. A good agreement with the experimentally observed periodic dynamics for an ensemble of four droplets is obtained. During the rotation, the tips of the elongated magnetic droplets approach close to one another. An expression is derived that gives the magnetic interaction between such droplets by taking into account the coulombian forces between magnetic charges on the droplet tips.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Structure characterizations of concentrated water-based magnetic fluids stabilized by oleic and lauric acids were done by means of small-angle neutron scattering (SANS) and complemented by dynamic light scattering and magnetization analysis. Stability of ferrofluids with time against sedimentation was concluded despite the presence of aggregates in solutions. Differences in the average sizes of individual polydisperse magnetite nanoparticles coated with surfactants and their aggregates were revealed. Structural parameters obtained from SANS have been confirmed by magnetogranulometry data. The comparative analysis of the aggregation and its change upon dilution is made basing on the data of SANS and dynamic light scattering techniques.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In recent years, several industries release varying concentrations of dye-containing wastewater directly into the ecosystem and become the foremost environmental concern. The adsorption method has been recognized to be one of the most effective techniques for the remediation of wastewater. The great efforts have been made by scientists to produce highly selective, discerning, and effective adsorbents. The introduction of magnetic iron oxide nanoparticles to adsorbents has led to a new avenue in resolving water pollution problems and found to have predominant significance in the elimination of dyes more efficiently compared to traditional adsorbents. Due to their unique physicochemical properties, magnetized adsorbents (magsorbents) display high removal efficiency along with easy and fast separation of adsorbent from aqueous media simply by applying an external magnetic field. Such a facile route of separation is crucial to increase the overall efficiency of operation and has great importance for practical application. This review summarizes the notable works carried out on the application of magsorbents for the adsorptive removal of cationic methylene blue (MB) dye from wastewater. The detailed information on the BET surface area, point of zero charge, operational conditions, and results on isotherm, kinetic and thermodynamics as reported on different magsorbents have been compiled. The present paper was planned with the prime objective to make the scientists up-to-date and to provide the valuable information of the developments that have been made as yet for the elimination of MB dye from aqueous solution by employing a variety of magsorbents.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The pyrochlore, Gd2FeSbO7, having general formula unit A2B2O7, was chosen for magnetic and heat capacity study in this work due to presence of Fe3+ moments, whose 3d orbitals (3d5:3t2g 3eg 2) are half-filled and carry a large magnetic moment, at B site of the structure, and hence create additional Gd−O−Fe−O−Gd pathways, which result in strongly antiferromagnetic superexchange interactions among the Gd−Gd spins as well as for the Gd−Fe bonds. Gd2FeSbO7 behaves paramagnetic down to ~10 K with effective antiferromagnetic nearest-neighbour interactions resulting negative Curie-Weiss temperature, θCW = −12.62 K. Fe sublattice exhibits a weak ferromagnetic transition at TC ≈ 5 K. The frustration index f = |θCW|/TC becomes 2.5 indicative of moderate frustration, which may prevent Palmer-Chalker ground state configuration of Gd sublattice at lower temperature in the system. Heat capacity Cp exhibits a broad anomaly at ~3.1 K and calculated magnetic heat capacity Cm/T attains a peak at ~1 K, but is much weaker than for other pyrochlores Gd2B2O7 (B = Sn, Ti, Ge, Pt) which are all found to order at 1 K or lower, thereby reflecting a short-range second-order transition in Gd2FeSbO7. The nature of transition was also verified by Arrott plot of magnetization. Finally the magneto-thermodynamic data were analyzed on the basis of a cooperative two-sublattice model taking account of intra-sublattice (Gd−Gd and Fe−Fe) and inter-sublattice (Gd−Fe) magnetic interactions, defined by three molecular-field parameters, λGd−Gd = −0.71 T/μB, λFe−Fe = 0.87 T/μB, and λGd−Fe = −0.61 T/μB in presence of the easy-planer crystal-field anisotropy at Gd-site. Without Gd−Fe interaction, two independent interpenetrating Gd3+ and Fe3+Sb5+ sublattices can not precisely demonstrate the measured thermomagnetic properties of Gd2FeSbO7. This study thus revealed that 3d−4f magnetic interactions offer Gd2FeSbO7 a unique place in the series of gadolinium-based pyrochlores.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Understanding the interdependencies of the processing steps of high silicon containing non-oriented (NO) electrical steel is a key factor for improving its final magnetic properties. Moreover, every process step in the production has a significant impact on the properties. Steels with a high silicon content are ferritic (α-Fe). Accordingly, the microstructure and texture are inherited from one processing step to the next. The presented research relates the hot strip microstructure and texture to the magnetic properties of the final annealed material. To investigate the impact of hot strip microstructure and texture for a ferritic 2.4 m.%Si silicon containing steel, the material was hot rolled from an initial thickness of 64 mm down to a thickness of 1 mm whereby different microstructures and textures were achieved by varied hot rolling conditions. Subsequently, the material was cold rolled to 0.25 mm and annealed at 800 °C or 1000 °C for 3 min. Finally, samples of each processing step were analyzed by means of light microscopy and XRD texture measurements. Samples after hot rolling and final annealing were tested in a single sheet tester for specific losses and magnetic polarization. Findings show an influence of the initial hot strip microstructure on the microstructure and magnetic properties of the final annealed samples.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report on the local electrical properties, measured by conductive atomic force microscopy, of the Iridate-based Srn+1IrnO3n+1 family of thin films, in particular by comparing the n = 1, Sr2IrO4, and the n = ∞, SrIrO3, phases. We analyze the different resistive switching behavior as a function of the pristine electronic properties of the films. We will show that, for films exhibiting insulating behavior, i.e., films of the n = 1 phase or films below 3 nm of thickness for the n = ∞ phase, hysteretic I–V curves with a sharp transition into a low resistance state (LRS), i.e. an abrupt increase of the current intensity, is detected above a well-defined threshold voltage. This suggests a resistive switching behavior associated to the jump between two resistance states that may be correlated to the activation energy, Δ, obtained by fitting the temperature dependence of the resistivity to a thermal activated Arrhenius law, ρ (T) ~ ρ0exp(−Δ/kBT). On the other hand, thicker samples of the n = ∞ phase exhibit a semimetallic character and I–V curves show progressive changes of the local resistance without a clearly defined threshold voltage. Kelvin Probe Force Microscopy based measurements confirmed that, concomitantly to the resistive switching, an evolution of the electronic states at the surface takes place that may be associated to the migration of oxygen vacancies promoted by the electrical fields under the AFM tip.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Strontium substituted barium hexaferrites i.e., Ba1-xSrxFe11Cr1O19 with x = 0.0–0.8 were prepared via co-precipitation technique. Single-phase magnetoplumbite structure was confirmed for all samples by X-ray diffraction, whereas scanning electron microscopy showed the variation in microstructure on Sr2+ substitution. Magnetic measurements revealed that the substitution causes prominent enhancement in saturation magnetization and coercive field for x = 0.4 sample. However, under same condition, decrease in real part of dielectric permittivity, dielectric loss tangent and ac conductivity were observed by impedance spectroscopy, while these parameters started to increase for x > 0.4. The dielectric permittivity exhibited frequency-dependent dispersive behavior due to Maxwell-Wagner interfacial polarization whereas weak ferroelectric hysteresis loops were obtained for the prepared samples. Moreover, it was found that the Sr2+ substitution substantially enhanced the resistive properties which is elucidated in term of localization of charge carrier's mobility due to reduction in Fe3+-O-Fe2+ network and microstructural variations. Here, it is proposed that x = 0.4 sample exhibits maximum magnetization (64 emu/g), moderate real part of dielectric permittivity at low frequency (>103), diminished dielectric loss tangent (~0.05) and colossal value of resistance (~1010 Ω) which makes this material interesting for high frequency applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Frustrated magnetic molecules are promising alternatives to refrigerant materials for low temperature magnetic refrigeration. We investigate the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in un-frustrated and frustrated spin clusters formed from spin chains of six sites, with site spins s=1,3/2 and 2 possessing site diagonal anisotropies and anisotropic exchange interactions, using exact diagonalization method. We also study MCE in spin clusters, on a chain, a 2-D square lattice and a 3-D cubic lattice with spin-dipolar interactions by a Monte Carlo method in spin-1 systems which uses exact eigenstates of a cluster. The magnetocaloric effect is closely related to the magnetic Grüneisen parameter ΓH. In this paper, we compute the magnetic Grüneisen parameter ΓH, and study its dependence on exchange anisotropy and spin-dipolar interaction. With increase of exchange anisotropy, the maxima in ΓH shifts to higher magnetic fields and becomes a sharp singularity. The singularities in ΓH correlate with cusps in the entropy as a function of magnetic field strength, and with crossover in the magnetization in the ground state in isolated clusters. The first maximum in ΓH shifts to lower fields as we increase spin-dipolar interaction. The first maximum in ΓH also shifts to lower magnetic field strength as the magnitude of the site spin increases. We show the dependence of ΓH on the dimensionality of the lattice for a fixed lattice constant.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.High-frequency studies, of exchange-coupled multilayer films, are the key to advance the development of fast switching spintronic devices. In this paper, we utilize the first-order reversal curve (FORC) to improve the understanding of the spin-reorientation transition process when the permalloy (Py) thickness increases. We also investigate the temperature dependence of the high-frequency properties of exchange-coupled [Co/Pd]6/Py (t nm) multilayer films during the spin-reorientation transition (SRT). The results show that the phase state of the magnetic domain changes, from the perpendicular phase to the multi-domain phase as the Py layer increases during the SRT. The temperature-dependent high frequency results indicate that the resonance linewidth ΔHres increases gradually when the temperature decreases from 300 K to 50 K. Our experimental study offers new insight into the SRT process in exchange-coupled multilayer films and can help to promote the development of fast switching spintronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Surface acoustic waves (SAWs) are used for the first time to investigate structural changes in transformer oil-based magnetic fluids under magnetic field. The measurement of the attenuation of SAW propagating along the interface between magnetic fluid and the piezoelectric substrate is showed as an effective tool to study such processes in the case of magnetic fluids when the obviously utilized longitudinal acoustic waves due to the higher viscosity are not available. The magnetic particles FeO.Fe2O3 in several different volume concentrations, from 0.05% to 3.5%, were added to the transformer oil MOL. Both linear increasing and jumped changed magnetic field were applied to study structural changes. The interaction between the magnetic field and magnetic moments of nanoparticles can lead to the aggregation of magnetic nanoparticles and following chain or cluster formations that have an influence on the SAW attenuation. The concentration of magnetic nanoparticles and temperature of magnetic fluid have a decisive influence on structural changes due to the changes of viscosity and thermal motion with the increasing temperature that both affect the process of cluster formation. The measurement of the acoustic anisotropy and applying the theoretical predictions gives additional useful information about the structure of nanoparticles formations in investigated magnetic fluids. Obtained results are compared and discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Hyperfine interactions in Fe78B15Sn7 metallic glass with Co/Fe substitution were investigated by Mössbauer spectrometry. As-quenched samples were prepared by planar flow casting and subsequently annealed at 673 K for 30 min which is in the region of phase transformations determined by differential scanning calorimetry. Magnetic thermogravimetry unveiled increase in Curie temperature after Co substitution. Structural analysis was performed by X-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscopy. The results show formation of primary bcc-Fe(Co) phase with proceeding nanocrystallization and indicate supersaturation of this phase with Sn. Hyperfine interactions between nuclei and electron shells were investigated by Mössbauer spectrometry at different temperatures and in external magnetic field. Modifications of the short-range order are demonstrated mainly by deviations in the positions of the net magnetic moment. They are driven by nanocrystallization as well as temperature of measurement and/or presence of external magnetic field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.With the aim of studying the microscopic characteristics of a magnetorheological fluid (MRF) in a magnetic field, the theoretical analyses of the particles dynamics in a magnetic field are presented, and a model for the particle motion is proposed. Based on these analyses, a three-dimensional numerical simulation of the microstructure of MRFs in different magnetic fields is performed. Furthermore, the microstructures of the MRFs are investigated using industrial computed tomography (CT) imaging. The numerical simulation and industrial CT results indicate that the chain structure of the same MRF becomes more apparent as the magnetic field strength increases, and in the same external magnetic field, this chain structure also becomes more apparent with an increase in the particle volume fraction. The lengths of particle chains in different magnetic fields are also captured in the industrial CT experiments. When the magnetic field strength is 12 mT, the particle chains of the MRF with a particle volume fraction of 30% reach more than 10 mm in length, which bridge the inner diameter of the container, and the dense clusters-like structure is formed, the clusters-like structure becomes denser with an increase in magnetic field. Moreover, the particle chain lengths of MRF with high particle volume fractions increase sharply with the magnetic field. The experiments demonstrated that the industrial CT is an efficient method to study the microstructures of MRFs by providing particle distributions of MRFs more clearly and intuitively.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We designed an experimental set-up and optimized the process parameters for large scale synthesis (250 g) of low density nickel core metal with graphitic carbon shell as functional nanomaterial with highly reproducible physical properties. Structural characterization reveals formation of nano-core FCC Ni metal ~40 nm with ~7 nm thick graphitic shell after annealing at 850 °C. Room temperature field dependent magnetic (M−H) measurement reveals significant saturation magnetization in the sample even with non-magnetic graphite shell. The structural and magnetic properties are compared with small-scale batch synthesis (10 g), reported earlier. The temperature-dependent magnetic measurements suggest that Ni/graphite core-shell samples, annealed at 550 °C, and 700 °C are superparamagnetic, whereas sample annealed at 850 °C is ferromagnetic. The developed synthesis set-up is simple, environment friendly, and cost-effective. Further, to cater the end use applications of such materials for industrial, bio-medical and microwave absorption, the reported method may be further scaled up for large production.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A flux source with four rotatable permanent magnet rods having access from two perpendicular directions through gaps exceeding the rod diameter can produce a continuously-variable flux density of up to ±300 mT at the centre when high-grade Nd-Fe-B magnets are used. The trade-off between field, access and torque in this mangle design is discussed. The maximum field, achievable when the magnets touch, is equal to the remanence of the Nd-Fe-B. The torque needed to rotate the rods scales as the square of the remanence, and it increases faster than the inverse square of the separation when the separation is comparable to the rod diameter. End effects reduce the torque significantly, but appropriate gearing is needed to ensure smooth operation. Modifications of the basic design can reduce or compensate the torque by using special end pieces, and improve access to fields > 1000 mT at small rod separation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic fluid (MF) seal enables mechanical contact-free rotation of a shaft and hence has excellent durability. The performance of an MF seal, however, decreases in liquids. Factors limiting seal life are MF flowing away and mixing of MF with liquids. We developed an MF seal that had a ‘‘shield’’ mechanism. Two types of shield were placed in MF seals installed in rotary pumps. Long-term durability tests were conducted. The MF seal with a shield having a small cavity space showed a longer life (207+ days), while the MF seal with a shield having a large cavity space failed after 28, 32 and 31 days. When a rotary pump is connected to an afterload, water flows into the cavity space of the shield through a concentric annulus and compresses air in the cavity. The water flow stops once the air pressure equilibrates the afterload pressure. Water remained in the entrance annulus and did not make contact with the MF in the case of the shield having a small cavity space, while water entered the cavity space and made contact with the MF in the case of the shield having a large cavity space. Less water in contact with the MF prolonged the seal life. In conclusion, the use of an optimally designed shield prolongs an MF seal life by preventing the MF from flowing away and mixing with liquids.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Iron-doped indium oxide is a promising material for spin electronics (spintronics) applications. Herein, an experimental investigation of the effect of adding a nonmagnetic element (magnesium) on the enhancement of the room-temperature ferromagnetism in substitutional iron-doped In2O3 powder was conducted. A new doping process, which avoids the formation of Fe nanoclusters in (In0.85Fe0.15− xMgx)2O3 (x = 0.00, 0.01, 0.03, 0.05) powders, was developed. The resulting powders were characterised by X-ray diffraction (XRD), superconducting quantum interference device, Mössbauer spectroscopy, energy-dispersive spectroscopy, and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy. The XRD analysis revealed that Fe and Mg ions were incorporated into the In3+ sites in the In2O3 lattice without altering the cubic bixbyite structure. Magnetic measurements indicated the coexistence of ferromagnetic and paramagnetic phases. Room-temperature ferromagnetic behaviour with remarkable enhancement of the saturation magnetisation was observed for decreasing Fe ions and increasing nonmagnetic Mg concentrations. Mössbauer spectra confirmed the coexistence of ferromagnetic (sextet) and paramagnetic (doublet) phases, with a clear effect of Mg concentration. The enhancement in the magnetic moment with increasing Mg doping is attributed to the large defects and oxygen vacancies induced in In2O3 by Fe and Mg co-doping. These results will be useful for the development of Fe-doped In2O3 semiconductor materials for advanced applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The influence of the spin Nernst effect on longitudinal spin conductivity, σxx is investigated in the two-dimensional antiferromagnetic model in the checkerboard lattice and in the presence of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction employing spin waves. We present results of the influence of the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction as well as variation of the Nernst coefficient at finite temperature on continuum spin conductivity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Interfacial coupling in heterostructures of spinel-perovskite nanocomposites, primarily controls the performance of the multiferroic samples, especially in such type of binary structure systems. The interfacial response in this class of composites is a key feature to enhance the magnetoelectric response of the materials. For this purpose, here we synthesized a series of 0.5BiFeO3−0.5Ni0.5Co0.5Fe2O4 by substituting Zn at Co-site in spinel phase, using a facile wet chemical technique. The structural analysis carried out using X-ray diffraction revealed the presence of both the phases. Spherical type agglomerated grains with sharp and distinct grain boundaries were exposed by field emission scanning electron microscopy. Elemental profile was mapped by energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy to confirm the stoichiometric composition of these composites. Improvement in saturation magnetization and remanence with increasing substitution contents was analyzed via vibrating sample magnetometer. In addition, the ferroelectric investigations were carried out to calculate the recoverable energy and energy loss density. Magneto-polarizability investigations uncovered the potential of these composites for multi-state device applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Energy input by under-field rotation of particles drives the systems to emergent non-equilibrium states. Here we investigate the suspension of rotating magnetic cubes. Micron-sized hematite cubes are synthesized and observed microscopically. When exposed to a rotating magnetic field, they form rotating swarms that interact with each other like liquid droplets. We describe the swarming behaviour and its limits and characterize the swarm size and angular velocity dependence on the magnetic field strength and frequency. A quantitative agreement with a theoretical model is found for the angular velocity of swarms as a function of the field frequency.© 2020The thermoelectric and transport properties of MgO/Co2MnGa/Pd stacks with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy were measured. For a nominal 3.3 nm Co2MnGa thickness, the anomalous Nernst coefficient and the Nernst angle at room temperature were found to be 0.3±0.05 μV/K and 5±1%, respectively. The Nernst and Hall angle temperature dependences show similar trends. Increasing the Co2MnGa thickness to 3.6 nm enhances the anomalous Nernst angle to 6.5% at room temperature. At remanence, the anomalous Nernst coefficient at room temperature is half the saturation value.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe hardware implementation of biological synapses is very necessary for a new brain-like neuromorphic computation system. In recent years, optoelectronic synaptic devices have become the application platform for next generation neuromorphic system and artificial neural network. Here, a new kind of photoelectronic synaptic transistors are proposed using the Al-Zn-O (AZO) as coplanar gate and the laterally-coupled poly (vinyl alcohol) (PVA) electrolyte membrane as neurotransmitter. The key synaptic functions such as excitatory postsynaptic current (EPSC) and paired-pulse-facilitation (PPF) were successfully emulated. More importantly, by exposing an ultraviolet (UV) laser, the transformation of short-term memory (STM) to long-term memory (LTM) can be mimicked in our neuromorphic devices. Furthermore, an energy-band diagram is finally proposed for a better understanding of the underlying mechanism of LTM behavior. These results represent an important step toward the next-generation neural networks enabled by photo-electric hybrid nano-electronics, and point to the potential of more sophisticated neuromorphic computations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effect of temperature and size on the exchange bias field of a hysteresis loop was studied based on the model of two-phase core/shell nanoparticles. Using the random interaction field method, the temperature dependence of the interfacial exchange interaction constant was estimated. It is shown that with increasing temperature, the field of exchange bias as well as the constant of interphase exchange interaction fall exponentially. An increase in the inverse size of nanoparticles leads to a linear growth of the exchange bias field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt ferrite nanopowders were prepared with low annealing temperatures (400 °C and 600 °C) using four different synthesis methods: co-precipitation, sol-gel, sol-gel autocombustion and microemulsion. The pure phase is obtained in all the samples and confirmed using the XRD diffraction. The crystallite size is calculated based on the XRD patterns and ranged between ~9 nm and ~26 nm. The SEM micrographs show an agglomeration with an increase of grain size between 400 °C and 600 °C samples for all the used methods. The magnetic properties are given. The best obtained values are MS = 80,319 emu/g, HC = 2057,97 Oe and (BH)max = 0.3313 MGOe for co-precipitation, sol-gel and sol-gel autocombustion, respectively. An improvement of 89% in (BH)max value is observed in the case of sol-gel auto-combustion when we go from 400 °C to 600 °C.© 2020Herein, we report a systematic study on the microstructure evolution of FePt-C granular films grown on MgO(0 0 1) single-crystalline substrates, especially during the initial growth stage. The number density of the grains during the nucleation stage is strongly affected by the growth temperature, reaching 40 Tgrain/in2 at <200 °C and decreasing with further increasing temperature. The addition of carbon (C) as a segregant substantially reduced the density. Despite the high number density during the nucleation stage, the density was dramatically reduced with subsequent growth of the FePt-C film. The possible reason for the reduction in the grain density is the surface diffusion of the C added to enhance grain separation. Controlling the growth conditions rather than the nucleation stage is key to increasing the areal density of FePt-C granular films to develop heat-assisted magnetic recording media.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.There exist various types of hyperthermia therapy such as radiofrequency, infrared, microwave, focused ultrasound or magnetic. Recently, a lot of effort has been put into combining more than one mode of heating into one treatment. The multimodal hyperthermia proves a better alternative in comparison with a single one. In this paper, we show that the application of dual sono-magnetic heating (ultrasound and magnetic together) gives better results than using either of them alone. The advantage of this bimodal treatment lies not only in cumulative heating of target volume (tumor) but also in synergistic interaction between the two mechanisms—the ultrasound sonication can improve the thermal effect of magnetic hyperthermia through the unblocking Brown's relaxation. Furthermore, the ultrasound and magnetic heating are complementary to each other. The temperature rise caused by ultrasound is fast changing and by magnetic field slow changing. So the parameters of ultrasound can serve as coarse-tuning settings of heating while the parameters of the magnetic field as fine-tuning enabling more precise hyperthermia.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the structural, transport, pyrocurrent and magnetic behaviors of Eu2CoMnO6 (ECMO) sample are reported. It was prepared by the solid-state reaction method and crystallized in monoclinic crystal structure with a space group of P21/n. A systematic study of the temperature and magnetic field-dependent susceptibility revealed a complex magnetic behavior with field-induced type-II metamagnetic phase transition of the first-order. The multiple sharp jumps in the initial magnetization curve for T < 10 K could be attributed to structural distortion related to the martensite-like strains from E*-type antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic ordering. The metastable magnetic behavior for T ≥ 60 K is ascribed to a transformation of the low-field disordered spin glass phase to long-range ordered ferromagnetic phase, induced by critical fields. These critical fields are quite sensitive to the direction and magnitude of the field-cooling process. The temperature-dependent magnetocaloric effect with maximum value of ~3.3 J kg−1 K−1 at TC ~ 123 K and the electrical transport behavior of ECMO were studied. Further, temperature dependent pyroelectric current and polarization data of ECMO are investigated.© 2019 The AuthorsOn-current ION and field effect mobility μFE changed abnormally by drain bias illumination stress (DBIS) in amorphous InGaZnO thin-film transistors. First, ION dropped to 35% of its initial value and μFE decreased from 11.8 cm2/(V∙s) to 3.0 cm2/(V∙s) because of acceptor-like tail states ATAIL, which were generated by rupture of weak oxygen bonds near the drain region. The ATAIL trap electrons, and therefore have negative charge, which causes scattering of charged carriers and decrease in μFE. As DBIS time elapsed, ionized oxygen vacancies (VO 2+) were generated near the drain region, so ION was re-elevated to 1.57 times as high as its dropped value (i.e., to 55% of its initial value); μFE increased from 3.0 cm2/(V∙s) to 6.9 cm2/(V∙s) (i.e., to 59% of its origin value);. These compensation effects happened when ATAIL and VO 2+ occurred in the same place, so generation of VO 2+ near drain region was the main cause of the re-elevation.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper we present a simulation study of a novel Double-Gate (DG) Ferroelectric FET (Fe-FET) architecture, exhibiting a subthreshold swing well below 60 mV/dec with a hysteresis-free behavior. The new device topology is based on the interposition of a floating gate between the ferroelectric layer and the gate oxide. The floating gate can be extended above the source and drain regions, so that its capacitance can be suitably optimized to ensure device stability. We found that both the overlap capacitance and quantum confinement are beneficial for the amplification factor. The ION improvement over the standard DG MOSFET turns out to be 23.7×, with no degradation of the intrinsic transit time.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper focuses on the phenomenon of the magnetic flux density dispersion Bd on the gaps of the Fe73.5Cu1Nb3Si13.5B9 multi-gap nanocrystalline block core. Present state-of-the-art shows, that there is no comprehensive knowledge about the value of the magnetic flux density dispersion Bd on the gaps of nanocrystalline block core and the possibilities of its minimisation. The magnetic flux density dispersion Bd is the source of local eddy currents, which are the cause of increase of power loss and temperature in the chokes’ core. To discuss the effect of gap width and the method of its filling on the power losses in the core, the comparison between inserts of Teflon and magnetic mat composed of 70% Fe53.9Co29.1B13Nb1Si2Cu1 powder with a fraction of 20–36 µm and 30% Ultimeg epoxy resin 2004L was performed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.It is shown that magnetic forces as the force ∓μ∇B, exerted on electron spins at rest, account for both the transverse spin imbalance typical of spin Hall effect and the transverse charge imbalance associated with pure spin currents (inverse spin Hall effect). Considering that for stationary currents the laboratory reference frame, and those for which the spin up and spin down carriers are at rest, are inertial systems one can easily find the forces exerted by the lattice on both spin sub-bands, as well as the force between sub-bands.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn solution-processed zinc tin oxide (ZTO) dual-active-layer (DAL) thin-film transistors (TFTs), a thermal limitation exists whereby the ZTO channel layer requires a high annealing temperature—above 470 °C—to achieve stable performance. This disadvantage has been overcome by applying ZnO/SnO2 channel structures and additional annealing methods. However, these methods are expensive due to equipment requirements. Therefore, we aimed at lowering the annealing temperature of solution-processed ZnO/SnO2 TFTs by varying the molar ratio and annealing conditions of the channel layers. The optimized TFTs were fabricated at an annealing temperature of 350 °C without employing additional annealing methods. The fabricated TFTs showed superior and more stable performance as compared to ZTO TFTs annealed at 350 °C. The electrical characteristics of the fabricated ZnO/SnO2 TFTs included a saturation mobility (µsat) of 3.04 cm2/V·s, an on-off-current ratio (ION/OFF) of 1.41 × 106, a threshold voltage (Vth) of 3.04 V, and a subthreshold swing (SS) of 1.49 V/dec. Based on X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy results, compared with the ZTO DAL channel layer, the ZnO/SnO2 channel layer showed an increased ratio of metal-oxygen bonds and a decreased ratio of metal-hydroxyl bonds in O 1s deconvolution peaks.© 2019 Elsevier LtdLow frequency noise studies are performed in Si/SiGe superlattice I/O n-channel FinFETs. It was observed that the experimental noise spectra may contain additionally to flicker and white noise one or several generation recombination (GR) components. The methodology to estimate the noise parameters corresponding to the 1/f noise and each GR noise contribution was detailed. It is found that the carrier number fluctuations mechanisms prevail the 1/f noise. The important 1/f noise level variability observed for devices having the same geometry may be related to the remote Coulomb scattering effect through the correlation between the mobility and the 1/f noise levels. Low frequency noise spectroscopy was performed allowing to identify traps related to divacancies, hydrogen and a possible carbon contamination in Si/SiGe fins.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic refrigeration is becoming a promising technology to replace the conventional refrigeration techniques based on gas compression/expansion at cryogenic temperature as well as at room temperature. In the present study, we have fabricated Ho2O3 nanoparticles by oxidation of HoN prepared by plasma arc discharge. The Ho2O3 nanoparticles annealed at 1200 °C were investigated by the structural and magnetocaloric analysis. The XRD pattern confirms the amorphous nature of naturally oxidized Ho2O3, which was converted into crystalline by annealing. It has been discovered that crystalline Ho2O3 nanoparticles exhibit significantly larger magnetocaloric effect at cryogenic temperature, in comparison to the amorphous nanoparticles, with the second-order antiferromagnetic phase transition. The maximum entropy change was found to be 15.1 J/kgK and 22.4 J/kgK at an applied magnetic field of 5 T for amorphous and crystalline Ho2O3, respectively.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports the effect of Ta/Bi double buffer layer on the magnetic properties of Co thin film. By inserting a Bi layer into the Ta/Co interface of Ta/Co/Ru, the coercive field is increased by about 6 times. Moreover, a further increase of coercivity is observed for the Ta/Bi/Co/Ru film after 450 ℃ annealing. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) reveals that the Bi atoms diffuse to film surface through the cobalt layer. Positron annihilation spectroscopy (PAS) indicates that the diffusion of Bi atoms promotes the formation of vacancies, which may increase the density of bulk defects in the film and enhance the pinning strength of the magnetic domains of Co. Besides, high-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) results confirm the better crystallization of Co layer with a uniform orientation due to the Bi diffusion, which increases the energy barrier for nucleation and movement of the reversal domain. These two reasons lead to the increase of coercivity simultaneously. This finding provides a feasible avenue for the tunable coercive field by the defect engineering.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report on the high-resolution spectroscopic study of multiferroic ErFe3(BO3)4. The energies of all eight Kramers doublets of the ground 4I15/2 multiplet of the Er3+ ion were determined by the high-resolution 4I13/2 → 4I15/2 infrared luminescence spectra. The spectroscopically determined temperature dependence of the splitting of the ground Kramers doublet was used to calculate the contribution of the erbium subsystem into the specific heat and the magnetic susceptibility of erbium iron borate. The analysis of the thermodynamic properties based on these calculations allowed us to suggest the domain structure in the easy-plane antiferromagnetically ordered iron subsystem, with two magnetically nonequivalent erbium positions in each domain.© 2019An analytical approach to parameter extraction and circuit calibration based on characteristic functions is proposed for small-signal equivalent circuit of field effect transistors (FETs). By using a π-topology of the original intrinsic sub-circuit to replace the conventional T-topology of a supplemental sub-circuit in the equivalent circuit, with the characteristic functions being fitted for both the intrinsic and extrinsic sub-circuits, high precision model parameters of the transistor can be extracted analytically without numerical curve fitting. The present method can serve as an effective way to verify and screen non-physical multiple solutions pertaining to conventional approaches. By comparing measured and simulated characteristic functions, series channel resistance along with channel inductance has been found critical for high frequency modeling. The validity of the present approach is demonstrated for 0.1 μm GaN HEMTs up to 65 GHz.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fe4N/Fe soft magnetic composites (SMCs) are fabricated by gas nitridation and molding compaction. The magnetic properties of Fe4N/Fe SMCs have been investigated. With increasing nitridation time, the content of the Fe4N phase, coercivity HC and remanent magnetization Mr increase, while saturation magnetization MS decreases. The core loss of Fe4N/Fe SMCs, especially eddy-current loss, is obviously improved with the increase of Fe4N content. The SMCs with higher Fe4N content present lower μ′, μ″, loss tangent and higher μQ product. Moreover, DC-bias performance has also been improved effectively after nitridation. The results suggest nitridation can effectively improve soft magnetic properties at high frequency.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic skyrmion is a small magnetic whirlpool, in which the local magnetic moments point in a concerted manner forming a nontrivial spin arrangement. This topological spin texture has been predicted to behave as a composite particle with finite mass. The mass effect plays a key role in describing skyrmion dynamics. In this paper, we put forward a method to measure the mass of a skyrmion. This measurement is realized by forming a simple harmonic oscillator in a semicircular nanoring, in which a skyrmion oscillates like a particle in a simple pendulum. Then we verify the method by using micromagnetic simulations.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Interlocking electrical steel sheets degrades magnetic characteristics of laminated cores. In this paper, local magnetic characteristics of laminated cores with interlocking have been measured. The size of the damaged region has been determined according to the measurement results in order to calculate the average magnetic characteristics of the region, which have been applied to the simulation of an electrical machine with interlocking. The results demonstrate that it is important to consider the influence of interlocking for accurate calculations of motor characteristics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the pursuit of rare-earth-free permanent magnets, materials with large saturation magnetization (Ms) stand out. However, large Ms results in low anisotropy field, thus additional source of coercivity is needed to make useful magnets for a broad range of applications. In this paper, we investigate the use of interface coupling to an antiferromagnet (AFM) as a means to increase coercivity for permanent magnet design. Results on the effects of Néel temperature, AFM anisotropy, interface coupling strength, AFM volume ratio, as well as temperature dependence are obtained using Monte Carlo (MC) simulations. And before that, we clarify some practices in MC simulations of magnetic hysteresis. The origin of coercivity enhancement is investigated by examining the magnetization reversal process, which is found to agree with well-established theory of exchange bias. Finally, discussions and design suggestions are made on the AFM materials, the geometry, and experimental realization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.First-principles calculations are performed to investigate the electronic structures and magnetic properties of (Mn, Ga) co-doped LiNbO3. The results show that it is available to tune the magnetism of Mn mono-doped LiNbO3, and the spin-polarized states and the magnetic moments mainly come from the unpaired 3d orbitals of Mn atoms. Furthermore, corresponding to the two Mn doped LiNbO3 system. Eight kinds of Mn atom positions are reviewed and the most stable configuration is verified. Several doping configurations indicate the presence of anti-ferromagnetic (AFM) coupling between two Mn dopants. And then we calculated (2Mn, Ga) co-doped LiNbO3 system. The exciting results show that the existence of ferromagnetic (FM) coupling between Mn and Ga dopants. The results demonstrate that the doped Mn atom will induce additional electron carrier into the LiNbO3. Ga itself does not contribute to magnetism, while (Mn, Ga) co-doped LiNbO3 can induce spin-polarization, indicating that Ga dopant significantly increases FM stability.© 2020A simple, cost-effective method to produce strong, single-domain superparamagnetic iron/graphene nanocomposites via electrochemical exfoliation/deposition is proposed. The simultaneous graphene exfoliation and Fe deposition could be finely controlled by adding sodium dodecyl sulfate (SDS) as a surfactant in the base liquid. The fabricated composites were characterized through morphological and magnetometric analyses. The adjustable magnetic moment varied from 57.3 to 189.6 emu/g and a correlation between SDS concentration, chemical properties, and surface morphology was observed. The results of this study could promote the synthesis of graphene composites with controllable magnetic properties for practical applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The plasma assisted ball milling technology is employed for the preparation of hard magnetic Sm2Fe17NX magnetic powders for the first time. Using conventional high-energy ball milling, Sm2Fe17 alloy powders can only be prepared from Sm2Fe17 alloy precursor but not from Sm and Fe metal precursor. However, by the plasma-assisted ball milling, Sm2Fe17 alloy powders with very fine grains can be directly obtained from the mixture of pure Sm and pure Fe fragments. It is also found that the Sm2Fe17 alloy has been partially nitrided by plasma assisted ball milling under nitrogen atmosphere. The precipitation of soft magnetic α-Fe phase and the oxidation of Sm2Fe17 particles can also be effectively inhibited by the plasma during milling. In addition, the nitriding effect of Nd-Fe alloy powders prepared by plasma-assisted ball milling is better than those prepared by conventional high-energy ball milling during the subsequent nitrding process, since the plasma field can increase the initial free energy of Sm2Fe17 powder and reduce its difference with the energy barrier. The present wok indicates that the nitriding efficiency of Sm2Fe17 alloy can be greatly improved by adding plasma field during the powdering.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Grain boundary diffusion process (GBDP) using Pr60Tb10Cu30− xAlx (x = 0, 5, 15, 25, 30, atomic fraction) alloy ribbons, named as A0–A30 alloys, was applied to high maximum energy product (BH)max Nd-Fe-B sintered magnet. After diffusion, coercivity (Hci) of A0 magnet is significantly enhanced from the original 11.4 kOe to 19.5 kOe with remanence (Br) decreasing from 14.65 kGs to14.32 kGs, which is mainly attributed to magnetic hardening effect by Tb-rich shells. With substituting 5 at% Al for Cu, the Hci and Br of A5 magnet are simultaneously enhanced by the homogenized distribution of Tb-rich shells and the reduced interface energy of Nd-rich phase and Nd2Fe14B phase. The highest coercivity of 22.4 kOe is obtained for A25 magnet by further strengthening magnetic isolation of Nd2Fe14B phase, however, which results in a drastic decrease in Br due to the increased fraction of Nd-rich phase and too much substitution of Al for Fe in Nd2Fe14B phase. Therefore, the Hci (kOe) + (BH)max (MGOe) reaches to the peak value for A5 magnet. Also, it is proven that Cu/Al co-addition can effectively improve Tb diffusion efficiency by modifying intergranular Nd-rich phase.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents the implementation of magneto-mechanical constitutive law utilizing thermodynamic approach in a 3D finite element solver using COMSOL Multiphysics software. The analytical expression for the magnetic field strength and stress is derived from the constitutive model utilizing magnetic flux density and mechanical strain as state variables. The constitutive model is successfully implemented in commercially available software COMSOL. This implementation allows 3D analysis of an energy harvester device efficiently and accurately. A prototype concept device is developed to validate the model and its implementation. The device is tested under uniaxial compressive loading by varying the preload, dynamic load and magnetic bias. The model is validated by comparing the simulated and experimental results. The comparison shows that the model can reasonably predict the optimal value of the preload and magnetic bias yielding maximum power and is able to follow the measurement trends. This model can be used as a suitable tool to analyze the behavior of the concept energy harvesters and determine the optimal design parameters.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Plasmon-tuned magneto-optical (MO) properties enable design concepts of MO devices with various nanoarchitectures. In this study, magnetic circular dichroism (MCD) is presented in plasmonic-magnetic Au-Fe3 − xO4 heterodimer nanostructures dispersed in solution. The heterodimers are synthesized by thermal decomposition of Fe(III) precursors in the presence of preformed Au nanoparticles. The extinction spectrum exhibits a localized surface plasmon resonance (LSPR) peak, which is red-shifted with respect to the isolated Au particle resonance. On the other hand, the MCD response is overwhelmingly dominated by iron oxide counterparts consisting of multiphase magnetite (Fe3O4)/maghemite (γ-Fe2O3). No appreciable LSPR-enhancement in the MO response is found. As for the effect of the magnetic component on the LSPR behavior of Au, a decrease in the magnetoplasmonic response is observed. This suggests a reduction of the effective magnetic field to the Au counterparts, which can probably be due to magnetic shielding by the iron oxides in the near vicinity of Au nanoparticles.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetotactic bacteria are aqueous microorganisms that navigate in the Earth magnetic field using their internal chain of magnetic nanoparticles, which actuate as a compass needle. A typical specimen of the species Magnetospirillum gryphiswaldense contains up to 25 cuboctahedral particles of magnetite (Fe3O4) with a size of about 50 nm. They are of great interest for biomedical applications, for instance as living micro-robots guided magnetically. Aiming to detect the presence and movement of a single bacterium using a magnetic sensor, we study the characteristics of its field in the sensor position. Being much larger than the bacterium, the sensor is affected in different regions by fields with opposite sign. If the permeability of the sensing material is low (µr ~ 1), the net effect of the positive and negative fields is almost fully cancelled, whereas with µr ≫ 1, the field distribution changes and the sensor output is greatly increased. We combine analytical and numerical calculations by finite elements to evaluate the performance of the sensor, as a function of the permeability of the material, for different geometries and sensing conditions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Heusler-type Ni-(Co)-Mn-X (X = In, Sn, Sb) meta-magnetic alloys can exhibit various magneto-functional behaviors due to the strong coupling between the magnetic and structural orders. Here, we demonstrate large magnetocaloric effect and magnetic shape memory effect in a directionally solidified Ni45.7Co4.2Mn37.3Sb12.8 alloy with 〈5 5 3〉A preferred orientation. It is shown that large magnetic entropy change up to 27.4 J kg−1 K−1 can be achieved under the field change of 5 T. Moreover, a large magnetic field-induced strain of 0.42% was also obtained with no-prestrain through inverse martensitic transformation induced by applying a magnetic field of 7 T. The present magnetostain is much higher than those in polycrystalline Ni-(Co)-Mn-Sb based alloys reported previously. Such enhanced magneto-functional behavior could be attributed to the highly textured microstructure and enlarged lattice distortion through Co addition.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Multilayer films with high saturation magnetization and low ferromagnetic resonance linewidth have great potential for various applications in the era of high frequency and miniaturization. In this study, Fe (t nm)/Ni81Fe19 (50 nm)/Fe (t nm) multilayer films were fabricated using electron beam evaporation, and the microstructure, saturation magnetization, coercivity, ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) linewidth and perpendicular standing spin-wave (PSSW) mode are discussed in detail. With increasing Fe film thickness, the saturation magnetization of the multilayer films increased from 10,547 to 14,494 Gs, becoming closer to the theoretical value, and the ferromagnetic resonance linewidth showed an overall increasing trend. It is worth noting that a strong pinning effect has been found via the appearance of the PSSW mode in the FMR spectrum, when the thickness of Fe reaches 4 nm. As the thickness of the Fe film increased from 4 to 15 nm, the perpendicular standing spin-wave field (Hp) increased from 133 to 379 Oe, and the perpendicular standing spin-wave linewidth (ΔHp) increased from 68 to 148 Oe. Remarkably, with 8 nm thick Fe film, the multilayer films achieved excellent comprehensive performances with high saturation magnetization (4πMs, 13,525 Gs), a low in-plane ferromagnetic resonance field (Hr, 725 Oe), and a low FMR linewidth (ΔH, 84.24 Oe).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the present paper, using the discontinuous Ni films and magnetite magnetic fluids as examples we consider theoretically and experimentally the influence of the structural parameters on the optical properties of the ultrafine structures. The optical properties of nanostructures are represented within the theoretical Maxwell-Garnett model. The behavior of the optical spectra of thin Ni films and magnetite magnetic fluids was explained in the framework of the effective medium approximation in two cases: q < 0.5 and 0.5 < q < 1. In this model an effective refractive index (n+ik) of the nanostructures can be calculated as a function of the εm, q, and particle shapes. This approach demonstrated a good accordance between the experimental results and the theoretical calculations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnonic directional coupler is important unit of the integrated functional magnonic networks. Here we report on the mechanism of the variation of the spin-wave coupling length which is equal to the longitudinal spatial scale of wave intensity modulation along the magnonic stripes placed in the proximity. The array of yttrium-iron garnet films was proposed to be the main unit of the magnonic directional coupler system. The simultaneous variation of the magnetization orientation and spin-wave intensity leads to the variation of spin-wave coupling length. Using the finite element numerical simulation and numerical integration of the phenomenological equations similar to the nonlinear Ginzburg-Landau equations the dispersion and frequency dependences of the spin wave coupling length were obtained. We also demonstate experimentally the simultaneous control of spin-wave transport by the variation of the signal intensity and magnetization angle. It was shown that the proposed dual-mode control can enhance the functionality of directional coupler, power splitter and multiplexer based on coupled stripes in planar magnonic networks.© 2019Sr2FeMoO6– x polycrystalline samples with different oxygen content (6−x) and various degrees of superstructural ordering of Fe/Mo cations (P) were obtained by the solid-phase method from the SrFeO2.52 and SrMoO4 precursors. From the investigation on the influence of oxygen non-stoichiometry and the P parameter on the magnetic properties of Sr2FeMoO6– x, it was found that with an increase in P and a decrease in the (6−x) value from 5.99 to 5.94, an increase in the magnetization values is observed in the temperature range 77–600 K. For all the Sr2FeMoO6– x samples there is a tendency that P value rises with increasing x, where, accordingly, the volume fraction of regions in which there are no anti-structural defects increases as well. This is also indicated by Mössbauer spectroscopy data, confirming an increase in the area of the S1 sextet corresponding to Fe ions in highly ordered regions and a decrease in the area of the S2 sextet associated with disordered regions. Using the temperature scanning method, the temperatures of the onset and completion of the transition from the paramagnetic to the ferrimagnetic state and, correspondingly, the blurring width of the transition have been estimated. It turned out that with decreasing P, the blurring of the transition increases, which is associated with an increase in the concentration of anti-structural defects.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The flow and heat transfer in a trapezoidal cavity were investigated numerically. Water-based ferrofluid with Fe3O4 nanoparticles and porous medium with low Darcy number were chosen for the investigation. Both side walls were maintained at a constant cold temperature, the top wall was adiabatic, and the heater is placed at the bottom wall. The dimensionless governing equations are solved numerically using finite element method. A uniform magnetic field of strength B0 was imposed. It is assumed that the magnetic Reynolds number is much smaller than the induced magnetic field so that it can be neglected when compared to the applied magnetic field. No slip boundary conditions were applied at the walls. The streamlines and isotherms were generated to explain the behaviour of dimensionless velocity and temperature inside the cavity. It is demonstrated that the magnetic field, thermal buoyancy, porous medium permeability and the length of the heating element play a crucial role in the enhancement of dimensionless average heat transfer rate.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.DC current component in the power grid may cause gross measurement errors and lead to overheating of power transformers. We have previously developed method how to measure DC current using fluxgate effect in existing current transformers. In this paper we show that using ferroresonance the power consumption of such device can be drastically reduced. The microprocessor can both control the H-bridge excitation unit and perform signal processing, avoiding the need of external instruments.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, by means of analytical calculations and a simple model, we studied the effect of curvature in magnetic thin stripes. Three different domain walls were observed, depending on the slab geometry. A phase diagram that shows the geometric parameters at which each domain wall is preferred was obtained. The presented methodology can also be used to obtain the magnetization behavior in other curved structures with proper aspect ratio relations.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe unique electrostatic properties of semiconductor nanowires enable the realization of novel transistor types by the possibility to use surround gate architectures resembling ideal gate electrostatic control. Nevertheless one fundamental issue of semiconducting nanowire channels is the reliable control of doping to adjust the charge carrier concentration. Indeed, as dimensions scale down the surrounding media and the interfaces become more important. In this study we experimentally investigate the role of surface depletion and dielectric mismatch on the electronic charge transport of highly arsenic doped and bottom-up grown silicon nanowires. Electrical characterization of silicon nanowires (SiNWs) synthesized by Au catalyzed vapour-liquid-solid (VLS) growth and in-situ arsine (AsH3) doping is reported for the first time. We demonstrate that high n-type doping is possible by adjusting the dopant precursor flow ratio during growth. Based on electrical measurements of individual nanowires, reproducible donor concentrations of up to 5.2 × 1019 cm−3 could be revealed. By measuring the electrical characteristics for individual nanowires in dependence of their radius, we show that the electrically active carrier density drastically reduces for small nanowires at radii much larger than those at which quantization or dopant surface segregation effects are expected to occur. Furthermore, enhancement of the contact transparency for small radii nanowires is demonstrated through dopant segregation upon metal silicidation. Size dependent measurement of electrical characteristics revealed improved contact resistivities as low as 1.4 × 10−11 Ωm2.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic losses in the Fe72,5Cu1Nb2Mo1,5Si14B9 nanocrystalline alloy were investigated in a wide range of magnetic induction from 0.01 to 1.0 T and frequencies from 60 Hz to 100 kHz. Dependences of magnetic losses approximated by power function. It is shown that the exponent of the power function depends on the ratio of hysteresis losses and eddy current losses, as well as on the number of actively moving domain walls. The number of domain walls was calculated using a domain model and measured eddy current losses.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report new results on magnetic and second harmonic generation properties found in Mayan Blue Indigo (MBI) synthetic nanostructured pigment. MBI pigment was synthesized by a conventional method. Magnetization values were found to be 6.968 × 10−2 emu/g and 18.91 × 10−2 emu/g at 300 K and 50 K, respectively. Electron paramagnetic resonance spectra indicates unpaired electron signal appearing at the g-value of 2.49 with a peak-to-peak line width of 2114 G. Second harmonic generation properties were found at 483 nm. MBI pigment was analyzed using various characterizations techniques. The nano-structure and chemical surface characterization were confirmed by techniques that included high resolution transmission electron microscopy, Raman spectroscopy and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy. The characterization results indicated, acicular nanostructures of ~1.14 nm, iron nanoparticles of ~1 nm, indigo molecule vibration mode at 632.52 cm−1, and binding energies corresponding to Fe (2s, 3s), O (1s, 2s), N (1s), C (1s), Si (2s, 2p), Al (2s, 2p), Mg (2s, 2p) related to the electronic structure of MBI nanostructured pigment.© 2019Magnetorheological (MR) fluids presents obvious rheological properties under external magnetic fields. A rotational rheometer was adopted to investigate the relationship between shear stress and shear rate of different volume fractions MR fluids under different applied magnetic field strengths, which is one of the most important indicators of rheological property of MR fluids. Shear stress increases with the increasing of applied magnetic field and particles volume concentration. While, MR fluid shows the pseudo-plastic fluid behavior when the volume fraction was 28% without magnetic field. Different constitutive models (i.e. H–B model, S-S model and a modified model used to analyze flowing law of MR fluids) were employed, respectively. Results show that the modified flow model fits well with experimental results as a whole compared to other models, and the modified model is more simple and effective.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We study ferrofluidic Taylor Couette flow under the influence of radial inflow and outflow in combination with an external applied magnetic field in a finite-length cavity via direct numerical simulations. As is the case for no magnetic field, the base state (cylindrical Couette flow and modified circular-Couette flow in presence of a transverse magnetic field component, respectively) with an external magnetic field is stabilized for any radial inflow and strong radial outflow, while the system becomes slightly destabilized for weak radial outflow. The particular parameter range for destabilization depends on the field strength of the applied magnetic field. Slightly increasing the field strength shrinks the range, while it grows for larger field strengths. In general, a larger field strength tends to minimize and compensate the effect of any radial flow, resulting in bifurcation thresholds (critical Reynolds number vs. radial flow) which have less curvature, i.e. they are more flat. We elucidate the origin of this effect to be in the symmetry breaking nature of the transverse magnetic field itself. Azimuthal velocity isocontours are shifted different strong due to radial flow, either in the part of the annulus that is aligned with the direction of the applied magnetic field or perpendicular to it. In particular, the modulation amplitude in the isocontours perpendicular to the field increase. As a result the flow is locally stabilized with different strength, so that the overall stabilization is weaker relative to the situation without any applied field. This diminishing curvature effect with variation of the radial flow becomes more pronounced with stronger applied magnetic fields.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The quasi-single-domain states in micron-sized triangular-shaped particles of two types: with the relatively small concavity of the side and with the maximal concavity of the side are studied by magnetic-force microscopy and numerical calculations. The external magnetic field required for switching the particles from one stable magnetic state to another is determined. The mechanical stresses for switching between stable magnetic states are estimated numerically. The modified theory for magnetic tunneling nanocontacts is used to calculate the spin-polarized conductance and tunnel magnetoresistance in a MagnetoElectric Random Access Memory cell consisting of ferromagnetic particles with different orientations of the quasi-uniform magnetization.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The dynamic magnetic susceptibility of ferronematics (nematic liquid crystals doped with magnetic nanoparticles) has been measured for high concentrations of nanoparticles. For a given composition of the ferronematic (the same nanoparticles, and the same liquid crystal matrix) we have found the optimal volume concentration of the magnetic particles, for which the largest relative enhancement of the dynamic magnetic susceptibility is obtained upon the application of a bias magnetic field in the isotropic phase.© 2019 Elsevier LtdSensing characteristics of the SO2 gas are investigated using a horizontal floating-gate FET-type gas sensor. SO2 gas sensing characteristics of the resistor-type gas sensor, a conventional sensor, fabricated on the same wafer are also investigated and compared with the FET-type gas sensor. The 18-nm-thick WO3 deposited using a radio frequency magnetron sputtering method is used as the sensing material. The SO2 gas sensing characteristics are examined while varying the operating temperature, the concentration of the SO2 gas, and the pre-bias (Vpre). The sensing mechanism for detecting the SO2 gas in an FET-type gas sensor is examined. Both sensors are able to detect up to 10 ppm of SO2 gas, and the FET-type sensor shows significantly improved gas response by using the pre-bias scheme.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate the wash-free detection of biological targets based on the Brownian relaxation of magnetic markers. The Brownian relaxation time of bound markers was prolonged by using a cluster (or agglomerate) of bound markers that was formed via the binding reaction between markers and targets. Thus, bound and free markers were differentiated magnetically by using the difference in their relaxation times. Two types of magnetic properties, i.e., third-harmonic signal and magnetic relaxation, were used for measurement. The concentration of target was detected from the decrease in the third-harmonic signal and the increase in the magnetic-relaxation signal. We demonstrated the detection of C-reactive proteins using these two properties. In both cases, a good correlation was obtained between the measured signal and the concentration of target. It was also shown that the two methods had different concentration dependences, which will be caused mainly by the distribution of cluster size of the bound markers.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents evidence of large scale aggregation in an aqueous dispersion of magnetic microgels, induced by 100 kHz AC magnetic fields with amplitude ranging from 40 Oe to 120 Oe. The microgels with 250 nm z-average hydrodynamic diameter and 44 emu/g saturation magnetization are composed by 8 nm magnetite nanoparticles imbedded in (3-acrylamidopropyl)-trimethylammonium chloride (APTAC) matrix. The magnetically induced aggregation was investigated by means of light extinction (LE) and small angle light scattering (SALS) at room temperature. The SALS experiments show the formation and growth of field direction elongated aggregates with thickness in the range of a few microns and length in the range of tens to hundreds microns. The extinction experiments show the increasing of aggregate total volume with increasing magnetic field amplitude. It was estimated that, at the saturation of the aggregation process in 120 Oe amplitude field, the aggregates consist of about 80% of the total amount of magnetic microgels within the sample. These findings have potential interest for magnetic composite applications in magnetic hyperthermia and heat transfer applications.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we present a compact modeling of capacitorless A2RAM memory cell. It is obtained by combining A2RAM DC compact model with an equivalent circuit that mimics the memory state. The DC modeling is achieved by considering the A2RAM architecture as the combination of a SOI transistor in parallel with a variable-resistance bridge. The crucial aspect is the analytical description of the bridge threshold voltage. The complete A2RAM compact model is implemented in Verilog-A to allow the use of SPICE simulator. DC and memory characteristics are validated by TCAD. SPICE simulations show the operation of 2 × 2 A2RAM matrix.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The thick and brittle amorphous ribbons with the maximum thickness up to 58 μm were successfully fabricated using melt-spinning method upon the adoption of a novel double-paralleled slits nozzle (DPSN). The magnetic properties of the two magnetic flake powder cores (MFPCs) prepared from the conventional thin ribbon pulverization and the thick ribbon pulverization were analyzed and compared. Hereinto, a coupling model of fluid flow with free surface and surface tension, and heat transfer with phase transform was developed to design the slit spacing for the DPSN, and sol-gel method was employed to create SiO2 insulation layer on the surfaces of the magnetic flake powders to improve electrical resistivity. Results show that a quasi-steady-state can be reached for the puddle with the upstream and downstream menisci in crescent and slope shapes, respectively, by adopting the DPSN with slit spaces of 2.0 mm and 2.5 mm. The embrittlement process for the conventional thin ribbon can be omitted to enhance the efficiency of the powder preparation when using the thick ribbon before the ribbon pulverization. The MFPCs fabricated using the thick amorphous ribbon pulverization exhibit a higher permeability of 65.27, lower total core loss with the frequency being less than 234 kHz for Bm = 0.08 T, and a better DC-bias property of 70.97% as compared to the MFPCs made from the conventional thin amorphous ribbon pulverization. This work provides a promising approach to further development of Fe-based amorphous MFPCs with high preparation efficiency and excellent magnetic properties at the frequency below 234 kHz.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of (Tb1-xCex)MnO3 have been investigated. The presence of Griffith's phase has been confirmed from the AC susceptibility study of the materials. The observed Griffith phase in (Tb1-xCex)MnO3 is attributed to the exchange interaction between Mn3+/Mn2+ ions. Chemical analysis by X-ray photo-emission spectroscopy has shown the presence of mix valence state of Mn and oxygen vacancy in the materials. At low temperatures, the materials also show existence of exchange bias in field cooled condition which changes with Ce content. Jahn-Teller distortion and oxygen vacancy are found to dominate in these systems to change the Mn–O–Mn bond angle which in turn induce canted antiferromagnetism (AFM) in this system. The canted AFM plays an important role in getting the exchange bias effect.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Enhanced magnetic refrigeration performance via introducing pores in a ferromagnetic shape memory Ni-Mn-Sn-Co alloy was demonstrated. The Ni40.7Mn42.9Sn10.4Co6.0 foam, with a porosity of 56% created by replication casting technique, exhibited reduced thermal hysteresis because of the high specific surface area. A maximum magnetic entropy change (ΔSM) 4.7 J/kg·K with a very wide working temperature span (ΔTFWHM) 40 K under 5.0 T were found in the annealed foam. Furthermore, the foam showed a small hysteresis loss (AHL) 17.4 J/kg under 5.0 T. As a result, refrigeration capacity (RC) 155 J/kg and relative cooling power (RCP) 188 J/kg were produced.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, pure and rare earth Ce3+ ion doped nickel oxide nanoparticles, i.e. Ni1-xCexO(x = 0.00, 0.01, 0.03 and 0.05) have been successfully prepared by sol–gel method and qualitative studied the influence of Ce3+ ion on the optical and magnetic properties by the mean of Rietveld refined X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis, Raman spectroscopy, Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), Ultraviolet (UV) visible spectroscopy, photoluminescence (PL), X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) as well as electron paramagnetic resonance (EPR) measurement. XRD analysis confirmed the single crystalline phase of the prepared samples without any impurity phase and the average crystallite size calculated from the Scherrer method follows the same trend as obtained from the Williamson- Hall method. Further, PL spectra of doped NiO nanoparticles exhibit green emission related to oxygen vacancies and the emissions at 398.78 nm and 466.70 nm (Blue emission) due to the Ce3+ ion transitions 2D3 / 2–2F5 / 2 and 2D3 / 2–2F7 / 2 which are also extremely supported by CIE1961 chromaticity diagram. Through magnetic measurement, room temperature weak ferromagnetism is observed for all samples. Moreover, EPR analysis reveals the presence of unpaired electron where the field resonance decreases along with increased g value as the Ce concentration increases when compared to pure NiO. The present studies also suggest that Ni vacancy might be responsible for inducing weak ferromagnetism in NiO samples through the collective localized magnetic moment.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe investigate the robustness of a purely electrical field-free switching of a perpendicularly magnetized free layer based on SOT. The effective magnetic field which leads to deterministic switching of a rectangular as well as of a square free layer is created dynamically by a two-current pulse scheme. It is demonstrated that the switching is very robust, being insensitive to fluctuations of the write pulses’ durations and to relatively large variations of the heavy metal wires’ dimensions. Furthermore, it remains reliable for a wide range of synchronization failures between the pulses. The combination of a rectangular free layer shape with a partial overlap with the second current line accelerates the switching of the cell allowing a fast, 0.25 ns, switching.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We discuss experimentally realizable situations in which surface effects may “screen out” the dipolar interactions in an assembly of nanomagnets, which then seemingly behaves as a noninteracting system. To illustrate this screening effect we consider three examples of physical observables, equilibrium magnetization, ac susceptibility and ferromagnetic resonance spectrum. For this purpose, we summarize our formalism that accounts for both the intrinsic features of the nanomagnets and their collective effects within an assembly and establish the conditions for screening.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.By using ab initio calculations, we explored the electronic and magnetic properties of 3d transition metals (TM = V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co, Ni, and Cu)-doped SrTiO3 (STO) systems. The stability of doped systems is analyzed by computing their formation energies, which exhibits a strong interdependence on the dopants atomic numbers. Our results show that the versatile electronic and magnetic properties can be obtained by TM-doping, which are ranging from ferromagnetic half-metal (V-, Cr-, and Fe-doped systems), magnetic/non-magnetic semiconductors (Mn-, Co-/Ni-doped systems), and magnetic metal (Cu-doped system). From total and orbital resolved partial density of states, it is found that 3d orbitals of dopant atoms are playing the key role in tunning the physical properties of the STO. The induced magnetism in these doped systems is explained by comparing the valence electronic configurations of host (Ti) and doped (TM) atoms. Our findings may trigger further experimental researches to obtain stable magnetic properties in TM-doped STO systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic permeability of a ferrite is an important factor in device design such as inductors, transformers and microwave absorbent materials. In this paper, the magnetic permeability of NiZn ferrites doped with yttrium was simulated as a function of frequency using a magnetic permeability model, which contains six parameters that depend on the material. The model's parameters were adjusted using the Genetic Algorithm. Genetic Algorithms are probabilistic search procedures that generate solutions to optimization problems using techniques inspired in biological evolution. The convenience of the Genetic Algorithms method is it that does not require estimated initial values for the parameters, which allows to find a stable global minimum. The magnetic loss of a NiZn ferrite was numerically investigated by using the Kramers-Kronig relationships. Due to the principle of causality and time independence in the relation between magnetization vector M and magnetic field H, the real and the imaginary part of the complex magnetic permeability are mutually dependent, and the correlation is given by Kramer-Kronig equations. In this paper, the imaginary part of the magnetic permeability was obtained numerically by applying the Hilbert transform to the simulated real part. Causality was suitably verified through the KK relationships.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We calculated the dispersion relations for magnon waves in a single and two adjacent periodic chains of spherical magnetic particles magnetized along the chain axis. Dipole-dipole coupling between point magnetic moments in a chain and between chains was taken into account. A weak coupling between local magnetic moments at separate particles in a chain leads to formation of narrow transmittance band, which results in a low group velocity of the spin waves. The group velocity can be controlled by the chain parameters. In the case of double magnon chains, a transmittance band splits into two sub-bands corresponding to symmetric and anti-symmetric eigenmodes. Interference between them results in spin wave snaking between the two chains. This effect is field-dependent that makes possible application of double chains of magnetic particles in magnonic switch.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The multiferroism is a very intriguing property discovered more than seventy years ago and largely investigated mainly after 2003 due to a strong magnetoelectric coupling observed in some materials. However, even this phenomenon has been known for so long, until now its origin at the molecular level has not been clarified for many materials yet. Thus, in this work is proposed a systematic DFT study using PbBO3 (B = V, Cr, Mn, Co, and Cu) materials, which materials show good potential as a material for multiferroic or spintronic devices. The structural properties indicate that chemical modification on B magnetic sites has not a big influence on unit cell symmetry; in addition, the investigation of energetic stability indicates that such materials are highly stable under room conditions and high pressures. As well as, the electronic properties show that all materials present metallic band gap or half-metallic ferromagnetism. In terms of magnetic property, the theoretical results show a ferromagnetic ordering for PbMnO3 and PbCuO3, while PbVO3, PbCrO3, and PbCoO3 are antiferromagnetic materials with weak-ferromagnetism. In both cases, the magnetic resultant is oriented along [1 1 1] direction. In turn, all materials presented good ferroelectric properties with anisotropic features and more pronounced along the x-direction. Once those magnetic and ferroelectric properties are tangents, such coupling is possible because of one perturbation in one property results on the immediate answer of the other property. Thus, the fact of cationic magnetic sites (magnetic property) was displaced from the center of the octahedral site (ferroelectric property) is molecular origin for magnetoelectric coupling on proposed materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The phase stability and magnetic properties of the parent phase in the Co2Cr(Al,Si) shape memory alloys were systematically investigated. For the Co-rich portion in the vicinity of stoichiometric composition, the phase boundaries of B2 phase in equilibrium with Co solid solution (A1) phase at 1473 K were identified and the compositions showing martensitic transformation were also determined within the B2 single-phase region. The addition of Si greatly expands the B2 single-phase region compared with that of the Co-Cr-Al ternary system. The Curie temperature and spontaneous magnetization of the L21 phase, which is formed by the order-disorder transition from the B2 phase during water quenching from 1473 K, were 345–540 K and 2.1–2.6 μB/f.u., respectively. The values of spontaneous magnetization were lower than those expected from the Generalized Slater-Pauling rule and the ab-initio calculation.© 2019 Elsevier LtdNeuromorphic computing is an emerging field of investigation for new algorithm solutions and daily life applications. We propose a novel approach to achieve an operator which uses a parasitic bipolar metal oxide semiconductor filed effect transistor combined with a capacitor and a n-type metal oxide semiconductor filed effect transistor. The resulting BIMOS-based leaky-integrate-and-fire spiking neuron circuit is integrated on thin silicon film in 28 nm high-k/metal-gate advanced complementary metal oxide semiconductor technology. The proof of concept is brought by 3-dimensional technology computer-aided design numerical simulations, and then validated by electrical characterization of the two-transistors-one-capacitor demonstrator. The underlying physical phenomena involved in the spiking mechanism are identified, explained and modelled. Low power consumption is obtained. In addition, the spiking neuron device benefits from intrinsic electro-static discharge robustness.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The temperature dependencies of the rheological and viscoelastic properties of magnetorheological (MR) fluids were investigated experimentally using a rotary rheometer. The shear flow and oscillatory shear strain experiments were conducted over a wide temperature range (−5 to 50 °C) for different levels of magnetic flux density, and strain amplitude and rate. The temperature effect is also investigated considering three different MR fluids with varying solid particles concentration. The measured shear stress-strain data were used to evaluate the effects of temperature and magnetic field on the pre- and post-yield properties of the MR fluids. The acquired data under harmonic strain excitations swept in the 0.005–100% strain amplitude and different levels of steady temperatures in the −5 °C to 50 °C range were analyzed to identify storage and loss moduli as functions of the temperature, shear strain amplitude and frequency. The results suggested strong influence of temperature on the mechanical properties of the fluids in the absence of the magnetic field, especially at temperatures below 10 °C. The magnetic field, however, constituted the dominant effect. In the presence of a magnetic field, the temperature effect could be observed only at low strain levels. The temperature dependency of the mechanical properties also varied considerably with the iron particle fraction of the MR fluid. The critical strain amplitude also increased with increasing magnetic field density, while the linear storage modulus approached saturation with magnetic flux density above 0.2 T.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Frequency dependent complex magnetic permeability is determined for a laboratory synthesized magnetic fluid having magnetite nanoparticles in the frequency range 0.3 MHz to 3 GHz. The effect of particle concentration, static magnetic field strength and field orientation over dielectric properties of magnetic fluid is studied. The discussion in this paper indicates that loss tangent (tan δ) can be controlled using these parameters. These fluids are suitable for the application in microwave absorber or tunable attenuators.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, FeCoNiCuZn single-phase high-entropy alloy powders were synthesized at room temperature for the first time using high-frequency electromagnetic-field assisted ball milling. FeCoNiCuZn was found to be a type of soft magnetic material exhibiting saturation magnetization as high as 65.92 emu/g. Its microwave-absorbing properties were investigated in the frequency range of 2–18 GHz. Its minimum reflection loss reached 14.69 dB at 10.96 GHz, corresponding to a thickness of 1.5 mm and effective bandwidth of reflection loss values below 10 dB (90% of microwave absorption) of 2.5 GHz (9.9–12.4 GHz). In order to understand the mechanism involved, a comparative experiment with the same experimental conditions but without the high-frequency electromagnetic field was performed. The results show that a type of non-thermal effect that changes the diffusion ability and solid solution effect of metal atoms exists in the high-frequency electromagnetic-field-assisted ball milling processing.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This research is dedicated to the specifics of the behavior exhibited by elastomer filled with magnetically hard (high-coercivity) particles influenced by magnetic fields. Composite materials of this type are also mentioned as magnetorheological, magnetoactive, and hybrid. There have been done studies on the magnetization processes taking place in ME's containing magnetically hard spherical NdFeB-alloy particles. As was found out, the coercivity exhibited by a sample can be significantly weaker in comparison to that demonstrated by the filler in pure form. It was also discovered that the coercivity may have negative values in positive magnetic fields. These effects are determined by the magnitude relation of the remnant magnetization of the sample, elasticity of the polymer matrix, strength of the external magnetic field, and the capability of magnetic particles to turn inside the polymer matrix as the magnetic field changes polarity to opposite.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of the material with more than two crystal phases are found better as compared to that of single crystal phase material. Hence, nanocomposites with different weight percentages of Barium Hexaferrite (BaFe12O19/BHF) in Barium Titanate (BaTiO3/BTO) matrix have been prepared. The X-ray diffraction patterns of BHF, BTO and nanocomposites reveal the absence of other secondary crystal phases. The Raman spectra analysis supports to the XRD patterns analysis. The presence of both BHF and BTO crystal phases in the nanocomposites have been confirmed by the high resolution transmission electron microscopy. Interestingly, the nanocrystalline BTO exhibits weak ferromagnetic behavior. Magnetic interaction between BTO and BHF in the bi-magnetic BTO-BHF composite has been observed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Enable hydrogels with real-time controllable viscoelastic properties is of great significance for their clinical application. In this study, magnetic hydrogels were synthesized through a blending method. Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) was used to analyze the morphology of the magnetic hydrogels. The structure of magnetic hydrogels was analyzed by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectrometry (FT-IR) and swelling tests. Compared with the passive hydrogel scaffolds, the magnetic hydrogel scaffolds have similar porous morphology but a more flexible structure. Magnetic hydrogels show dynamic viscoelasticity and magnetic-induced shear storage modulus with increasing field strength. The reason is the Fe3O4 nanoparticles interact with each other under external magnetic field, thus change the microstructure of the magnetic hydrogels.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.First order coupled magnetostructural transition (MST) between ferromagnetic orthorhombic and paramagnetic hexagonal structure and large magnetocaloric effect are reported in the present article in transition metal based Al doped (Mn0.6Fe0.4)NiSi1− xAlx (x = 0.06, 0.07) alloys. On doping Al in place of Si, the structural transition temperature is found to shift to around room temperature (~272 K for x = 0.07) from a high temperature of ~1210 K for MnNiSi system. On further increase in Al doping with x = 0.08, only magnetic transition is observed at ~145 K. Isothermal magnetic entropy change (ΔSM) as large as ~20.6 Jkg−1K−1 is found for the alloy with x = 0.07 due to a change of 50 kOe magnetic field. Large value of ΔSM observed near room temperature for the alloy with x = 0.07 enable it as a potential candidate for magnetic refrigerant.© 2019In Heusler compounds, structural configuration and phase stability are essential for determining their properties. Under this framework, we have systematically investigated the atomic configuration in the full Heusler compounds Cr2ZnSi and Cr2ZnGe and their electronic, magnetic, mechanical and dynamic properties. Both L21-type and XA-type structural configurations have been investigated and the corresponding equilibrium lattice constants in cubic phase have been determined, which are in good consistence with previous studies. Mechanical and dynamic properties have been further investigated and results show that the L21-type structures for both Cr2ZnSi and Cr2ZnGe are both mechanically and dynamically stable whereas the XA-type structures are not. And, strong elastic anisotropy is also revealed with the calculated directional dependent Young's modulus and shear modulus. Afterwards, the tetragonal phase has been considered and results show that tetragonal XA-type structure can further reduce the total energy with regard to the cubic phase. The minimum total energies under tetragonal phases at c/a ratio of 1.31 and 1.41 are even lower than that of the cubic L21-type structure for both Cr2ZnSi and Cr2ZnGe, respectively, and their mechanical and dynamic stabilities have also been confirmed. This detailed investigation about the structural configuration and phase stability in full Heusler alloys Cr2ZnSi and Cr2ZnGe from different perspectives can be important and helpful for the related studies and inspire other relative works.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Based on cold rolling and primary recrystallization method, 0.05–0.15 mm-thick ultra-thin grain-oriented silicon steel sheets were successfully produced by utilizing the high induction (Hi-B) and common grain-oriented (CGO) silicon steels as raw materials, respectively. Thus, the effects of sharpness of initial Goss texture on the evolutions of microstructure, texture and magnetic property were investigated in detail. For Hi-B steel, ‘smooth’ microstructures were formed in the cold-rolled sheets, and the textures evolved along the following path: exact {1 1 0}〈0 0 1〉 → {2 3 0}〈0 0 1〉 → {1 1 1}〈1 1 2〉. By contrast, significant deformation bands or shear bands were observed in the CGO steel, and the textures developed along the following path: deviated {1 1 0}〈0 0 1〉 → {2 1 0}〈0 0 1〉 → {1 1 1}〈1 1 2〉. After annealing, inhomogeneous microstructures containing some clusters with large grains (∼2–4 mm) and fine equiaxed grains appeared in the Hi-B steel and the associated texture evolution with increasing cold rolling reduction followed the path: {1 1 0}〈0 0 1〉 → {2 3 0}〈0 0 1〉 → {2 1 0}〈0 0 1〉. Unlike the Hi-B steel, relatively fine and uniform equiaxed recrystallization grains were produced in the final CGO steel, and the texture evolved along the route: {2 1 0}〈0 0 1〉 → {6 1 0}〈0 0 1〉. Consequently, further research focusing on the recrystallization mechanism was studied. The results showed that {1 1 0}〈0 0 1〉 and {2 1 0}〈0 0 1〉 developed into the predominated components due to oriented growth and oriented nucleation respectively in the 0.05 mm-thick Hi-B sheet, while {1 0 0}〈0 0 1〉 became the main texture with the aid of oriented nucleation advantage in the CGO sheet. In addition, more attention was paid on the magnetic properties of the ultra-thin sheets, and the results showed that heavy cold rolling reduction as well as low annealing temperature contributed to better magnetic induction. Furthermore, the separated iron loss components were obtained to clarify the relationships between the iron loss and grain size, texture and thickness.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The manufacturing processes of electrical machines may lead to significant degradation of magnetic core properties and therefore of the machine performance. Laminations are usually stacked and pressed which affects the magnetic properties and the iron losses. However, the influence of this step must be still investigated when large generators are considered. Indeed, in that case, the stator and rotor stacking process consists in assembling several stacks of electrical steel sheets separated by airvents. The surface of the airvent spacers represents about ten percent of the lamination surface of the magnetic circuit, implying, during the compaction process, an inhomogeneous stress distribution with significant local stresses. The present work deals with the experimental characterization of a lamination stack, including airvents, under compressive stress in the thickness direction. A mock-up has been designed and built-up to study magnetic properties of lamination stacks under pressing conditions corresponding to the industrial process.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Diesel engines have advantages such as high energy density of fuel, high efficiency, and relatively low CO2 emission. Therefore, diesel engines are preferred for various applications, such as automobile and ship. Despite the advantages, emission of particulate matters (PMs) from the diesel engines is a grave environmental concern. To address the issue, here, a magnetic fluid filter aided with nonthermal plasma (NTP) for removing diesel particulates without causing any loss in the pressure is proposed. The working principle of the proposed filter and the methodology for evaluating the PM removal efficiency are discussed in the paper. Further, the experimental results including the performance of the proposed filter are analyzed. The feasibility and high efficiency of the filter are evident from the results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nd2Fe14B is a high-density Fe cluster containing 56 Fe atoms in one unit cell. We investigated the crystallographic structure of an isotropic Nd2Fe14B magnet comprising nanocrystals of a size of ~30 nm at pressures up to 2 GPa. The results of X-ray diffraction measurements using Rietveld refinement revealed the displacements of each Fe atomic site in the Fe cluster, Nd, and B atomic sites. The lattice constants, a and c, of tetragonal symmetry decreased proportionally with external pressure, whereas the shrinkage ratio for both a and c changed at approximately 0.5 GPa. However, each atomic position exhibited non-monotonic pressure dependence. The trend of displacement of atomic positions changed at a characteristic pressure of 0.4 ± 0.1 GPa. When exceeded, most atoms shifted to the direction opposite their displacement at lower pressures. Thus, they exhibited restoration tendencies toward the positions at ambient pressure. The bond angles and bond lengths among Nd, Fe, and B atoms also exhibited characteristic pressure dependences. As pressure increased, the basal triangle of the trigonal prism in the Fe cluster layers distorted up to ~0.5 GPa, whereas the strain of the trigonal prism gradually reduced just above 0.5 GPa. The atomic position of the heaviest Nd atoms was a key structural parameter to characterize the change.© 2019The magnetic domain structure is studied in epitaxial Fe100-xGax/MgO(0 0 1) films with 0 < x < 30 and thicknesses below 60 nm by magnetic force microscopy. For low gallium content, domains with the magnetization lying in the film plane and domain walls separating micrometric areas are observed. Above x ≈ 20, the magnetic contrast shows a fine corrugation, ranging from 300 to 900 nm, suggesting a ripple substructure with a periodic oscillation of the magnetization. We discuss the presence of a random magnetic anisotropy contribution, that superimposed to the cubic coherent anisotropy, is able to break the uniform orientation of the magnetization. The origin of that random anisotropy is attributed to several factors: coexistence of crystal phases in the films, inhomogeneous distribution of both internal strain and Ga–Ga next nearest neighbor pairs and interface magnetic anisotropy due to the Fe–O bond.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt-Nickel (CoNi) alloy nanotubes (NTs) with diameters 50 nm (D1), 100 nm (D2), 150 nm (D3), and 200 nm (D4) have been fabricated using Anodic Aluminum Oxide (AAO) membranes. X-ray diffraction spectroscopy (XRD), field-emission scanning electron microscopy (FE-SEM), vibrating-sample magnetometer (VSM), and physical property measurement system (PPMS) analysis methods were employed to systematically investigate the structural, morphological and magnetic properties of CoNi NTs samples. Magnetization reversal mechanism has been explained by angular dependence of coercivity. Low temperature studies have shown that coercivity Hc of nanotubes follows the thermal activation model. Temperature dependence of Hc follows the 3/2 power law for the field dependence of energy barriers.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper reports on resistive switching behavior observed in resistive random access memory (RRAM) devices fabricated with aluminum oxide (AlOx) and graphene oxide (GO) dielectric films, which were solution-processed under low annealing temperatures of 250 °C and 50 °C for AlOx and GO dielectric films, respectively. As representative of metal oxide and two-dimensional material, a detailed study and comprehensive comparison in view of resistive switching performance has been conducted for AlOx and GO based RRAM, including operation voltage, resistance distribution, resistance ratio, conduction mechanism and retention/endurance property. A smaller operation voltage and better stability were demonstrated in AlOx based RRAM devices while higher resistance magnitude of high resistance state (HRS) and resistance ratio were observed in GO based RRAM devices. The current study opens up promising applications of environmental-friendly solution-processed AlOx and GO films with lower energy consumption for non-volatile memory (NVM).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Grain-oriented (GO) Fe-Si sheets are often preferred to non-oriented steels in large rotating machines, where the material response along directions different from the rolling one (RD) matters, both in terms of magnetisation curve and energy losses. The experiments show that the material properties depend in a complex fashion on the angle θ made by the applied field with respect to RD in the lamination plane, an effect that can be quantitatively interpreted in terms of evolution of the domain wall processes. It was shown that the pre-emptive knowledge of the material behaviour along RD (θ=0°) and the transverse direction TD (θ=90°) allows one to predict, under quasi-static excitation, the normal magnetisation curve, the hysteresis loop shape, and the energy loss dependence on θ in high-permeability GO sheets. The evolution of the quasi-static magnetic properties with θ has an obvious counterpart in the dynamic behaviour. In the present work we have therefore investigated, from the experimental and theoretical viewpoint, the behaviour of the magnetic energy loss W(f,Jp) versus frequency 1Hz⩽f⩽200Hz and peak polarisation (0.15T⩽Jp⩽1.6T) in high-permeability 0.29 mm thick GO Epstein samples, cut at 15° steps between RD and TD. We show that the predicting method developed for the quasi-static loss can be made general through loss decomposition and applied, in particular, to the determination of the excess loss term. This leads to a general description of W(f,Jp) as a function of the sheet cutting angle, without using arbitrary parameters.© 2019The non-magnetic element Ca is substituted in LiFe5O8 (x = 0, 0.003, 0.005, 0.007 and 0.01) and the effect of Ca on magnetic, dielectric and electrical properties over a broadband frequency and temperature range (both at cryogenic and high temperatures) are investigated in order to check their suitability in microwave devices. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) study revealed the increment in the lattice constant and volume, which is also confirmed from the redshift in F2 Raman mode. The M-T curves of all the samples exhibited a ferromagnetic transition around 873 K. The effective magnetization and saturation magnetization is reduced with Ca substitution due to the incorporation of non-magnetic ions in place of magnetic ions, whereas the coercivity and remanent magnetization enhanced. These changes are explained based on Neel's two-sublattice model. The x = 0.007 specimen exhibited the highest permeability (µr = 28 @ 1 MHz, room temperature (RT) and µr = 52 @ 1 MHz, 523 K) among all the Ca substituted samples. Both the permittivity and permeability showed dispersion behavior with temperature. With Ca substitution, the permittivity improved, whereas the dielectric loss tangent (tanδ; order of 10−3) reduced. The activation energy is found to be 0.14 eV and 0.06 eV for x = 0 and 0.007, respectively. The reduction in activation energy can be ascribed to the creation of oxygen vacancies. A combination of permeability, low tanδ, enhanced permittivity, and high saturation magnetization obtained for the x = 0.007 sample is suitable for the applications in circulators and phase shifters.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effect of Rashba spin-orbit interaction on quantum transport in a two-dimensional tight-binding system is studied in the presence of random impurities. The relaxation time for the impurity scattering is calculated using the Matsubara Green function technique and the spin and charge conductivities are determined using the Kubo formalism. The relaxation time, charge and spin conductivities are shown to exhibit peak structures at a critical chemical potential, the peak of the spin conductivity being higher than that of charge conductivity. It is also shown that the Rashba interaction increases the peaks of the charge and spin conductivities, while the impurity coupling decreases them. In case of relaxation time, however, the peak value remains unaffected by RSOI. It is furthermore shown that in general, the relaxation time, and charge and spin conductivities are enhanced by RSOI while they are reduced by impurities.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Fe69.5 −xNd7B21Nb2.5Zrx (x = 0–3) permanent magnets were produced by annealing bulk amorphous alloys. The intrinsic coercivity (Hcj) as well as maximum energy product ((BH)max) were enhanced significantly by Zr substitution in the Fe69.5 −xNd7B21Nb2.5Zrx (x = 0–3) alloys, while the remanence (Br) is reduced slightly. When x = 2, annealed magnets tend to display the optimal properties of Hcj = 513.92 kA/m, Br = 0.57 T and (BH)max = 37.59 kJ/m3. The effects of the magnetic field intensity on the distribution of elements, microstructures and hard magnetic properties in Fe67.5Nd7B21Nb2.5Zr2 magnets were investigated. The results of X-ray diffractometry, transmission electron microscope and atom probe tomography indicated that the magnetic field heat treatment can not only contribute to a uniformly distributed B element enriched region but also benefit the precipitation of α-Fe. After heat-treatment at 563 K × 1 T, Hcj, Br and (BH)max experienced an increase from 513 kA/m to 583 kA/m, 0.57 T to 0.65 T and 37.59 kJ/m3 to 50.05 kJ/m3, respectively. Thus, the Hcj, Br and (BH)max are enhanced by 14%, 14% and 33%, respectively.© 2019Gd6FeBi2 is reported as the only one room-temperature magnet among more than hundreds of compounds with its structural type, which makes it more attractive in potential applications. To reveal the origin of such high ordering temperature, critical behaviors, electronic structure and crystal-field effects of Gd6FeBi2 are investigated in this work. The short-range Gd-Fe ferrimagnetic interaction is supported by the crystal and electronic structure analyses. Unlike the strong Fe-Fe exchange interactions, the Gd-Fe exchange interaction shows limited influence on the critical exponents determined by long-range exchange interactions, which seems a common feature in rare earth – transition metal based alloys without exchange interactions between transition-metal atoms. However, the strong Gd-Fe hybridization reduces the influence of vibronic couplings on the short-range exchange interaction and thus allows a high Tc. The broadening or splitting mechanism of Gd 4f-electron bands is addressed based on crystal-field analysis and likely another factor for elevated Tc in Gd6FeBi2 and Gd-based compounds with non-magnetic elements. Different magnetic behaviors among isostructural compounds, and the relationship between the band splitting and crystal-field effects is also discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we propose a method to identify the magnetostrictive behavior of electrical steel sheet submitted to a mechanical loading. The technique relies on the use of a magneto-mechanical model including the magnetostrictive phenomenon, namely the anhysteretic Jiles-Atherton-Sablik (JAS) model, and experimental macroscopic stress dependent magnetization curves. The method is illustrated with measured magnetization curves of a non-oriented (NO) electrical steel sheet under different stresses. Furthermore, the influence of a bi-axial mechanical loading on the magnetostrictive behavior is analyzed with the help of an equivalent stress.© 2019We present the study of magnetic susceptibility of pyrochlores Gd2Ti2O7, Dy2Ti2O7 and Tb2Ti2O7 which belong to frustrated magnets. The temperature dependence of the susceptibility χ(T) of powder samples was measured in the temperature range from 4.2 to 300 K and analyzed in the framework of mean field approximation taking into account both crystal field effects and anisotropy of the exchange interaction. We developed a simple approach allowing us to estimate interaction energies of magnetic ions from χ(T) dependences and data on wave functions of the crystal-field states of the ions using a minimum number of fitting parameters. We revealed a strong anisotropy of the exchange interaction in the paramagnetic state of Gd2Ti2O7 and obtained nearest-neighbor effective bond energies of the magnetic ions in Tb2Ti2O7 and Dy2Ti2O7 which are in good agreement with the temperatures of formation of the spin-ice state in these compounds.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Targeted cell delivery via magnetic field has presented a potential method to enhance cell targeting and retention efficiency for cell-based therapeutics. In this study, for the first time, a three-dimensional computational fluid dynamic (CFD) model was established in ANSYS Fluent to predict the effect of an external magnetic field on delivery of the cells, labeled with magnetic nanoparticles, through a bend vessel. To track the cells through the vessel in the presence of the magnetic field, an Eulerian-Lagrangian method with one-way coupling was employed. The magnetic force induced to each cell was modeled using User-Defined Function (UDF). The effect of the magnetic field strength, the concentration of magnetic nanoparticles in each cell, Reynolds number, curvature coefficient and the current wire position on cell delivery efficiency were studied. In addition, to validate the numerical solution, an analytical analysis was presented to determine the cell path in a micochannel, in the presence of the magnetic field induced by the current wire. The numerical results reveal that the efficiency of cell delivery is improved by increasing the magnetic strength and the concentration of cellular magnetic nanoparticles. Furthermore, in a blood vessel with high Reynolds number and low curvature coefficient, targeted cell delivery via magnetic field has low capture efficiency.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe report on vertically stacked lateral nanowires (NW)/nanosheets (NS) gate-all-around (GAA) FET devices as promising candidates to obtain a better power-performance metric for logic applications for advanced sub-5 nm technology nodes, in comparison to finFETs. In addition, vertical NW/NS GAA FETs appear particularly attractive for enabling highly dense memory cells such as SRAMs (with improved read and write stability), and as the selector devices for ultra-scaled MRAMs with lower energy consumption values. These cells can be manufactured by a cost-effective, co-integration scheme with a triple-gate finFET or a lateral NW/NS GAA FET high-performance logic platform for increased on-chip memory content.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.For the next-generation spintronic nanodevices, it is highly desirable to explore the ferromagnetic (FM) half-metal materials with high Curie temperature (TC), wide half-metallic gap, and large magnetic anisotropy energy (MAE). Here, from density functional theory calculations, we predict two types of such materials in Mn doped III-N low-density cluster-assembled sodalite (SOD) phases. Specifically, SOD-(Al, Mn)N and -(Ga, Mn)N possess robust FM ground state with high TC temperature of up to 788 K and 633 K, respectively, due to the strong Mn-N exchange interaction. Both of their magnetic moments are calculated to be 4 μB per formula unit. They have large half-metal direct band gaps (1.70 eV and 1.33 eV for SOD-(Al, Mn)N and -(Ga, Mn)N, respectively, which can effectively prevent the spin-flip scattering during spin transportation, guaranteeing the application of half-metallicity at ambient temperature. Moreover, the MAEs of SOD-(Al, Mn)N and -(Ga, Mn)N are −0.56 and −0.53 meV per Mn atom, respectively, about two orders of magnitude larger than those of some traditional magnetic materials. Our findings highlight that the FM systems of SOD-(Al, Mn)N and -(Ga, Mn)N are the promising materials for the applications of spintronics.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe homeostatic neuron circuit using a double-gate MOSFET is proposed to imitate a homeostasis functionality of a biological neuron in spiking neural networks (SNN) based on a spike-timing dependent plasticity (STDP). The threshold voltage (Vth) of the double-gate MOSFET is controlled by independent two-gate biases (VG1 and VG2). By using Vth change of the double-gate MOSFET in the neuron circuits, the fire rate of the output neuron is controlled. The homeostasis functionality is implemented by the operation of multi-neuron system based on the proposed neuron circuit. Through the SNN based on STDP using MNIST datasets, it is demonstrated that the recognition rate (~91%) of the SNN with the proposed homeostasis functionality is higher than that (~79%) of the SNN without the proposed homeostasis functionality. Also, the results of the recognition rate with the variations (σ/μ < 0.5) of the synaptic devices and the initial Vth of neuron circuits show a low degradation (1 ~ 3%) in the recognition rate. Thus, it is demonstrated that the homeostasis functionality of the proposed neuron circuit has the immunity to variations (σ/μ < 0.5) of the synaptic devices and the neuron circuits in the SNN based on STDP.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe effect of 60Co γ-irradiation (5·107 rad) and ultrasound treatment (4 MHz, 2 W/cm2, up to 60 min) on current-voltage characteristics is experimentally investigated in an Au-SiO2-Si structure. The change in the current mechanism is analysed in terms of a modifying defect system. The irradiation is shown to enhance the space charge limited current and trap-assisted tunneling current. Experimental observations of the acoustically induced low temperature annealing of the Pb and E′ centers, which causes the partial recovery of irradiated silicon MOS structure characteristics, are highlighted.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis work presents statistical measurements on the effects of the electrostatic coupling on the on-current, off-current and low frequency noise characteristics of individual top-tier devices, due to bottom-tier devices being biased. No inter-tier coupling impact was observed on device low-frequency noise regardless the transistor area. While for analog applications the coupling-induced ΔVt, ΔIoff and ΔIon might reach high values, it is demonstrated that regarding digital applications, the coupling-induced fluctuations are well below the mismatch effects. TCAD and SPICE simulations were used to fully understand the phenomenon, to predict the effects at SRAM bitcell level and to propose guidelines to contain the inter-tier electrostatic coupling: the coupling effect can be limited either by increasing the Inter-Layer Dielectric (ILD) thickness or through a top/bottom transistor misalignment.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we compare the evolution with temperature of the experimental characteristics of Nanonet-based Field-Effect Transistors, with a modelling of carrier transport in the percolating regime. The main electrical parameters of Nanonet-based Field-Effect Transistors that featured different nanowire densities and source-drain distances were extracted from static measurements at different temperatures. The temperature dependence of low field mobility and threshold voltage was explained by the temperature activated behaviour of inter-nanowire junctions, and the activation energy dispersion of individual junctions. A Monte-Carlo simulation of Nanonet FET in the shape of a random percolating network of resistances and thermally activated junctions was used to confirm the influence of activation energy dispersion on low field mobility. The simplest model which was able to capture experimental trends consisted in a bimodal distribution of activation energies, with a subset of non-thermally activated junctions (resistive junctions) while other junctions were thermally activated (energy barriers at the junctions).© 2020 The AuthorsWe report a novel switched-mode light-emitting device (LED) in an undoped ultra-thin-body (UTB) based on the electrostatically-induced electron-hole bilayer (EHB) concept. The proposed device works on the principle of formation of EHB channels by applying suitable gate biases during the charging-cycle, and their recombination during a discharging-cycle. Using TCAD simulations, we show that continuous switching of the gates in an indium arsenide (InAs) based EHB LED with a ~12 μs time period leads to radiative recombination of the induced charge carriers with a peak internal quantum efficiency (IQE) as high as ~92% and a time-averaged IQE of ~29%. The proposed concept obviates the need for chemically doped p-n junctions in the UTB device for light-emitting applications. However, when relying on the thermal generation alone as a source of charge carriers in a small undoped semiconductor volume, a narrow bandgap semiconductor (such as InAs) is required for the proposed LED which ultimately limits the switching speed. For wider bandgap materials, highly doped regions on either side of the intrinsic UTB layer in the form of a lateral PIN structure could be employed where switching speed is then not limited by thermal generation. TCAD simulations of a silicon (Si) EHB LED based on such a gated PIN structure shows switching capability in the GHz frequency range making it attractive for SOI based optocoupling applications.© 2019This paper discusses a new type of hybrid journal bearing in which a magnetorheological fluid is used in combination with local magnetic fields, such that the hydrodynamic and hydrostatic working regimes are not compromised. This demonstrates the potential of using the concept of rheological texture in bearings. The performance of this new type of bearing is assessed via Finite Element Modelling (FEM) in which the behaviour of the fluid film is described by the ideal Bingham plastic fluid model. Both the yield stress and the viscosity increase as a function of the magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Grain-oriented 6.5% Si steel was produced by strip casting and the effect of warm rolling and cold rolling at the latter stage of rolling was investigated. The result showed the rolling method had a minor influence on the rolling microstructure but significant on the rolling texture. Compared to the cold-rolled sheet, the warm-rolled steel showed strong α-fiber and γ-fiber texture at the surface but weak α-fiber and γ-fiber texture in the center layer. After primary annealing, the warm-rolled sheet showed inhomogeneous microstructure and strong {223}〈110〉 texture together with weak γ-fiber texture. By comparison, the cold-rolled sheet showed fine equiaxed grain with favorable {111}〈112〉 texture component. During secondary annealing, the warm-rolled sample displayed significantly normal grain growth at the initial stage and abnormal grain growth at ~1150 °C. The final microstructure was characterized by coarse matrix grains and abnormal Goss grain. In contrast, the cold-rolled sheet showed complete abnormal grain growth. The different secondary annealing behavior was attributed to different grain structure and texture.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The study of magnetic bubble configuration in Co/Ni multilayers circular dots under in-plane magnetic field enlightens two magnetic force microscopy (MFM) measurement artifacts. We demonstrate that any tilt of the magnetic field producing out-of-plane field component due to the inhomogeneity of the MFM set up strongly affects the shape and size of the magnetic bubble independently of the in-plane field component intensity. Furthermore, MFM signal variations for in-plane magnetic field larger than 0.1 Tesla can only be understood considering MFM tip magnetization rotation. These two artifacts can have strong impact on MFM images and need to be carefully checked for reliable results in imaging skyrmionic structures with MFM under-field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Spatial resolution is a key metric for characterizing any imaging modality. Here we describe magnetic particle imaging (MPI) experiments and complementary magnetic particle spectroscopy (MPS) experiments that reveal and probe significant variations in MPI spatial resolution that are intrinsically coupled to the magnetization dynamics of superparamagnetic nanoparticles. In particular, employing a phase-sensitive MPI detection scheme, we observe a marked spatial sharpening effect as the phase of the demodulation reference is advanced. This increase in spatial resolution is accompanied by degradation of image contrast, to the point where reconstructed images effectively vanish when the demodulation phase is advanced by approximately 90 degrees relative to the phase that yields images with the highest signal-to-noise ratio (SNR). Relaxation- or phase-weighted magnetic particle images with apparent spatial resolutions of order a few hundred microns or better, and with SNRs of order 10 dB or more, are presented, and a qualitative framework for interpreting the role of phase as it pertains to spatial resolution in MPI is introduced.© 2019 The AuthorIn this paper a theoretical and experimental investigation will be presented on the linearity of the flat hysteresis loop obtained by continuous stress annealing of Finemet type nanocrystalline ribbon. The stability of the effective permeability versus the magnetizing field depend on the residual random distribution of local magnetization and can be characterized by i) the coefficient a in the expression of magnetization approaching the saturation: M/Ms = 1 − a/H, valid in a restricted region, for Hlin < H < Hsat, where Hlin is the limit of linearity and by ii) the distribution of the anisotropy field ΔHK. The theoretical upper limit of linearity is given by the anisotropy field HK = Bs/µo.µeff. The linearity limit, Hlin, can be expressed as a difference between the value HK and the half width of the anisotropy field distribution, ΔHK. The linearity will be measured by the ratio R = Hlin/HK. The parameter R is almost constant (around 0.72) for large applied stresses and carefully selected annealing parameters (furnace geometry, temperature distribution along the furnace and pulling velocity). For small applied stresses (i.e. for effective permeability's above 4000) however this linearity parameter is reduced to zero and a potbellied loop appears. A possible explanation will be given for the stress dependence of linearity parameter based on the back stress model of stress annealing.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The spinel cobalt oxide Co3O4 is an antiferromagnetic semiconductor containing two non-equivalent Co2+ and Co3+ cobalt ions with different local environments and different magnetic moments. We have performed ab initio study and comparison of the electronic, magnetic and optical properties of Co3O4 within GGA, GGA + U, and G0W0 approximations. GGA correctly predicts Co3O4 to be a semiconductor, but severely underestimates the bandgap. G0W0 approximations increase the bandgap indicating a better description of the cobalt localized d-states. The spectral weights of the bands near Fermi energy are about 0.5. Ab initio calculations confirm that the low-spin state of Co3+ ion arises due to the local environment and the crystal effect field. The investigation of the pressure dependencies of magnetic properties revealed the appearance of Co3+ ion abrupt transition from low-spin state to high-spin state under tensile pressure. This allows manipulating the spin state of Co3+ ions through the pressure or strain.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe interest of 5G in centimeter and millimeter waves relies on large blocks of available spectra and thus increased bandwidth. At these frequencies, the dielectric and conductive losses of the substrate can greatly degrade the performances of RF circuits. With high electrical resistivity and low relative permittivity, porous silicon is an ideal candidate as a high-quality RF substrate. This paper presents an innovative technique of post device fabrication integration of porous silicon (POST-PSi) with the substrate. The frontside is not involved in porous layer growth and therefore the integrity of the RF circuitry is not impacted by the POST-PSi process. A comparison of the RF performances with benchmark trap-rich (TR) RF silicon substrate is presented. In addition to its compatibility with standard microfabrication processes and stable final structure, POST-PSi provides characteristics of low losses, high isolation and very high linearity, unmatched by any other silicon-based substrate. Finally, the substrate's RF performance is evaluated at high temperature, and POST-PSi substrate linearity is shown to remain sufficiently high for RF and 5G applications up to 175 °C.© 2019 The AuthorsNew computation schemes inspired by biological processes are arising as an alternative to standard von-Neumann architectures, to provide hardware accelerators for information processing based on a neural networks approach. Systems of frequency-locked, coupled oscillators are investigated using the phase difference of the signal as the state variable rather than the voltage or current amplitude. As previously shown, these oscillating neural networks can efficiently solve complex and unstructured tasks such as image recognition. We have built nanometer scale relaxation oscillators based on the insulator–metal transition of VO2. Coupling these oscillators with an array of tunable resistors offers the perspective of realizing compact oscillator networks. In this work we show experimental coupling of two oscillators. The phase of the two oscillators could be reversibly altered between in-phase and out-of-phase oscillation upon changing the value of the coupling resistor, i.e. by tuning the coupling strength. The impact of the variability of the devices on the coupling performances are investigated across two generations of devices.© 2019 Elsevier LtdResistive switching (RS) device (memristor) technology is continuously maturing towards industrial establishment. There are RS devices that demonstrate an “incremental” (analog) switching behavior, whereas others change their state in a binary form. The final achieved resistance is generally a function of the applied pulse characteristics, i.e. amplitude and duration. However, variability —both from device to device but also from cycle to cycle— and the stochastic nature of internal RS phenomena, still hold back any universal tuning approach based solely on these two magnitudes, making also difficult the qualitative comparison between devices with different material compounds owing to the required SET/RESET voltages being dependent on the biasing conditions. In this work we demonstrate experimentally using commercial RS devices from Knowm Inc. that the switching energy is very insensitive to the biasing conditions. We explored experimentally the SET-RESET behavior of bipolar RS devices from the energy point of view. We figured out the quantitative effect of the injected energy to the resistive state of the devices, and proposed an analytical model to explain our observations in the energy consumed by the device during the switching process. Our results lay the foundations for the definition of “resistance change per energy unit” as a performance parameter for this emerging device technology.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe analyze that the initial synaptic weight distribution affects the performance, such as the learning speed, recognition rate and the power consumption in the spiking neural networks (SNNs) based on spike-timing-dependent plasticity (STDP) learning rule. A thin-film transistor (TFT)-type NOR flash memory is used as a synaptic device. In this fully connected two-layer neuromorphic system using the proposed pulse scheme, the results with and without the homeostasis functionality were analyzed separately. In addition, power consumption of the network in various initial synaptic weight distributions, and recognition rate that varies with the number of output neurons are also investigated. In pattern recognition for 28 × 28 MNIST handwritten patterns, higher performance is achieved in various aspects when the initial synaptic weights are distributed near the maximum value.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we demonstrate experimentally a novel SOI-based photodiode using electrostatic doping and fabricated in a simple, low-cost process. Unlike a conventional ion-implanted pn junction diode, the electrostatically doped devices feature extremely low reverse-bias current. When used for photodetection, our devices exhibit a dark current three decades lower than a conventional photodiode and provide excellent detectivity even under low optical power density. Our electrostatically-doped diodes also feature enhanced response in the near-UV and 1/f low-frequency noise.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Transverse magneto-optical measurements of iron oxide magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) dispersed in water was studied by using a 532 nm laser light and a reflection cell composed of a glass prism and a shallow cell or a glass prism and a deep cell. In the shallow cell, the absorbance of the bulk phase of the dispersion was measured in the low MNPs concentration of 0.005–0.2 wt%, but in the higher concentration than 0.2 wt% the absorbance of the interface was observed predominantly. The deep cell allowed measuring the absorbance of the interface in the wide MNPs concentration range of 0.018–3 wt%. The observed absorbances were analyzed according to Langevin equation, which gave the magnetic moment of MNPs and the absorbance at the saturated magnetization of MNPs. By the present method, the interfacial adsorption of COOH modified MNPs assisted by a cationic surfactant at the glass/water interface was demonstrated.© 2019Rare-earth-free permanent magnet Mn-Ga alloys have attracted wide interest owing to their large magnetocrystalline anisotropy and high Curie temperature. In this work, we reported a large coercivity of ~22 kOe at room temperature in the Mn3−xGa film, deposited by magnetron sputtering on the Si(0 0 1)/SiO2 substrate. Combined analyses of the x-ray diffraction, magnetization and high-resolution transmission electron microscopy revealed a cubic α-Mn phase coexisting with the main D022 ferrimagnetic phase in the film. It is proved that the mixed structures can refine the magnetic domains, thus enhancing the coercivity in the high temperature annealed sample.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An irreversible regenerative Brayton refrigerator cycle is established, in which the nonperfect regenerator, regenerative time, heat leak, and irreversible adiabatic processes are taken into account. The mathematical expressions of the refrigeration rate, coefficient of performance, and thermoeconomic function of the refrigeration cycle are derived and the thermoeconomic function is optimized. Moreover, choosing Gd, Gd0.95Dy0.05 and Gd0.95Er0.05 as the working substances respectively, we discussed in detail the influences of the thermoeconomic and thermodynamic parameters on the optimal thermoeconomic and thermodynamic performances. The results show that the thermoeconomic performance of the refrigeration cycle using Gd or Gd0.95Dy0.05 as the working substance is better than that using Gd0.95Er0.05 and the thermoeconomic performance of the refrigeration cycle using Gd0.95Dy0.05 as the working substance is better than that using Gd in the situation with the lower adiabatic magnetization.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The 3d-metal chromites ACr2O4 where A is a magnetic ion, show the paramagnetic to ferrimagnetic phase transition at TC while for non-magnetic A-site ion, ACr2O4 show paramagnetic to antiferromagnetic phase transition at TN. In this report, we present the detailed study of magnetic and the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) of the 3d-metal chromites ACr2O4 (where A = Mn, Fe, Co, Ni, Cu, and Zn) near TC and TN. We find the magnitude of MCE (-ΔSM) decreases on decreasing the magnetic moment of A-site ion with an exception for CuCr2O4. Additionally, to know more about the order and nature of phase transition, we have made a scaling analysis of (-ΔSM) for all the chromites across the phase transition temperatures TC and TN.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Microstructure, revealed by X-ray diffraction and transmission Mössbauer spectroscopy, and some thermomagnetic properties of the amorphous Fe70-xCoxMn10Mo5B15 (x = 0, 0.25 and 0.5) alloys in the as-quenched state and after accumulative annealing at Ta1=723K, Ta2=753K, Ta3=853K and Ta4=903K for 0.5 h have been studied. After the annealing at Ta1 and then at Ta2 the ribbons remain in the amorphous state, whereas after the final heat treatments at Ta3 and Ta4 they are partially crystallized. The grains of the hexagonal ε-Fe80Mn20 phase, 8 nm and 12 nm in size after the annealing at Ta3 and Ta4 for x = 0 and 0.5, respectively, are paramagnetic at room temperature and the first product of crystallization. After the final annealing at Ta4 in samples containing Co (x = 0.25 and x = 0.5) α-Fe grains are also detected. X-ray diffraction studies are qualitatively very consistent with transmission Mössbauer spectra measurements. The Curie temperature (TC) for x = 0 decreases after the annealing at Ta1 in comparison with the as-quenched state and then increases after the heat treatment at Ta2, whereas in the alloys containing Co atoms (x = 0.25 and 0.5) only the increase of TC on annealing at Ta1 and at Ta2 is observed as compared to the as-quenched state. Isothermal magnetic entropy change is rather modest and reaches its peak value in the vicinity of the Curie temperature of the amorphous phase. The higher TC the larger peak value of the magnetic entropy change. An attempt to elucidate such behavior is undertaken.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The electronic properties and spin magnetism of graphene nanoribbon doped with triangular BN flake are systematically investigated. For the spin polarized state, the size of the triangular BN flake could tailor the spin magnetism of devices. More importantly, it will intrigue property of bipolar magnetic semiconducting with the spin-filtering efficiency (SFE) nearly reaching 100% and keep good transport property when the triangular BN flake is large enough. Although the triangular vacancies also present a bipolar magnetic semiconducting property with a higher SFE, the transmission probability drops dramatically and the stability is no more than those of triangle BN flake.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Research on magnetic particles dispersed in a fluid medium, actuated by a rotating magnetic field, is becoming increasingly active for both lab-on-chip and bio-sensing applications. In this study, we experimentally investigate the behaviour of ferromagnetic filaments in a rotating field. Filaments are synthesized by linking micron-sized ferromagnetic particles with DNA strands. The experiments were conducted under different magnetic field strengths, frequencies and filament sizes, and deformation of the filaments was registered via microscope and camera. The results obtained showed that the body deformation is larger for longer filaments and higher frequencies. The angle between the filament tangent at the centre and the magnetic field direction increases linearly with frequency at the low-frequency regime. A further increase in the frequency will result in filament movement out of plane when the angle approaches 90 degrees. The experimental results were used to estimate the magnetic moment and the bending elasticity of the filament.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we studied the structural, electronic, magnetic, and optical properties of (ZnTe)m/(MnTe)n superlattices with very small size layers (m-n: 1-1, 2-2, and 3-1). This work is purely theoretical and it's performed using the functional density theory (DFT) with the full-potential linear muffin-tin orbital (FP-LMTO) method implemented in the LmtART calculation code. We adopted the GGA + U formalism for the exchange-correlation potential. The obtained results demonstrate the existence of a strong correlation between the electronic, magnetic and optical properties of (ZnTe)m/(MnTe)n superlattices and their structural properties. In addition, and for more details on the behavior of these nanostructure systems, the density of states (DOS and PDOS), the s-d exchange constant (N0α) and the p-d exchange constant (N0β) are calculated and analyzed. The dielectric function ε(ω) is calculated for radiation energies up to 35 eV. The obtained results show that the static dielectric constant increases significantly with the increase in the number of monolayers m.© 2019A series of rare earth Pr3+ element substituted, Sr1-xPrxMn2Fe4O11 (x = 0, 0.02, 0.06, 0.1) R-type hexagonal ferrites has been synthesized by adopting the Sol-gel method. The influence of Pr-substitution on its structural, electrical, dielectric and magnetic behavior was examined. XRD patterns indicate the single phase for all the samples. The lattice parameters and unit cell volume changed with the substitution of Pr3+ contents. The electrical resistivity of the sample significantly varied with the substitution of Pr3+ ions. The sample with the Pr3+ concentration x = 0.1 was observed to have highest resistivity among the others. The dielectric constant was found to decrease at high frequencies for all samples. The tangent loss revealed the hopping type conduction between Fe3+ and Fe2+ sites. The increase in AC conductivity was observed as a function of frequency. The sample with concentration x = 0.1 revealed the maximum value of polarization. A peculiar magnetic trend was observed for all samples upon the substitution of Pr-contents. The unsubstituted sample exhibited the soft ferrimagnetic properties while the paramagnetic behavior was observed for Pr concentration x = 0.02 and last two concentrations (x = 0.06 and 0.1) unveiled the superparamagnetic nature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A new cluster approximation based on the effective field theory for Ising systems is presented. The application of the presented method to the most basic model, namely the spin-1/2 Ising model has been carried out. Obtained critical temperatures for spin-1/2 Ising model improves the results of Bethe-Pierls approximation. Generalization of this approximation to the other spin models such as higher spin Ising model and Heisenberg model, that are capable of explaining the magnetic properties of the real materials have been discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a new method is presented for the magnetic characterization of nanoparticles that is especially suitable for samples with a low mass, on the order of tens of micrograms. We investigated the magnetic and morphological properties of the colloidal dispersions of iron oxide magnetic nanoparticles that were synthesized by two methods: chemical precipitation (co-precipitation) and pulsed laser ablation in liquid (PLA). We measured the stray field generated above the samples by scanning magnetic microscopy (SMM) and used a nonstandard model to obtain the magnetization of the nanoparticles. We assessed the performance of the method by comparing the magnetization curves with measurements obtained using commercial magnetometers. The errors in the saturation and remanent magnetization were found to be approximately ±0.18 Am2/kg and ±0.6 Am2/kg, respectively. As the samples exhibited a superparamagnetic state, we also used the magnetization curves to estimate the average size of the synthesized nanoparticles, which were found to be consistent with the results obtained using other techniques.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Density functional theory is applied to investigate the relative stability of Fe in different phases (bcc, fcc and hcp) for both the nonmagnetic (NM), ferromagnetic (FM) and anti-ferromagnetic (AFM) states as well as the effect of pressure. From the calculated enthalpy as a function of pressure, we predict the phase transition pathway for Fe at T = 0 K as: bccFM→10GPahcpAFM2→30.2GPahcpNM→116GPafccFM. A new intermediate, which is the hcp (AFM2) phase, was obtained. The resulting enthalpy of each phase indicates that the hcp AFM2 phase is more favorable than the hcp NM phase, thus we suggest the existence of novel transition under pressure from bcc FM to hcp AFM2 phase around 10 GPa. The calculated elastic constants Cij for the preferred pressure induced transition phases satisfy the criteria for elastic stability. Also these phases are dynamically stable based on the phonon dispersion and phonon total density of states considerations.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we fabricated semi-transparent organic-inorganic hybrid perovskite light-emitting diodes (st-PeLEDs) using the solution processing of all its functional layers including the silver nanowire network (AgNW) cathode under ambient air conditions with relative humidity (RH) of over 40%. Aerogel nanoparticle film was used to passivate the film defects in the ambient air processed methylammonium lead bromide (MAPbBr3) perovskite nanocrystal. The semi-transparent aerogel nanoparticle film and AgNW cathode also allowed the emitted light of the st-PeLED to be transmitted through them in addition to the transmission of emitted light through the indium tin oxide (ITO) transparent anode. Under ambient air fabrication conditions with RH of over 40%, the st-PeLEDs fabricated using the optimized nitrogen (N2) gas blowing method provided high maximum luminance (L) of approximately 657 cd·m−2 emission through the bottom ITO anode and 320 cd·m−2 emission through the top AgNW cathode. Furthermore, excellent operational stability was confirmed during bending and twisting of the st-PeLEDs with aerogel passivation layer fabricated on flexible polymer substrate.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have performed magnetic measurements such as temperature (T), cooling field (μ0HFC) dependence and training effect of exchange bias (EB) to investigate the magnetic nature of the interface in the Fe/Ir20Mn80 system. Bilayers of different thicknesses of Ir20Mn80 (antiferromagnetic) have been prepared by dc magnetron sputtering at room temperature. The variation of exchange bias field (μ0HEB) with Ir20Mn80 thickness indicates that the ‘bulk’ spins of the antiferromagnet contribute to EB. Exponential decay of μ0HEB and coercive field (μ0HC) with T reveals the possible presence of a spin glass (SG) like interface. The decrease of μ0HEB with increasing μ0HFC provides further evidence of SG like behaviour at the interface. The results of training effect data indicate the presence of frozen and rotatable spins at the magnetically frustrated interface of these Fe/Ir20Mn80 bilayers.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have fabricated Ce/Pd bilayers grown on the SiO2 substrate by magnetron sputtering under ultrahigh vacuum. Usage of palladium layer on top of the Ce film appears to prevent effectively the sample oxidation. The thickness of the cerium films is between 10-200 nm and 10 nm-thick palladium overlayers are always used. We have performed in-situ X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy on the as-deposited films and ex-situ electrical resistivity measurements and XRD characterization. XPS confirms a very good quality of the samples. The analysis of the Ce 3d spectrum suggests that the f states of Ce are on the border between the fluctuating valence and localization. The resistivity measurements reveal a competition of the Kondo scattering, semiconducting and metallic behaviors as well as the influence of the dimensional effect.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we investigate the intercalation effects of Iron (Fe) in the van der Waals gap of Bi2Se3 on the magnetic and transport properties using first-principles band structure estimations combined with dynamical mean-field theory. The Dirac cone in the band structure of parent Bismuth Selenide is modified via Fe intercalation at moderate densities. Further inclusion of electronic correlations found to result in the emergence of novel and exotic properties in an intercalated Bi2Se3. Accompanied by unconventional structural effects, the onset of an orbital selective metal insulator transition in the Fe 3d orbitals brings about a magnetic phase transition in the Fe intercalated Bi2Se3. Additionally we have explored the dependency of the electron-electron correlations on the magnetic ordering and the effects of intercalation in establishing new physical properties.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we demonstrate MoS2/n-GaN and MoS2/p-GaN vertical heterostructures using chemical vapor deposition (CVD). The few-layer MoS2 was grown with wafer-scale homogeneity and confirmed to have n-type characteristics by sulfur vacancy. The optical band gap, Fermi level, and work function of MoS2 and GaN were extracted using Hall measurement, ultraviolet–visible absorption, and ultraviolet photoelectron spectroscopy (UPS) analysis, to derive the band diagram of the heterostructures. The band diagrams for both MoS2/n-GaN and MoS2/p-GaN heterostructures show straddling alignment (type I) and are well matched with the results of the current–voltage (I–V) measurement. The ohmic characteristic of MoS2/n-GaN was shown in the fabricated devices. In contrast, in the case of MoS2/p-GaN, diode characteristic with tunneling current at reverse bias was confirmed. Our results suggest that the electrical properties of 2D/3D heterostructure strongly depend on the doping of the 3D material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents an experimental study of magnetic properties of the LaFeCoSi alloy near the magnetic phase transition at the Curie temperature of 306 K. The biased magnetizing field complies with the real magnetization of active magnetic regenerators, whereas the standards for testing soft magnetic materials recommend the approach based on the bipolar magnetizing field. The influence of the DC-biased magnetic field on dynamic hysteresis loops and power losses was studied. The investigations confirmed a significant drop of power losses under biased magnetization and proved that the impact of the time of the magnetizing field switching between the isomagnetic states is critical, as far as the field distribution inside the sample and the magnitude of magnetic losses are concerned.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the effect of the excess oxygen on the structural, magnetic, and transport properties in LaMnO3 thin films by post-annealing in the oxygen atmosphere. The ferromagnetism and conductivity of the LaMnO3 films are greatly enhanced after post-annealing. The valence states of Mn ions are trivalent in the as-grown film and become trivalent and tetravalent mixed in the annealed film. Jahn-Teller interaction is suppressed due to a reduction of MnO6 distortion, confirmed by Raman spectra. The conversion from Mn3+ to Mn4+ and suppression of the Jahn-Teller interaction are responsible for the enhancement of ferromagnetism and conductivity in annealed films.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Our previous Mössbauer studies have shown that the A1 to L10 structural transformation in equiatomic FePd is a complex transformation of the cascade type. The FePd ordering involves more phases that one may expect. In addition to the ordered L10 phase it can proceed via the cubic ordered L12 (Pm-3m) phase and intermediate low-symmetry phases, namely the disordered tetragonal phase A6 (I4/mmm), the modified L10* phase (P4/mmm), the ordered hexagonal Fe2Pd and FePd2 (P-3m1), the ordered tetragonal FePd2 (I4/mmm) and probably, the orthorhombic 5:3 (Cmmm) phases. We theoretically investigate the phase stability of proposed phases using first principle density functional calculations. Structurally, tetragonal L10* modified, cubic FePd3, tetragonal FePd2 and orthorhombic Fe3Pd5 are energetically stable and likely to form in the course of the A1 to L10 structural transformation. All these phases show interesting magnetic properties. We report magnetization, Curie temperature and magnetocrystalline anisotropy of these phases.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The new type Fe-rich Fe-B-Cu-Hf alloys show a great of potential applications as the energy-saving soft magnetic materials, due to its especial α-Fe/amorphous dual phases structure contributes to the high saturation magnetization (Ms), permeability (μe) and low loss cost (W), coercivity (Hc). However, these alloys are difficult to be used actually with the uniform α-Fe/amorphous dual phases structure, on account of the poor glass forming ability (GFA) and the difficulty of crystallizing α-Fe away from the Fe-B compounds precipitation. Therefore, the effects by Si substituting of minor B on GFA, thermal stability, crystallization behaviors and magnetic properties in Fe86B13−xSixCu0.4Hf0.6 alloys have been researched. The results show that Si microalloying is prominent and the ribbons with entire amorphous can still be easily fabricated as Si content is less than x = 1.0. As x = 0.75 and x = 1.0, the amorphous alloys have a two-step crystallization process and the uniform α-Fe/amorphous dual phases structure is easy to be fabricated. After annealing, the crystallized ribbons show a quick increasing trend of Ms values and reach to the maximum approximately 208 emu/g as the annealing temperature is near Tp1, and Hc values are effectively decreased by an auxiliary annealing process applied the magnetic field. The new developed Fe-B-Si-Cu-Hf system alloys with excellent soft magnetic properties show a great application prospect as the novel Fe-based soft magnetic materials.© 2019To predict the stress-dependent magnetization properties of silicon steel using a multiscale magnetization model called assembled domain structure model, pinning field models are developed using the play model. The hysteretic property of pinning field is identified from measured BH loops under stress-free condition. From the unidirectional hysteretic property, the distribution of the play hysterons is determined via an identification method that uses scalar and vector play models under the assumption of 2D or 3D distribution of crystal orientations. The loss properties of non-oriented silicon steel under compressive and tensile stresses are predicted successfully using an energy minimization process without parameter fitting to the stress-dependent measurement results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and magnetization reversal processes in a (Pt/CoFe/MgO)10 film were studied as a function of temperature (100–300 K) using hysteresis loops and the first-order reversal curve (FORC) method. The coercivity, saturation magnetization, remanence and effective anisotropy field are enhanced as the temperature decreases. Also, as the temperature changes from 300 to 100 K, the distribution of the irreversible reversal magnetization field shifts from 100 to −20 Oe along the reversal field Hr axis. Two different sets of “hysterons” and interparticle magnetostatic interactions were clearly observed in the sample at 100 K.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Soft magnetic composites based on spherical supersendust (Fe85Si8Al4Ni3) powder were made by gas atomization. The nano-ZnFe2O4 layer was coated on the surface of Fe85Si8Al4Ni3 powder particles by in-situ oxidation. Core-shell structured microspheres were achieved and then mixed with epoxy-modified silicone resin. Lorentz-transmission electron microscopy confirmed the core-shell structure of the Fe85Si8Al4Ni3-ZnFe2O4 microspheres. The uniform surface layer consisted of nano-ZnFe2O4 layer was clarified by scanning electron microscopy and energy dispersive spectroscopy X-ray analysis. The ferromagnetic nano-ZnFe2O4 layer effectively reduces magnetic dilution, while high electrical resistivity of both ZnFe2O4 and ESR provides satisfactory insulation of the SMCs, giving rise to simultaneous high permeability and extraordinary low core loss. Magnetic properties were determined using a vibrating sample magnetometer and an auto testing system for magnetic materials (SY8258B-H/m). The results show that the samples prepared at 1200 MPa and 550 ℃ exhibited distinguished magnetic properties, with core loss of 89 W/kg (100 kHz, 50 mT) and amplitude permeability of 50 whose frequency stability is up to 170 kHz. The Fe85Si8Al4Ni3 SMCs with excellent soft magnetic properties provide great potential for application of various fields such as transformers, sensors and electromagnetic actuation devices. Our approach can be expanded to other Fe-based SMCs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hard/soft SrCo0.02Zr0.02Fe11.96O19/MFe2O4 (M = Ni, Co, Cu, Mn and Zn) nanocomposites have been fabricated efficiently via one-pot sol-gel combustion route. The influence of different type of spinel were examined by XRD (X-ray diffraction), SEM – TEM (scanning and transmission electron microscopies) systems and VSM (vibrating sample magnetometer). The XRD investigation of Hard/soft nanocomposites revealed the tailoring between hexaferrite and spinel ferrite phases. Magnetization measurements (M vs. H) were performed at room (T = 300 K) and low temperature (T = 10 K) and diverse magnetic parameters comprising Ms (saturation magnetization), Mr (remanence), coercivity (Hc), and so on were determined. Smooth M vs. H curves and single peaks in dM/dH vs. H plots were observed for various prepared nanocomposites. The Henkel plots and maximum energy products were also determined and analyzed. Various prepared hard/soft nanocomposites indicated relatively high values of diverse magnetic parameters. Diverse findings disclosed the incidence of exchange-coupling spring behavior among various soft and hard magnetic phases. Measurements of ZFC-FC magnetizations showed the existence of a peak temperature values, which are largely ascribed to competition between the motion of magnetic domain walls and thermal activations. It is revealed that one-pot sol-gel combustion route is valuable to attain strong exchange coupling among hard and soft nanoparticle phases grown near to each other. The obtained findings indicated that these nanocomposites are promising candidates for numerous practical applications.© 2019 The AuthorElectrical steel (ES) is the optimal material for magnetic cores of large electrical machines and transformers. This material is graded according to the value of its specific total loss (PS). Due to Goss texture the ES displays anisotropy of magnetic properties. The anisotropy is also crucial in the selection for applications of ES. This paper presents the anisotropy behaviour of PS loss components in Goss oriented ES. The analysis shows that similarity between hysteresis Ph and excess Pex loss components differs from grade to grade of grain oriented ES. The similarity is dependent on many factors such as on chemical composition or thickness. The presented paper can be helpful in better understanding of loss mechanism in ES and improvement of directional model of PS loss.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The SmCo5 nanoflakes covered with polyvinylpyrrolidone (PVP) surfactant are obtained via surfactant-assisted ball milling method and were treated by ligand-exchange and vacuum heat-treatment methods. No significant change in the phase structure and surface morphology of as-milled SmCo5 nanoflakes was found upon those as confirmed by X-ray diffraction (XRD) and scanning electron microscopy (SEM) analysis, respectively. Moreover, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) analysis revealed that the ligand-exchange and vacuum heat-treatment are effective techniques for removing the polyvinylpyrrolidone (PVP) surfactant from the surface of SmCo5 nanoflakes. Meanwhile, the mechanism of coercivity is studied by the temperature dependence of demagnetization curves, which indicates that the magnetization reversal is controlled by co-existed mechanisms of pinning and nucleation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanowires arrays are an important type of structures for magnetic recording media and spintronic devices owe to their unique order dense packing system. Here, gradient diameter FeNi alloys nanowires arrays (GDNWs) were successfully prepared by a constant potential electrodeposition method into a tapered anodic aluminium oxide template. The transmission electron microscopy (TEM), electronic differential system (EDS), selected area electron diffraction (SAED) and X-ray diffraction (XRD) demonstrated that the polycrystalline fcc Fe30Ni70 GDNWs were obtained and the GDNWs diameter decreasing linearly from the thick end to the thin end was about 106 nm and 28 nm. The effects of gradient diameter on magnetic properties of GDNWs were compared to uniform diameter FeNi nanowires (UDNWs) by hysteresis measurements and first-order reversal curves (FORCs) curves. The results revealed that increasing UDNWs diameter changed domain state from single domain (SD) to multi-domain (MD) state and decreased the irreversible components. However, with changing gradient diameter, the domain state of GDNWs was SD, and the SD GDNWs with enhanced magnetostatic interactions had irreversible components of 83.5% and reversible components of 16.5%. The magnetic interaction, magnetic domain states and reversibility of GDNWs were different from those of UDNWs.© 2019 Elsevier LtdMeasurement noise acts as a barrier to the accurate calculation of threshold voltage by derivative-based extraction methods. We examined several smoothing techniques and their effects on measurement noise in threshold voltage extracted by the linear extrapolation method and the gm/Id method. We applied these techniques on a set of SiC power MOSFET devices before and after they had undergone accelerated thermal testing. The smoothing methods examined are least-squares polynomial fitting, low-pass filtering using Butterworth and Chebyshev filters, and differential smoothing. These methods are compared by their shift in threshold voltage compared to unsmoothed data and their standard deviation among the measurements of each device. All methods performed poorly at smoothing when extracting via the gm/Id due to the large amounts of high-magnitude subthreshold noise, mostly tending to extract threshold voltages far below the expected value. Differential smoothing provided results closest to the expected value with an absolute shift of 1.2 V on average. The smoothing methods performed better with the LE method. On a failed device, all smoothing methods except polynomial smoothing preserved the large threshold voltage anomaly for four out of five measurements. These results show that choice of smoothing method, if used must be evaluated based on the device and extraction method.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.To elevate the electromagnetic interference (EMI) shielding and heat-resistance properties of carbonyl iron powders (CIPs), we synthesized the silver (Ag) capsulated on CIPs by a simple electroless plating process with different process conditions. Samples are characterized by scanning electron microscope (SEM), X-ray diffraction analysis (XRD), thermal gravimetric analyses (TGA) and vector network analyzer (VNA), respectively. The TG result shows that the existence of Ag can prevent CIPs from being oxidized at high temperature. The Ag coated CIPs composite materials possess excellent EMI shielding performance in X-band (8.2 GHz–12.4 GHz), which originates from the synergistic effect of electricity and magnetism. Additionally, the total EMI shielding effectiveness (SET) of the composite with the optimum experiment condition can exceed ~33 dB in the whole X-band, which has a high potential for use as EMI material.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe effect of channel hot carrier stress has been investigated in pMOSFETs with respect to channel hole trapping by the gate oxide traps and the resultant Random Telegraph Signals (RTS) observed at the output. Process- and stress- induced oxide traps have been identified through RTS measurements. These traps are believed to be E′ centers, acting as hole-attractive or repulsive centers, causing RTS through correlated carrier number and mobility fluctuations. Generation of E′ centers as well as activation of the passivated oxide defects as a result of stress are thought to be the reasons behind observing the stress-induced RTS. Two of the observed defects: one process-induced and one stress-induced trap have disappeared and reappeared randomly with stress. We report the reaction of the defects with hydrogen to be responsible for the volatile nature of the traps. Hydrogen is either bound to the Si/SiO2 interface or trapped at the oxide defects. Applying the stress releases these hydrogen species, which then drift towards the gate through the oxide layer and react with the oxide defects to passivate them. Reaction with another hydrogen de-passivates the defect releasing H2. This is the first article that reports hydrogen to deactivate and reactivate oxide traps responsible for RTS.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Frequency dispersion of RF complex permeability of Ni-Cu-Zn ferrites prepared under different amplitudes and durations of applied hydraulic pressure have been thoroughly investigated. The Ni0.35Cu0.19Zn0.46Fe2O4 ferrites were prepared by conventional ceramic synthesis process. The obtained ferrite powders were pressed under different hydraulic pressures (4 MPa, 8 MPa, 12 MPa) of different durations (30 s, 2 min, 3 min and 5 min). It was noted that the complex permeability spectra change considerably with respect to the application of different amplitudes and durations of hydraulic pressure before sintering. Porosity and grain size play an important role in affecting the permeability and magnetic loss of the sintered ferrite samples. A significant increase of the real part of the complex permeability from 96 to 151 was achieved due to the application of hydraulic pressure of 8 MPa for 30 s as compare to manually pressed sample. The magnetic loss tangent also increased from 0.01 to 0.02 as the imaginary part of the complex permeability increased, which is still acceptable for most of the wireless power transfer (WPT) applications. It is postulated that the hydraulic pressure applied before sintering of ferrite powder-based specimen increases the real part of permeability while influencing magnetic loss tangent much less severely.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, using numerical simulations, analytical modeling and experimental data, we validate the applicability of the transconductance-to-current ratio (gm/ID) derivative (d(gm/ID)/dVG) method for extracting the threshold voltage (VTH) in junctionless (JL) MOSFETs and show its advantages over the commonly-used transconductance derivative (or double derivative of drain current) method (dgm/dVG≡d2ID/dVG 2). It is shown that, although both methods are based on the same theoretical VTH-criterion, the d(gm/ID)/dVG method is more accurate than the d2ID/dVG 2 method due to its lesser sensitivity to the gate-voltage-dependent mobility and series resistance parasitic effects, being particularly important in JL MOSFETs.© 2019 Elsevier LtdA recently developed nonlocal history dependent model for electron and hole impact ionization is used to compute the gain and the excess noise factor in avalanche photodiodes featuring heterojunctions of III-V compound semiconductors while accounting for both carriers. The model has been calibrated with measurements by our group, as well as on noise versus gain data from the literature. We explore the avalanche photodiode design trade-offs related to the number of GaAs/AlGaAs conduction band steps for X-ray spectroscopy applications.© 2019For the first time, we propose a 3D-monolithic SRAM architecture with a local back-plane for top-tier transistors enabling local back-bias assist techniques without area penalty, as well as the capability to route two additional row-wise signals on individual back planes. Experimental data are extracted from a 14 nm planar Fully-Depleted-Silicon-On-Insulator (FDSOI) 0.078 µm2 SRAM cell in order to properly model 3D top-tier cells. BTI measurements are done to ensure that the proposed assist do not provide additional stress. Simulations show this technique yields a 7% bitline capacitance reduction, a 12%/50% read/write access time improvement at VDD = 0.8 V and a reduction of minimum operating voltage Vmin by 60 mV (up to 92 mV with speed penalty) at 6σ w.r.t. planar SRAMs.© 2019 Elsevier LtdA novel haze technique for analyzing point-defect distribution in Czochralski Si (CZ-Si) wafers without intentional contamination by transition metals was proposed. Based on the background haze in high-temperature oxidation, a three-step oxidation process including two-step low-temperature precipitation and a single-step high-temperature wet oxidation process was designed. After the newly designed heat processing and preferential etching, surface haze was formed selectively on the interstitial-dominant region of the wafer. Through electron microscopy analysis, surface defects decorated with Ni were observed, which suggested that the surface accumulation of non-gettered Ni adsorbed from the furnace causes surface haze on the interstitial-dominated region. The widths of the hazes could be optimized by adjusting the processing times of the first two steps, which affected the Ni gettering ability in the vacancy-dominated regions of the wafers. Additionally, the second stage at 1000 °C was associated with precipitate growth, as well as with haze formation.© 2019Preliminary results are reported on an in-situ heater for thermal assist recovery of MOS transistor and is demonstrated in 28 nm Fully Depleted Silicon-On-Insulator (FD-SOI) Ultra-Thin Body and Buried oxide (UTBB) high-k metal gate CMOS technology. This approach consists in functionalizing the source of a MOS device. We demonstrate that it is possible to heat the device with the current flowing between two split source contacts. Electrical and temperature measurements of the structures were made at wafer level. Moreover, 3D TCAD electro-thermal simulations assess the concept. The thermal resistor calibration on source and gate are performed on low and high VT NMOS devices with thin and thick high-k metal gate oxide. We have successfully reproduced the I-V responses on several samples at wafer level by electrical sweep in the 100 ns range into the split source contacts. The local temperature change effect was measured from room temperature up to +300 K. Finally, this first study shows that the thermal recovery is efficient and opens the door on new innovative solutions and could be applied on other technology nodes.© 2019 Elsevier LtdPEALD-grown hafnia and alumina buried oxide (BOX) stacks in silicon-on-insulator (SOI) structures were produced and characterized by XTEM and pseudo-MOSFET techniques. The ferroelectric phases of hafnia were observed by XTEM and SAED. It was shown that the minimal interface states density (IFS) < 1012 cm−2 and the maximal one with a memory window MW ~1 V could be obtained by the right choice of high-k dielectric layer sequence in BOX stack and thermal processing.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Equiatomic RNi (where R = Gd, Ho and Er) compounds have been prepared by undercooling. Magnetization data confirm ferromagnetic ordering of the samples at 69 K, 35 K and 10 K (TC) respectively. Magnetocaloric effect (MCE) has been estimated in terms of isothermal magnetic entropy change (ΔSm) near TC. The maximum ΔSm value (ΔSm max) for 50 kOe field change is about −18 Jkg-1K−1, −20 Jkg-1K−1 and −30 Jkg-1K−1 respectively near TC for the undercooled RNi (R = Gd, Ho and Er) compounds. The ΔSm max value is more than that obtained for the same compounds prepared by arc-melting and melt-spinning techniques. The observed enhancement in MCE of the undercooled samples could be due to the improved purity that results in faster change of magnetization around the magnetic transition. Thus undercooling rare earth intermetallics and alloys seems to be an attractive, alternative method to synthesize magnetocaloric materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the effect of transition metal substitution on the structure and magnetic properties of BaSn0.99Gd0.01O3 was investigated. Oxides with a chemical formula BaSn0.99-xGd0.01MxO3-δ (M = Mn, Ni, x = 1 and 4 at.%) were synthesized by citric acid-assisted combustion method. Powder X-ray diffraction has confirmed the formation of pure single-phase cubic structure for BaSn0.99-xGd0.01MxO3-δ. The photoluminescence spectrum of the un-doped BaSnO3 displayed a strong near-infrared emission peak at 832 nm, which showed a decline in its intensity after the addition of Gd and virtually disappeared in Mn or Ni-doped BaSn0.99Gd0.01O3. Temperature-dependent electrical conductivity measurements have demonstrated an improvement in conductivity of BaSnO3 after simultaneous co-doping with Gd and Mn. A very weak ferromagnetic behavior was observed for the pure BaSnO3 under a low magnetic field. In spite, a pronounced room temperature-ferromagnetic behavior was seen for all the doped BaSn0.99-xGd0.01MxO3-δ samples over the whole measuring range of magnetic field. Among the prepared samples, a notable enhancement in the magnetic parameters was shown upon doping BaSn0.99Gd0.01O3 with Mn. The ferromagnetic behavior of the co-doped samples was discussed in terms of F-center exchange interaction mechanism.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A prototype heat transport device using Temperature-Sensitive Magnetic Fluid (TSMF) is newly designed and manufactured for recovering low to high temperature available heat. In the present study, the device is a closed loop experimental system for testing fundamental performance and characteristics of thermal energy (heat) transport. The device introduced in the present study is particularly designed for the practicality of long distance heat transport. Experiments were performed with the device under fixed magnetic field imposed by a permanent magnet. It was shown that the heat transport rate increases as heat source temperature is increased. It is also verified that the prototype device transports high amount of heat with self-driving force for a channel length of more than L = 10 m.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of hybrid magnetic elastomers (HME) featuring a type of magnetorheological elastomer filled with high-coercivity (a.k.a. magnetically hard) particles have been studied. Introduction of magnetically hard components into the formula significantly modifies both magnetic and rheological parameters of the composite. An additional factor having an influence on the overall behavior of the elastomer is based on the properties of the powder used as filler determined by its dispersion degree. Impregnation of the polymer matrix with a magnetically hard powder leads to a complex relationship between the magnetization and elasticity of the material and magnetic field as compared to the behavior demonstrated by composites based on magnetically soft filler, which is determined by the rotational motion of the particles inside the sample. Such a material exhibits asymmetrical magnetization hysteresis loops.© 2019 Elsevier LtdA new methodology for MOSFET characterization making use of the on-resistance characteristics Ron(Vg,Vd) = Vd/Id(Vg,Vd) and associated derivatives dRon/dVg and dRon/dVd is proposed. This approach enables to eliminate the influence of source-drain series resistance Rsd not only in linear region but also in non-linear region of MOSFET operation. Therefore, it allows for intrinsic MOSFET parameter extraction free from source and drain series resistance.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This addendum updates the article published recently in this journal as Magnetorheological Particle Clouds, 479 (2019) 301–306 by this author. The theory and certain updated aspects were presented at ICMF 2019, Paris.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The binary intermetallic Ho3Pd2, crystallize in an U3Si2-type tetragonal structure with the tP10, space group P4/mbm (no. 127). On the basis of Monte Carlo Simulations and ab initio calculations, we have studied the magnetism of the Ho3Pd2 compound. We show that the Ho3Pd2 is electronically stable. It has a ferromagnetic (FM) metallic with 84% spin polarization. The exchange energy calculated between the magnetic configurations confirms that the ground state FM is more stable than the antiferromagnetic (AFM) states. The total magnetic moment and the exchange couplings are deduced from ab initio calculations lead, using Monte Carlo simulations, to a quantitative agreement with the experimental transition temperatures. The maximum value of the magnetic entropy change was obtained near the paramagnetic (PM)-FM transition at transition temperature 9.6 k equal to 18.60 J.kg−1.K−1 for magnetic field ΔH = 5 T. These results are more consistent with the experimental results. Our results suggest that this material is a promising candidate for applications in specific technological fields at low temperatures and moderate fields. The relative cooling power and adiabatic temperature change of Ho3Pd2 compound have been calculated for different values of magnetic field. The obtained value for ΔH = 5 T is 230 J/kg. Arrott plots analysis reveals that our materials exhibit a second order magnetic phase transition.© 2019Perovskite mixed valence magnetic (La0.7Ba0.3MnO3) material is explored as a magneto-optical sensor by integrating onto the surface of an optical fiber. The guiding properties of core modes excited by the material cavity are modulated by the external magnetic field. The experimental results concluded that the device exhibits linear response to applied magnetic field strength in the range of 0–20 mT with the sensitivity of 228 pm/mT and resolution of 0.87 Oe. Blue-shift phenomenon has been observed in the interference pattern, when a magnetic field is applied. Such wavelength shift is attributed to the influences of magneto-optical properties on optical-wave propagation. The results reveal the feasibility of developing an index-tuneable magneto-optical sensor using perovskite magnetic material.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, small- and large-signal performances of passive devices integrated on high-resistivity, trap-rich and gold-doped silicon wafers are presented and compared through measurements and simulations. The gold-doped silicon substrate was produced starting from standard silicon having a nominal resistivity of 56 Ω·cm. We show that the gold-doped substrate presents high effective resistivity and low losses suitable for RF applications. This has been demonstrated by measuring coplanar waveguides, crosstalk, inductors and band pass filter where we observed similar performances for small-signal measurements compared with trap-rich substrate. Large-signal measurements of gold-doped substrates show 60 dBm lower harmonic distortion than high-resistivity substrates, and 10 dB lower than trap-rich substrate at 0 V DC bias. However, a large DC bias dependence on the harmonic distortion induced by the gold-doped substrate is observed. This unexpected behavior is explained using the Fermi level localization in the silicon bandgap for the different DC bias conditions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The authors regret a mistake in the Figs. 3, 4 and 5 presenting the band structure of the studied compounds. The spin-character of the presented band structures is vice versa. For each figure the band structure on the left is the minority spin band structure and the one on the right is the majority spin band structure. The discussion in the article is not influenced by this mistake. The authors would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We studied the electronic properties and spin polarization of the interface between Co and black phosphorus (BP) with ultraviolet, X-ray and spin-resolved photoemission spectroscopy. The results show that the outermost BP is destroyed and the unbonded P is produced in the process of Co deposition. There is no chemical reaction and an interface dipole is found at the Co/BP interface. The SR-UPS results show that there is an inverted spin polarization near EF and the spin polarization is about positive 10%, which is attributed to the interface hybridization between Co and BP.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.When a magnetic field is applied to a magnetic fluid for long time, inner magnetic particles form clustering structure, and this clustering structure grows from time by time. The surface tension of magnetic fluid is possible to change with the influence of this growth of clustering structure. For long time use of magnetic fluid application, it is important to clarify the contribution of clustering structure to surface tension change of magnetic fluid after application of magnetic field. In this study, the surface tension of water-based and kerosene-based magnetic fluid was measured by maximum bubble pressure method, and we attempted to detect the contribution of the clustering structure to the surface tension change of the magnetic fluid after the application of magnetic field. To investigate the contribution of the clustering structure, magnetic field is applied for certain time to magnetic fluid for the growth of the clustering structure in magnetic fluid before the surface tension measurement. We defined this time as the cluster growing time in this study, and the cluster growing time was set to 2, 60 and 120 min. The magnetic field intensity was 68 mT by using permanent magnets. The result shows that we detected the contribution of the clustering structure to the surface tension change by applying magnetic field in only the case of the diluted water-based magnetic fluid. In contrast, because the clustering structure is difficult to form in kerosene-based magnetic fluid due to the difference of the surfactant structure around magnetic particle, the surface tension change by applying magnetic fluid is hardly different with the cluster growing time.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This report is focused on the investigation of electrical and magnetic properties of distorted bcc system. The inspiration for the selection of amorphous Fe22.5Co22.5Ni22.5Cr22.5Zr10 alloy with a distorted bcc structure is based on the theoretical band calculation. It is confirmed that the free electron density of state of disordered bcc FeNiCr alloy increases at Fermi surface. Amorphous Fe22.5Co22.5Ni22.5Cr22.5Zr10 alloy, hereafter denoted as a-FeCoNiCrZr, shows among all the metallic materials the weakest temperature dependence of the electrical resistivity, ρ0(T). The weak ρ0(T) has been interpreted in the context of different physical processes such as tunnelling of free electrons and electron phonon interactions. Magnetically, a-FeCoNiCrZr consists of independent soft ferromagnetic clusters with average cluster size of about 1840 atoms. The Curie temperature, TC, was verified using Landau's theory of second-order phase transitions in low non-zero external fields. The reduced magnetization, M(T)/M(0), as a function of reduced temperature, T/TC, is explained in the framework of the exchange integral fluctuation theory. The exchange integral fluctuation is dominant only at low external fields. At Bex = 9 T, the exchange integral fluctuation has no noticeable effect on reduced magnetization. At Bex = 9 T, the precision of magnetic clusters around the Bex controls the behaviour of reduced magnetization as function of temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.There is a growing interest towards increasing the efficiency of electrical machines to reduce the ecological footprint. The efficiency of an electrical machine is closely related to the understanding and accurate estimation of the associated losses. One loss component is related to the welding of the electrical steel sheets as a part of manufacturing. This paper studies the effect of the core welding on a typical industrial induction motor. The effect of core welding on the magnetic permeability and core losses is first analyzed with the help of magnetic measurements on the unwelded and welded ring cores assembled from the stator sheets. Further, the derived material parameters are applied in finite element analysis of the induction machine and the effect of welding on the machine performance parameters is analyzed. It was observed that stator core losses increased about 10% due to the welding effect. A mock-up prototype is then manufactured to measure the stator core losses which follow the simulated values closely.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Multichannel Kondo resonance causes non-Fermi liquid behavior in many systems, as nanostructured metallic quantum dots and metallic alloys. The Kondo effect occurs at low temperatures and its indicating parameter is the Kondo temperature TK. This parameter can be used to renormalize thermodynamic and transport properties. The Kondo temperature is an important quantity to analyze the antiferromagnetic interaction between a localized spin and itinerant ones in a fermionic bath. There are many different definitions of the Kondo temperature. One of them is that it universalizes magnetic impurity susceptibility. This version was created for the one-channel Anderson model, but it is also valid in two-channel Anderson models, where a single magnetic impurity interacts with the conduction band electrons by two different channels. If the two coupling parameters are different, the model exhibits the well known Fermi liquid regime. When the coupling parameters are equal, the model displays the non-Fermi liquid regime. Each one shows different universal magnetic susceptibility behavior with appropriate TK value. In this article, Numerical Renormalization Group method is applied to study the Kondo temperature systematically. Different values of the coupling parameters in a two-channel Anderson model are examined. Finally, a single analytic expression for the Kondo temperature, valid in the Fermi and non-Fermi liquid regime, is presented.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.One-dimensional chain-like MnO@Co/C composite derived from MnOx@ZIF-67 is synthesized by hydrothermal and high temperature pyrolysis method. This structure not only solves the agglomeration problem of pure ZIF-67s, but also provides more effective transmission paths for the propagation of electromagnetic wave in the material, and increases the attenuation of electromagnetic wave. The MnO@Co/C composites can provide a minimum reflection loss (RL) value of −49.06 dB at 6.48 GHz. In the thicknesses range of 2 mm–5 mm, the corresponding effective absorption bandwidth below −10 dB is up to 12.24 GHz. The excellent properties benefit from the 3D network structure, the synergistic effect of the matters of MnO and Co/C, the increasing of interfacial polarization and the lengthening of the effective transmission path of electromagnetic wave.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the room-temperature magnetoimpedance of paramagnetic (x = 0.06) and ferromagnetic (x = 0.1) samples in La0.7Ca0.3 − xSrxMnO3 series using a radio-frequency impedance analyzer and also microwave power absorption using a network analyzer. In both measurements, samples were enclosed tightly inside a copper strip coil and impedance or reflection coefficient of this copper strip coil was measured as a function of applied magnetic field for different frequencies of current (f = 0.1–2.5 GHz). The direction of the applied magnetic field was perpendicular to the alternating magnetic field produced by the coil. In the ferromagnetic sample (x = 0.1), magnetoresistance shows a peak around zero field for lower frequencies but a peak appears at H > 0 at higher frequencies. The position of the peak shifts towards higher fields with increasing frequency. A similar trend is also found for the paramagnetic sample (x = 0.06) but the peak occurs at a higher field compared to the ferromagnetic sample for the same frequency. Microwave power absorption also shows features similar to magnetoresistance. Line shape analysis of the data was performed by fitting the data to a Lorentzian function. It is concluded that the observed features are imprints of ferromagnetic resonance in x = 0.1 and paramagnetic resonance in x = 0.06 samples.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Shell-ferromagnetism is observed in Mn-rich NiMn-based Heusler alloys as a result of phase-separation. Off-stoichiometric NiMn-based Heusler alloys decompose into a dual-phase composite when annealed under a magnetic field. As a result of this process, an initially anti-ferromagnetic Heusler alloy gains hard-ferromagnetic properties with a nearly 10 Tesla coercive field of a core/shell structured precipitate. In the present study, Ni50.1Mn42.1Sn7.8 and Ni50.4Mn36.6Sn13.0 alloys are investigated for magnetic and structural instabilities and shell-ferromagnetic decomposition to obtain information on the compositional limits of the decomposition. Furthermore, we investigate the magneto-transport properties of shell-ferromagnets obtained by annealing Ni49.8Mn45.1Sn5.1 in a magnetic-field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this contribution a novel setup for studying rapid crystallization of metallic glasses using a time resolved in situ X-ray diffraction combined with a direct current fast Joule heating (flash-annealing) is presented. The setup was implemented and successfully tested at the P02.1 beamline of the PETRA III storage ring (DESY Hamburg, Germany). Its potential use is demonstrated by studying rapid crystallization of soft magnetic Fe73.5Cu1Nb3Si15.5B7 (at.%) metallic glass prepared by melt spinning technique. Flash-annealing experiment is realized by bursting 20 rectangular current pulses with a fixed amplitude of 1.5 A and pulse length δ is varied (30, 40 and 50 ms). A single pulse with duration of 30 ms causes temperature to rise to 770 °C with an average heating rate of 4200 K/s. Phase composition of crystallized material consist of major Fe3Si phase and small traces of boride phase Fe23B6. Consecutive pulses result in cyclic thermal expansion of a crystal lattice, which appears fully reversible. Increasing pulse width to 50 ms causes temperature to increase up to 1020 °C with an average heating rate of 5600 K/s. Differentiation of the temperature profile yields exceptionally high value of heating rate 10800 ± 2400 K/s.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The influence of annealing on the microstructure and the electrical and magnetic properties of cylindrical nickel-based nanowires has been investigated. Nanowires of nickel of ~275 nm diameter and of permalloy (Py) of ~70 nm diameter were fabricated by electrochemical deposition into nanoporous templates of polycarbonate and anodic alumina, respectively. Characterization was carried out on as-grown and up to 650 °C heat-treated nanowires. Transmission electron microscopy imaging and diffraction of the nanowires showed a temperature-correlated grain growth of an initially nanocrystalline structure (untreated) with <8 nm (Ni) and <20 nm (Py) grains towards coarser poly-crystallinity after heat treatment with grains up to ~160 nm (Ni) and ~70 nm (Py), the latter being limited by the nanowire width. The electrical conductivity of individual as-grown and 650 °C annealed Ni nanowires was measured in-situ by scanning electron microscopy. At low current densities, the conductivity of annealed nanowires was estimated to have doubled over as-grown nanowires. We attribute this increase to the observed grain growth. The annealed nanowire was subsequently subjected to increasing current densities. Above 120 kA.mm−2 the nanowire resistance started to rise. At 450 kA.mm−2, the nanowire melted and current flow ceased. Magnetometry of as-grown and annealed nanowire arrays showed them to display quasi-thin film magnetic properties. Coercivity and saturation field were inversely correlated in annealed wires and a 25% tunability in these properties was achieved at just 200 °C.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Our ongoing research addresses, by means of experiments and computer simulations, the aggregation process that takes place in a shaken granular mixture of glass and magnetized ferrous alloy beads when the shaking amplitude is suddenly decreased. After this quenching, the magnetized beads form a transient network that coarsens in time into compact clusters, following a viscoelastic phase separation. Here we focus on the quasi-two-dimensional case, analyzing in computer simulations the effects of a magnetic field parallel to the system plane. Our results evidence that the field drastically changes the structure of the forming network: chains and elongated clusters parallel to the field are favored whereas perpendicular connecting structures tend to be suppressed, leading to the unknotting of the networks which are observed at zero field. Importantly, we found that moderate field strengths lead to the formation of larger clusters at intermediate time intervals than in the case of weak and strong fields. Moreover, the latter tend to limit the overall growth of the clusters at longer time scales. These results may be relevant in different systems governed by similar magnetically driven aggregation processes as, for example, in the formation of iron-rich planetesimals in protoplanetary discs or for magnetic separation systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An analysis is conducted of the possibility of making an assessment of active stresses in steel elements of civil engineering structures by measuring three electromagnetic diagnostic signals: the Barkhausen noise (BN), impedance components in in-series LCR circuits and the residual magnetic field (RMF) components. The issues under consideration belong to what is referred to as inverse problems of non-destructive testing. In this case, they consist in using electromagnetic properties for the active stress assessment. In order to develop the relevant correlation, experiments are needed that enable metrologically appropriate measurements, extraction of the diagnostic signal features and analysis of correlations between the features and active stress. The testing takes account of the impact of the element geometry and loading history. Impact factors are determined that need to be taken into consideration while developing quantitative diagnostic correlations.© 2019 Elsevier LtdModified Boltzmann-Arrhenius-Zhurkov (BAZ) constitutive model is applied to predict the reliability of integrated circuits. The model accounts for the impact of physical defects and process variations on the stress-free activation energy, which is viewed as a critical material's property. It is shown that the probability of non-failure (reliability) and the corresponding mean-time-to-failure (MTTF) can be evaluated from the failure-oriented-accelerated-testing (FOAT) geared to the modified BAZ model. The general concept is illustrated by the experimental data.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Evolution of microstructures and magnetic properties in bulk Nd-Fe-Cu-B based nanocomposites prepared by high pressure thermal deformation from amorphous precursors under different thermomechanical histories were investigated. We found that two-step isothermal deformation was favorable to the formation of (00l) texture of Nd2Fe14B phase and the enhancement of energy product compared with isothermal deformation, calefactive & isothermal deformation and isothermal & calefactive deformation, where a much higher energy product (BH)max = 22.8 MGOe was obtained for the former nanocomposite than those 15.6 MGOe, 17.3 MGOe and 20.1 MGOe for the latters, respectively. For the nanocomposites prepared by two-step isothermal deformation, the (00l) texture degree and the energy product increased with the first-step deformation-time up to 5 s then decreased, yielding the maximum magnetic anisotropy and energy product at 5 s. The magnetic anisotropy and energy product increased and then decreased with the temperatures increase from 500 °C to 560 °C in the first-step deformation, and the same change occurs in the second-step temperatures from 600 °C to 720 °C. The maximum anisotropy and energy product were obtained at 530 °C and 650 °C, respectively. The detailed mechanisms for these evolutions have been discussed.© 2019Quasistatic hysteresis loops of a single-domain magnetic nanoparticle with uniaxial anisotropy in a rotating magnetic field have been calculated. Magnetic hysteresis is shown to exist only in a limited range of reduced magnetic field amplitudes, 0.5 < h0 < 1, where h0 = H0/Ha, H0 is the amplitude of the rotating magnetic field, Ha being the particle anisotropy field. An analytical formula is obtained for the particle coercive force as a function of the reduced field amplitude. In the domain h0 < 0.5 the magnetization reversal of a particle is impossible, since the final energy barrier exists between the potential wells of the particle for all orientations of applied magnetic field. On the other hand, in the domain h0 > 1 the total energy of the nanoparticle has a single energy minimum, so that there is no magnetic hysteresis. Quasistatic hysteresis loops of a randomly oriented assembly of non interacting nanoparticles in a rotating magnetic field are also obtained.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the effects of the Al2O3 insulating coating and surfactant on magnetic properties of the iron powders coated with Al2O3 by one-pot synthesis method were investigated. The morphology, phase composition and magnetoelectric properties of iron powders coated with Al2O3 were tested respectively. Compared with uncoated iron powder, the composite powder of Al2O3 insulating layer not only has better permeability stability in the frequency range of 5–300 kHz, but also has lower core loss, especially eddy current loss in the frequency range of 5–100 kHz. The surface of iron powder modified by surfactant will change crystallization process of aluminum hydroxide. After the addition of dodecyl trimethyl ammonium bromide (DTAB) as the surfactant, the Al2O3 insulating coating becomes denser and smoother, and the core loss of coated powders is further reduced.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the effect of substitution of 10% divalent ion (Mn2+, Co2+ and Ni2+) on the magnetization of Zn ferrite thin films. M0.1Zn0.9Fe2O4 (M = Mn2+, Co2+ and Ni2+) thin films were pulse laser deposited on to fused quartz substrate at substrate temperatures (TS) ranging from room temperature (RT) to 750 °C. Some of the films deposited with substrate at room temperature were also annealed at different temperatures (TA). While the bulk samples of similar composition are paramagnetic at room temperature, the films were found to be magnetically ordered. The values of magnetization obtained were dependent on TS and TA, similar to pure Zn ferrite films. However, the magnetization values for substituted films were stable over a much larger range of substrate temperatures than pure Zn ferrite films. The thin films of Co0.1Zn0.9Fe2O4, Mn0.1Zn0.9Fe2O4 and Ni0.1Zn0.9Fe2O4 deposited at TS = 750 °C showed the 10 K magnetization values of 5.8 kG, 4.4 kG and 4.5 kG respectively and 0.1 kG, 0.3 kG and 0.2 kG at RT respectively. These values are to be compared with the reported values of ZnFe2O4 thin films deposited at TS = 750 °C, which showed magnetization value of 0.7 kG and 0.2 kG at 10 K and RT respectively. The magnetic properties of bulk and thin films of M0.1Zn0.9Fe2O4 were explained based on the cation occupancy of A and B-sites.© 2019The magneto-dielectric Mg-Nd-Cd spinel ferrites with chemical formula MgxCd1−xNd0.03Fe1.97O4 (x = 0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8 and 1.0) was synthesized by oxalate co-precipitation method under microwave sintering. The electromagnetic input parameters of these ferrites required for design of antennas were investigated in the X-band range. The miniaturization factor found to be highest for composition x = 0.4. The lower dielectric losses and magnetic losses for all compositions of ferrite material were useful for miniaturization of antenna. The patches of silver material were printed on fabricated substrates by using screen printing technique. The performance of return loss, % bandwidth and VSWR indicates that Mg-Nd-Cd ferrite substrates with compositions x = 0.2, 0.8 will have a strength for application as substrates of MPA in X-band microwave communication.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the impact of dissimilar substrate inherent twinning over the structural, electrical and magnetic properties of otherwise identical ferromagnetic/antiferromagnetic La0.7Ca0.3MnO3/Pr0.58Ca0.42MnO3 (LCMO/PCMO) superlattices (SLs). 12 layers of LCMO and PCMO each ~11 nm thick were deposited and then LCMO was deposited as the top layer. The SLs were fabricated by RF magnetron sputtering method over three LaAlO3 (0 0 1) substrates embodied with different twinning disorders. Structural analysis employing high resolution X-ray diffraction (HRXRD; 2θ, ω, and ϕ scans) demonstrates that substrate twin structures exactly get imprinted over all the superlattice peaks. Transport and magnetization measurements showed coupled insulator-metal (IM)/paramagnetic-ferromagnetic (PM-FM) transition around 220 K in all the three SLs. In the high temperature PM region all the samples behave similarly however at low temperatures where long-range ferromagnetic metal (FMM) and antiferromagnetic insulating (AFMI) phases start emerging in LCMO and PCMO respectively, SLs show deviant behaviors. This is ascribed to the substrate originated microstructural disorders in SLs which are distinct for all the samples and hence perturb FMM/AFMI interfacial interactions differently. Samples with prominently large substrate FWHM = 0.683° and 0.959° respectively show a second but weak IM transition and a strong hysteretic IM transition behavior. Magnetization displays a hysteretic behavior in field cooled data measured during cooling and warming cycles. The hysteresis gets stronger with the rise in FWHM which signifies an enhancement of phase competition between FMM and AFMI phases at the interfaces. This behavior of LCMO/PCMO SLs is attributed to the interfacial exchange interactions lead magnetic reconstruction at the interfaces.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Rheumatoid arthritis (RA) is a chronic autoimmune disorder that initially leads to inflammation in the lining of a joint and other parts of the body, then progresses and causes deformity. It occurs when the immune system attacks the body tissue. Treatments help to mitigate symptoms and impede the progression of this disease; however, it can bring about a range of side effects. In a current study, methotrexate hydrate (MTX)-loaded magnetic nanocomposite spheres were fabricated and examined for their potential to treat collagen-induced arthritis (CIA) in the murine model. The carriers contain MTX, albumin, poly lactic-co-glycolic acid (PLGA), and magnetic nanoparticles (NPs), thereby allowing the drug carriers to accumulate at the targeted limb using a magnet that is attached outside the body. A release rate study of these drug delivery systems concluded a mean of six to seven days for the release of the effective dosage. Also, it was revealed that mice treated with the drug carriers using a magnet to target the carriers brought better results in the overall progression of the disease compared to mice that were treated with only carriers but did not receive a magnet to target the carriers. Analysis of the paw scores of arthritis-induced mice demonstrated a progression in the studied paws. Moreover, these results were stated with a 95% confidence interval revealing that paws treated with the targeted carrier showed lower scores and subsequently a better outcome. These results are further supported by the review of micro-computed tomography (micro-CT) scans of the paws.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization curve and energy losses have been analyzed in non-oriented (NO) Fe-Si alloys with variable thickness (0.20 mm–0.35 mm), cut at widths ranging between 5 mm and 60 mm, in order to assess the impact of cutting, either done by punching or water-jet techniques. Measurements were performed by means of a digitally controlled single strip tester, from dc up to 1.5 kHz, at peak polarization values Jp = 1.0 T and 1.5 T. The evolution of the magnetization curve and the structure-dependent hysteresis Wh and excess Wexc loss components have been assessed as a function of the strip width using a simple phenomenological model, by which the extension of the damaged area at the edges of the cut sheets is estimated. Such a model assumes a hyperbolic dependence of the measured polarization on the cut strip width. The limiting values of Wh and Wexc for the fully damaged and the pristine sheets are in this way estimated, showing that one can simply and affordably predict the magnetic behavior of NO Fe-Si steels subjected to cutting.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe doped polycrystalline silicon (poly-Si) is used to investigate the effects of boron on non-linear properties of trap-rich silicon-on-insulator (TR-SOI) substrates. A dip at poly-Si/Si interface in spreading resistance profiles (SRP) is found and attributed to certain combinations of the poly-Si layer and the substrate dopant levels. A multilayered SRP model is employed to explain the SRP characteristics of the poly-Si films. The non-linear performance of TR-SOI is also studied using 50 Ω coplanar waveguide (CPW) lines. The results show little impact to the second harmonic distortion (HD2) up to 1 × 1015 cm−3 boron concentration in the poly-Si layer. At boron doping levels of above 5 × 1015 cm−3 measurable deteriorations of HD2 are detected and significantly worse when boron doping level in poly-Si reaches 1 × 1017 cm−3, presumably the traps in grain boundaries of poly-Si layer are filled by doping charges.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, Fe2SiO4/SiO2 coated Fe-Si soft magnetic composites (SMCs) have been prepared successfully via ball milling Fe-6.5wt%Si/Fe3O4 composite particles combined with subsequent spark plasma sintering (SPS) process. The formation mechanism of Fe2SiO4/SiO2 insulating layer and effect of Fe3O4 coating content on the microstructure and properties for the Fe-Si SMCs were investigated in detail. It is interesting that high temperature SPS process would lead to the occurrence of redox reactions between Fe3O4 and Si from Fe-Si alloy cores, and resulted in the transformation from Fe3O4 coating layer to Fe2SiO4/SiO2 insulating layer. As a consequence, the novel Fe-Si SMCs exhibited superior performances including high saturation magnetization (190.4 emu/g) and low core loss (9.02 mW/cm3 at 10 kHz) decreased by 89.1% compared to that of the uncoated Fe-Si SMCs (83.08 mW/cm3 at 10 kHz). The results indicated that the method of preparing insulating layer by the redox reactions is a simple and effective way to synthesize new SMCs with high performance for electro-magnetic energy conversion equipments.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have employed the + U extension of Generalized Gradient Approximation (GGA) of the Density Functional Theory (DFT) to study the (LaMnO3)n/(LaNiO3)n oriented (0 0 1) superlattices. We built superlattices for both high (cubic) and low (rhombohedral) symmetry structures. Structural, electronic, and interfacial energy calculations reveal charge transfer from Mn to Ni interfacial atoms in both structures inducing magnetic moment at the Ni atom. Magnetic calculations show that the Mn and Ni atoms are ferromagnetically coupled. Our results indicate that the amount of charge transfer and magnetic moment are largest in the (LaMnO3)1/(LaNiO3)1 than (LaMnO3)2/(LaNiO3)2, and in the low symmetry (rhombohedral) than the high symmetry (cubic) superlattices, because of the Transition Metal-Oxygen (TM[sbnd]O) bonds created, and suggest the low symmetric structure for more efficient magnetic moment in the (LaMnO3)/(LaNiO3) superlattices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present the electronic and magnetic properties of MnFe2O4 and the effect of Ca and Zn substitutions on half of the tetrahedral sites in terms of density functional theory calculations. We conduct different calculations within density functional theory to comprehend the magnetic order, Coulomb interaction (U) and spin–orbit coupling (SOC) effects. The Ca and Zn substitution in MnFe2O4 have considerably enhances the saturation magnetization fromμ0Ms = 0.19 T for MnFe2O4 toμ0Ms = 1.03 T. The magnetocrystalline energy (MAE) is calculated to be −0.6979 × 104 J/m3 for MnFe2O4, −2.836 × 104 J/m3 for Ca substituted MnFe2O4 and 2.67 MJ/m3 for Zn substituted MnFe2O4. We have found among all these compounds, only Zn substituted MnFe2O4 exhibits uniaxial anisotropy with moderate saturation magnetization and high MAE, making it potentially well suited for permanent magnet (PM) applications.© 2019 Elsevier LtdVertical heterojunction Ge0.92Sn0.08/Ge gate-all-around (GAA) nanowire pMOSFETs fabricated with a top-down approach are reported. With optimized processes, pFETs with nanowire diameters as small as 32 nm were achieved and a decent ION/IOFF ratio of ~3 × 106 was obtained thanks to the GAA nanowire geometry, the GeSn/Ge heterostructure and NiGeSn metallization. A compensating effect between top source resistance and diameter-related electrostatics was identified for pFETs without NiGeSn source. Devices with NiGeSn source showed significant improved ION, ION/IOFF ratio and subthreshold swing (SS) characteristics compared with those without NiGeSn.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work we report detailed investigations of structural, ac transport and magnetotransport properties of composites of reduced graphene oxide (rGO) and magnetite nanoparticles measured in the frequency range 10 Hz–2 MHz and in static magnetic fields upto 500 mT. AC conductivity of composite samples was enhanced by a factor of ~3 over that of the pure rGO even though the conductivity of magnetite is five orders of magnitude lower than that of rGO. We attribute this to charge transfer effects between the magnetite nanoparticles and the rGO matrix. Evidence of this is also observed in detailed Raman analysis of all samples. Further, we find a giant magnetoconductivity in the ac transport behavior of the composite samples. The rGO sample showed a negative magnetoconductivity of ~−15% at room temperature, while all composite samples showed positive magnetoconductivity with weak frequency dependence between 10 Hz and 254 kHz. We report a room temperature ac magnetoconductivity of 57% (at f = 254 kHz) and 40% (at f = 10 Hz) in a magnetic field B = 500 mT for the sample with 40 wt% magnetite nanoparticles. This is much larger than that obtained in dc magnetotransport, where room temperature magnetoconductivities in similar composites are typically 10% or less in comparable magnetic fields.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a simple formula for localization of a magnetic dipole. Firstly, the analytical formula of position vector is directly derived from the analytical expressions of magnetic field vector and magnetic gradient tensor of magnetic dipole. Secondly, the analytical formula shows that the proposed linear algorithm can give the true position of the dipole regardless of the singularity of the magnetic gradient tensor matrix. Finally, numerical simulations show that the proposed localization formula is correct and it can also localize the magnetic dipole precisely for applications with measurement noise.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The efficacy of magnetic hyperthermia treatment depends on the optimal available magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) that are excited in a given alternating magnetic field and viscosity of the region of interest. In this regard, assessing the relevant relaxation parameters is of upmost importance and could improve the speed of development of efficient applications. Here, we demonstrate how to deduce all relevant magnetic parameters from fast, independent, and simple experimental measurements such as dynamic light scattering, vibrating sample magnetometer, and lock-in thermography. We study the thermal behaviour of two MNPs with different forms, i.e. spherical and cubical, synthesized in-house by thermal decomposition and coated with 4 different surface agents. By determination of specific absorption rate (SAR) values, hydrodynamic diameters and M−H curves it is possible to compute the magnetic particle volume, dominant relaxation time and magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant. The calculated SAR values derived from these parameters, show good agreement with the experimental determined SAR data, demonstrating the applicability of the reported procedure. Additionally, our results indicate that surface coatings can have minor impacts on the thermal dissipation of Néel relaxation dominated MNPs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Methods for detecting spin waves rely on electrodynamical coupling between the spin wave dipolar field and an inductive probe. While this coupling is usually treated as constant, in this work, we experimentally and theoretically show that it is indeed temperature dependent. By measuring the spin wave magnetic field as a function of temperature of, and distance to the sample, we demonstrate that there is both a longitudinal and transversal confinement of the field near the YIG-Air interface. Our results are relevant for spin wave detection, in particular in the field of spin wave caloritronics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, amorphous FeGaSiB thin films have been fabricated on silicon (1 0 0) substrates using a co-sputtering-evaporation deposition system. By fixing the sputtering parameters (chamber pressure and power of the FeSiB target), and only varying the Ga evaporation rate, how the morphology, magnetic properties, and magnetostriction constants changed with the addition of Ga were investigated. This was to increase the Ga concentration, while maintaining the optimized fabrication parameters established in previous work. It was determined that the percentage of Ga increased linearly as the Ga evaporation rate was increased. The x-ray diffraction (XRD) results indicated that all the films were amorphous and the only detected peaks were for the Si substrate. The results showed that varying Ga evaporation rate, thus Ga content, affected the magnetic properties of the films by reducing the saturation induction along with increasing the uniaxial anisotropy within the films. The magnetostriction constants measured were in the range of 10.2–17.2 ppm.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report on results of electrical transport properties of Gd1-xCaxMnO3 (0⩽x⩽1) thin films fabricated on top of SrTiO3 substrates by pulsed laser deposition. The lowest studied doping level (x<0.1) was enough to trigger a transition from the antiferromagnetic state present in the parent compound (x = 0) to a ferrimagnetic state. Up to x = 0.3, the system exhibits a high temperature insulator paramagnetic state and a low temperature insulator ferrimagnetic one. At higher concentrations, the electrical and magnetical properties of the films differ drastically from the bulk form which shows a strong antiferromagnetic behavior. At mid Ca substitution (0.4⩽x⩽0.7), samples show a high temperature charge ordered state with ordering temperatures around room temperature and a low temperature glassy state which was not observed in their bulk counterparts. In contrast, high x samples show a high temperature conductive paramagnetic state and a low temperature insulator antiferromagnetic phase. More interestingly, sample x = 0.9 shows a distinct minimum in the resistivity versus temperature plots and a region of thermal hysteresis which indicate a first order transition. Magnetoresistance measurements display a strong irreversibility which we attributed to phase separation effect of a kinetically arrested ferromagnetic metallic phase and a stable antiferromagnetic insulator phase. Based on the above observations and previous magnetic results, we have reconstructed a phase diagram and characterized the properties of each phase.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hematite, α-Fe2O3, is a canted antiferromagnet with the Neel temperature of 960 K. The Morin transition, which occurs when the temperature is lowered to ~260 K, when the magnetic moments of the sublattices become strictly antiparallel to each other and the resulting magnetic moment disappears, is a characteristic feature of this compound. Detailed investigations are presented here of the magneto-optical effects in the α-Fe2O3 nanoparticles in the transmitted light and in the α-Fe2O3 single crystal in the reflected light. Two types of magneto-optic features were revealed in the magnetic circular dichroism (MCD) spectrum. Some of them described by the Gauss line shape were associated with one-ion d-d transitions. Others were described by the S-shaped line with the inflection points corresponding to the absorption maxima. Last features were assigned to the pair exciton-magnon transitions. An exceptionally strong S-shaped line at 2.0–2.5 eV appeared to be a unique feature of α-Fe2O3 distinguishing it from other iron oxide compounds. The origin of the high effectiveness of the pair exciton-magnon interaction giving rise to this strong S-shaped feature in the MCD spectrum of α-Fe2O3 is discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic iron garnets are insulators with low Gilbert damping with many applications in spintronics. Many emerging spintronic applications require perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) although garnets have only a few PMA types (i.e. terbium and samarium garnet). More and stable PMA garnet options are needed for investigating new spintronic phenomena. In this study, we predict 20 new epitaxial magnetic iron garnet film/substrate pairs with stable PMA at room temperature. The effective anisotropy energies of 10 different garnet films that are lattice-matched to 5 different commercially available garnet substrates (total 50 film/substrate pairs) have been calculated using shape, magnetoelastic and magnetocrystalline anisotropy terms. Strain type, tensile or compressive depending on substrate choice, as well as the sign and the magnitude of the magnetostriction constants of garnets determine if a garnet film may possess PMA. We show the conditions in which Samarium, Gadolinium, Terbium, Holmium, Dysprosium and Thulium garnets may possess PMA on the investigated garnet substrate types. New PMA garnet films with tunable saturation moment and field may improve spin-orbit torque memory and compensated magnonic thin film devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work we investigate numerically the viscosity and normal stress differences of mono and polydisperse ferrofluids undergoing a simple shear flow in the presence of a transverse applied magnetic field. The simulations are carried out by means of a Brownian Dynamics integration algorithm. For all simulations we assume that the dipole moments are fixed to the magnetic particles. In the case of polydisperse suspensions the particles present a typical log-normal distribution of magnetic diameters which are covered with a layer of surfactant of constant width. The long-range dipolar interaction between the magnetic moments are computed by Ewald summation technique and the surfactant influence is modeled as a steric repulsive force between pairs of particles. The attractive van der Waals force is also incorporated in the numerical simulations. The numerical procedure is validated by comparing the simulation results of the non-dimensional relative viscosity increase as a function of the magnetic field intensity with experimental data. The present numerical simulations show that the non-dimensional relative viscosity increment as a function of the non-dimensional shear rate is strongly influenced by the particle volume fraction and the strength of the dipolar interactions parameter. By examining the suspension microstructure into the numerical box, we can see anisotropic structures like chains of particles for the low shear rate regimes, specially in the polydisperse cases. The results also indicate the presence of a suspension shear-thinning behavior with two different non-dimensional shear rate dependence. In addition, non-dimensional normal stress differences are observed even in the absence of dipolar interactions, as a consequence of stress anisotropy produced by the repulsive forces during the particle collisions induced by the imposed steady-shear flow. The dipolar interactions increase these non-dimensional normal stress differences and make their dependence on the non-dimensional shear rate non-monotonic. For low non-dimensional shear rates, the dipolar interactions dominate and the formation of large-structures like chains oriented in the direction of the magnetic fields leads to an increase in the non-dimensional first normal stress difference. For very high non-dimensional shear rates, the flow breaks the anisotropic structures and the effects of polydispersity and dipolar interactions become unimportant. The numerical simulations provide a useful tool for understanding the complex microphysical and rheology of real ferrofuids under shear flows.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The longitudinal and transverse resistivities of single crystalline Fe(1 1 0) film are both experimentally studied as functions of the magnetization orientation and the current orientation with respect to the crystalline axes. Unusual dependences and symmetries are revealed but cannot be described well by established conventional models. Furthermore, the anisotropic magnetoresistance ratios differ by more than one order of magnitude for currents along different crystalline directions. Analytical expressions for the resistivities are derived by using a phenomenological model based on a series expansion of the resistivity tensor with respect to the direction cosines of the magnetization up to the fourth order. The experimental data can be fitted well by these expressions, and the resistivity coefficients obtained from the fitting are consistent with the symmetries of the current-direction dependence measurements. The resistivity coefficients increase with temperature due to electron-phonon scattering. Our studies suggest that the spin-dependent transport properties could exhibit strong magneto-crystalline effect, which paves a new way for designing future spintronics devices by taking advantage of the material crystallinity.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization of hybrid magnetic elastomers (HMEs) is a complex process that develops through contiguous events including mechanical rotation of magnetically soft and hard particles embedded in an elastic matrix, and magnetic rotation and switching of elementary magnetic moments constituting those particles. To clearly understand the mesomagnetomechanics of HMEs and separate phenomena due to different types of magnetic fillers, in this work magnetization of magnetoactive elastomers (MAEs) containing NdFeB particles is investigated. Magnetization curves obtained via experiments and computer simulations based on a model of a multigrain magnetic particle in an elastic environment are scrutinized. The training effect, negative bias, and reduction of coercivity inherent to the soft HMEs and MAEs are demonstrated and discussed. The occurrence of irreversible processes of matrix destruction during cycled magnetization of the samples is deduced from comparison of the modeled and measured curves.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Copper (Cu) doped barium hexaferrite BaFe12−xCuxO19, (x = 0.0–2.0) were synthesized by the modified citrate sol-gel method. The structural, magnetic and electric properties have been investigated. All samples are crystallized to M-type hexagonal structure with P63/mmc space group. Lattice parameters are found to be maximum for x = 1.0, which has been correlated with the physical properties (magnetic & dielectric) of the material. The particle size distribution (found to be nm order) and surface morphology were analyzed by the FESEM (Field Emission Scanning Electron Microscopy) technique. The magnetic hysteresis (M-H) loops have been analyzed by employing the “Law of approach to saturation” and, important magnetic parameters are obtained. The saturation magnetization and magnetocrystalline anisotropy constants are found to be maximum for x = 1.0 sample, but the coercive field is found to a minimum for the same sample. The modified Debye equation has been employed to understand the impedance response to the frequency. The activation energy was obtained by using the Arrhenius equation. Hence, a correlation between crystal structure parameters and physical (magnetic and dielectric) properties of nano-crystalline Cu-doped barium hexaferrite has been observed. Finally, a correlation between crystal structure parameters and magnetic properties, as well as electrical properties, has been proposed for the Cu doped BHF.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the modification of magnetic properties due to variation of the structure of Fe-contain granules in SiCxNy:Fe films grown by chemical vapor deposition at different temperatures from various gaseous mixtures. It was shown that formation of large composite Fe-granules in the case of structures created using hexamethyldisilazane as source of Si, C, and N atoms results in the hysteresis loop in the magnetization curve appeared only at low temperature (5 K). The ESR spectra are characterized by many ESR lines with sharp asymmetrical shapes and different line widths. The samples with a dense arrays of small homogeneously distributed α-Fe granules, obtained with hexamethylcyclotrisilazane, demonstrate the large saturation magnetization, the hysteresis loop (~135 Oe at 300 K and ~680 Oe at 5 K) and the collective ferromagnetic resonance signal. The pronounced magnetic properties are explained by the formation of the single magnetic domain due to quantum-mechanical tunneling between small coupled α-Fe clusters. Conductivity measurements confirm the existence of the tunneling coupling between Fe-granules even in case of lowest Fe concentration in the samples under study.© 2019By using technology computer aided design (TCAD) simulation, the aim of this paper is to investigate the effect of Si parasitic channel, which is placed under stacked nanosheet channels, on electrical characteristic of stacked nanosheet GAA FETs. We have controlled the parasitic channel height, and evaluated the effect on electrical performance of the device. Trade-off in performance of the nanosheet FET is observed: the increase in parasitic channel height results in improvement in subthreshold swing and on/off ratio, while the increase in capacitance brings worse RC delay and active power. The parasitic channel height control in devices with ground plane doping is also investigated.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.X-ray powder diffraction, differential scanning calorimetry, and magnetization measurements were performed to investigate the effects of heat treatment on the magnetic and structural properties of as-cast and aging treated MnCoGe. The martensitic transformation temperature of the as-cast sample was 526 K for its first heating cycle, which decreased with repeating thermal cycles of 300–1273 K. MnCoGe prepared by aging treatment of 873 K for 7 days showed a first-order magnetic transition, which was accompanied by a martensitic transformation at 307 K. However, the transformation was not detected when the aging temperature was increased up to 973 K. The martensitic transformation temperature and volume of the parent phase was found to have a positive correlation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This work contributes to the understanding of angular dependence of the magnetic properties of Permalloy nanowire arrays by means of a comparative analysis between experiment and micromagnetic simulations. On the one hand, Permalloy nanowires of 30 nm in diameter and 1 μm in length were synthesized by AC electrodeposition inside mesoporous alumina templates. Magnetic experimental measurements show that both coercivity and remanence decrease monotonously as the angle, at which the external field is applied, increases. On the other hand, the comparison between the simulation of a nanowire array and that performed for one single nanowire reveals that the magnetostatic interactions between the nanowires strongly modifies not only the shape of the hysteresis curve but also the coercivity and remanence values. Besides, simulations also disclose that the nanowires reverse their magnetization through the nucleation and propagation of transverse domain walls. Moreover, the simulation of an array of nanowires also discloses that the hysteresis curve exhibits noticeable jumps in the magnetization that are proportional to the number of nanowires that reverse their magnetization in the array. This latter could provide an interesting hint to control the performance of magnetic nanodevices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The present work deals with the investigation of the oscillatory behavior displayed by a vibrating sensor unit made of a magnetoactive elastomer (MAE). Since this type of smart materials consists of an elastic matrix and micro-magnetic particles, it reveals exceptional magnetic-field-dependent material properties. The forced vibration response under the bending of the MAE unit subjected to in-plane harmonic kinematic excitation of the housing is studied. It is found that the amplitude-frequency characteristics of the MAE unit can be changed considerably by means of an external homogeneous magnetic field. With and without applied field, the unit displays different steady-state responses for the same excitation, and the resonance occurs at various ranges of the excitation frequency. The nonlinear phenomenon of the resonance hysteresis is observed depending on whether the excitation frequency increases or decreases. It is shown that the MAE vibrations can be detected based on the magnetic field distortion measurements. The presented prototype of the MAE-based vibrating unit with field-adjustable “configuration” can be potentially implemented for realization of acceleration sensor systems with adaptive sensitivity.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we report an approach to chemically synthesize PrCo5 nanomagnet with high performance. The synthesis starts with the fabrication of composite containing Pr(OH)3 nanorods and Co(OH)2 nanoflakes by the hydrothermal process, which can be further reduced by Ca to yield 380 nm PrCo5 single-crystal particles. These particles can be suspended in epoxy and aligned into nanomagnet, leading to a large coercivity of 13.1 kOe, high remanence of 0.8, and magnetic energy product of 14 MGOe, which is among the highest values for PrCo5 magnets.© 2019NiCr2O4 and CoCr2O4 are two distinct members of the chromite family (ACr2O4) having unique structural and magnetic properties. This paper is a continuation of previous work [Mohanty et al., J. Magn. Magn. Mater. 451(2018)20] and is focused on the modification of ferrimagnetic properties in NiCr2O4 by substituting Co ions at Ni sites. In order to do so (Ni1− xCox)Cr2O4 (x = 0, 0.50, 0.75, 1.00) powder samples were synthesized using chemical co-precipitation techniques. Interest is primarily on (Ni0.5Co0.5)Cr2O4 and (Ni0.25Co0.75)Cr2O4 as characterization results on the end members have been reported. It was determined with in-situ temperature dependent X-ray diffraction measurements that these compositions become fully crystallized cubic spinels with space group Fd3-m above 700 °C. All samples were subsequently calcined at 900 °C to ensure phase purity and uniform crystallinity. Transmission electron microscopy showed non-uniform distribution of particle sizes with the majority of the particles having bi-pyramidal structures with flat tops for both samples. A comparative account of different ferrimagnetic Curie temperature, θf or TC, estimations are presented as determined from measured temperature dependences of the following techniques: Fits of the magnetic susceptibility data indicated a minimum value for the (Ni0.5Co0.5)Cr2O4 sample at 56.1 ± 0.9 K, followed by an increase to 76.8 ± 0.4 K for the (Ni0.25Co0.75)Cr2O4 sample; Neutron diffraction measurements gave values of 80 ± 1 K and 87 ± 1 K; Their paramagnetic Curie points, θp, were determined to be 73.3 and 84.9 K, respectively. The magnetic frustration index f = ΘCW/TC was found to decrease continuously over the series from 11.9 for NiCr2O4 to 7.1 and 6.5 for x = 0.5 and 0.75 respectively with (Ni0.5Co0.5)Cr2O4 being more frustrated than (Ni0.25Co0.75)Cr2O4. Magnetization as a function of applied magnetic field measured at 3 K demonstrates unusually high coercivity for (Ni0.5Co0.5)Cr2O4, supporting the notion for the higher degree of magnetic frustration in this sample. No exchange bias was observed for M (μ0H) in the (Ni0.25Co0.75)Cr2O4 sample measured at 3 K, but did however show a significant anomaly in its hysteresis loop at this temperature. The anomaly in hysteresis behaviour disappeared when measured at 1.7 K and also at higher temperatures. Frequency dependent ac-susceptibility measurements revealed no shift in the peak position with frequency refuting the existence of spin-glass like behavior in both these samples.© 2019Recently, magnetic field induced low magnetization tetragonal martensite to high magnetization cubic austenite transformation has been realized in Heusler alloy Co50V34Ga16 (Applied Physics Letters 112, 211903 (2018)). In this paper, first-principles calculations have been performed on Heusler alloy Co2V1.5Ga0.5 to reveal the mechanism for magnetostructural transition. It has been found that the alloy prefers to crystallize into ferromagnetic L21 type structure at austenite, with Co atoms tending to occupy the Wyckoff sites A (0, 0, 0) and C (0.5, 0.5, 0.5), V atoms occupying at site B (0.25, 0.25, 0.25), Ga and the extra V atoms entering D (0.75, 0.75, 0.75) site. Moments of Co and V atoms parallel to each other and a total formula moment of 2.95 μB is achieved. A potential of tetragonal distortion from ferromagnetic cubic structure to non-magnetic tetragonal structure has been predicted from the view of energetically favorable state. The stability of tetragonal Co2V1.5Ga0.5 is further confirmed by the phonon spectrum. The peaks of dx2-y2 and dz2 states for Co and V(D) 3d states near the Fermi level for the cubic structure split at the tetragonal structure, implying the structural transition is mainly attributed to the band Jahn-Teller effect. The hybridization between the Co 3d states and the 3d states of V at D site plays an important role in the martensitic transformation. A volume contraction of 1.3% is obtained accompanying with the magnetostructural transition.© 2019 Elsevier LtdExperimentally, two critical device performance factors, apparent mobility (μapp) and virtual source velocity (vx0) were investigated down to effective channel length (Leff) = 15 nm silicon nanowire field-effect transistors (SNWFETs) by using virtual source (VS) model. Both μapp and vx0 decreased in n-SNWFETs but increased in p-SNWFETs as the nanowire diameter (DNW) shrank because of opposite effective mass (meff) dependency. The critical on-current booster, vx0 rather than μapp increased monotonically as Leff shrank, and it showed that vx0 boosting by Leff scaling is still valid to Leff = 15 nm in SNWFETs. Furthermore, p-SNWFETs had higher μapp and vx0 than n-SNWFETs because compressive stress from SiGe layer below source/drain improved the performance of p-SNWFETs. Interestingly, unpredicted non-linearity of Leff/μapp vs. 1/vx0 plot was observed in short channel p-SNWFETs and its origin was discussed. Finally, thermal limit velocity (vTx) and ballistic efficiency (Bsat) consisting vx0 were extracted from experimental data. The DNW dependence of vTx and Bsat was analyzed using stress effect, meff, critical length (LC), and mean free path (λ), which provides the way of vx0 boosting.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a comparative study of the effect of Cu on the structural, magnetic and magnetic induction heating response in CdFe2O4 spinel is presented. The ceramic nanoparticles (Cu1−xCdxFe2O4; 0 ≤ x ≤ 1) were synthesized by co-precipitation from Cu(II), Cd(II) and Fe(III) salts. The samples, characterized by X-ray diffractometry, display the characteristic spinel cubic structure (space group Fm3m) where CdO is detected as main secondary phase (≈ 16% weight for x = 1). A high degree of nanoparticle agglomeration is inferred from the Transmission Electron Microscopy (TEM) images, as a consequence of the employed synthesis procedure. Regarding the magnetic properties, superparamagnetic behavior at room temperature can be disregarded according to the low field magnetization response (ZFC-FC curves). For 0.4 ≤ x ≤ 0.8 ratios, the samples display maximum values in the magnetic moment that should be correlated to the cation distribution between the octahedral and tetrahedral sites. Maximum magnetization values lead to an enhancement in the magnetic induction heating response characterized by highest heating temperatures under the action of an ac magnetic field. In particular, maximum SAR values are estimated for x = 0.8 as a combined effect of high magnetic moment, low dc coercive field (high susceptibility). Although these Cu-Cd ferrite nanoparticles display moderate SAR values (around 0.7 W/g), the control of the maximum heating temperatures through the cation distribution (composition) provides promising properties to be used as nanosized heating elements (i.e. hyperthermia agents).© 2019 The AuthorsWe report on the large coercivity enhancement in epitaxial Fe/FeRh bilayer grown on W(110). It is shown that the coercive field increases by almost an order of magnitude when the FeRh alloy undergoes a phase transition from the ferromagnetic to antiferromagnetic state. Analysis of temperature spin structure evolution of the FeRh alloy across the magnetic transition reveals that the observed coercivity enhancement is caused by the interfacial spin-flop coupling between Fe and the antiferromagnetic FeRh layer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Variation in chemical composition is one the most important parameters that affects the microstructure and mechanical properties of powder metallurgical (PM) steel parts. Therefore, utilization of nondestructive methods to determine the chemical composition and microstructural/mechanical properties of a given PM steel sample could be a subject of importance. In the present study, capability of three electromagnetic nondestructive methods, including hysteresis loop, Hall effect and eddy current methods has been investigated to determine metallurgical properties in powder metallurgical steel parts. In order to study the variations in the chemical composition, three groups of specimens with different contents of carbon (0–0.9 wt%), copper (0–4.5 wt%) and phosphorus (0–0.45 wt%) were prepared. Microstructure and mechanical properties of the samples were evaluated using microscopic observations and tensile/hardness testing, respectively. In the next step, the relationships among the parameters extracted from the electromagnetic methods and weight percent of alloying elements have been established. Finally, to simultaneously predict the accurate weight percent of carbon, copper and phosphorus, as well as mechanical properties, the electromagnetic outputs were fed into a data fusion system. The new proposed data fusion system is an interval-based ordered weighted averaging method that uses some approximation components to first produce different approximations for each of the outputs and then fuse these approximations to increase accuracy. The study shows that multi-electromagnetic methods coupled to a powerful predictive data fusion system could be used to determine the metallurgical characteristics of the PM steel parts with high precision and reliability.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetism and magnetocaloric performances of rapidly solidified RE60Co20Ni20 (RE = Ho and Er) amorphous ribbons have been investigated in this work. Both ribbons undergo a second-ordered magnetic transition from ferromagnetic (FM) to paramagnetic (PM) state. The magnetocaloric performances of RE60Co20Ni20 (RE = Ho and Er) ribbons have been characterized using magnetic entropy change (ΔSM), temperature averaged entropy change (TEC), relative cooling power (RCP) as well as refrigeration capacity (RC). With the external magnetic field change from 0 to 5 T, the maximal ΔSM values (−ΔSM max) for Ho60Co20Ni20 and Er60Co20Ni20 are calculated to be 18.4 and 15.5 J/kg-K, respectively. The corresponding RCP (RC) values reach 668.2 (518.5) and 403.2 (320.3) J/kg. The present investigation highlights the potential of RE60Co20Ni20 ribbons as magnetic refrigerant materials at low temperature region.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The ellipsometric parameters of light reflected from a magnetic fluid under the influence of a magnetic field were measured. In a magnetic fluid with nonsuperparamagnetic magnetite particles with a diameter of about 20–30 nm, a nonlinear change in the ellipsometric parameters under the action of a field was detected. The dependence of the effect on the wavelength of light is established.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic fields and magnetic materials have promising microfluidic applications. For example, magnetic micro-convection can enhance mixing considerably. However, previous studies have not explained increased effective diffusion during this phenomenon. Here we show that enhanced interface smearing comes from a gravity induced convective motion within a thin microfluidic channel, caused by a small density difference between miscible magnetic and non-magnetic fluids. This motion resembles diffusive behavior and can be described with an effective diffusion coefficient. We explain this with a theoretical model, based on a dimensionless gravitational Rayleigh number, and verify it by numerical simulations and experiments with different cell thicknesses. Results indicate the applicability and limitations for microfluidic applications of other colloidal systems. Residual magnetic micro-convection follows earlier predictions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of silver-doped lanthanum manganite, La0.85Ag0.15MnO3+δ,δ=0.10(2), have been studied using magnetometry and high-resolution neutron powder diffraction. The structural space group is found to be predominantly R3¯c, with a minor (5%) fraction of Pnma phase. This phase fraction does not change in the measured temperature range of 4 K to 300 K. Our high-resolution diffraction data allow a detailed analysis of the spin orientation. Using representational analysis, we find the ferromagnetic state below Tc=246 K has spins oriented perpendicular to the rhombohedral c-axis and is purely ferromagnetic i.e. no canting between sublattices is observed. Implications for the magnetocaloric effect are discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets with and without B-Fe particles are prepared to investigate the effect of B-Fe particles on the magnetic properties. After the addition of 0.5 wt% B-Fe particles, the coercivity of the hot-deformed magnet is increased. It is found that B-Fe particles inhibits the abnormal growth of grains around the melt-spun ribbons’ boundaries results in fine grains. Besides, by further annealing, the fine grains have a modification effect on the boundary, which reduces the demagnetization nucleation field, thereby further optimizing the coercivity of the magnet.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Anisotropic Sm2Fe17Nx nanoflakes with high performance were successfully prepared via surfactant-assisted ball milling (SABM) at low temperatures. Comparing with the conventional SABM at room temperature, these Sm2Fe17Nx nanoflakes possess more uniform particle sizes, much enhanced coercivity and remanence ratio (Mr/Ms), higher saturation magnetization and excellent magnetic alignment. Based on systematic investigations of phases, N content and magnetic properties as a function of milling time for nanoflakes fabricated at room and low temperatures, the effective inhabitation of the decomposition of Sm2Fe17Nx phase by low-temperature milling has been clearly evidenced. Our study indicates that the low-temperature milling may serve as a promising and new technique for fabricating the high-performance Sm-Fe-N anisotropic powders used in bonded magnets.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe performance of fully depleted silicon on insulator (FDSOI) device and ferroelectric-gated FDSOI (FE-FDSOI) device are investigated for various gate voltage sweep rates. Regardless of the gate voltage sweep rates, the input transfer characteristics of the baseline FDOSI device are not varied. On the contrary, it was observed that the hysteresis width of the FE-FDSOI device is affected by the gate voltage sweep rates. As the gate voltage sweep rate decreases, the ratio of ferroelectric remnant polarization to coercive voltage (Pr/Vc) increases, so that the magnitude of the ferroelectric negative capacitance (|CFE|) increases. This affects hysteresis condition of the FE-FDSOI device, therefore, the hysteresis width of the FE-FDSOI device decreases as the gate voltage sweep rate decreases. According to the results, it is suggested that voltage sweep rate be decreased to decrease the hysteresis width of FE-FDSOI device.© 2019 The AuthorsThe paper presents magnetization measurements and the scaling analysis of related power loss for a high-temperature magnetocaloric alloy (TC = 330 K). The measured hysteresis loops show anomalous behaviour near the temperature of 315 K, which may indicate the occurrence of additional phase transition. Power losses measured in different temperatures are analyzed using the scaling theory in order to determine the universal curves and the scaling exponents. The temperature dependence of scaling exponents confirms the existence of another phase transition at the temperature of 315 K, associated with an additional metallic phase in the alloy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, double perovskite oxide Sr2FeMoO6 doped with Nd was prepared through sol–gel method. SNFMO belongs to the I4/m space group. The Fe/Mo order of SNFMO obtained from Rietveld refinement are 89.3%, 88.6%, and 88.2% for x = 0.01, 0.03, and 0.05, respectively. For SNFMO (x = 0.01, 0.03, 0.05) samples, the values of Fe3+/Fe2+ ratio are 1.41, 1.51, and 1.53, and the values of Mo5+/Mo6+ ratio are 0.37, 0.48, and 0.54. According to the minimum dM/dT of the FC curves, the Curie temperatures of SNFMO are 378, 367, and 380 K for x = 0.01, 0.03, and 0.05, respectively. H/M-M2 curve analyses showed that all the samples have a second-order magnetic transition. In the magnetic field of 2.5 T, the maximum ΔSM of SNFMO (x = 0.01, 0.03, 0.05) samples were 0.36, 0.63, and 1.23 J kg−1 K−1, respectively.© 2019The lead-free ferroelectric system (1-x)K0.5Na0.5NbO3-x(Bi0.8La0.2FeO3), KNN-xBLFO, was synthesized by a solution combustion method. Complete solubility was obtained for all x values used. The modification of the original bonds and the generation of new bonds were characterized by infrared and Raman spectroscopy. The modification of the KNN structure during BLFO addition was determined by X-ray diffraction which showed a monoclinic-orthorhombic phase transition. The lattice parameters and the percentage of each phase present were determined by Rietveld refinement. Scanning electron microscopy showed how the particle morphology changed with the incorporation of BLFO. A ferrimagnetic behavior for different x values was identified by magnetic characterization with the most significant result obtained for x = 0.40.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Multiple-effect molecular devices have been constructed by single molecule magnet Mn(dmit)2 and phosphorene electrodes. First-principle quantum transport calculations show that the devices present excellent spin-filtering, spin-switching and negative differential resistance effects, which can be explained by the frontier molecular orbitals, the projected density of states and evolution of the transmission spectra. These excellent spin transport properties are better than the performance of the devices constructed by Au or graphene electrodes, which suggest that the one-dimensional devices with phosphorene electrodes are promising candidates for future applications of phosphorene-based multi-functional spintronics devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A systematic XMCD analysis was performed to study the evolution of magnetic moments of overall Fe atoms in α′-FexN thin films. It was found that the spin and orbital moments of overall Fe 3d shell of α′-FexN increase gradually along c-axis with increasing nitrogen fraction. We showed that the magnetocrystalline anisotropy of α′-FexN compounds is associated with corresponding orbital anisotropy of Fe 3d shell. No clear p-d hybridization between Fe and N elements was discovered in the current experimental systems, suggesting that lattice expansion has a sufficient influence on magnetic performance of α′-Fe8N compounds.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports on the influence of growth angle on morphology and uniaxial magnetic anisotropy of 60 nm-thick sputter-deposited cobalt films on patterned-Ge substrates (having nanowire-like morphology with extreme regularity) prepared by keV-ion bombardment at room temperature. Morphological studies reveal that grain size in Co films increases with increasing growth angle, albeit lateral spacing among the ridges of conformally grown Co films (under growth angles in the range of 0–70°) on patterned-Ge substrates match quite well with that of a patterned-Ge substrate. While an increase in the Co grain size is expected to cause higher coercive fields, in the presence of magnetic pinning and slopes between ridges and grooves of nanowire-like patterned Co morphology, we observe an inverse trend. In other words, an increase in the grain size in conjunction with respective evolution of microstructures in Co films, at higher growth angles, lead to a decrease in the coercive field. Magnetic force microscopy is employed to probe the out-of-plane domains in ferromagnetic Co films. Tailored design of these novel nanostructured Co layers will be of interest for fabrication of high-density magnetic data storage devices, magneto-transport phenomena, and magneto-plasmonics.© 2019The microstructure, defect and magnetic properties of Ge-substituted CuFeO2 multiferroics are studied systematically. The introduction of Ge4+ in Fe3+ sites of CuFeO2 leads to obvious changes in its crystal structure, micro-morphology and surface chemical status. Positron annihilation results show that the concentration of positron traps and the local electron density increases evidently inside CuFe1− xGexO2 (x ≥ 0.05) series compare with that of un-doped sample. Interestingly, the magnetic hysteresis loops show the magnetic interactions are changed and obvious ferromagnetism appears in the CuFe1− xGexO2 (x ≥ 0.05) samples. In addition, the stability of the antiferromagnetic phase of CuFeO2 is weakened. The magnetic transition temperature TN2 slightly decreases with increasing Ge content. The relation between the microstructure and the magnetic behavior are explored in detail in the present paper.© 2019Spin waves play a vital role as potential data carriers in low power wave-like computing and high-frequency spintronic devices, which stimulate intensive studies on the efficient excitation of spin waves in magnetic thin films. Here, we suggest a controllable approach for the efficient excitation of perpendicular standing spin waves (PSSWs) in a series of CoFeB/Si thin films by the oblique angle deposition technique. It is experimentally demonstrated that the intensity of the PSSW mode can be enhanced significantly with increased oblique angle, and a comparable intensity of spin wave to that of uniform FMR mode is achieved at an oblique angle of 39°. Moreover, the dependence of in-plane anisotropy field Hk, exchange constant A, as well as intrinsic Gilbert damping α on oblique deposition angle are also investigated.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ni0.5Zn0.5FeCoO4 spinel ferrite was elaborated using sol-gel technique. X-ray diffraction patterns indicate that sample has a cubic spinel type structure with Fd-3m space group. The change in Raman modes and relative intensity were observed due to ball milling and consequently to the decrease of particle size and cationic redistribution. The Raman spectra show peaks appearing at 450 and 490 cm−1 corresponding to T2g (2) and T2g (3), respectively. It may be noted that both of these modes shift toward the higher wavenumber with the substitution of Zn by Ni in Ni0.5Zn0.5FeCoO4 ferrite. Mössbauer spectroscopy analysis shows one tetrahedral A-site and two octahedral B-sites. Due to Zn doping, the hyperfine magnetic fields are much smaller than for CoFe2O4 and NiFe2O4 ferrites. The Jonscher's power low was used to describe the ac-conductivity measurements. Frequency dependence of dielectric constant (ε″) and tangent loss (tan) display a dispersive behavior at low frequencies that can be explained by the Maxwell Wagner model and Koop's theory. Electric modulus formalism has used to study the relaxation dynamics of charge carriers. The complex impedance spectra (Nyquist plots) show well-defined semicircles which are strongly dependent on the temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic Particle Imaging (MPI) has been successfully used to visualize the distribution of superparamagnetic nanoparticles within 3D volumes with high sensitivity in real time. Since the magnetic field topology of MPI scanners is well suited for applying magnetic forces on particles and micron-sized ferromagnetic devices, MPI has been recently used to navigate micron-sized particles and micron-sized swimmers. In this work, we analyze the magnetophoretic mobility and the imaging performance of two different particle types for Magnetic Particle Imaging/Navigation (MPIN). MPIN constantly switches between imaging and magnetic modes, enabling quasi-simultaneous navigation and imaging of particles. We determine the limiting flow velocity to be 8.18 mL s−1 using a flow bifurcation experiment, that allows all particles to flow only through one branch of the bifurcation. Furthermore, we have succeeded in navigating the particles through the branch of a bifurcation phantom narrowed by either 60% or 100% stenosis, while imaging their accumulation on the stenosis. The particles in combination with therapeutic substances have a high potential for targeted drug delivery and could help to reduce the dose and improve the efficacy of the drug, e.g. for specific tumor therapy and ischemic stroke therapy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effective thermal conductivity, keff, for a kerosene-based ferrofluid with magnetite particles was determined, both in absence and presence of a static magnetic field, H over the range (0–90) kA/m. In zero polarizing field, keff of the ferrofluid is greater than the thermal conductivity of the carrier liquid (kerosene) kF, and increases greatly by applied of the static magnetic field. The obtained experimental results for keff of the ferrofluid sample, were compared with the computed values of keff using four theoretical models of the thermal conductivity. The effective specific heat (Ceff) and the effective thermal diffusivity (Deff) were also computed, both in the absence and presence of the static magnetic field. The obtained results show that all the investigated thermal parameters of the ferrofluid can be externally controlled by means of the magnetic field. These results are of particular practical importance and suggest that the investigated ferrofluid may be a potential candidate for incorporation into heat transfer devices and other thermal applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The influence of coil turn number n and sample cross-section S on the Barkhausen noise signal has been studied. Combining the obtained results with our recent findings on the dynamic properties of the magnetic Barkhausen noise, we propose a Faraday-like relation for its rms envelope in the form Urms(H)∝nS·dH/dt. Validity of this relation is proved for classical sample-wrapping coils of the same geometry testing semi-hard thin ribbons of martensitic iron-based steel. The introduced square root dependence is explained by stochastic multiple overlapping of the independent Barkhausen pulses.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Graphyne, a two-dimensional carbon allotrope being proven to possess amazing electronic properties as graphene, have been successively proposed in theory and experiment. Here, the electronic band structures of zigzag-edged δ graphyne nanoribbons (ZδGYNR) and zigzag-edged γ graphyne nanoribbons (ZγGYNR) have been revealed with a metallic behavior in non-magnetic state, a metallic spin splitting in ferromagnetic state and a spin degeneracy with a direct band gap in antiferromagnetic state, which is much similar to zigzag-edged graphene case. We also report a comprehensive study of the intrinsic spin-resolved transport properties for the three junctions with a carbon chain sandwiching between ZδGYNR/ZγGYNR leads by using density functional theory coupled with the non-equilibrium Green's function method. The results reveal that the designed junctions perform multiple functions with wonderful spin filtering, rectification, and a spin negative differential resistance(SNDR) effect, and so on. Specifically, the spin filtering efficiency approximate 100% within a large bias range, the maximum rectification ratio can be up to 1.5×104 and an obvious SNDR with the maximum peak to valley ratio up to 9.10×103 can also be found. The GYNR-based multiple functional device is demonstrated, and mechanisms are proposed for the above phenomena.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Co100-XWX (0 ≤ Χ ≤ 8) nanowire arrays with mean diameters of ~33 nm were synthesized by alternating current electrodeposition of Cobalt and Tungsten into template of anodic aluminum oxide. Effects of W concentration, pH and annealing process on magnetic properties and crystal structure of the fabricated nanowires were studied using Scanning electron microscopy, Energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy, X-ray diffraction, and alternating gradient force magnetometer. The obtained results demonstrated that the crystal structure of prepared nanowires was hcp and fcc and a mixture of both, and the magnetic parameters such as coercivity and squareness (Sq = Mr/Ms) of nanowire arrays decreased with increasing the tungsten content and pH. For the study the effect of annealing temperature on the nanowire magnetic properties, the fabricated nanowires were annealed at different temperature (300 °C–600 °C). It is observed that the coercivity for all nanowire arrays with the different value of W content and pH increases with annealing temperature and the maximum variation is related to Co97W3 nanowire at pH = 3, which is explained by shape and magnetocrystelline anisotropy that is discussed in detail.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The long-standing issue-the ferromagnetic coupling of adjacent Nd2Fe14B matrix grains across grain boundaries severely impedes further coercivity enhancement of sintered Nd-Fe-B permanent magnets. However, the quantitative role of the ferromagnetic coupling across grain boundaries on the coercivity degradation of sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets is still not well understood. Here, we quantified the nucleation effect of correlated (ferromagnetically coupled) matrix grains in sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets by integrating electron backscatter diffraction, energy dispersive spectroscopy, atom probe tomography, and high-resolution magnetic force microscopy in conjunction with micromagnetic simulations. We revealed that (1) the de-nucleation effect of correlated matrix grains (αψ) across intergranular grain boundaries is linearly enhanced with the increasing thickness (d) of grain boundaries (αψ = kd + l) and k is reduced with increasing exchange stiffness of these grain boundaries when the d is comparable to the domain wall width of the Nd2Fe14B matrix grains in sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets; (2) The thickness variation of the ferromagnetic grain boundary at the nanoscale is harmful to achieving high intrinsic coercivity of sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets; (3) The nucleation field is reduced if there is a little misalignment between correlated (ferromagnetically coupled) matrix grains. These findings shed light on grain boundary engineering at the nanoscale for enhancing the coercivity of Nd-Fe-B permanent magnets.© 2019YMnO3 (YMO) thin films were synthesized by radical-enhanced atomic layer deposition (RE-ALD) on silicon (Si) and yttria-stabilized zirconia (YSZ) substrates, to investigate the effect of film composition and substrates on their intrinsic magnetic properties. The crystalline phase of these ultra-thin films depends on both the processing conditions and the substrate lattice parameters. The Mn/Y atomic ratio of the YMO thin films could be controlled near unity by adjusting the Mn:Y precursor pulsing ratio during the RE-ALD processes. The ALD YMO thin film on Si (111) was orthorhombic, regardless of the film thickness with a Néel temperature (TN) between 48 ∼ 62 K, as determined through the anomalies observed during DC magnetic susceptibility measurements. However, ultra-thin ALD YMO films (∼6 nm) on YSZ (1 1 1), at a Mn/Y atomic ratio near unity, has both orthorhombic- and hexagonal- phases, yielding two TN anomalies measured at ∼48 K and ∼85 K. The induction of magnetization of ultra-thin YMO film on Si (1 1 1) under an in-situ 20 V electric poling indicates that the magnetoelectric coupling was observed below TN, showing that the ALD synthesis could be a promising technique to deposit ultra-thin magnetoelectric films.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.As available in the literature, the physical properties of ternary intermetallic compounds (Heusler alloys) are highly influenced by atomic positions. Therefore, we studied the effect of antisite disorder or swapping X to Y position on the electrical and magnetic properties of the Co2VIn Heusler alloy. We performed first-principles calculations using the full-potential linearized augmented plane wave (FP-LAPW) within wein2k. The compounds Co2VIn and V2CoIn were found to be stable in ferromagnetic state. It was observed that the swapping of Co-V enhanced the magnetic moment two times larger than Co2VIn alloy. Also, swapping Co-V diminished the half-metallic character of Co2VIn and showed the traditional metallic behavior due to delocalization of valence electrons. Apart from swapping, 16.7% V inclusion in Co2VIn alloy offers the more stable behavior than other systems, but suppress the magnetic moment in compare to Co2VIn and V2CoIn systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A top-down approach using focused ion beam has been employed to fabricate Co/Permalloy hard-soft bilayer magnetic antidot arrays. These nanopatterned films are studied with particular emphasis on magnetic coercivity. The antidots have a diameter of 40 nm and the studied antidot symmetries are square and hexagonal. A dependence of magnetic coercivity on the relative thicknesses of the magnetically hard (Co) and soft (Permalloy) layers is found; increasing Permalloy thickness results in lower magnetic coercivity. Furthermore, the long-range periodicity of top-down nanopatterned antidots results in higher magnetic coercivity and a stronger magnetic domain-wall pinning, compared to identical hard/soft bilayers of short-range order deposited on porous anodic alumina. The combination of antidot symmetry and hard/soft thickness, allow for efficient tailoring of the magnetic properties of nanopatterned thin films. Finally, magnetic force microscopy imaging of the antidot array magnetic configuration shows striking qualitative differences between the two array symmetries: square symmetry arrays have inhomogeneous magnetic state and a high density of immobile super-domain walls, whereas hexagonal symmetry arrays show a homogeneous magnetic configuration.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Single crystals of Mn2GeS4 were grown by chemical vapor transport. X-ray powder diffraction data show a single phase. Rietveld refinement results indicated that Mn2GeS4 crystalize in an olivine-type structure. The magnetic properties of the compound have been studied by means of DC magnetometry and AC susceptibility measurements. The system shows two different phase transitions on decreasing temperature, a first one at about 90 K, leading the system from the paramagnetic to an antiferromagnetic state and a second at about 25 K, corresponding to the onset of a weak ferromagnetic behavior superimposed to the underlying antiferromagnetic order. No evidence of a possible spin-glass behavior in the intermediate temperature region has been found.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have carried out harmonic voltage response experiments by application of AC current along the c-axis of Ca5Ir3O12, which has a nonlinear electrical conductivity in a non-ordered state. This AC current method can allow us to investigate a detail of the nonlinear conductivity by application of small current. We observed the harmonics up to 7th order below 200 K. The results reveal that the nonlinear conductivity exists even in application of current close to zero. In addition, the temperature dependence of the resistance R0 estimated at the zero current limit is expressed by ln R0∝T-2/3, which is explained by an adaptation of Efros-Shklovskii variable range hopping or Fogler-Teber-Shklovskii variable range hopping. As a field assisted motion of charge career occurs in hopping conduction, from this analysis result, the nonlinear conductivity comes form the field-assisted hopping conduction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The study reports the influence of polyols (1,2-ethanediol, 1,2-propanediol, 1,3-propanediol, 1,2,3-propanetriol) used in the synthesis on the structure and magnetic properties of Zn0.5Co0.5Fe2O4/SiO2 nanocomposites. The X-ray diffraction patterns indicated the formation of poorly to highly crystalline Zn0.5Co0.5Fe2O4, together with several other crystalline phases (Zn2SiO4, Co2SiO4, SiO2, Co3O4, ZnO), depending on the used polyol and annealing temperature. The Fourier transformed infrared spectra confirmed the formation of metal oxide bonds in Co-Zn ferrite and of SiO2 matrix. The physical density increases and the X-ray density decreases with average crystallite size decrease. The transmission electron microscopy measurements revealed the spherical nanoparticles (2–47 nm) size growth with increasing distance between the hydroxyl groups and number of hydroxyl groups. The shape of the hysteresis loops suggests the dependence of the magnetic behaviour on the structural properties, and consequently, on the polyol structure and the annealing temperature. Also, the saturation magnetization (Ms, ~ 15.8–61.0 emu/g), remanent magnetization (MR ~ 0.41–9.5 emu/g) and coercive field (Hc ~ 0.014–0.021 T) of Zn0.5Co0.5Fe2O4 increase with the polyol chain length and hydroxyl group number. Both Ms and Hc increase with increasing crystallite size. The shape of the magnetization derivative curves with respect to the applied magnetic field indicates the presence of a single magnetic phase (Zn0.5Co0.5Fe2O4) that has ferromagnetic or superparamagnetic type behaviour, depending on the annealing temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This research presents fast-computed analytical expressions and the analysis of the magnetic field distribution created by a permanent magnet with a conical shape. The expressions are derived based on the charge model and geometrical analysis. The results of the magnetic field, computed using the analytical model, are in good agreement with those computed using the Finite Element Analysis. It took less than 1.1 ms to execute each of the derived expressions on a personal computer, which demonstrates their efficiency over the well-known Finite Element Analysis method, in terms of computation time. The magnetic field distribution of an annular cone is analysed, assuming that it is used to generate the magnetic field for the magnetic resonance image of a human head. As a result, the radial component of the magnetic field deceases with the increase of the cone's height while the cone's angles are constant. On the other hand, the radial component increases with the increase of the cone's angles, while the cone's height is constant. This phenomenon is also applicable to the azimuthal component.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of Bi doped CaMn7O12 (CMO) multiferroics are correlated with the results of electronic structures obtained from X-ray absorption spectroscopy. These compounds were prepared by using wet sol–gel technique and their X-ray diffraction patterns confirm the single phase formation. The solid solubility limit of Bi in CMO is found to be 10% at Ca site. A remarkable enhancement in magnetization is observed for 10% Bi doped Ca1-xBixMn7O12. This increase in remanence magnetization is ~10 times in comparison to CMO. Doping of divalent Ca ions by trivalent Bi ions cause an increase in trivalent Mn ions and hence increase in unpaired electrons leading to this enhancement of magnetization. The X-ray absorption studies at the O K-, and Mn K-, and Mn L3,2 -edges of Ca1-xBixMn7O12 (x = 0, 0.05 and 0.10) clearly indicate an increase in the ratio of Mn3+/Mn4+ along with increase in interstitial oxygen atoms. This significant increase in magnetic remanence for optimum Bi doping is very promising for magnetic and microwave applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The problem of mixing miscible fluids is relevant for submillimeter-sized channels, in which the Reynolds numbers are small and the diffusion front on the contact line of two fluids is stable. In the present paper, a diffusion front is numerically simulated at the interface of two miscible fluids, one of which is magnetic fluid. It is shown that the instability of the diffusion front in a uniform magnetic field normal to it leads to rapid mixing of fluids. The most rapid mixing occurs if the magnetic field rotates. It was found that there is an optimal frequency of rotation at which mixing occurs most rapidly. This frequency depends on the mixing time.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the composition dependence of the magnetic properties in X-type hexaferrites Sr2CoxFe30− xO46. We prepared single crystals including various contents of cobalt ions using a flux method. The samples with x ≥ 1.58 exhibited a different behavior in the 21¯1¯0 and 011¯0 directions at 100 K, which was observed by magnetic measurements and Lorentz transmission electron microscopy. Such anisotropy was not observed in the sample that included slightly less cobalt ions (x = 1.32). In contrast, the Curie temperature was independent of the cobalt content. It was concluded that such strong magnetocrystalline anisotropy was caused by the cobalt ions especially at low temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In order to investigate the performance of Fe-Ni magnetic cores within embedded inductor in 3D package, a series of Fe-Ni films with compositions ranging from 15 wt% to 80 wt% iron were electrodeposited on 8-inch silicon wafer. The uniformity on brightness, phase structure and grain size of Fe-Ni magnetic films were investigated through SEM (scanning electron microscopy) and XRD (X-ray diffraction). A gradient growth behavior of fcc (face-centered cubic) and bcc (body-centered cubic) phase was revealed when Fe content ranges 50–75 wt% within Fe-Ni films, which can be attributed to the slightly faster growth rate of fcc phase. As also revealed in TEM (transmission electron microscope) observation, the fcc phase gradually spread over bcc phase region during the electroplating process, and formed an interface with a slight tilt angle to the substrate on the thickness direction. Several methods, such as increasing solution stirring, temperature or decreasing the current density, were proposed to restrain the gradient growth behavior of Fe-Ni film in wafer level.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hard/soft magnetic Co0.8Al0.2NdxFe2− xO4/Co7Fe3(Co) composites are synthesized by the ball-milling-assisted ceramic process, followed by 5% H2-Ar reduction. The effects of the reduction time on their structure and magnetic properties are studied at room temperature. XRD patterns indicate that Co0.8Al0.2NdxFe2− xO4 sample, calcined at 900 °C for 3 h, contains the main spinel CoFe2O4 phase in combination of a small amount of foreign Fe2O3 and/or FeNdO3 phases. After being reduced at 550 °C for 30 min, surface magnetic particles of spinel Co0.8Al0.2NdxFe2− xO4 ferrite samples are transformed from the hard magnetic Co0.8Al0.2NdxFe2− xO4 to the soft magnetic Co7Fe3(Co). The magnetic measurement suggests that the specific saturation magnetization and remanence of spinel Co0.8Al0.2NdxFe2− xO4 decrease with increasing Nd3+ content. After being reduced at 550 °C, specific saturation magnetization and remanence of the composites, Co0.8Al0.2NdxFe2− xO4/Co7Fe3(Co), increase markedly. The hysteresis loop of the composites shows a single-phase magnetization behavior, implying that the magnetic hard (Co0.8Al0.2NdxFe2− xO4) phase and soft [Co7Fe3(Co) alloy] phase in Co0.8Al0.2NdxFe2− xO4/Co7Fe3(Co) composites are well exchange-coupled, which is confirmed by the switching field distribution curves further.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Thin films of the archetypal multiferroic TbMnO3 were epitaxially deposited on (0 0 1)-oriented SrTiO3 substrates by means of DC magnetron sputtering. A substrate temperature of 1053 K and an oxygen pressure of 300 Pa were determined to be appropriate growing conditions for obtaining high-quality, epitaxial TbMnO3 films using this physical growing technique. The structural and magnetic properties of ~100 nm thin TbMnO3 films were investigated. X-ray diffraction patterns showed that the films are single-phase and (00ℓ)-oriented. Rocking curves of the (0 0 2) peak confirm the good crystalline quality of the films. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy analysis confirmed that the nominal valence of the Mn ions is 3+. The films grown on the SrTiO3 substrates displayed substantial epitaxial strain, which decidedly changed the magnetic ground state of the bulk-like counterpart. In particular, the films displayed ferromagnetic-like interactions below a temperature close to the magnetic ordering temperature of the Mn3+ spins (TN ≈ 42 K). Well-defined hysteresis loops with coercive fields as high as 0.1 T were observed at 5 K. The variation of the coercive field with the temperature clearly indicated the presence of low-temperature ferromagnetism in the TMO films. The origin of the anomalous ferromagnetism in the films is discussed in terms of the strain-induced distortion generated by the lattice mismatch between the film and substrate. The reported results can give insight into accurate strategies for controlling single-phase spin-driven multiferroic states.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the relationship between Dy2O3 and MoS2 on magnetic performance and microstructure in Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets was investigated. Compared with the Dy2O3 doped magnets, the coercivity of the Dy2O3/MoS2 co-doped magnets increased with the increasing of MoS2 content. A comprehensive magnetic performance was achieved in the 2 wt% Dy2O3/0.5 wt% MoS2 co-doped magnets. The coercivity increased from 1563.2 kA/m to 1710 kA/m while there was no obvious decrease in the remanence and maximum energy product. Furthermore, the average grain size decreased from 8 μm to 6.7 μm. In the co-doped magnets, the distribution of Dy element was relatively uniform because Dy atoms were found to avoid the Nd2O2S phase. Besides, the Mo atoms were likely diffused into the Nd2Fe14B phase instead of the Nd-rich phase.© 2019Understanding of spin-gapless semiconductors with fully spin-polarized charge carriers is critically important because of their promise for spintronic applications. Here, we report non-collinear spin structures, magnetic ground state, and effective exchange interactions of the spin-gapless semiconductor CoFeCrAl investigated with noncollinear density functional calculations. The ground state of CoFeCrAl is ferrimagnetic and has a spin configuration with ↓ Fe, ↑ Co and ↑ Cr spins. In our constrained calculations, the magnetizations of the Fe, Co, and Cr sublattices are rotated by various angles θ, which give rise to three sets of noncollinear spin structures. For all three elements, the magnetic energy increases with the angle, which reconfirms the ferrimagnetic spin structure. During rotation, the magnitudes of the Co and Cr spins remain almost unchanged, whereas that of Fe strongly decreases as a function of the angle θ. This indicates that the finite-temperature behavior of CoFeCrAl is characterized by a pronounced non-Heisenberg behavior of the ↓ Fe moments, whereas the ↑ Co and ↑ Cr moments are Heisenberg-like. We discuss how this feature affects the finite-temperature behavior of the alloy beyond the commonly considered intersublattice Heisenberg exchange.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Exchange coupling between a magnetically soft shell and magnetically hardcore can boost the properties of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) to maximize their power loss. These MNPs possess large specific loss powers than conventionally used iron oxide MNPs and application of these MNPs in hyperthermia of cancer may result in a better treatment option. In this paper, we have conducted an in-silico study to treat liver cancer using these core-shell MNPs. All the hyperthermia processes are based on the FEM model analysis of infusion of nanofluid flow, diffusion of nanofluid, heat transfer in liver tissue, and tumor thermal damage subject to initial and boundary conditions. All these processes are simulated using COMSOL Multiphysics to predict the pressure, velocity, concentration, temperature distribution, and the fraction of tumor damage during the treatment. The expressions for temperature and concentration-dependent heat sources are derived and compared with a constant heat source. The simulation results show that the concentration-dependent heat source produced a higher temperature as compared to the remaining two heat sources. Through simulations, we have succeeded to effectively treat liver cancer with maximum tumor damage and minimum collateral damage. The validity of our simulation curves of temperature versus time and temperature versus x-coordinate with pre-existing studies are excellent. Our simulations also revealed that the core-shell MNPs used in our study is superior to the other identical core-shell MNPs for better heat generation. Certainly, this research will aid cancer treatment protocols in the clinical setting.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.To study the magnetic memory signal characteristics of buried defects and for timely detection of the buried defects and stress concentration areas of metal components, defect samples with different burial depths were fabricated. The relationship between the magnetic memory signals and burial depths of the defects was studied. The variation in the magnetic memory signals of the buried defects was studied under different load stages (initial loading, mid-loading, critical fracture, and after fracture). The results show that the magnetic memory detection method can detect buried defects, and the strength of the magnetic field and its gradient decrease with an increase in the burial depth. The strength of the same defect magnetic field and its gradient decrease initially and then increase under the action of an external load, and then, increase sharply at the critical fracture stage. The research results are of considerable significance for the detection of defects in ferromagnetic materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We study the effect of inserting Fe and FeCo thin layers between the MgO and the magnetic layer in the TbFeCo-based perpendicular magnetic tunnel junction (pMTJ). Different half and full structure MTJ were prepared and thin layers of Fe and FeCo were inserted between the MgO-TbFeCo interface. It is observed that in both the reference and free layer half structures, the coercivity decreases on inserting Fe or FeCo thin layer. In magnetic tunnel junction full structure, the minor and major loop coercivities increase with FeCo insertion. The transmission electron microscope images of magnetic tunnel junctions show the MgO interface becomes smoother with FeCo-insertion. The difference in the half and full structure magnetic properties attribute to the FeCo crystal orientation. Both the Fe and FeCo insertion gives large coercivity to the MTJ free and reference layers and made the MgO-TbFeCo interface smoother. The magnetic annealing of MTJs shows an advantage over the zero-field annealing. The magnetic annealing up to 250 °C improves the squareness of the MTJ's. This study suggests that the Fe/FeCo thin layer insertion to the TbFeCo-based MTJ will be useful in the fabrication of high performance magnetic random-access memories.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Micro-magnetic non-destructive testing helps in evaluating the mechanical and structural integrity of ferromagnetic components (mostly steel) via local magnetic characterization. As a means of revealing the magnetic domain wall movements, the Barkhausen noise measurement method is a micro-magnetic non-destructive testing method of considerable potential and interest. The Magnetic Barkhausen Noise Energy (MBNenergy) method can be used to reconstruct local hysteresis cycles from Barkhausen noise measurements. These cycles constitute good indicators for understanding the magnetization process and the influence of microstructural and mechanical properties. In this article, the MBNenergy method is employed for evaluating the microstructural changes induced by creep/ageing of high chromium steel subjected to different creep test conditions as stress and temperature. The corresponding magnetic parameters are investigated in relation to precipitations and dislocations. After the experimental analysis, simulations are performed based on the Jiles-Atherton theory for the quasi-static magnetic behavior. This simulation approach yields physically meaningful model parameters that can be analyzed and linked to the sample microstructural characteristics, thereby enabling physical interpretation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Experimental investigation of heat capacity, CP, unit cell parameter, a, as well as the ESR absorption for a clathrate-like compound Eu7Cu44As23 has been performed in the temperature range of 2–300 K. The CP(T) function exhibits a sharp maximum at the temperature of ferromagnetic ordering, Tc ≈ 17 K, whereas the a(T) shows no anomaly at this temperature. This unusual behavior is governed by the clathrate-like structure of Eu7Cu44As23, where Eu2+ guest cations residing in oversized cavities of the host framework order ferromagnetically imposing no influence on the framework dynamics. The analysis of maximum of the Cp(T) function at 2–20 K allows determining the exchange integral, J, which is a characteristic of the magnetic interaction Eu2+ – Eu2+: J ≈ 0.27 K The analysis of the temperature dependencies of heat capacity, CP(T), and unit cell volume, V(T), in the frames of the Debye-Einstein model enabled determining characteristic temperatures of host and guest subsystems. Along with this, the contribution of two-level systems into thermodynamic properties of Eu7Cu44As23 was evaluated and related to the possibility of guest Eu2+ cations to occupy nonequivalent positions inside the cages of the host framework. The ESR of Eu2+ in Eu7Cu44As23 was studied at 5–300 K. The intensity of the ESR signal shows a sharp drop at low temperatures, which confirms the ferromagnetic character of the magnetic phase transition in Eu7Cu44As23. The experimental ESR spectrum was approximated by two Dyson lines, L1 and L2, which correspond to two g-factors: g1 = 2.081 ± 0,030 and g2 = 2,094 ± 0,016. The increase in L1 linewidth with temperature at 75–275 K is d(ΔH1)/dT = 0.027 G/K. These values of g-factors and d(ΔH1)/dT are derived the exchange integrals of the interaction of the Eu2+ local moment with conduction electrons J1* = 0.241 eV and J1** = 0.252 eV accordingly. For L2 J2* = 0.255 eV. Value J2** ≈ 0.26 eV is valid in 100–130 K interval only. The change of ΔH2(T) slope at higher temperatures may be due to crystal field effect.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Tumor microenvironment involves physical parameters that impede the transport of therapeutic agents and create an abnormal extracellular matrix (ECM) at the region with an elevated interstitial fluid pressure (IFP). This is the main reason that the chemotherapy drug agents could not fully penetrate the solid tumors. To overcome this resistance, drug-coated magnetic nanoparticle (MNP) had been proposed as a therapeutic agent affected by an external magnetic force. Three variables as the MNP's size, magnetic field intensity, and the tumor-magnet distance are proposed to see their effects on the distribution of the drugs to the tumor tissue. A micro-scale computational domain is assumed as the normal and tumor tissues with the discrete microvessels. The results determine a moderate effect on the drug penetration to the tumor tissue by the magnetic field and size variations. This moderate effect is due to the consequent of the high density of ECM and high amount of IFP leading only a 36% increase in the drug penetration to the tumor tissue with a 10 nm MNP and under the 2.5 T magnetic field intensity. While, a slight percent increase about 11% is obtained from 0.6 T to 2.5 T. We conclude that the dense ECM, high IFP, and the existence of microvessels have negative effects on the systemic delivery of the MNP distribution leading to a low impact of Magnetic field on the MNPs’ penetration. Therefore, The systemic drug delivery of MNP under the magnetic field has a lower effect in comparison to local drug delivery of MNPs to the homogenous solid tumors. However, the convection rate in the tumor tissue shows a percent increase in the rate of drug distribution to the tumor tissue. The size and the magnetic field are the two most promised parameters for improving the convection term in the tumor region. the finding of this study can help to better understanding the magnetic effects on the distribution rate of MNP to the solid tumor and to overcome the tumor microenvironmet barriers for better drug efficacy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.BaFe12O19 were synthesized using usual ceramic technology in two stages. The structure and dielectric properties of the obtained samples after different processing conditions were the subject of study. At the final stage, the samples were thoroughly reground and pressed into pellets with different pressures. The unit cell parameters of the obtained samples were determined by X-ray diffraction method. The density of the sample pellets as a function of the applied pressure and sintering temperature was collected. The density of the initial sample pellets monotonously depends on the applied pressure. The density of the final sample pellets has a maximum at 1.055 GPa, after which a slight decrease was observed. Complex impedance spectra of all the obtained samples were measured in the frequency range of 10−1–106 Hz. Different treatment conditions result in two ranges of impedance spectrum. The impedance decreases with increasing processing pressure up to 1.055 GPa, above which, it starts gradually decrease. Complex spectra of impedance were fitted with a complex nonlinear least squares method based on the Levenberg-Marquardt minimization algorithm.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We calculate the conductivity tensor for a deformed graphene sheet, in the presence of an external in plane magnetic field and random neutral and charged impurities. We use the semiclassical Boltzmann transport equation to find the transport times due to each scattering mechanism. For random scalar potentials (isotropic scattering) both backward and forward scattering are suppressed. This suppression of backscattering can be understood as a consequence of the overlap between incoming and outgoing states. However, we explicitly show that for random magnetic field (anisotropic scattering) the overlap between states has a hidden angular dependency that actually favours backward scattering and only forward scattering is suppressed, like in conventional two dimensional electron gas (2DEG). This opens the possibility for weak localisation without inter valley scattering in graphene.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Tensile test is one of the most widely used testing methods to measure the yield strength of the processed cold-rolled steel sheets due to its credible results. This testing method is destructive and time-consuming so it can only be used to detect the target parameters on the materials in the same batch. To solve this problem, an online and nondestructive testing device based on incremental permeability (IP) is proposed. IP is related to the reversible domain movements of ferromagnetic materials during the period of dynamic magnetization. This paper analyzed the relationship among IP, eddy-current (EC) impedance and microstructure, and discovered a new IP feature that indicates materials’ average grain size and lattice friction. Experiments used the new feature to estimate the yield strength of steels and obtained an approximately accurate result. In addition, to raise the testing accuracy and realize the quantitative NDT of the yield strengths in cold-roll steel sheets, the rolling direction of the steel sheet was studied and analyzed in our research.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Diverse polymer crosslinking techniques allow the synthesis of linear polymer-like structures whose monomers are colloidal particles. In the case where all or part of these colloidal particles are magnetic, one can control the behaviour of these supracolloidal polymers, known as magnetic filaments (MFs), by applied magnetic fields. However, the response of MFs strongly depends on the crosslinking procedure. In the present study, we employ Langevin dynamics simulations to investigate the influence of the type of crosslinking and the distribution of magnetic particles within MFs on their response to an external magnetic field. We found that if the rotation of the dipole moment of particles is not coupled to the backbone of the filament, the impact of the magnetic content is strongly decreased.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present a study of the physical properties of perovskite oxide Nd0.5Sr0.5MnO3 (NSMO) thin films grown on (110)-oriented SrTiO3 substrates. In bulk form, NSMO displays coupled magnetic and electronic transitions from paramagnetic/insulator to ferromagnetic (FM)/metal and then to antiferromagnetic (AFM)/charge-ordered insulator with decreasing temperature. In thin films, the AFM ordering only occurs when the films exist in an anisotropic strain state such as those obtained on (110)-oriented cubic substrates. In this work, resonant X-ray reflectivity, soft X-ray photoemission electron microscopy (X-PEEM), and magnetometry measurements showed that the NSMO film displays both vertical and lateral magnetic phase separation. Specifically, the film consists of three layers with different density and magnetic properties. The FM and AFM properties of the main NSMO layer were probed as a function of temperature using soft X-ray magnetic spectroscopy, and the coexistence of lateral FM and AFM domains was demonstrated at 110 K using X-PEEM.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This review describes some recent progress in the area of molecular magnets, particularly single-ion magnets (SIMs). While this field is dominated by lanthanide (III) complexes, even among these, thanks to theoretical studies, it is now realized that linear complexes in a two-coordinate state are likely to be most effective. However, synthesis of two-coordinate Ln(III) complexes is extremely difficult. In view of this, there has been emphasis on the preparation of pseudo-linear Ln(III) complexes. In such complexes, only two ligands that are axially disposed and are trans with respect to each other are strong-field while the others are weak-field rendering an overall linear crystal-field around the lanthanide ion. We describe recent examples of pentagonal bipyramidal (PBP) lanthanide(III) complexes where the pentagonal plane has weak-field ligands and the two axial positions have strong-field ligands. It is seen that such PBP complexes are often excellent SIMs. The synthesis, structure and magnetism of PBP lanthanide complexes that show SIM behaviour are described.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and magnetoelectric properties of Y-type hexaferrite single crystal Ba0.6Sr1.4Zn2Fe12O22 were investigated using vibrating sample magnetometer and ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) techniques. It was found that this compound orders magnetically below 400 K and magnetization exhibits a sharp peak at 331 K, which corresponds to magnetic transition from collinear ferrimagnetic phase to a proper screw spin phase with decreasing temperature. Magnetic hysteresis measurements showed stepwise behavior of initial magnetization curve due to sequential metamagnetic transitions with increasing magnetic field. Using novel and sensitive method of electrically modulated FMR it was shown that this Y-type hexaferrite has significant magnetoelectric coupling, which was determined quantitatively at room temperature. Obtained results show that Y-type hexaferrite Ba0.6Sr1.4Zn2Fe12O22 has a rare combination of magnetoelectric coupling and large magnetization at room temperature, which is important for applications in magnetoelectric devices.© 2019A complex investigation of the morpho-structural, magnetic, magneto-optical and magneto-transport properties of amorphous Fe-Gd thin films crossing the magnetization compensation point is reported and the unexpected observed magneto-functionalities are discussed. A tendency of magnetic domain formation with increasing the Fe content over the compensation concentration is observed. The switch from a reversed Magneto-optical Kerr Effect loop to a direct loop when increasing the Fe content over the compensation point is explained via the specific contribution to the rotation of the polarization vector from each magnetic sub-lattice, belonging to Fe and Gd, respectively. Local atomic configurations and magnetic interactions ascertained the amorphous character and revealed an out-of-plane orientation of the magnetic moment of Fe above the compensation point. The thermomagnetic curves prove a concentration dependent behavior, explained by weakly coupled magnetization relaxation processes of the two magnetic sub-lattices. On the other hand, the magnetic hysteresis loops gave evidence of two exchange coupled magnetic phases with different coercive fields. According to structural and 57Fe Mössbauer Spectroscopy results, the two phases correspond to definite nano-sized volumes of two different average concentrations (one of them closer to the compensation point) which are randomly distributed in the film. The unexpected single step-like behavior of the magneto-resistivity curves was explained by dissimilar switching of the spins in these two magnetic phases distributed in nano-sized volumes.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Perturbed angular correlation (PAC) measurements in Hf2Co7 have been performed in the temperature range 77–973 K using the 181Hf probe to observe ferromagnetism in this intermetallic alloy. From present measurements, no magnetic interaction is observed at any temperature in the above temperature range. Only two quadrupole interaction frequencies have been found. At room temperature, values of quadrupole frequency and asymmetry parameter are found to be ωQ=15.7(4)Mrad/s, η=0, δ=0 for site 1 (∼71%) and ωQ=46(1)Mrad/s, η=0.74(5), δ=5(3)% for site 2 (∼29%). Present results contradict with the earlier reported results where a room temperature ferromagnetism was found with a Curie temperature of ∼400 K. X-ray diffraction measurement in Hf2Co7 has also been performed. From the measured XRD pattern, an almost pure phase of Hf2Co7 was observed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanogels represent a cutting edge of magnetic soft matter research due to their numerous potential applications. Here, using Langevin dynamics simulations, we analyse the influence of magnetic nanogel concentration and embedded magnetic particle interactions on the self-assembly of magnetic nanogels at zero field. For this, we calculated radial distribution functions and structure factors for nanogels and magnetic particles within them. We found that, in comparison to suspensions of free magnetic nanoparticles, where the self-assembly is already observed if the interparticle interaction strength exceeds the thermal fluctuations by approximately a factor of three, self-assembly of magnetic nanogels only takes place by increasing such ratio above six. This magnetic nanogel self-assembly is realised by means of favourable close contacts between magnetic nanoparticles from different nanogels. It turns out that for high values of interparticle interactions, corresponding to the formation of internal rings in isolated nanogels, in their suspensions larger magnetic particle clusters with lower elastic penalty can be formed by involving different nanogels. Finally, we show that when the self-assembly of these nanogels takes place, it has a drastic effect on the structural properties even if the volume fraction of magnetic nanoparticles is low.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Graphene is a two-dimensional (2D) material with excellent physical properties, and its special charge transport characteristics promote extensive exploration based on graphene electronic devices. In order to determine the effect of the mesostructure on the electromagnetic transport properties of graphene, the temperature dependencies of the resistance and the magnetoresistance (MR) of reduced graphene oxide paper (rGOP) and reduced graphene oxide aerogel fiber (rGAF) were systematically measured. The conduction mechanism was systematically studied, and the graphene paper and aerogel fiber were in accordance with Mott's 2D and 3D variable-range hopping (VRH) models, respectively. With the decrease of temperature, the transition from small-negative MR to large-positive MR was observed, the influences of wave function shrinkage and quantum interference effects on positive and negative MR were discussed in the framework of hopping conduction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this article, we have investigated the effect of Cr3+ ions substitution on structural, optical and magnetic properties of nanocrystalline nickel-copper ferrites with a generic formula Cu0.3Ni0.7CrxFe2−xO4 (x = 0.00, 0.10, 0.20, 0.30 and 0.40) synthesized via chemical co-precipitation technique. X-ray diffractograms confirmed phase purity of the synthesized samples. The average crystallite size in the range of 16 nm–39 nm was obtained using Scherrer's formula. The HRTEM images also confirmed the particle sizes of the samples. Both saturation magnetization and coercivity were found to decrease with increasing Cr content in Ni-Cu nanoferrites. The hyperfine field obtained from room temperature Mössbauer spectra also reduced for higher Cr content samples. The gradual reduction in Néel temperature with enhancement in Cr concentration also confirmed the weakening of superexchange interactions. A notable increment in indirect optical band gap due to finite size effect was also noticed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization, electron spin resonance (ESR) spectra and resistivity measurements have been performed on the doped pyrochlore iridate Y2Ir2− xFexO7. Magnetization data show the onset of magnetic irreversibility changes little with gradual substitution of Fe. Both the bulk magnetism and the micromagnetism demonstrate that the system becomes less antiferromagnetic (AFM) as more Ir4+ ions are substituted by Fe3+ ions, which is due to the appearance of ferromagnetic (FM) Fe interactions and broken networks of Ir ions. Both the macromagnetism parameters (Curie-Weiss temperature and effective magnetic moment) and micromagnetism parameters (effective g factor, peak-to-peak intensity Ipp, and peak-to-peak width ΔHpp) present nonmonotonic evolution with doping, suggesting coexistence of FM and AFM interactions. Ir ions have mixed valence of Ir4+ and Ir3+ and Fe3+ ions are in high-spin state in doped samples. The resistivity data show that all the compounds are insulators and follow an inverse power law ρ = ρ0T−n well in the whole temperature range. The complex variation of resistivity and magnetism should be a consequence of variation of both SOC and U, as well as hole doping.© 2019We propose results of theoretical study of shear and tensile elastic properties of ferrogels filled with magnetizable particles, united in linear chains, percolating the sample. It is supposed that a magnetic field is applied along the chains, perpendicular to the shear and parallel to the tension deformation of the sample. Our results show that at a certain threshold deformation, the chains experience a rupture; this break leads to a fall down of the macroscopic elastic stress. This effect is detected for both types of the deformation. The results of calculations are in agreement with experimental data.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Here we report that Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets containing only 12.6–12.9 at.% rare earth elements exhibit maximum energy product (BH)max of 48.0–48.8 MGOe, remanence Br of 1.40–1.41 T, and coercivity Hcj of 12.2–14.5 kOe, which are prepared through introducing eutectic Dy71.5Fe28.5 (at.%) into the near-stoichiometric (Pr,Nd)12.3FebalB6.1 (2:14:1 phase, at.%) magnets via grain boundary restructuring (GBR) approach. The low-melting-point Dy71.5Fe28.5 additive facilitates the liquid phase sintering process to achieve high densification, and generates continuous grain boundary layers that well isolate the main phase grains. Moreover, Dy enrichment at the surface region rather than the center of 2:14:1 grains not only increases the coercivity by enhancing the local magnetocrystalline anisotropy field, but also maintains the remanence. The fact that total rare earth contents of Dy71.5Fe28.5-restructured magnets are much lower than those commercial ones with equivalent magnetic performance (usually 13.5–14.0 at.%) delights the prospective future of GBR approach on fabricating high-performance Nd-Fe-B.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, we have gained fundamental understanding of the physical properties of ferric selenide (Fe3Se4), an emerging ferrimagnetic material, via a systematic study of its structural, electronic, magnetic, optical and transport properties based on first-principles calculations. The analysis of the electronic band structure (with spin-orbit coupling taken into account) and density of states confirms its metallic behavior and reveals considerable hybridization of Fe-3d and Se-4p states near/at the Fermi level. With the predominant spin polarization on Fe sites, Fe3Se4 in its monoclinic phase favors a type-II ferrimagnetic ordering resulting in a total magnetic moment of 4.25μB per unit cell. The symmetry and charge analysis further suggests the tilting of Fe sub-lattice and the existence of interesting orbital-ordering due to the Jahn-Teller (JT) distortion. In addition, electron plasmonic peaks in the optical absorption spectra and unusual electrical and thermal transport properties are observed. These findings make Fe3Se4 as a potential candidate for a wide variety of applications in magnetism, spintronics, optoelectronics, and thermoelectrics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.While the research field of hyperthermia has long focused on magnetic oxides and two-component alloy nanostructures, ternary magnetic alloy nanoparticles (NPs) have not been thoroughly investigated and understood so far. In this study, we synthesized FeNiCo ternary alloy NPs with variable compositions by a facile polyol method. By investigating morphological and magnetic properties using field-emission scanning electron microscopy, hysteresis loop measurements and first-order reversal curve analysis, we found average NP size, saturation magnetization, coercivity (HC) and coercive field distribution (ΔHc) to range between ~60–230 nm, 65–109 emu/g, 33–98 Oe and 0–650 Oe, respectively. Hyperthermia measurements were performed under an alternating magnetic field with intensity of 400 Oe at a frequency of 400 kHz, leading to maximum specific loss power (SLP) values ranging from 237 to 298 W/g in an ethylene glycol medium with concentrations of 5–1 mg/ml, respectively. By comparing between results of average NP size, HC and ΔHc, our study indicates the possibility of tuning SLP by morphological and magnetic characteristics for potential hyperthermia applications.© 2019 The AuthorsNanocomposites of manganese ferrite and bismuth oxide chloride were synthesized. The composites consisted of 10 nm thick nanocrystalline bismuth oxide chloride thin film grown by atomic layer deposition on spinel MnFe2O4 nanoparticles prepared by wet chemical synthesis. The composite layers exhibited nonlinear polarization behavior in both magnetic and electric fields at room temperature. The magnetic coercive force, HC, was 30–40 Oe at room temperature. The width of electrical charge – voltage hysteresis loop reached 3.6 MV/cm.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.NiMnGa have potential applications for magnetic field sensors, strain sensors, actuators and solid-state refrigeration, due to their unique microstructures and crystalline phases at various temperatures. Synthesis of Heusler type NiMnGa nanowires (diameter ~200 nm) has been done by low cost DC electrodeposition method using AAO templates. This method was employed due to its cost effectiveness, simplicity, and precise control over composition, diameter and length of nanotubes/nanowires. It has been observed that Ga concentration decreases as Mn concentration increases with the rise in potential. Magnetic properties have been studied at room temperature as well as at low temperatures. It has been found that coercivity (Hc) increases as temperature decreases. The nanowires have maintained ferromagnetic behavior from 10 K to RT.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we systematically studied the influence of Ti doping on the crystal structure, martensitic transition, magnetocaloric effect, and exchange bias in Ni43Mn46Sn11−xTix alloys. With the increase of Ti concentration, the martensitic transformation temperature increases gradually due to the effect of lattice contraction, and the ferromagnetic ordering windows in the martensitic and austenitic regions are closed at x = 1 and x = 2, respectively. This study demonstrates that relatively large magnetic entropy changes can be obtained around the paramagnetic-paramagnetic martensitic transformation under high magnetic field. Another effect of Ti doping is the enhancement of antiferromagnetic interaction, which resulting in the transformation of ground state from reentrant-spin-glass to canonical spin-glass for x⩾1. The zero-field-cooled exchange (ZEB) was realized in the composition range of 1⩽x⩽4, of antiferromagnetic interactions is a viable way to achieve ZEB in NiMn-based Heusler alloys.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetorheological elastomers (MRE) are potential resilient elements to improve the operating frequency range of a vibration isolator. The field-dependent characterization of MRE properties for varying input frequencies under lateral shear conditions has been well researched in past studies. In the present study, a novel approach to assess the magnetic field dependent rheological properties of magnetorheological elastomers under dynamic torsional loading is presented. Field and frequency-dependent properties are estimated from the dynamic blocked transfer stiffness method specified by ISO 10846. Viscoelastic properties represented in-terms of complex torsional stiffness and loss factor are estimated from the Lissajous curves within the linear viscoelastic (LVE) limit. Experiments are performed at a frequency range of 10 Hz–30 Hz under a constant input angular displacement. Magnetic field sensitive characteristics of MRE are evaluated under the field produced by a custom-made electromagnet. The results reveal a strong influence of field dependent variations on the complex stiffness in comparison with the input frequency. Variations observed in the loss factor suggests a dominance of the imaginary part of the complex stiffness on the energy dissipation. The reduced field induced enhancements in the complex stiffness are interpreted from the Magneto-static and structural based numerical simulations using ANSYS 19.1.© 2019The interactions between liquid–solid and liquid–gas phases can be characterized by measuring the contact angle between a solid surface and a liquid droplet. The wetting properties of magnetic fluids can be determined by contact angle measurements. In the case of these fluids the wetting properties are also affected by an external magnetic field. In our research we investigated the magnetic field induced deformation of water based magnetic fluid (Ferrotec EMG 700) droplets containing various amount of nanosized (~10 nm) magnetite particles on different surfaces. The contact angle measurements were conducted in a closed controlled environment on droplets placed on hydrophobic (silicone rubber coated silicon wafer) and hydrophilic (uncoated silicon wafer) surfaces. The droplets were photographed using a microscope camera and the contact angles were determined by image processing. The experimental data are discussed in the framework of a perturbative density functional theory.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetogranulometry involves analysing the magnetic properties of a material in order to determine the microscopic composition. For ferrofluids, this means determining the number of magnetic particles of particular size and magnetic dipole moment. Previous work has focused on analysing the static initial magnetic susceptibility, χ, using an accurate theory for how χ depends on the Langevin magnetic susceptibility χL, which is a function of the concentration and dipole moment of each particle fraction. Herein, the application of similar techniques to the frequency-dependent magnetic susceptibility, χ(ω), is examined with the assumption of the Brownian rotation mechanism. The usefulness of the analysis relies on the accuracy of the underlying theory. Ignoring interparticle interactions gives the Debye theory. Interactions are taken into account using a modified mean-field theory and a modified-Weiss theory. Using computer-simulation results for known compositions as model ‘experimental’ data, it is shown that it is essential to take interactions into account, and that the modified-Weiss theory provides the most accurate results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The role of the morphology of raw Fe materials on microstructures and magnetic properties of bulk SmCo/Fe(Co) nanocomposite magnets prepared by ball milling combined with annealing and high pressure thermal compression (HPTC) was investigated. We found that the branch-like coarse-grained Fe (BLCG-Fe) promoted SmCo amorphization and reduced grain sizes of the formed Fe(Co) nanocrystals during ball milling process compared with spherical nanocrystalline Fe (SN-Fe). The BLCG-Fe resulted in a three-phased nanocomposite consisting of SmCo7, SmCo3 and Fe(Co) phases and the SN-Fe led to a two-phased magnet composed of SmCo7 and Fe(Co) phases after annealing at 580 °C. And the BLCG-Fe nanocomposite had a smaller Fe(Co) grain size d = 12 nm compared with d = 18 nm for the SN-Fe nanocomposite. For the nanocomposites prepared by HPTC, the BLCG-Fe enhanced obviously the (0 0 2) texture of the SmCo7 phase and improved the magnetic anisotropy compared with the SN-Fe, which resulted in a much higher energy product 25.5 MGOe (203 kJ/m3) than that 15.5 MGOe (123 kJ/m3). The detailed mechanism was discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We provide an overview of the routes allowing the optimization of magnetic softness, giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) effect and domain wall dynamics in one of the families of magnetic microwires: glass –coated microwires prepared using Taylor-Ulitovsky method. The magnetic properties of as-prepared microwires are determined mostly by the magnetoelastic anisotropy. Conventional annealing allows a considerable improvement of the domain wall dynamics in Fe-rich microwires and a slight decrease of the coercivity, however, remarkable magnetic hardening is observed after conventional furnace annealing of Co-rich microwires. Stress annealing of Fe-rich microwires allows a considerable magnetic softening and GMI effect enhancement and even more remarkable improvement of the domain wall dynamics. In Co-rich microwires stress-annealing allows the improvement of GMI effect and even the induction of transverse magnetic anisotropy at high enough annealing temperature. However, the highest GMI effect is observed for stress-annealed Co-rich microwires which present rectangular hysteresis loops. Consequently, annealed Co-rich microwires can present both, fast domain wall propagation and GMI effect. Observed induced anisotropy and related changes of the magnetic properties are discussed considering the internal stresses relaxation, “back-stresses” and circumferential magnetic field during proposed post-processing. Consequently, correctly designed post-processing enabled us to design the magnetic anisotropy distribution beneficial for the optimization of the GMI effect and the domain wall dynamics in magnetic microwires.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this contribution, an amino acid of L-Arginine coated cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) nanoclusters with mesoporous structure were synthesized via a facile solvothermal strategy. The morphology, structure and properties of bare CoFe2O4 and L-Arg-coated CoFe2O4 nanoclusters were characterized in detail by SEM, TEM, XRD, XPS, TGA, BET and SQUID. It was found that these products exhibited a well-defined clusters-like morphology and a uniform size distribution with an average diameter of 103.6 nm. The as-prepared superparamagnetic CoFe2O4 nanoclusters with mesoporous structure and negligible cytotoxicity could be utilized as an effective drug delivery for doxorubicin hydrochloride (DOX). The drug loading capacity and the release behavior in vitro of DOX from L-Arg-coated CoFe2O4 nanoclusters at different pH values (4.0 and 7.4) were investigated. The results showed that the developed drug delivery system exhibited a high drug loading capacity and a pH-sensitive drug release behavior.© 2019Lanthanum replaced strontium M-type ferrite particles, Sr1−xLa2x/3Fe12O19 (where x = 0.0, 0.1, 0.2 and 0.3) have been elaborated using tartrate precursor pathway. The manipulation of different synthesis conditions was assayed. Typical, Sr2+ ion surplus and La3+ ion substitution was discovered to develop the phase evolution and the microstructure of M-type hexagonal ferrites. Indeed, appropriate strontium hexaferrite single phase of was acquired at annealing temperature ≥1100 °C for with Sr1.1Fe12O19, Sr1.0La0.067Fe12O19 and Sr0.9La0.133Fe12O19samples. A secondary α-Fe2O3 phase was recognized at all temperature for samples with composition Sr1.0Fe12O19, and Sr0.8La0.2Fe12O19. The crystalline aspects were strongly premised on the La3+ ion content as well as the annealing temperature. The morphology of M-type hexagonal ferrite clearly indicates that the synthesized powders existed as a closed pack plate-like. The saturation magnetization and the coercivity were found to gradually increase with annealing temperature and Sr2+ ion surplus. Interestingly, coercivity value was highly gained with incorporation of La3+ ion. A high coercive force (Hc = 2366.5 Oe) was fulfilled by inserting La3+ ion of 0.1 into pure SrFe12O19 phase.© 2019We study the magnetic behavior of the metallic system ∊-FeHx as a function hydrogen concentration (x). Using ab-initio density functional theory, we investigate the effect of hydrogen on the stability of magnetic configurations considering two antiferromagnetic (AFM) phases and a ferromagnetic (FM) one present in ∊-Fe (AFM-I and AFM-II). Our results show a magnetic transition induced by H between AFM and FM around x = 0.44. In this way, two main effects can determine the stability and the magnetic phase transition: a volume increase that produces an AFM to FM transition and the charge transfer effect from H to Fe energetically favors the FM phase. We discuss these behaviors in detail and physically explain the magnetic transition and the overall behavior using a phenomenological Stoner model for these systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate ~36% enhancement in heating efficiency in an aqueous magnetic fluid containing tetramethyl ammonium hydroxide (TMAOH) coated superparamagnetic (SPM) Fe3O4 nanoparticles (MNPs), after external static bias field (HDC ~ 80 Oe) induced in situ texturing, parallel to the radio frequency alternating magnetic field (RFAMF). Under the influence of HDC, the dispersed SPM MNPs undergo a disorder-to-order transition by forming linear chain-like structures parallel to the direction of HDC, which is confirmed from atomic force microscopy images. Using flexible chain model, the ensemble averaged chain length is determined and formation of such chains is found to enhance the effective anisotropy energy density by ~24%. Calorimetric experiments show ~8–15 and 26–36% enhancement in RFAMF induced heating efficiency for the oriented ferrofluids with MNP concentrations of 6 and 8 wt%, respectively. High frequency dynamic hysteresis loops simulated for the oriented samples indicate ~37% enhancement in heating efficiency over the randomly oriented samples, which is found to be in good agreement with the experimental results. Our findings validate the recently proposed in situ orientation protocol for enhancing RFAMF induced heating efficiency and provide further impetus towards successful implementation of magnetic fluid hyperthermia for cancer therapy by minimizing exposure time and offering new opportunities to mitigate the undesired loss of heating efficiency in viscous tissue-like environments.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.It is known that superparamagnetic magnetite (Fe3O4) nanoparticles (NPs) become ferromagnetic under Si2+ ion irradiation due to particle size growth and microstructure evolution; it has been proposed that this feature could be used for in situ high temperature (up to 500 °C) radiation monitoring in the core of nuclear reactors. Herein, magnetite NPs synthesized by a nanocluster deposition system are heated to 800 °C in three different environments (argon, oxygen and vacuum), and nanostructure-magnetic property correlations are investigated by vibrating sample magnetometry, scanning electron microscopy, and X-ray diffraction. Magnetization of the NPs is increased due to the sintering and overall size growth by the agglomeration of the particles, while the morphology remains nearly unchanged up to 800 °C, with the one anomaly that zerovalent Fe appeared due to the reduction of the Fe3O4 at 800 °C in vacuum. In argon and oxygen at high-temperature, antiferromagnetic hematite is created, which causes a reduction of the magnetization, and abrupt growth of particle size above 500 °C.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) was applied to uncover the magnetic properties of NiFe/WTi multilayers, which showed themselves up as ideal candidates to exemplify the several resonance modes [optic, uniform, and interface FMR modes, volume and surface spin wave resonance (SWR) modes] that can emerge from the probing materials during the measurements: an instructive work to describe what can be revealed by this powerful technique. The absorption modes excited by the microwave field were correlated to important magnetic parameters and characteristic of each multilayer studied by using the FMR and SWR theories and the associated fittings. In particular, the dependence of the damping constant on the thicknesses of magnetic and spacer layers, attributed to both the effects of spin-pumping and mixing of electrical conductance at the magnetic/non-magnetic interfaces, opens the possibility of tailoring the NiFe/WTi structures for specific device applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.By controlling the polarization direction of BaTiO3 (BTO) layer, the nonvolatile and reversible resistive switching behavior of the BaTiO3/La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 (BTO/LSMO) layered heterostructure have been observed. Pulsed laser deposition (PLD) technique was used to prepare it on the (0 0 1) oriented single-crystal SrTiO3 (STO) substrate, and its magnetic and electric properties were studied. Moreover, the change of the resistivity and metal–insulator transition temperature (TMI) for the LSMO layer were found to be induced by the switching of the electric field direction. The resistivity is decreased while the TMI is increased for the accumulation state of hole carriers when a negative electric field is applied to the BTO layer. By contrast, the resistivity is increased while the TMI is decreased for the depletion state of hole carriers when a positive electric field is applied to the BTO layer. This result indicates a nonvolatile and reversible resistive switching behavior in the multiferroic heterostructure control through the external electric field on ferroelectric layer, which provides a platform to develop unique electronic devices, such as nonvolatile random-access memories, sensors and memristive devices, etc.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Spin-torque and spin-Hall nano-oscillators based on topological magnetic solitons, including domain wall, circular vortex, Skyrmions and antiferromagnetic Skyrmions have sparked extensively scientific interest, which hold the advantage of miniature size, wideband tunability and high levels of integration with CMOS. Here, we present that the radial vortex state can also be brought into persistent self-oscillatory periodic motion by applying spin polarized current in a nanocontact cylinder magnetic multilayers structure. Using micromagnetic simulation, we show that the threshold current density of radial vortex oscillator is one order of magnitude lower than traditional spin-torque nano-oscillators. More importantly, the radial vortex oscillator exhibits roughly tripled time-varying averaged magnetization oscillation in comparison with the circular vortex oscillators. Therefore, the microwave output power can be greatly enhanced and the energy dissipation can be markedly reduced. The above-mentioned findings provide an in-depth knowledge of radial vortex oscillators, it may facilitate the practical application of radial vortex oscillators.© 2019The coercivity of hot-deformed magnets is enhanced with slight reduction of remanence by spraying Pr70Cu30 powders on magnets’ precursor melt-spun Nd–Fe–B powders. The distribution of rare earth rich phases in diffused sample is superior to original magnet. The thermal stability of the diffused magnets is comparable to the sintered sample with 1 wt% Dy content and much better than the sintered grade 42SH HRE-free sample. The reversed magnetic domains of the pre-saturated samples appear when the temperature reaches 125 °C in coarse grains near ribbon surface and propagated like avalanche by further increasing the temperature. The thermal stability of hot-deformed magnet can be largely optimized from the magnetic domain variation dependent on temperature enhancement.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ferrofluid has been used in many fields, such as microfluidics, droplet formation, and heat transfer, due to its potential to be attracted in the presence of a magnetic field. Droplet formation, itself, has many applications such as emulsions, 3D micro-printers, MEMS, and electro-sprays. In this study, the mechanism of ferrofluid droplet formation from the nozzle in the presence of an alternating magnetic field was investigated. The magnetic coil was fixed at different angles with respect to gravity and the effect of the alternating magnetic field and the angle of the magnetic coil axis with respect to gravity on the produced droplet volume, satellite droplet, and droplet formation frequency were studied for the first time. Also, by using a reservoir instead of syringe pump, a drop-on-demand (DOD) platform was introduced. The results showed that with increasing magnetic force, the volume of droplets in both DC and AC cases decreases, whereas the droplet formation frequency increases. It was also observed that by using a DC magnetic field for all angles, the droplet formation was accompanied by a satellite droplet, whereas in the presence of the AC magnetic field, the satellite droplet was eliminated. So, a new regime of droplet formation was observed. Also, by tuning the alternating magnetic field, a larger droplet with respect to DC magnetic field was detected. Interestingly, it was shown that by increasing the angle of the magnetic coil axis with respect to gravity from zero to 90°, the volume of the produced droplet has a minimum at 45°.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this study, transient leakage current caused by a parasitic bipolar junction transistor (BJT) in nanowire-type gate-all-around metal–oxide–semiconductor field-effect transistors is physically modeled for circuit design. The model considers the majority carrier concentration in the body, which is modulated by the gate-to-body bias. The parasitic BJT gain is dependent on the majority carrier concentration, which exceeds the body doping concentration in transient conditions. Three-dimensional technology computer-aided design simulation is performed to verify the model. The model accurately predicts the transient leakage current according to various structural parameters.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we study theoretically the effect of the mass transfer processes on the volume magnetic force and viscous friction of the magnetic fluid subjected to a magnetic field gradient and a shear flow between two rotating cylinders. The model is based on the diffusion equations and takes into account a condensation phase transition in the magnetic fluid. The results of experimental and theoretical studies of the diffusion processes in a thin layer of the magnetic fluid are also presented.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this letter, we introduce for the first time a nano-fin patterning technique that combines Au electro-plating and high-temperature InGaAs dry etching processes. We applied this technique to fabricate vertical homojunction InGaAs tunnel-field-effect-transistors (TFETs). An InGaAs fin width (Wfin) of 60 nm was implemented with excellent line-edge-roughness (LER). The fabricated vertical homojunction InGaAs TFETs with a gate length (Lg) of 100 nm exhibited excellent device characteristics, such as a minimum subthreshold swing (Smin) of 80 mV/decade, an on–off-ratio (ION/IOFF) of 6.09 × 102 at VDS = 0.3 V, and a drain induced barrier lowering (DIBL) of 208 mV/V at room temperature.© 2019 Elsevier LtdA charge-trap flash (CTF) memory stack of chemical vapor deposition (CVD) tungsten (W) was systematically compared with a physical vapor deposited (PVD) W memory stack. The residual F in the CVD W was diffused into Al2O3, Si3N4, SiO2, and the interface at SiO2/poly-Si after the subsequent annealing process at 900 °C for 1 s. The diffused F increased the SiO2 thickness and altered the charge-trap density in the Al2O3, Si3N4, SiO2, and SiO2/poly-Si interface, and this eventually affected memory performance and reliability. The memory window and program/erase retention properties degraded while the charge-transport and endurance characteristics improved with the CVD W memory as compared to the PVD W memory.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe present work highlights the potential of low-temperature processed Al-doped ZnO (AZO) nanoparticles (NPs) for application in organic-inorganic perovskite solar cells (PSCs). ZnO nanostructured electron-transporting layer (ETL)-based PSCs are superior to ZnO film-based PSCs owing to their relatively lower cost, simpler deposition process, milder sintering temperatures, and higher electron mobility. Moreover, the PSCs based on ZnO nanostructure ETLs are more stable than ZnO film-based PSCs because perovskite films can be easily decomposed into PbI2 during the annealing process. Al doping in ZnO can reduce the recombination at the ETL/perovskite interface. Thus, low-temperature processed AZO NPs were used as the ETLs for PSCs, and the effects of Al doping on the performance and photovoltaic parameters of PSCs were investigated. The lowest transmission loss was observed for the AZO sample with an Al/Zn molar ratio of 2%, while a higher transportation rate was obtained for the Al/Zn molar ratio of 5%. The effectiveness of Al doping was demonstrated by a conversion efficiency (η) of 13.91% for the Al/Zn molar ratio of 2% (η = 12.28% for ZnO). Moreover, the short-circuit current density (from 18.40 to 19.36 mA/cm2) and fill factor (from 67.87 to 71.18%) increased. The value of shunt resistance gradually increased (from ~799 to 1248 Ωcm2) by Al doping. The values of diode ideality factor (from 2.3221 to 2.3175) and reverse saturation current density (from 11.97 × 10−10 to 7.95 × 10−10 A/cm2) decreased by Al doping, indicating a reduction in the recombination loss. The lowest series resistance was obtained for Al/Zn molar ratio of 2%.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Co and Mn co-doped BiFeO3 samples are successfully realized using a stirred hydrothermal route to form BiFe0.9CoxMn0.1−xO3 (for x = 0.01, 0.03, 0.05, 0.07 and 0.09) system. Our data show that both the ferroelectric (TC) and antiferromagnetic (TN) transition temperatures increase especially TN varies by up to 23 °C when changing from BiFe0.9Co0.01Mn0.09O3 to BiFe0.9Co0.09Mn0.01O3. Such strong TN enhancement is explained by Co ionic size which induces a chemical pressure by reducing the unit cell and consequently favor the exchange coupling between the magnetic moments carried by Fe/Co/Mn. Moreover, Co3+ (d6 electronic configuration) by replacing Fe (d5) increases the magnetization reaching a value of 3.394 emu/g for BiFe0.9Co0.09Mn0.01O3, by favoring double exchange interactions. The direct magnetoelectric (ME) measurements on those samples show a significant increase of the ME coefficient with a value of 8.720 mV/(Oe.cm) for BiFe0.9Co0.05Mn0.05O3 i.e. up to 6 times higher than that of pure BiFeO3. For Mn-rich compositions, because of a parasitic Bi25FeO40 phase and high electric losses, no intrinsic ME coefficient could be measured.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The electromagnetic wave can be efficiently absorbed by coating absorbing materials in the frequency of absorption peak, which has been experimentally proved deriving from destructive interference of electromagnetic waves reflected from different interfaces of the absorber in that frequency. However, except at the peak frequency, the absorption mechanism is still controversial. In this paper, the symmetry model of absorbing materials has been proposed and the reflected waves originated from different interfaces were separated. The separated waves’ amplitude and phase were extracted, which provides direct evidence to explain the absorption performance at different frequencies. Three common fillers, namely magnetic materials, ferrite materials, and carbon materials, were selected to prepare polyurethane composite absorber material. Their absorbing properties were simulated by the finite element method, and the information of separated waves was obtained. The superposition result of the separated waves is the same as the reflection loss, which reveals the dependence of absorption performance and the waves reflected from different interfaces, validates the correctness of the quarter-wave model, and proves that not only the reflection loss at peak frequency, the absorption performance at all the frequency range are dependent on the interference.© 2019 Elsevier LtdConventionally, the catalytic promotion of semiconductor metal oxide-based CO2 sensors response is simply based on chemical reaction. In most realistic applications, the sensors are operated in both sensing gas and light surrounding. Hence, we try to use a new type of catalyst, such as ZnSn(OH)6 (ZHS) has both chemical and photo catalytic functions to improve gas response more significantly. In this work, ZnO nanorods are deposited on p-type silicon substrate with and without ZHS microcubes covered on the top. The effects of adding the ZHS microcubes on CO2 sensing response have been studied in detail with experimental measurements. Experimental results show that the added ZHS microcubes promote CO2 response up to 350%, which is higher than the reported CO2 sensors with or without metal catalyst.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic Hartree Fock ground state stability for a two-dimensional interacting electron system with Rashba-type coupling is studied by implementing the standard many body Green's function formalism. The externally applied electrical field E enters into the Hamiltonian model through a local gauge-type transformation ∼EjAj(k), with Aj(k) as the spin gauge vector potential. Phase diagrams associated to the average spin polarization, the Fermi energy, electron density and energy band gap at zero temperature are constructed. The magnetic polarization state as a function of E is obtained by minimizing the Helmholtz energy functional F with respect to the average Z-spin: 〈σ̂Z〉. We have found that the electric field might reverse the magnetic ground state, unlike the characteristic decreasing behavior associated to the linear term σ̂·(k×E).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the effects of quenching rate on the thermal dependence of the magnetic entropy change ΔSM(T) and the magnetic field induced hysteresis loss through the antiferromagnetic (AFM) ↔ ferromagnetic (FM) transformation in bulk Fe49Rh51. Two nearly identical square-prism-shaped samples were subjected to two different temperature cooling regimes; one was rapidly quenched (FQ) in iced-water and another slow cooled (SC) to room temperature at a cooling rate of 2 K/min. The temperature of the AFM ↔ FM transition is similar for both samples, but the FQ sample shows much sharper temperature- and magnetic field-induced magnetization change; in addition, the total magnetization change is 14% larger. In FQ material, the magnetocaloric effect, i.e., ΔSM(T) quickly approaches saturation above 1 T and shows a large peak value at 2 T (13.9 versus 8.9 Jkg−1 K−1 in SC material), but a larger average hysteresis loss <HL>FWHM in the temperature range coinciding with of the full-width at half-maximum of the ΔSM(T) curve.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we study the rotating magnetic field driven domain wall (DW) motion in antiferromagnetic nanowires, using the micromagnetic simulations of the classical Heisenberg spin model. We show that in low frequency region, the rotating field alone could efficiently drive the DW motion even in the absence of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI). In this case, the DW rotates synchronously with the magnetic field, and a stable precession torque is available and drives the DW motion with a steady velocity. In large frequency region, the DW only oscillates around its equilibrium position and cannot propagate. The dependences of the velocity and critical frequency differentiating the two motion modes on several parameters are investigated in details, and the direction of the DW motion can be controlled by modulating the initial phase of the field. Interestingly, a unidirectional DW motion is predicted attributing to the bulk DMI, and the nonzero velocity for high frequency is well explained. Thus, this work does provide useful information for future antiferromagnetic spintronics applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a novel core–shell structured FeSiAl@MnO/Al2O3 soft magnetic composites (SMCs) has been fabricated by the combination of ball milling with MnO2 and spark plasma sintering (SPS) process. The structure and phase evolution of MnO/Al2O3 insulation layer also were investigated. Meanwhile, the influences of various MnO2 content on magnetic properties of FeSiAl SMCs have been revealed. The results indicate that MnO/Al2O3 insulation layer with high resistivity (32.46 mΩ·cm) is conducive to the frequency stability of permeability. In particular, the total core loss of FeSiAl@MnO/Al2O3 SMCs is only 6.71 W/kg, which is 94.1% lower than that of original FeSiAl (113.6 W/kg) at 50 kHz. It implies that the novel core–shell structure is a powerful method to increase resistivity and reduce total core loss of SMCs, which can significantly improve energy utilization.© 2019We demonstrated improvement of magneto-mechanical properties, including ΔE effect and damping capacity by quenching Fe-rich Fe87Ga13 alloy related to texture transformation. The significant enhancement of about 50% from 4.1% to 6.0% in ΔE/E0 at H = 2.5 kOe (ΔEs/E0) and that of 85% from 0.74% to 1.31% in damping capacity achieved for quenched Fe87Ga13 alloy favors for applications. The almost proportional relation between ΔEs/E0 and K2 suggests that the experimentally ΔEs/E0 is consistent with theoretically calculated K2. Besides, the large change of damping capacity with H examined is mainly dominated by the micro eddy-current mechanism mainly originated from magnetic domain wall motion. The theoretically obtained (ΔW/W)eth of 0.73% and 1.35%, respectively, for the furnace-cooled and quenched Fe87Ga13 alloys are very close to the experimentally measured ζ (0.74% and 1.31%). The texture transformation from (1 1 0) into (2 0 0) after quenching may increase μR and therefore dλ///dH. As a result, the magneto-mechanical properties, including ΔEs/E0, K, and ζ are significantly improved.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The critical behavior of a new ternary intermetallic compound Gd2Rh3Ge has been investigated around the second order ferromagnetic transition temperature (TC). The field dependence of magnetic entropy changes and isothermal magnetization at critical temperature were used to study critical behavior in Gd2Rh3Ge. The exponents β = 0.299(2) and γ = 1.042(1) were evaluated from the modified Arrott-plot method, while β = 0.308(1) and γ = 0.982(2) were estimated through the Kouvel-Fisher method. The reliability of the obtained critical exponents were examined by using the universal scaling hypothesis. These estimated values for the critical exponents indicate that the ferromagnetic compound Gd2Rh3Ge has long-range interactions between spins, which decays with distance (r) as J(r) ∼ r-(σ+d) with σ = 1.91.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report simulation results of skyrmions on fluctuating 2D lattices, where the vertices ri(∈R3) are treated as a dynamical variable and, hence, there is no crystalline structure. On the fluctuating surfaces, an external magnetic field perpendicular to the surface, Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya and ferromagnetic interactions are assumed in addition to the Helfrich-Polyakov Hamiltonian for membranes. The surface (or frame) tension τ is calculated under both isotropic and uniaxial strain conditions, and this calculation clarifies a non-trivial dependence of τ on the skyrmion, stripe, and ferromagnetic phases. We find that the variation of τ with respect to the applied magnetic field in the skyrmion phase is accompanied by a variation of the total number of skyrmions. Moreover, we find that this total number variation is qualitatively consistent with a recent experimental result for the creation/annihilation of skyrmions of 3D crystalline material under uniaxial stress conditions. It is also found that the stripe phase is significantly influenced by uniaxial strains, while the skyrmion phase remains unchanged. These results allow us to conclude that the skyrmion phase is stable even on fluctuating surfaces.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work we study the dynamical quantum phase transition in the 1D spin-1/2 transverse axial next-nearest-neighbor Ising (ANNNI) model by employing the mean field Jordan-Wigner approach. The NNN interaction breaks the integrability of the ANNNI model. We have focused on the induced dynamical effects of the frustration on quench dynamics of the system. The approach helps us to diagonalize the Hamiltonian in the region where the frustration is weak and the analytical method is reliable. First, the non-analyticity of the rate function is analyzed. It is found that only by quenching across the quantum critical point, regular non-analyticitic behaviors at periodic instants are seen in the dynamics of the rate function. Here, our results confirm the existence of paramagnetic commensurate and paramagnetic incommensurate phases in the system. Second, the order parameter dynamics as a system's macroscopical property is investigated and the oscillatory behavior is reported. Third, the nonequilibrium dynamics of the quantum correlations as the entanglement and the quantum discord are studied. We have compared the efficiency of the quantum discord with respect to the entanglement in the detection of the occurrence of the dynamical quantum phase transition.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we have studied the role of Y ions on the structural, magnetic and optical properties of Fe-doped ZnO nanoparticles synthesized by the sol gel method. Rietveld refinement confirmed the single phase of ZnO, without any secondary phase. The lattice parameters and the lattice strain increased, while the crystallite size decreases with increasing of dopant concentration. Fourier transform infrared analysis showed the characteristic absorption bands of ZnO, with some changes in the intensities. The micrographs showed particles with irregular shapes and increase of the agglomerates. The role of Y on the magnetic properties of Fe-doped ZnO nanoparticles was also analyzed. The magnetic measurements at 300 K exhibited a diamagnetic behavior for undoped ZnO sample and doped with Y. A magnetic transition was verified for co-doped samples, now with a ferromagnetic (FM) contribution in combination with a paramagnetic component. The FM exchange mechanisms involving intrinsic defects are the main cause of ferromagnetic behavior. Photoluminescence spectra showed asymmetric shape and confirmed the magnetic phase transitions with the presence of peaks associated with different defects states. The optical band gap values are explained as stronger sp-d exchange interaction between the band electrons of ZnO and the localized d electrons of the Y and Fe ions substituting for Zn ions. This work contributes to the understanding the role of Y on different properties of Fe-doped ZnO nanoparticles, which may be important for future applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.For the first time, 6-aminohexanoic acid is used as an alternative fuel in the synthesis of the spinel ferrites with compositions CoFe2O4, ZnFe2O4 and MgFe2O4 using gel combustion synthesis with different oxidizer-to-fuel (O/F) ratios. The gel precursors were studied by differential thermal analysis and thermogravimetry (DTA/TG), which showed that the ignition temperature depends on the gel precursor, being around 230 °C, 130 °C and 275 °C for CoFe2O4, ZnFe2O4, and MgFe2O4, respectively. These results showed than the 6-aminohexanoic acid has an ignition temperature lower than the urea and the citric acid when were used in the synthesis of the spinel ferrites by gel combustion. Moreover, the adiabatic flame temperature (Tad) of the reactions of combustion were calculated using thermodynamic analysis, which showed that Tad increases when the mass of the 6-aminohexanoic acid increases. X-ray diffraction (XRD) and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR) techniques confirmed the formation of the spinel structures for all the O/F ratios, but there is a minor impurity phase for some experiments. The particle morphology was evaluated using scanning electron microscopy (SEM), showing aggregated particles with a sponge-like structure due to the released gases during the combustion. A vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) was used for measuring the magnetic properties of the as-prepared powders. The values of saturation magnetization, Ms, and coercitivity, Hc, were Ms = 66.9 emu/g and Hc = 1505 Oe for CoFe2O4, Ms = 44.6 emu/g and Hc = 75.2 Oe for ZnFe2O4 and Ms = 28.66 emu/g and Hc = 111.4 Oe for MgFe2O4. The optical band gap for CoFe2O4, ZnFe2O4, and MgFe2O4 were 1.11 eV, 1.37 eV and 1.64 eV, respectively. These results show that 6-aminohexanoic acid can be used as an alternative fuel in the synthesis of spinel ferrites using gel combustion synthesis.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The present study reports auto-tunable temperature sensitive iron-based magnetic nanoparticles fluid synthesized for its application in magnetic fluid hyperthermia. The effect of magnetic field and concentration of the sample is investigated for the induction heating at 350 kHz frequency. The concentration of magnetic fluid and magnetic field was optimized based on the specific absorption of the sample. The cytotoxicity of the optimized magnetic fluid was analyzed on cervical cancer cell line HeLa with and without magnetic field applicator by performing MTT assay. The cytotoxicity assay after induction heating for the magnetic fluid showed cell death up to 75% for 24 h of interaction of fluid with cells. Upon increasing the time of interaction of magnetic fluid to 36 h and for 60 min hyperthermia heating session, almost all cells were found dead. The preliminary analysis revealed significant efficacy of the synthesized magnetic fluid to caused cell death due to hyperthermia of one hour session. In future such type of magnetic fluids can be used for localized treatment of cancer under magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Using first principles calculations based on density functional theory, we study electronic and magnetic properties of CoIrMnZ (Z = Al, Si, Ga, Ge) Heusler systems. Based on the electronic structure calculations, CoIrMnSi and CoIrMnGe are predicted to be half-metallic. For the studied systems, the ground state magnetic configurations are found to be ferromagnetic with magnetic moment consistent with the Slater-Pauling rule. The calculated ferromagnetic transition temperatures are much higher than the room temperature for all the cases. The effect of spin orbit coupling has been discussed on the electronic structure for all the systems studied here. Furthermore, we construct junctions with MgO along (001) direction. The MnZ terminations are found to be energetically more favourable compared to the CoIr terminations. After discussing the tunnelling conductance, we find that CoIrMnSi/MgO/CoIrMnSi could be a promising magnetic tunnelling junction (MTJ) candidate.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) is a useful method to inject spin current between adjacent layers. At the interface between a ferromagnetic insulator (FMI) and a normal metal (NM), conduction electrons are reflected by a spin-flip scattering absorbing a magnon from the ferromagnetic side. Therefore, a magnon source is fundamental to create an imbalance between up and down-spin conduction electrons close to the interface. Using a combination of static and oscillating magnetic fields, one can generate a precession magnetization that provides the over populated magnon state necessary to inject magnetization by spin pumping. Since magnon coherent states are a suitable method to describe precession magnetization, we used coherent states to study spintronic properties. We determined the spin conductivity as well as the spin current injection in an FM/NM junction.© 2019Coix seed oil (CSO) is well-known for wide anti-tumor spectra, but the low bioavailability confined its application. The aim of this study was to prepare nanoscale thermosensitive magnetoliposomes (TML) and identify its possibility to improve the antitumor efficiency of CSO. To obtain TML, polyethylene glycol modified Fe3O4 nanoparticles (PEG-Fe3O4) was prepared by a simple co-precipitation method, PEG-Fe3O4 and CSO were then embed by thermosensitive materials. The results indicated that both TML and PEG-Fe3O4 were superparamagnetic nanoparticles. TML with a phase transition temperature at around 42 °C exhibited temperature sensitive release. In addition, blank TML was nontoxic, while the inhibitory rate of TML containing CSO on HepG2 cells increased significantly when exposed to an external constant magnetic field and preheated treatment. Thus, the fabricated TML has good magnetic targeting effect and fast drug release in response to hyperthermia, which suggests their great potential of application in cancer therapy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Herein, a crucial external variable of spin dynamics responsible for classical and quantum behavior of strongly spin correlated frustrated magnetic systems has been revealed. An experimental procedure has been demonstrated, by which the dephasing of quantum mechanically correlated spins are prevented from thermalization in Ho2Ti2O7 and Dy2Ti2O7. Due to the coupling of Ho/Dy spin with thermal bath, thermalization of doubly degenerate Ising spin takes place independently. The role of external stimuli on quantum information associated with correlations in these systems has also been studied. It has been found that in the thermalized state, macroscopic properties are stationary and universal with respect to widely differing initial conditions, whereas in the non-thermalized state, macroscopic properties depend on widely differing initial conditions and vary with temporal evolution. Temperature dependent variation in Δχ′ as Intensity I(T) and decay rate R(T) of quantum information at a given temperature shows that, in these strongly correlated spin systems, strengthening of spin correlations ease the propagation of quantum information whereas spin constraints by underlying magnetic interactions prohibit the propagation of quantum information. These findings also reveal how quantum-classical correspondence plays a crucial role in the macroscopic properties of quantum materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Titanium substituted BaFe12−xTixO19 (x ≤ 1) barium hexaferrites have been synthesized using the solid phase method. The phase purity and the crystal structure of the obtained solid solutions have been studied by X-ray diffraction. It was found that the unit cell parameters change a non-monotonically. The a parameter has a maximum of 5.896 Å at x = 0.25 and then it decreases almost linearly down to 5.886 Å at x = 1. The c parameter almost linearly increases from 23.216 Å up to 23.282 Å with x increasing. It has been discovered that titanium cations are located in the following positions: 4fIV tetrahedral and octahedral 4fVI and 12k ones. Results of the Mossbauer and Raman spectrometry confirm the established substitution mechanism. The homogeneous ferrimagnetic ordering is detected by magnetic measurements down to ~35 K. Below this temperature the noncollinear magnetic structure is formed as a result of Fe2+ cations change in the spin state from high to low configuration. Magnetization for all the samples is saturated at room temperature in fields of ~1 T. The saturation magnetization decreases from ~70.6 emu/g for x = 0.25 to ~56.7 emu/g for x = 1. The real part of the dielectric constant has value of ~0.2 for all the samples and gradually decreases at heating from room temperature up to ~500 K, after which it begins to increase sharply. The dielectric loss tangent has a maximum in the region of ~500 K and reaches a value of ~0.25 at a frequency of 104 Hz. With increasing the substitution level, the dielectric constant and the dielectric loss of all the samples increase.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The law of approach to ferromagnetic saturation (LAFS) method is required for the accurate measurement of the magnetic properties of magnetically isotropic materials. In this study, we examined the accuracy of the following two LAFS methods for determining the saturation polarization (Js) and anisotropy field (Ha) of isotropic magnets: (1) the method based on the relationship between polarization (J) and applied field (H; 1/H2); and (2) the method based on the relationship between susceptibility (dJ/dH) and 1/H3. We used an isotropic magnet prepared from a commercial ferrite magnet powder with well-known magnetic properties and low Ha as a standard magnet for evaluating the two LAFS methods. Then, we measured the Js and Ha values of our -Ti0.7 compounds with a ThMn12 structure, (Nd0.8Zr0.2)(Fe0.9Co0.1)11.3Ti0.7N1.5 and (Sm0.9Zr0.1)(Fe0.8Co0.2)11.3Ti0.7, including in the high-temperature region (>373 K), where the reduction of Ha was observed. Finding the adequate maximum magnetic fields, where the Js and Ha values obtained by the two LAFS methods agree well, is important for the proper application of the method to isotropic magnet samples. The results of the LAFS methods revealed that the Js values of the new compounds are similar at RT, but higher than that of the Nd2Fe14B phase in the high-temperature region. Because the -Ti0.7 compounds are almost α-(Fe,Co)-phase-free, their Ha values are also higher than that of Nd2Fe14B over the whole temperature region.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Oxide-based diluted magnetic semiconductors usually exhibit above room-temperature ferromagnetism, but low carrier mobility limits their applications in novel spintronics. In this study, using first-principles calculation, the mobility, electronic and magnetic properties of V-N codoped ZnO((V, N)ZnO) system and its composite system (V, N)ZnO/graphene are studied. Compared with (V, N)ZnO, our results show that the electron mobility of the composite system is obviously increased by about three times (from 500 cm2 V−1 s−1 to 1500 cm2 V−1 s−1). In addition, we find that the ferromagnetism of the composite system is largely enhanced than that of the only V-N codoped ZnO. The Curie temperature of the composite system is estimated to be about 630 K based on the mean-field approximation theory, which is nearly twice as high as the (V, N)ZnO(321 K). This study provides effective theoretical guidance for improving carrier mobility and Curie temperature of oxide based dilute magnetic semiconductors.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Aggregation of non-Brownian magnetizable particles and the elastic properties of a magnetorheological suspension under the action of applied magnetic field are studied by means of computer simulations. Our simulations demonstrate non-monotonic dependence of shear stress vs. shear deformation with a maximum at a shear deformation of about 25%.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The spin polarized structural, electronic, and magnetic properties of zincblende Ga1−xVxP (x = 0, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75, and 1) alloys are studied by using the full-potential linearized augmented plane waves with local orbital (FP-L/APW + lo) method within the spin-polarized density functional theory (spin-DFT). The exchange and correlation (XC) energy is defined in all this approach by the generalized gradient approximation (GGA-PBE) of Perdew-Burke-Ernzerhof, whereas the GGA + U (U is the Hubbard term of the Coulomb repulsion correlation) functional is employed specially to treat and improve the electronic and magnetic properties of these compounds. The structural properties show the stability of Ga1−xVxP alloys in ferromagnetic phase, where their equilibrium structural parameters (lattice constant (a0), bulk modulus (B0), and its first-pressure derivative (B’) are evaluated. The elastic constants for the cubic system (C11, C12, and C44) and anisotropy are computed in the goal to prove the mechanical stability of these compounds. The electronic results reveal that both Ga0.25V0.75P and VP alloys have a perfect half-metallic nature, while the Ga0.75V0.25P alloy is a semiconductor. From band structures, we observe that the unfilled 3d-V orbitals increase the rise of spin-exchange splitting energy Δx(d) and Δx(pd); consequently, we found that the minority-spin case presents an attractive effective potential comparing to the majority-spin case. The total magnetic moment of Ga0.75V0.25P, Ga0.25V0.75P and VP alloys are found in integer value (2μB), affirming their complete half-metallic behavior. Moreover, we estimate the s-d exchange constant N0α (conduction band) and the p-d exchange constant N0β (valence band) to analyze contributions of conduction and valence bands in the exchange splitting process; in the other hand, the observed p-d hybridization reduces the atomic magnetic moment of V element from its free space charge value and produces weak local magnetic moments on the nonmagnetic sites of Ga and P atoms.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Developing high-efficiency microwave absorbers is still a big challenge in the low-frequency range, especially in S-band (2–4 GHz). We present a multi-layered structure absorber based on magnetic material with broad-band absorption in low frequency region. The multi-layered structure consist of metamaterials and magnetic coatings, which is stacked layer by layer. Benefiting from the well-designed structure and good impedance matching performance, it is possible to achieve low-frequency and broadband absorption from 2.2 to 9.5 GHz. The experimental results agree well with the simulated ones. The results may provide some valuable design guidelines for low-frequency and broadband microwave absorber.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Controlled thermal decomposition of zinc and iron acetylacetonates in the presence of oleic acid and oleylamine provided surfactant-capped magnetic nanoparticles with narrow size distribution and the mean diameter of ≈15 nm. The combined study by XRD, XRF and Mössbauer spectroscopy revealed three important features of the as-prepared nanoparticles. First, the actual ratio of Zn:Fe was considerably lower in the product compared to the initial ratio of metal precursors (0.14 vs. 0.50). Second, a pure stoichiometric Zn-doped magnetite system, specifically of the composition Zn0.37Fe2.63O4, with no signatures of oxidation to maghemite was formed. Third, Zn2+ ions were distributed at both tetrahedral and octahedral sites, and the observed preference for the tetrahedral site was only twice as high as for the octahedral site. Furthermore, carbon-coated nanoparticles were achieved by pyrolysis of the surfactants at 500 °C, providing a potential sorbent of organic pollutants with room-temperature magnetization as high as 79.1 emu g−1 and very low carbon content of 5 wt%. The thermal treatment, albeit intended only for the carbonization of surfactants, did alter also the non-equilibrium cation distribution toward the equilibrium one by the relocation of a considerable fraction of the octahedrally coordinated Zn2+ to the tetrahedral sites. Preliminary experiments with magnetic solid-phase extraction of β-estradiol from aqueous solutions evidenced applicability and reusability of the carbon-coated product in the separation of steroid pollutants.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The anisotropy of the critical current density, the n-factor and the irreversibility field of mono-core in-situ MgB2 tapes have been studied at various magnetic field orientations and temperatures. Undoped as well as silicon carbide (SiC) and malic acid (C4H6O5) added tapes were studied. The anisotropy is noticeably influenced by the additives due to different carbon contents and fabrication processes. The malic acid added tape exhibits almost isotropic behavior compared to SiC doped MgB2 tapes due to the homogeneous carbon substitution through the chemical solution route, which paves the way to design MgB2 tapes to be applied for industrial magnet application.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Spin-orbit torque (SOT) has been proposed as an efficient mechanism to switch the magnetization in heavy metal/ferromagnet heterostructures. Several experiments show controversial results on the relationship between the magnetic proximity effect (MPE) and the SOT efficiency in heavy metal/ferromagnet structures. In this work, we use first-principles calculations to investigate the dependence of the MPE and the SOT efficiency on the Pt/CoFe interfacial strain in a model structure of Pt/CoFe/MgO. We have found that the interfacial strain can effectively reduce electron hybridization between Pt and CoFe and thereby significantly suppress the MPE while enhance the SOT efficiency. Thermodynamic magnetics analysis further confirmed these findings. Our results have pointed out a new research direction in which one uses interfacial strain as an effective route to design efficient spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.YBaCuFeO5 is one of the interesting multiferroic compounds, which exhibits magnetic ordering and dielectric anomaly above 200 K. Partial substitution of Fe with other magnetic and non-magnetic ion affects the magnetic and the structural properties of the system. We report detailed investigation of structural, magnetic and dielectric properties of YBaCuFe0.85M0.15O5 (M = Co, Ni and Ga). We observed that the partial replacement of Ni and Co in place of Fe, results in magnetic dilution and broadening of the magnetic transition and shifting towards lower temperature. The replacement of Fe with non-magnetic Ga also results in shifting of the magnetic transition to the lower temperature side. The observed dielectric relaxation behavior in these compounds is due to the charge carrier hoping. This study highlights the impacts of magnetic and non-magnetic doping at the magnetic site on magnetic and dielectric properties in layered perovskite compound YBaCuFeO5.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Here, we investigate particular Heusler compounds which were previously predicted by ab initio calculations to have an interesting electronic structure and possible spin-gapless semiconductor state. We synthesized polycrystalline samples, determined crystal structure using X-ray diffraction and performed magnetization measurements. In addition, we present here density functional theory (DFT) calculations for several variants of the unit cell possible for these compounds, and in particular, for structural variant where disorder between Mn or Fe site and p element is present. We found that Ti2MnAl exhibits nonmagnetic ground state, whereas for the Ti2FeAl and Ti2FeGa ferromagnetic ordering is preferred over the antiferromagnetic one. The ordering temperatures observed for Ti2FeAl and Ti2FeGa are in the 30–50 K range, with the latter showing some spin glass type behaviour.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report studies of perovskite La0.64Sr0.36FeO3−δ ceramics through measurements of magnetization and mechanical spectroscopy. We find an unusual magnetic anomaly around 225 K, R3¯c↔Pnma octahedral tilting transition where a step-like change of magnetization was observed. The step-like change depends on the external magnetic field. The magnetic anomaly indicates a change of the magnetocrystalline anisotropy axis and it suggests a substantial role of spin-lattice coupling in La0.64Sr0.36FeO3−δ. Below the tilting transition, a broad peak in zero-field-cooling dc magnetization was observed around TP = 125 K and exchange bias was observed below TP. The exchange bias field shows a strong dependence on temperature and cooling field. It suggests that the exchange bias is resulting from the coupling at cluster glass or ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic interface where ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic domains coexist below TP in La0.64Sr0.36FeO3−δ.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We observe a rare occurrence of multiple caloric effects in multiferroic FeCr2S4 & CoCr2S4 compounds having a spinel structure. The significant magnetic entropy changes of ∼3.72 J kg-1 K−1 and 3.99 J kg−1 K−1 are observed in FeCr2S4 & CoCr2S4, respectively, for a magnetic field change of 0–50 kOe at the paramagnetic to ferrimagnetic transition (TN). At TN large magnetoresistances are also observed as ∼17% and ∼10.2% for FeCr2S4 & CoCr2S4, respectively, for applied magnetic field 50 kOe. On the other hand, the electrocaloric entropy are also found considerable as ∼0.56 J-m−3 K−1 and 1.24 J-m−3 K−1 for a small electric field change of 0–100 kV/m at the ferroelectric transition temperature (TC) for CoCr2S4 & FeCr2S4, respectively.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Combined study of magnetization reversal and AC field-induced processes has been carried out for lanthanum-strontium manganite nanoparticles with an average particle size near 30 nm. Hysteretic behavior with magnetic anisotropy fields of the order of one hundred Oersteds is independently confirmed by magnetic and calorimetric measurements. The regularities of the AC field-induced heating processes occurring in magnetic fluids based on the synthesized nanoparticles are specified and linked to magnetic anisotropy characteristics. The ways to optimize nanoparticle parameters and experimental conditions for the achievement of maximal heating efficiency are outlined.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Toxic effects of drugs on healthy tissues in the traditional way of chemotherapy are considered as the serious challenges of cancer treatment. Magnetic drug targeting is a method that can be used for topical treatment of cancerous tumors as well as to reduce the side effects of drugs. In this paper, a finite element simulation is carried out to calculate the trajectories and capture of drug carrying Fe3O4 magnetic nanoparticles under the influence of an external magnetic field. Two different cases of uniform distribution of the nanoparticles in the blood flow, and a separate injection in the vein are considered and the effects of different parameters such as blood velocity, magnetic field intensity, and particle diameter on the capture efficiency are investigated. Results show that injection of magnetic nanoparticles in an appropriate site can be very effective in blood vessels with high blood flow velocities. The capture efficiency of the particles in a separate injection mode is shown to be improved up to 85% in comparison with the case of uniform flow of the particles in the blood vessel. However, it is indicated that the drug targeting is not successful when the injection site is located opposite to the permanent magnet. Moreover, it is observed that the capture efficiency of the drug carrying particles depends on the magnitude of the magnetic and drag forces. The capture efficiency increases with increase of the magnetic field intensity and particles diameter and decrease with the blood flow velocity.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We successfully prepared Sm2Fe17N3 magnet powders uniformly coated with non-magnetic metals without oxides in the interface between the magnet phase and the coating layer. The whole process from powder preparation by jet milling to coating was undertaken in a low-oxygen atmosphere. Powder coating was investigated using two different dry thin-film preparation methods, arc-plasma deposition (APD) and DC magnetron sputtering. The powder was continuously stirred during coating in order to ensure the uniformity of the coating layer. Scanning electron microscopy with energy dispersive X-ray spectrometry (EDS) and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy demonstrated that an arc-plasma deposited Zn layer on Sm2Fe17N3 powder had nearly 100% coverage and an oxide-free direct metal-metal interface with the underlying magnet phase. The effects of metal-coatings and coating methods on the coercivity of the magnet powder were evaluated with Zn, Ti, and Al as the coating materials and with APD and DC magnetron sputtering as the coating methods. With all three coating metals, the sputter-coated Sm2Fe17N3 powders showed higher coercivity than the raw powders. The APD powders had lower coercivity than the sputter-coated powders, and in the case of Ti, coercivity was even lower than that of the raw powder. Transmission electron microscopy with EDS and nano-beam electron diffraction suggested that the high energy particles deposited by APD damaged the magnetic phase. This study demonstrated that nanometer-thick coatings of non-magnetic metals without oxides in the interface with the magnet phase have the effect of enhancing the coercivity of Sm2Fe17N3 powders, provided the proper coating method is selected.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.High-Fe Fe-metalloid alloys with the nominal composition of Fe85B11–xCxP4 (x = 0, 0.5, 1, 2, 3, 4) were fabricated through the melt-spun technique. Then, the effects of C content on the glass formation, crystallization behavior and magnetic properties of Fe–B–C–P alloys were investigated. Results showed that the completely amorphous structure only formed in an alloy composition of Fe85B9C2P4 (2 at.% C). Moreover, α-Fe phase appeared gradually when C was added continuously. The introduction of C can significantly improve the thermal stability and reduce the glass transition temperature Tg. The appropriate annealing temperature and annealing time can significantly increase the saturation magnetization (Ms) and reduce the coercivity (Hc). Fe85B9C2P4 amorphous alloy annealed at 698 K for 600–1200 s exhibits excellent soft magnetic properties, such as typical Ms of approximately 165–167 Am2/kg and Hc of approximately 5.0–5.1 A/m. Low cost of raw materials and good soft magnetic properties make this alloy a promising candidate for future application.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic phase stability in transition metals doped (4,4) armchair AlN nanosheet were studied using first principle calculations for three different configurations and two magnetic states. Energy differences between ferromagnetic (FM) and antiferromagnetic (AFM) state suggest that the preferable magnetic state for the AlN nanosheet doped with a pair of Fe and Co atoms independent from doping site is AFM, while it is FM for Ni and Mn impurities. For the rest transition metals (Ti, V, Cr, and Cu) doped AlN nanosheet, magnetic state alters as the transition metals configuration varies. In order to identify the most stable configuration, the formation energy is calculated for all compounds. The results obtained from formation energy calculations revealed that the most stable configuration for a pair of (V, Mn, Fe, Co, and Cu) atoms doped AlN nanosheet is the configuration of I, while for Cr and Ni is the configuration of III. AlN nanosheets doped with (Ti, V, Fe, and Ni) atoms are more stable than nanosheets doped with Cr, Mn and Cu.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Within the combination of two-step Jordan-Wigner transformations and one spin rotation, the interacting Kitaev topological superconductor model has been solved exactly, which will be further generalized and transformed into an antiferromagnetic transverse-field Ising chain by the vanishing of electron-electron interaction (U = 0) together with a local unitary transformation in a transverse field. The continuous quantum phase transition is marked by a quantum critical point (QCP), yielding a characteristic quantum critical fan at low temperature owing to the interplay between quantum and thermal fluctuations. It is shown that the plentiful gapped quantum phases and their crossovers are characterized by thermodynamics. In particular, the thermal Drude weight Dth(T = 0) = 0 together with an activated behavior modulated by a power law as T → 0, demonstrate the gapped low-lying excitation. However, at the QCP, Dth(T = 0) > 0 as well as the linear relation dependence on temperature at ultra-low temperature, indicates the gapless quantum criticality, where two distinct gapped quantum phases touch and compete with each other accompanied by the accumulation of entropy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report on the time-resolved dynamics of a single magnetic domain wall (DW) under the influence of a tunable barrier in a Fe-rich microwire. The energy barrier was created by applying a local magnetic field antiparallel to the uniform driving field used to depin and propagate the DW along the wire. This originates the braking and eventually the trapping of the DW depending on the magnitude of the antiparallel local field. The motion of the DW through the local field becomes stochastic for minimum magnetic field values close to the measured friction field (Hfr = 24.4 A/m). This phenomenon is caused by fluctuations in the pinning field associated to the different types of local defects and residual stress existing in the wire. The probability for the DW to overcome the barrier has been estimated for different values of the local field. When the minimum applied field is lower than the fluctuating friction field the DW is always trapped.© 2019Defect engineering provides a tremendous opportunity to impart novel functionalities to nanomaterials. This report is focused on TiN metallic system, where the unpaired spin structure and electron-transport are controlled by injecting nitrogen vacancies (VN). The TiN films are epitaxial, with the TiN/Al2O3 epitaxial relationship given by: (1 1 1) TiN//(0 0 0 1) Al2O3 as out-of-plane, and 〈11-0〉 TiN//〈1 0 1- 0〉 Al2O3 and 〈1 1 2-〉 TiN//〈1 1 2-0〉 Al2O3 as in-plane, after 30° rotation. Epitaxy in such a large misfit system (~9.24%) is rationalized to arise via domain matching epitaxy (DME) paradigm. Following the report of room-temperature ferromagnetism [1] in TiN1−x films formed by injecting nitrogen vacancies, we provide direct experimental evidence of weak antilocalization (WAL) effects by plugging VN using nitrogen annealing of TiN films. This evidence with simultaneous loss of magnetization in nitrogen annealed TiN films is the tell-tale sign of VN acting as magnetically active defects in TiN, as their removal facilitates Berry's phase formation and generation of time-reversal symmetry. Through detailed EELS and Raman analysis, we have explicitly shown the absence of Ti+2 polarons in TiN films on N2 annealing. The resistivity minima in TiN films are attributed to the WAL effect with persistent log T behavior under 0–7 Tesla magnetic fields. The temperature-dependent coherence length analysis also highlights the emergence of WAL under the two-dimensional localization theory. The WAL effect in TiN is similar to topological insulators, quenching on the introduction of magnetically active defects, while stable against non-magnetic defects. Our findings demonstrate the prime importance of nitrogen vacancies in tuning the magentotransport characteristics in epitaxial nitride films for optoelectronic device applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The polycrystalline samples of undoped CuFeO2 and Cu0.97A0.03FeO2 (A = Ca, Sr, Ba) were prepared by solid state reaction method. The single phase delafossite structure with lattice distortion is observed in all of the prepared samples, and the valence state and concentration of Fe3+ have changed after the substitution of alkaline earth ions (A2+) for Cu+. The particle size is improved by A2+ doping, and the largest particle size is observed in the Cu0.97Ca0.03FeO2 sample (~9 μm). Positron annihilation spectroscopy results demonstrate that a small amount of A2+ doping increases the open volume and concentration of vacancy defects, but the overall defect environment is almost unaffected by A2+ ions doping. The UV–Vis absorption spectroscopy investigations indicate that A2+ doping decreases the direct optical band gap. The magnetic properties measurements exhibit that the low temperature antiferromagnetic interaction of CuFeO2 system changes obviously by A2+ doping, the coexistence of ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic interactions is observed in all of the prepared samples. The antiferromagnetic transition temperature of the doped samples is decreased compared to that of the undoped sample. It is found that the magnetic properties of CFO are closely associated with lattice structure and defects concentration.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Bloch-Bloembergen-Slonczewski equation is adopted to simulate magnetization dynamics in spin-valve based spin-transfer torque oscillator with synthetic antiferromagnet acting as a free magnetic layer. High frequency up to the terahertz scale is predicted in synthetic antiferromagnet spin-transfer torque oscillator with no external magnetic field if the following requirements are fulfilled: antiferromagnetic coupling between synthetic antiferromagnetic layers is sufficiently strong, and the thickness of top (bottom) layer of synthetic antiferromagnet is sufficiently thick (thin) to achieve a wide current density window and frequency window. Additionally, the transverse relaxation time of the free magnetic layer should be sufficiently larger compared with the longitudinal relaxation time. Otherwise, stable oscillation cannot be sustained or scenarios similar to regular spin valve-based spin-transfer torque oscillator with relatively low frequency will occur. Our calculations pave a new way for exploring THz spintronics devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A detail study has been performed for the Sm0.50Ca0.25Sr0.25MnO3 compound in its single crystalline form. Distinctly different nature in their magnetocaloric responses (with temperature and external magnetic field variation) were found depending upon the direction of the external magnetic field. Additionally, we have constructed magnetic phase diagram from the magnetic and magnetocaloric effect. Different features in magnetic phase diagram were addressed considering the shape induced magnetic moments configuration in different orientation.© 2019In this study, tunnel field-effect transistor (TFET) which has surface Ge-rich SiGe nanowire as a channel has been demonstrated. There are improvements in terms of on-current and subthreshold swing (SS) comparing with control groups (constant Ge concentration SiGe TFET and Si TFET) fabricated by the same process flow except for the channel formation step. In order to obtain the concentration-graded SiGe channel, Ge condensation method which is a kind of oxidation is adopted. The rectangular shape of the channel becomes a rounded nanowire through the Ge condensation process. The TFET with the concentration-graded SiGe channel can improve drive current due to a smaller band gap at the Ge-condensed surface of the channel compared to Si or non-condensed SiGe channel TFET.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis work reports on the origin of performance improvement for thermally grown TiO2 and Al2O3 based AlGaN/GaN metal-oxide-semiconductor high electron mobility transistors (MOS-HEMTs). The oxides have been used as gate dielectrics and passivation layer. High resolution X-ray diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, and transistor characteristics are analysed to investigate the improvements in the two dimensional electron gas (2DEG) concentration. The HRXRD analysis reveals that in-plane tensile stress of AlGaN layer is increased by 23% (12%) for TiO2 (Al2O3) sample as compared to that of an as-grown sample. The induced tensile stress in the AlGaN barrier layer enhances the piezoelectric polarization charges which effectively improve the carrier confinement and mobility at the interface. The improvement in the DC characteristics is observed as a reduction in the gate leakage current without deteriorating gate control and transconductance. The output characteristics of TiO2 (Al2O3) based MOS-HEMTs have shown a 60% (40%) increment in the maximum saturation drain current and 50% (40%) increment in the transconductance as compared to that of a control sample. The RF characteristics also show similar order of improvements.© 2019 Elsevier LtdTwo different parameter extraction methods are proposed in this article. First, a simple DC method is presented to extract the difference between the drain and source series resistance of MOSFETs. This method is valid for any three- or four-terminal MOSFET and it can be used in linear, triode or saturation region. Second, an integration-based method is proposed to extract the drain resistance and the source resistance of thin-film MOSFETs. Both methods were tested using simulated and measured data of two different devices: zinc oxide (ZnO) and polysilicon TFTs.© 2019 Elsevier LtdOn-chip solenoid coupled inductors with a spliced anisotropic and isotropic magnetic core were proposed and demonstrated for high efficiency DC-DC conversion. The proposed magnetic core design avoids easy-axis excitation at the joint parts of the magnetic loop, which not only reduces the close-loop magnetic reluctance and therefore boosts the inductance value, but also reduces the magnetic flux leakage and therefore enhances the coupling factor (k). The fabricated inductors achieved a high inductance density of 127 nH/mm2 and a large inductance to DC resistance ratio of 323 nH/Ω. The inductance gain is 51× compared to the air-core counterpart and 1.3× compared to the anisotropic-core counterpart. An enhanced k of 0.5 was also achieved compared to the k of 0.2 for the anisotropic-core counterpart. Consequently, the fabricated coupled inductors can achieve a high inductor efficiency of 96.0% for 1.8–0.9 V, 152 mA per phase, 170 MHz DC-DC conversion.© 2019 Elsevier LtdA small-area composite-varactor-based digitally tunable capacitor operated with positive and negative control voltages is proposed to remove several drawbacks resulting from the metal–insulator-metal (MIM) capacitor of the conventional switched capacitor array (SCA). It was constructed with several composite-varactor branches in parallel, each of which consists of p-type (P+/Pwell) and n-type (N+/Nwell) accumulation-mode varactors in a cascode configuration. The optimum ratio of the channel width between p-type and n-type accumulation-mode varactors was investigated through the simulation in order to maximize a quality factor (Q-factor) of the tunable capacitor at the maximum capacitance (CMAX) state. The number of composite-varactor unit in each branch was designed to be binary-weighted, and the total capacitance can vary linearly by digitally turning on and off both varactors. It was firstly implemented in 65-nm bulk CMOS process, and showed comparable tuning range, Q-factor, and harmonic distortion performances while reducing the silicon area by half and eliminating the MIM capacitor in comparison with the conventional SCA. In the measurement, the proposed tunable capacitor showed a Q-factor of 60.3 at CMAX state and a tuning range of 2.8 at 2 GHz frequency band. In addition, it was perfectly capable of handling a high power signal up to 0 dBm with excellent second and third-order harmonic distortion of greater than 70 dBc at the minimum capacitance (CMIN) state and 77 dBc at CMAX state.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This work presents the study and development of an iron-based soft magnetic composite containing double layer insulating coating constituted of zinc oxide nanoparticles and vitreous boron oxide. The combination of these two insulating compounds improves significantly the electrical and magnetic behavior of SMCs due to a synergistic effect between the layers during processing. Dynamic losses were reduced nearly 78% and electrical resistivity was increased in almost 10 times for the double layered SMC compared to an SMC containing only vitreous boron oxide coating. Moreover, the permeability was at least 10% higher in the double-layered SMC than in the one coated only by ZnO nanoparticles. On the other hand, tensile rupture strength of double-layered SMC matches the one observed for the SMC coated by ZnO, which is nearly 30% lower than the strength of sample coated by B2O3. A mechanism responsible for the observed synergy is proposed in this paper based on the electric and magnetic performance of produced samples, on the thermal behavior of the coating observed on TGA and on the SEM images taken from several stages of samples production.© 2019 Elsevier LtdAn empirical, versatile finite-element model is developed to predict void formation in as-deposited or melt-quenched amorphous Ge2Sb2Te5 during annealing. This model incorporates void formation with nucleation and growth of the crystals along with thermal models that capture laser heating of the nano-structures during device fabrication. Modeling of void formation during Joule heating or furnace annealing can be implemented in a similar way. The modeling results are compared to example experimental results obtained from pore-cell phase change memory structures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic response of nanostructures plays an important role on biomedical applications being strongly influenced by the magnetic anisotropy. In this work, we investigate the role of the temperature, particle concentration and nanoparticles arrangement forming aggregates in the effective magnetic anisotropy of Mn-Zn ferrite-based nanoparticles. Electron magnetic resonance and coercivity temperature dependence analyses, were critically compared for the estimation of the anisotropy. We found that the temperature dependence of the anisotropy follows the Zener-Callen model, while the symmetry depends on the particle concentration. At low concentration one observes only an uniaxial term, while increasing a cubic contribution has to be added. The effective anisotropy was found to increase the higher the particle concentration on magnetic colloids, as long as the easy axis was at the same direction of the nanoparticle chain. Increasing even further the concentration up to a highly packed condition (powder sample) one observes a decrease of the anisotropy, that was attributed to the random anisotropy axes. Further, room temperature anisotropy decreased on the order of 50% in comparison to the low temperature values, thus impacting the theoretical estimations of the magnetic response of nanoparticles.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIonization potential is an important parameter for the design of semiconductor devices. Since amorphous semiconductors do not have long-range ordering and lattice constants, it is not necessary to consider lattice defects at interfaces. If the ionization potential can be controlled with such an amorphous semiconductor, the flexibility of the semiconductor device designs will expanded. This enables the fabrication of semiconductor devices such as light-emitting diodes, laser diodes, and solar cells. In this study, we fabricated n-type amorphous Cd–In–O films (a-CIO) on silica glass substrates using radio frequency magnetron sputtering at room temperature. The band gaps of these films increased from 2.6 to 3.0 eV with a decrease in the Cd concentration (Cd/(Cd + In)). Ip (energy difference between the vacuum level (Evac) and the valence band maximum) and electron affinity (the difference between the Evac and the conduction band minimum) were measured using a combination of ultraviolet photoelectron spectroscopy and optical spectroscopy techniques. Ips were controlled by the Cd concentration in films without a shift in electron affinities. The results suggest that the a-CIO films are suitable for the design of semiconductor devices such as solar cells, where tuning the Ip is important.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe report a gate recessed Al0.7Ga0.3N/Al0.5Ga0.5N heterostructure field effect transistor (HFET) with a graded contact cap layer grown by metal organic chemical vapor deposition (MOCVD) on AlN/Sapphire substrate. A low specific contact resistivity ρc of 2.1 × 10−5 Ω·cm2 is demonstrated with current injection from the top of the Al0.7Ga0.3N barrier to the Al0.5Ga0.5N channel. The device with a gate length of 160 nm exhibits a drain current density at gate shorted to source (ID,SS) of 420 mA/mm, a cutoff frequency fT of 20 GHz, and a maximum oscillation frequency (fmax) of 40 GHz. The same device has a three terminal off-state gate-to-drain breakdown voltage of 170 V, corresponding to an average breakdown field (FBR) of 2.8 MV/cm between the gate and drain, due to drain induced barrier lowering effect. Devices with a gate length of 1 µm demonstrate a gate to drain breakdown voltage of 195 V or an average breakdown field of 3.9 MV/cm. This work provides a way to make ohmic contacts to Al-rich AlGaN channel heterojunction transistors for high power and high frequency applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The anomalous Hall and Nernst effects are considered theoretically within Matsubara Green's function formalism. The effective Hamiltonian of a magnetized two-dimensional electron gas with cubic Rashba spin-orbit interaction may describe transport properties of electronic states at the interfaces or surfaces of perovskite oxides or another type of heterostructures that, due to symmetry, may be described by the same effective model. In the quasi-ballistic limit, both effects are determined by the topological (Fermi sea) contribution whereas the states at the Fermi level gives a negligibly small response. For a wide range of parameters describing the considered system, the anomalous Nernst conductivity reveals a change of the sign before the magnetic phase transition.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We apply the mean-field Hubbard model, non-equilibrium Green's function (NEGF) theory and the hierarchical equations of motion (HEOM) method to investigate some magnetic phase transitions in the 1D interacting quantum dots arrays (QDA) sandwiched by non-interaction leads. We find that with a weak device-leads coupling, there exists a ferrimagnetic state in the uniform odd-numbered or the staggered-hopping QDA systems. With increasing the coupling strength, temperature or the bias potential, the extra spin-polarized electrons flow out of the QDA, which results in a magnetism-to-nonmagnetism phase transition. With the spin-resolved HEOM method, we also investigate the transient spin dissipation process in these phase transitions. When applying an abrupt large bias potential or a strong device-leads coupling, the spin polarized electrons decay with oscillations from the QDA into electrodes. We believe our results may be helpful in the future quantum computation devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Metallic nanostructures such as nanorods, nanowires, and nanotubes are of great interest from fundamental and applied perspectives. In this work, we studied one-dimensional nickel nanostructures with variable lengths approximately 2–12 μm and wall thickness approximately 70–120 nm grown electrochemically in the pores of PET templates. The synthesis technique and the results of sample characterization including morphological features, texture, crystal structure, and magnetic properties are presented.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper introduces a monolithic high-voltage driver circuit for use in MEMS applications. The proposed design offers an output voltage which can linearly sweep from 0 V to 72.8 V under zero-load conditions. To minimize the power consumption of the driver circuit, an advanced charge recycling strategy and finger capacitor structure are implemented in the Dickson charge pump which acts as the high-voltage generator. At the maximum output voltage, the total power consumption of the driver circuit is only 2.337 mW.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the magnetostatic interactions between two parallel cylindrical nanostructures with wire-tube morphology as a function of their interaxial separation and the magnetic field applied using micromagnetic simulations. We find that the hysteresis curves of the system can exhibit one, two or three Barkhausen jumps as a function of the separation between the nanostructures and the angle at which the external magnetic field is applied, which are related to the reversal of the magnetic moments of certain segments of the nanostructures. In addition, by studying the averages of magnetization we obtain that for angles less than or equal to 60 degrees, the nanostructures reverse their magnetization through the nucleation and propagation of domain walls (vortex for the tube segment and transverse for the wire segment), while for higher angles the nanostructures revert their magnetization by quasi-coherent rotation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The crystalline phase, elastic, magnetic, and optical properties of heated Co0.4Sr0.6Fe2O4 have been studied at different annealing temperatures. The samples have been scanned by (XRD), (HR-TEM), (FT-IR), (VSM), and UV–Visible spectrophotometry techniques. The cubic → hexagonal phase transition occurs at about 900 °C. During the precipitation process, the formed Sr(OH)2 exposed to atmospheric CO2 and the SrCO3 appeared as a second phase. So the precipitated powders are a mixture of cobalt ferrites and SrCO3, and the solid-state reaction between them leads to the transformation from cubic to hexagonal. Heating effects on the structural and magnetic parameters offer the possibility to modify the magnetic and electric phenomena to suit promising applications. The elastic moduli decrease by heating, whereas the average particle size increases in the range of 8–55 nm. The optical band-gap depends on the annealing temperature and was found to be ~2.78 eV, and the optical studies show a direct allowed transition in these nanostructures.© 2019 Elsevier LtdPhotoresponses of the back-side illuminated photoconductive semiconductor switches (PCSSs) in the linear mode are studied. It has been found that the back-side-illuminated PCSS enjoys the better performance than that of the front-side-illuminated one. Photogeneration of electron-hole pairs beneath the contacts under the back-side illumination condition significantly reduces the resistance of the PCSS leading to the higher output pulse amplitude up to 4.6 times. Impact of the beam center position on the output waveform is also investigated for both the illumination cases. The laser beam centered near the cathode yields the slowly-decaying output pulse waveform. On the other hand, the rapidly-decaying waveform is observed with the beam centered near the anode.© 2019The effects of Cu and Nb additions on the structure and magnetic properties of a Fe87B13 alloy in melt-spun and annealed states were investigated. Increase in Cu content from 1.0 to 1.7 at.% changes the melt-spun Fe87-xB13Cux alloy ribbons from a single amorphous phase to a composite of high-number-density nano-order α-Fe phase with an average grain size (Dα-Fe) of 12.1 nm dispersing in the amorphous matrix. The crystallized structure after annealing gets refined with increasing the Cu content, and a small Dα-Fe of 18.1 nm is obtained for the Fe85.3B13Cu1.7 alloy, which possesses a low coercivity (Hc) of 32.6 A/m and high saturation magnetic flux density (Bs) of 1.87 T. Minor addition of Nb reduces the Dα-Fe in melt-spun Fe85.3-yB13Cu1.7Nby alloys but not obviously lowers the number density, while 3 at.% Nb makes the formation of fully amorphous phase. The Dα-Fe in the crystallized alloys is decreased to 15.3 nm by alloying 2 at.% Nb, but increased to 31.4 nm with 3 at.% Nb. The Fe83.3B13Cu1.7Nb2 nanocrystalline alloy exhibits a lower Hc of 9.5 A/m combined with high Bs and effective permeability at 1 kHz of 1.75 T and 15000, respectively. The combined effects of competitive growth of the pre-existing nano-order α-Fe particles and Nb-inhibited atoms diffusion contribute to the refinement of the nanocrystalline structure.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Herein, to analyze as a smooth microwave signal contributor in recording media, we have successfully synthesized Ce-Co co-doped SrM based nano hexaferrite crystallites through conventional ceramic route. The magneto-structural properties were studied analytically by employing different characterizations. Consequently, Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction (XRD) certified the phase singularity, with space group P63/mmc hexagonal. Field Emission Scanning Electron Microscope (FESEM) revealed the aggregation of grains into regular hexagonal platelets of sizes ~1 to 2 µm. Transmission electron microscope (TEM) estimated the grain size and high crystallinity. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) corroborated the host and dopant elements in diverse chemical states, affecting the magneto-structural parameters. Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) validated the ferromagnetic nature of samples at 300 K by measuring their saturation magnetization (MS). Accordingly; Stoner Wolhfarth (S-W) model confirmed the MS values, the domain singularity with squareness ratio (SQR) of ~0.51 and the high uniaxial magneto-crystalline anisotropy (MCA) of the prepared hexaferrites. Different magnetic parameters were analyzed using coupled intrinsic and normal demagnetization curves, results in Br > 1 kG & Hc > 1 kOe, validating our samples usage in permanent magnetic industry.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Electrical measurement is a common method to determine core losses of inductive components. In such core-loss measurements, current and voltage signal delays induce significant error due to phase measurement inaccuracies. In this paper, these inaccuracies are reduced by a novel compensation method. Thereby, the signal delays for a specifically developed large signal measurement setup in a frequency range of 0.1–1 MHz are frequency compensated. Measurement inaccuracies of 0.07° are achieved for sinusoidal signals. This leads to a relative power loss error E of 20% for a measured phase of 89.65°. To demonstrate the impact of the compensation on core loss measurements, a material with low effective permeability (μeff of 10) is characterized. The results show a difference in core losses by factor 2.5 and a relative errorE of150% between the compensated and uncompensated measurement.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report the novel findings on the structural, second harmonic and magnetic properties of the Coltan material from México. The magnetic properties were studied through the analyses of the magnetization versus temperature (M(T)) and magnetic field (M(H)). The isothermal magnetization measurements performed at 300 and 50 K shows a saturation magnetization of 11.5 and 11.8 emu/g, respectively. Electron Paramagnetic Resonance (EPR) signal result indicates a signal with g-value of g = 2.481 with a line width (ΔHPP) of 3575.7 G. Zero-field-cooling (ZFC) and Field cooling (FC) curves demonstrate the magnetic fingerprint of Coltan. Additionally, good second harmonic properties are observed at 470 nm, related to the blue color. High resolution transmission electron microscopy showed structural natural nanorods of Nb2O5 at 50 nm resolution with interatomic distance of 0.39 nm. Finally, electronic chemical structure characterization by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy results indicated binding energies of Fe (3p), Mn (3p), Nb (3d5/2, 3d3/2, 3p3/2), O (1s), and Ta (4d3/2) that correspond to columbite and tantalite related to chemical composition fingerprint of Coltan material from México.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Supracolloidal magnetic polymers (SMPs) are structures made by crosslinking magnetic particles. In this work, using Langevin dynamics simulations, we study the zero-field magnetic properties of clusters formed in suspensions of SMPs with different topologies – chains, rings, X and Y – that interact via Stockmayer potential. We find that the presence of central attraction, resulting in the formation of large compact clusters, leads to a dramatic decrease of the suspension initial susceptibility, independently from SMP topology. However, the largest decrease corresponds to chain-like SMPs with strongly interacting particles. This is due to the higher rotational degrees of freedom of SMPs with such topology, which allows the particles to reorganise themselves inside the clusters in such a way that their magnetic moments form energetically advantageous vortex structures with negligible net magnetic moments.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The current paper deals with the influence of Tb doping on magnetic and magnetostrictive properties of Fe-19 Ga-xTb (x up to 0.37 at%) and Fe-27.4 Ga-xTb (x up to 0.5 at%) alloys at room temperature by vibrating sample magnetometry and strain gauge methods. The magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant and the magnetic permeability are improved in Fe19 Ga-xTb alloys upon Tb addition. A significant enhancement of the magnetostriction up to ≈ 235 ppm in Fe-19 Ga-0.37 Tb alloys is observed. Alloying of Fe-27.4 Ga with 0.3 at%Tb increases the magnetization, permeability, and magnetostriction, and decreases the coercivity, remanent magnetization, and hysteresis losses. Beyond this Tb content, a considerable amount of the phase enriched in Ga and Tb precipitates, which opposes magnetic domain wall motions and declines the magnetic properties. An improvement of the magnetic properties in Fe-Ga-Tb alloys might be correlated to the magnetocrystalline anisotropy and the localized strain induced by Tb. The present work demonstrates that the full potential of Fe-Ga-Tb alloys is yet to be explored for engineering soft magnetic applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The α-Fe core/PrDy-FeCo-B(48 at.%)α-Fe(52 at.%) shell and GdPrDy(FeCo)B microwires were grown by pendant drop melt (PDM) extraction technique. Single core–shell microwires of ~80–100 μm diameter and 2–20 mm length manifest rectangular hysteresis loops corresponding to ~100 Oe switching magnetic fields. Bistability of the microwires relates to single domain state of the α-Fe inner core revealed by scanning electron microscopy (SEM). Rare-earth amorphous PrDy-FeCo-B shell of the microwire scanned by magnetic force microscope (MFM) possesses magnetization reversal nuclei corresponding to the α-Fe inclusions. Interwire magnetic dipole interaction and scattering of microwire size change shape of the magnetic hysteresis loop and increase coercive field up to 983 Oe, in chaotic ensembles of the core–shell microwires. The GdPrDy(FeCo)B microwires of the same sizes with no Fe core possess “butterfly” type of the hysteresis loop of high coercivity ~20 kOe.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structure, magnetic properties, and magnetocaloric effect (MCE) of polycrystalline Ho3M (M = Rh, Ru) compounds have been investigated by X-ray diffraction and magnetization measurements. The Ho3Rh sample contains two phases Ho3Rh and Ho7Rh3. Two successive magnetic transitions near 34 and 22 K from the Ho3Rh and Ho7Rh3 phases, respectively, are observed. The maximum magnetic entropy change (-ΔSM) and refrigerant capacity (RC) of the as-cast Ho3Rh alloy are 10.0 J/kg K and 320 J/kg, respectively, for the magnetic field change of 50 kOe. For the Ho3Ru sample, two phases, Ho3Ru, Ho5Ru2, and trace of Ho2O3, are present. Only one Neel transition temperature around 14 K was observed in this multiple-phase sample. The maximal −ΔSM value is 5.1 J/kg K around TN and the value of RC is estimated to be 145 J/kg for ΔH = 50 kOe, which is less than that of the Ho3Rh sample due to the dominant antiferromagnetic interaction. The excellent magnetocaloric performance suggests the potential applicability of Ho3Rh for magnetic refrigeration at low temperatures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigated spin-dependent thermoelectric properties of a carbon atomic chain (CAC) between two zigzag-edged triangular graphene nanoflakes (GNFs), with two semi-infinite armchair graphene nanoribbons (AGNRs) as the electrodes. Using the non-equilibrium Green's function method combined with the effective self-consistent mean-field Hubbard approximation, we found that the designed configuration shows large thermo-spin effects that could be tuned by the gate voltage, chemical potential as well as temperature. Our results show that the non-magnetic AGNRs with the edge magnetism of the GNFs and CAC located between them induces a notable spin Seebeck coefficient (SSC), comparable to or more than that in zigzag graphene nanoribbon junctions, for all sizes of CAC. Finally, applying a gate voltage and a temperature gradient across the chain-based caloritronic device could induce a pure spin current, a perfect spin filtering effect, and an unrivaled negative differential thermal resistance in a broad range of temperatures close to room temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic and electrical properties of Ni0.7Zn0.2Co0.1Fe2− xGdxO4 (x = 0.00, 0.02, 0.05, 0.07, 0.1 and 0.12) ferrites, prepared by the standard solid-state reaction technique have been studied. The single phase of cubic spinel structure was confirmed by X-ray diffraction. The lattice constant, bulk density and porosity were calculated. The FE-SEM examined the surface morphology of the prepared samples. Real and imaginary parts of the complex permeability and magnetic properties of the samples were measured using Impedance Analyzer and VSM respectively. Initial permeability decreases with increasing of Gd content up to x = 0.05 and then increases with Gd. The dielectric constant and dielectric loss tangent of the studied samples decreased with the increase of Gd concentration. The eddy current loss of the prepared samples is expected to decrease with the increase of Gd content due to increase in ac resistivity. Complex impedance plots were studied to understand the contribution of grains and grain boundary resistances.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A new class of high-entropy spinel oxides, (Cr0.2Fe0.2Mn0.2Ni0.2Zn0.2)3O4 and (Cr0.2Fe0.2Mn0.2Co0.2Zn0.2)3O4 nanocrystalline powders, has been synthesized by solution combustion synthesis. Their microstructures and magnetic properties were compared with those of (Cr0.2Fe0.2Mn0.2Co0.2Ni0.2)3O4. All the oxides were identified to have the spinel crystal structure (Fd-3m) with average crystallite size of about 24 nm, and their lattice parameters found to decrease with reduction in the electronegativity of Ni2+, Co2+ and Zn2+. Furthermore, nonmagnetic Zn2+ substitution for either magnetic Co2+ or Ni2+ weakened the ferromagnetic ordering and magnetic moments, showing the controllable magnetic property of this new class of high-entropy oxides.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 has been subjected to simultaneous partial bismuth substitution and particle size reduction to understand the mechanism controlling the magnetic properties. Nanosized samples of 10% Bi doped La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 samples were prepared by high energy planetary ball milling. Compared to pristine La0.7Sr0.3MnO3, 10% Bi doping results in the reduction of saturated magnetic moment and Curie temperature. Using the ‘top-down approach’ through high energy planetary ball milling, particle size reduces from 250 nm for bulk to 26 nm for 48 h ball milled sample. Correspondingly, the magnetic properties show the direct influence of size reduction, as the observed magnetic moment shows drastic decrease as particle size reduces. It is interesting to note that 10% Bi doping in La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 plays important role in controlling the size with respect to milling time. In the present work, we discuss the magnetic properties of nanostructured La0.6Bi0.1Sr0.3MnO3 samples. The observed magnetization behaviour can be described using the core-shell model for nanoparticles.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we focus on a dielectric breakdown in transformer oil and three magnetic fluid samples. The magnetic fluids contain iron oxide nanoparticles sterically stabilized with oleic acid. The nanoparticle volume concentration ranges from 0.05 vol% to 0.35 vol%. The breakdown tests are carried out in the needle-sphere electrode geometry with the high negative electrical potential applied once to the needle and then to the sphere. The breakdown voltage was found to increase not only due to the increasing nanoparticle concentration, but also due to the increasing voltage rise rate. The experiments revealed a remarkable polarity effect on the dielectric breakdown voltage of the transformer oil and the magnetic fluids under both above mentioned influencing factors. A significant increase in the breakdown voltage was measured with the negative high potential applied to the needle electrode, as compared with the high potential on the sphere. To provide the explanation of the observed effect, the electric field distribution, space charge and a potential effect of local magnetic fields in the vicinity of the magnetic nanoparticles are considered.© 2019Bulk samples of Co1−xNixFe2O4 (x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8 1.0) were shaped by a spark plasma sintering (SPS) process. The initial ferrite nano-powders which were prepared using a co-precipitation method were characterized by high-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) and Mössbauer spectroscopy. The HRTEM showed nanoparticles with almost 5–35 nm average size. Mössbauer spectrometer is employed to study the magnetic properties of ferrite nano-powders at room temperature. X-ray diffractometer (XRD), field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM) coupled with EDS detector for the chemical composition analysis and vibration sample magnetometer (VSM) equipped with FORC software were used to characterize the bulk samples. Without any structural changes to powder samples, a single-phase spinel structure was obtained. In the FE-SEM micrograph, the porosity decrease and consequently the density increase are clearly visible and the EDS study confirms the presence of Fe, Co, Ni and O ions in the fabricated samples by SPS process. The magnetic parameters such as saturation magnetization and the coercivity showed a decreasing behavior with an increase in Ni concentration from 67 emu/g and 787 Oe to 42.77 emu/g and 151 Oe, respectively. FORC analysis implies the coercivity reduction of bulk samples comparing with powders state in cobalt-rich ferrites is due to the multi-domain formation. The coercivity unavoidable in nickel-rich ferrites is due to the occurrence of the multi-domain state along with the disappearance of the superparamagnetic phase.© 2019Absorption is one of the fundamental unit operations in industrial processes; it is particularly used for gas purification. Constant research is carried out for finding and characterizing new absorption fluids with higher absorption capability and selectivity, less energy requirements for regeneration, and lower environmental impact. In the context of this work, the potential use of ferrofluids as absorption means for separating gaseous mixtures of paramagnetic and diamagnetic components has been investigated for the first time. An experimental apparatus has been designed and tested to measure the impact of an external magnetic field on the solubility of gases in ferrofluids.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Polyaniline sheet has been recently synthesized experimentally and attracted a lot of attention due to its exotic properties. In this research, we study electrical properties of semi-hydrogenated polyaniline sheet, SHP, in details. First-principle calculations reveal that the SHP is a half-metal with spin polarization of 100%. The magnetization is attributed to the localized pz electronic orbitals of unsaturated carbon atoms and half-metallicity is related to the nitrogen atoms. Phonon band structure confirms the sheet is dynamically stable and ab initio molecular dynamics simulations indicate the sheet can be synthesized at room temperature. Tensile biaxial strain improves the half-metallicity of the sheet so that a 70% increase in the band gap of spin-up is observed when a 12% tensile strain is applied. The substrate can moderate the magnetization of two-dimensional materials. Our analysis reveals the sheet grown on the hexagonal boron-nitride sheet is still a half-metal. A transition from half-metal to magnetic metal is observed when the sheet is grown on the Si(1 1 1) substrate due to strong bonds between some unsaturated carbon atoms with top Si atoms. In addition, we show that the sheet can preserve its half-metallicity under hydrogen vacancy. Our findings show that semi-hydrogenated polyaniline sheet has a great potential for spintronics and spin-filtering.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A study on the magnetic properties of the BaTiO3(BTO)-NiZnFeO4(NZFO) nanocomposite thin films is presented to reveal the effect of percolation and resultant topological-microstructure-transition on the magnetic properties of the nanocomposites, which exhibit a critical behavior at the percolation threshold fc. An in-depth analysis was conducted from the perspectives of chemistry and physics both experimentally and theoretically by considering the microstructure and magnetic parameters of the nanocomposites. The results show that the anomalous behavior of the coercivity is jointly controlled by the exchange interaction between the ferrite nanoparticles and the grain size associated with the topological microstructure and composition of the nanocomposites. When the NZFO content is below the percolation threshold, the coercivity is mainly controlled by grain size, and the permeability is controlled by the equivalent demagnetizing field. When the NZFO content is above the percolation threshold, the coercivity is jointly affected by exchange interaction and grain size, while the suppression of the permeability by the equivalent demagnetizing field is greatly reduced. The findings may help establish a new paradigm of topological-microstructure-transition induced magnetic critical behaviors of percolative functional composites, and more and more evidences suggest that such effect may widely exist in various percolative systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The crystal structure of hexagonal-Sr0.6Ba0.4MnO3 allows various competing superexchange interactions, leading to intriguing magnetic properties. Local structural changes with temperature modify the overlapping between Mn and oxygen ions. Calculations based on our model spin-Hamiltonian reveal that the dominant antiferromagnetic superexchange interaction between the linearly oxygen-linked Mn4+ ions results in short range correlations (SRC), manifesting a smooth drop in magnetization below 325 K. Dominance of superexchange interaction changes its allegiance towards the non-linearly oxygen-linked Mn-O-Mn interactions, onsetting long-range correlations (LRC) below 225 K. Below the SRC-LRC crossover temperature, electrical response arising from the interacting dipoles exhibits power-law divergent behaviour of their relaxation time, upon cooling. Non-ergodic character of the dipole-cluster glass state is examined via the indispensable aging and rejuvenation effects, similar to the spin glasses. Competitive-frustration among spin-exchange and local-strain is reckoned as responsible for the electrical glass origin.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Annular samples are fabricated by metal injection molding using pre-alloyed Fe-35%Co powder. Samples sintered at different temperatures (1275, 1300, 1325, 1350 and 1375 °C) all exhibit a single α-FeCo solid solution phase and have low interstitial impurity contents. They are used as model materials to investigate the influences of microstructures on the magnetic properties. The results show that both sintered density and grain size of the material increase with sintering temperature, which gives the sample sintered at 1375 °C the best magnetic properties The coercivity (Hc) of the sintered samples increases linearly with the grain size, while the initial permeability (μi) is inversely proportional to the square root of the coercivity. Based on the above relationships, a mathematic model has been developed which can be used to predict the magnetic properties of the sintered Fe-35%Co alloy from its microstructures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Many efforts have been made recently to develop new materials that can be applied in more efficient data storage devices, such as 2D magnetic materials. MoS2 is the most studied 2D material beyond graphene due to its unique optical, electronic, mechanical and magnetic properties. This paper presents a systematic study of magnetic anisotropy in MoS2 sheets prepared by liquid exfoliation method. We have applied an extension method in order to obtain ferromagnetic anisotropy by separating paramagnetic contribution from total magnetic anisotropy. MoS2 thin films exhibit ferromagnetic order on 2D-MoS2 remaining until room temperature and a magnetization easy plane.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The dielectric and microwave absorption properties are very important for many civil and military applications. In this study, we report the microwave absorbing properties of hexamolybdate (nBu4N)2[Mo6O19] clusters before and after a hydrogenation process. The pristine hexamolybdate cluster shows minimal microwave reflection loss (RL) due to its highly symmetric structure, while it displays unusually broad and high RL with a maximum RL value of −41.92 dB centering at 15.25 GHz after being subjected to a hydrogenation process, demonstrating promising prospects as a new microwave absorbing material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Gas-liquid mass transfer plays a key role in a broad range of industrial processes. The magnetic field control over the morphology of the gas-liquid interface and solute transport is an attractive feature if it can be realized efficiently. However, the magnetic properties of typical liquids and gases are rather weak. The experimental investigation is carried out to evaluate the effect of the magnetic field, which is mediated by magnetic nanoparticles, on the gas-liquid mass exchange during the sparging run through a hydrocarbon ferrofluid. The results indicate that the gradient field is especially effective at controlling the gas-liquid contact volume: the foaming of the liquid during the sparging of gas has been completely suppressed by the magnetic forces without any reduction of the mass exchange efficiency.© 2019In this paper, ε-Fe2O3 phase was achieved by the thermal treatment of magnetite nanoparticles. Magnetite was synthesized, with or without silica shell, and treated with different annealing procedures in oxygen or argon atmospheres. Therefore, the necessary conditions for Fe3O4 transformation to ε-Fe2O3 were studied. Before and after thermal treatment, the physicochemical and magnetic properties of starting materials were investigated. The size and morphology of obtained nanostructures were characterized using Transmission Electron Microscopy. Crystalline structure and presence of γ-, α-, ε-Fe2O3 phases were examined by X-ray diffraction. Magnetic properties were studied by the Mössbauer effect with and without the presence of an external magnetic field. Obtained results show that ε-Fe2O3 phase can be achieved from magnetite nanoparticles coated with silica shell in oxygen rich environment only.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, magnetocaloric properties of the as-cast rods and melt-spun ribbons for Gd-based metallic glasses are investigated. Different magnetocaloric responses in the rods and ribbons are observed and discussed. Under a magnetic field change of 5 T, maximum magnetic entropy change (-ΔSM max) values of 8.7 and 9.1 Jkg−1K−1 are obtained for the as-cast Gd55Co19Al24Si1Fe1 and Gd20Dy20Er20Co20Al20 rods, which are obviously larger than those of 7.8 and 7.7 Jkg−1K−1 for their ribbon counterparts, respectively. In addition, the as-cast rods show obviously larger exponent n values compared with the melt-spun ribbons, i.e., the -ΔSM max increases faster with increasing applied magnetic field. The magnetocaloric difference is analyzed and can be mainly attributed to the effects of the demagnetizing field, the oxide existence and the microstructural differences in ribbons and rods. The glassy rods exhibiting larger magnetocaloric effect are more attractive for the application of magnetic refrigerants.© 2019The experiments were carried out in a gas gun system to examine the equation of state (EOS) below or near the Hugoniot elastic limit (HEL) for the sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets. A laser velocity interferometer system for any reflector (VISAR) was used to measure the shock and particle velocity of the specimens. The obtained EOS data indicated that the EOS at high pressure could not be extrapolated to the lower pressure below or near the HEL for the Nd-Fe-B magnets. The spall strength of the Nd-Fe-B magnets was determined in the gas gun plane spall tests using the analysis of the free surface velocity profile of the specimens measured with the VISAR. It is found that the spall strength of the Nd-Fe-B magnets is dependent on the strain rates and larger than the tension strength of the magnets in the dynamic Brazilian tests.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Using exact expression of the magnetic field we derive analytical expression for the induced current density and volume force in a solid conducting cylinder and ring due to a coaxial rotating finite permanent magnet with transverse magnetization. The integral torque is calculated from these expressions and validated with numerical and experimental results. Conditions for useful magnetic field approximations are found.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we fabricated AlInGaN/GaN FinFETs and compare electrical performances with those of AlGaN/GaN FinFETs in different channel structures, such as single and double channel. The double-channel structure is promising to compensate for the degradation of the drain current density caused by the fin structure, as well as the FinFET structure is suitable to control the double-channel structure. The fabricated AlInGaN/GaN double channel FinFETs exhibit considerably higher maximum drain current of 290 mA/mm than those of AlGaN/GaN FinFETs such as 245 mA/mm and 165 mA/mm of double- and single-channel FinFETs, respectively. This is because of the high electron density caused by the strong polarization charge of AlInGaN/GaN heterostructure and double channel structure. Moreover, the double-channel FinFETs effectively suppress the current collapse. In conclusion, the AlInGaN/GaN double-channel fin structure is a very promising candidate for the GaN-based RF power applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Two-dimensional nanosheets of MXene (Ti3C2) and Gd+3-doped MXene (Ti3C2) have been synthesized superficially by using the cost-effective co-precipitation method. The hexagonal crystal structure doped by Gd was confirmed using X-ray Diffraction. The doping was further confirmed by using scanning electron microscopy, energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy and Fourier transformed infra-red spectroscopy. Furthermore, UV–Vis spectroscopy absorption spectra, followed by a Tauc-plot, revealed a band-gap value of 1.93 eV for Gd-doped MXene, reduced from that for pure MXene (2.06 eV). The magnetic measurement of undoped and doped MXene indicate a clear ferromagnetic hysteresis existing at room-temperature. The asymmetric spatial spin-density of states (s-DOS) for undoped MXene is attributed to the existence of spin-up and spin-down electrons of Ti-3d atoms at top and bottom Titanium layers. The strength of one of the spin-type (spin-up) increases more than two-folds at room-temperature after the doping of Gd+3 cations due to the fact that it contains more unpaired electrons around Fermi level making the MXene more ferromagnetic. The present report establishes the existence of ferromagnetism introduced by doping of Gd+3 cation in Ti3C2 MXene at room-temperature making it a suitable candidate for two-dimensional spintronic devices operating at room-temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A theory of the dynamic magnetic response of an ensemble of immobilized ferroparticles on a weak, linearly polarized ac magnetic field is developed. All particles have uniaxial magnetic anisotropy and the particle easy magnetization axes are aligned in one direction. External ac field is oriented with some given angle to the easy axes. The interparticle dipole-dipole interaction is taken into account basing on the first order modified mean-field model, in the framework of which the orientation of the magnetic moment of a randomly chosen particle is influenced by an external magnetic field and by a total dipolar field produced by all other magnetic moments. The dynamic magnetic susceptibility and magnetization are calculated as a function of the frequency and direction of the field, as well as height of the magnetic crystallographic anisotropy energy barrier for internal superparamagnetic rotation of magnetic moments inside the particles.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The coupling of interacting magnetic nanodisks with vortex configuration has interesting consequences, and has possible applications in the transport and processing of information. We show, through micromagnetic simulation and the use of Thiele's equation, that the coupling of magnetic vortices and the phenomenon of spin pumping in FM/NM multilayers, although arising from different physical mechanisms, show significant parallels. We study the variation of the effective damping (αeff) of the system formed by a string of nanodisks with magnetic vortex structure, and Gilbert damping constant α1, interacting with another disk with Gilbert constant α2 (α2⩾α1). The result of varying the number of disks in the string is analogous to the observed variation of effective damping as a function of FM layer thickness, in FM/NM multilayers. The variation of the value of α2 is analogous to the ability of the NM layer to act as a spin sink, for different NM materials. We also obtain that the effective damping goes through a maximum as a function of the value of damping α2; an analogous effect is present in experiments with FM/NM systems, when the thickness of the NM layer is varied.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate that the tuning of magnetic domain structures in Fe-rich amorphous microwires can be engineered by the torsion stress and the circular magnetic field. Their co-directed or opposite action allows for fine tuning of domain structures with helical magnetization state. Also the effect of torsion stress induced reversible transition between spiral and elliptical domain structures has been discovered. The modeling of the stress and the circular magnetic field induced transformation of helical domain structure is in good agreement with the experimental results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Electrochemical reaction induced by gate voltage between metallic cobalt and cobalt oxides was found to remarkably reshape average volume of superparamagnetic particles in Pt/Co/AlOx stacks at room temperature and thus modulate superparamagnetic properties, such as saturation fields and saturated magnetization, of the superparamagnetic films. The interfacial reaction was indicated in anomalous Hall transport measurement. This voltage-controllable superparamagnetism observed in Pt/Co/AlOx films could be utilized in a new architecture of nonvolatile and high density magnetic random access memories or neuromorphic computing.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Effects of Cu-doping on the structural and magnetic properties of spin chain compound MnV2O6 have been investigated through experimental and theoretical techniques. Significant change in magnetic properties with Cu-doping have been observed. Increasing defects and disorders with Cu-doping which often results in a breaking of infinite chains along b-axis into finite segments play pivotal role towards the decrease in the intrachain exchange interaction. Defects, disorders and hence the chain breaking also affects the magnetic susceptibility of the compound and an increasing Curie tail has been observed. In addition, increasing contribution of orbital moment has been observed with doping. Observation of metamagnetism in both pure and doped compounds is the another key feature observed. First-principles electronic structure calculations have been employed to understand the observed increase in the effective magnetic moment as well as metamagnetism in both pure and doped system.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the current work, a facile one-step magnetically assembling method coupled with subsequent carbonization treatment was proposed to fabricate one dimensional (1D) chain-like Fe3O4@SiO2@C-Ni composites for effective catalysis and protein adsorption. Typically, Fe3O4 nanoparticles (NPs) were firstly prepared by solvent thermal method. With the assistance of an external magnetic field, 1D Fe3O4@SiO2@polydopamine-Ni2+(PDA-Ni2+) nanochains were obtained with one-step stöber method under the mechanical stirring condition. Notably, SiO2-assisted coating was essential for one-step magnetically assembling formation of 1D Fe3O4@SiO2@PDA-Ni2+ nanochains. While without the presence of silica, the spherical Fe3O4@PDA-Ni2+ composites were obtained instead. After a carbonization treatment under an inert atmosphere, the Fe3O4@SiO2@PDA-Ni2+ was converted into Fe3O4@SiO2@C-Ni composites while retaining 1D morphology. In the process of carbonization, polydopamine-chelating nickel ions were reduced to Ni NPs by PDA. Simultaneously, PDA was carbonized to be N-doped carbon shell layer, which could effectively avoid the exfoliation of Ni NPs in complex reaction system. Furthermore, the size of Ni NPs could be modulated via varying the annealing temperature. Consequently, the 1D chain-like Fe3O4@SiO2@C-Ni composites exhibit high catalysis on 4-NP and effective adsorption on histine-rich proteins. And it also can be conveniently regenerated by a magnet and showed good cyclic stability, which is important for practical applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Temperature is one of the biggest influencing factors affecting the performance of polymer composites. The study on the temperature-dependent mechanical properties of magnetorheological (MR) elastomers is very necessary for its practical application. In this work, the dynamic and static mechanical properties of anisotropic MR elastomers were investigated under different temperatures. The results showed that both the initial modulus and the magnetic-induced modulus of MR elastomers decreased with increasing temperature. The variation of magnetic-induced modulus with temperature indicated the temperature-dependent rotation of particle chain inside the MR elastomers. The expression of magnetic-induced modulus as a function of the magnetic field and initial modulus was obtained by the theoretical analysis of the temperature-dependent rotation. It was found that when the magnetic field was constant, the reciprocal of the magnetic-induced modulus was linearly related to the reciprocal of the initial modulus at the corresponding temperature, which agreed well with the experimental result.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report on the in-plane magnetic anisotropy in Au/Fe(1 1 0) and Co/Au/Fe(1 1 0) bi- and trilayers epitaxially grown on a W(1 1 0) single crystal. Magnetic surface anisotropy (MSA) exhibits a strongly non-monotonic, oscillatory behavior as a function of Au thickness. In the case of the Au/Fe(1 1 0) bilayers bi-periodic oscillations were observed and interpreted in terms of quantum well states that are affected by the alternating complete and in-complete atomic layers of Au. Thin bcc Co films grown on Au/Fe(1 1 0) bilayers strongly enhance MSA and for the Co/Au/Fe system magnetic anisotropy oscillates as a function of the Au spacer thickness due to the oscillatory interlayer coupling.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis study deals with the uniformity investigation and comparison on the typical behaviour of pseudomorphic high electron mobility transistors (pHEMTs) before and after the 3-D multilayer fabrication. There are seven multilayer fabricated pHEMTs compared with the seven virgin pHEMTs based on drain-source input current, output current, transconductance, off state leakage behaviour, threshold voltage, knee voltage, on-resistance, Schottky barrier height, ideality factor, reverse saturation current, small signal gain and current gain. Below 10% changes in performance can be seen after multilayer fabrication compare to virgin samples and apart from these exceptions, the discrepancies are well within the tolerance and less than 3% in terms of Schottky behaviour. We show that, the application of the 3D-MMIC technology does not cause any visible destruction of pHEMTs performance using seven different samples before and after the multilayer fabrication.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The solid solution Mn1-xFexNiGe with x~0.27 has been investigated via powder ray diffraction, dc magnetization, ac susceptibility, heat capacity, and magnetic relaxation measurements. The alloy Mn0.73Fe0.27NiGe crystallizes in a Ni2In-type hexagonal structure at room temperature. A coexistence of hexagonal and orthorhombic phases with a phase fraction of nearly 88:12 was found below 80 K. The dc susceptibility measurements reveal a paramagnetic to ferromagnetic transition at around Tt≃80 K and a thermal hysteresis observed during field-cooled-cooling and field-cooled-warming suggests the first order nature of the magnetic transition. The splitting between zero-field-cooled and field-cooled dc susceptibilities and the appearance of a frequency dependent peak in ac susceptibility indicate the onset of a spin-glass transition at Tg≃58 K. The relative shift in freezing temperature (δTf) is calculated to be ~0.03 and ~0.09, respectively from the real and imaginary parts of ac susceptibility indicating the formation of cluster spin-glass state. The analysis of frequency dependent Tf using power law yields a characteristic time for a single spin flip τ*≃1.5×10-10 s and critical exponent zν′≃5.5. Similarly, the analysis using the Vogel-Fulcher law results a characteristic time for a single spin flip τ0≃1.2×10-8 s, Vogel-Fulcher temperature T0≃54.8 K, and an activation energy Ea/kB≃72.8 K. The magnitude of τ* and τ0 together with a non-zero value of T0 add further evidence for the formation of cluster spin-glass. The magnetic relaxation and memory effect measurements also demonstrate the low temperature cluster spin-glass behaviour. The reason for the cluster spin-glass behaviour could be the difference in local environment of Mn atoms in the coexisting Mn-rich antiferromagnetic and Fe-rich ferromagnetic phases. Furthermore, Mn0.73Fe0.27NiGe shows the asymmetric response of magnetic relaxation with a change in temperature, belowTf, which can be explained by the hierarchical model. The low temperature heat capacity gives a large electronic coefficient γ≃25 mJ/mol K2 and the Debye temperature θD≃300 K. This value of θD is in close agreement with that calculated from the temperature variation of unit cell volume.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe propose an analytical model for the CMOS Buried Multiple Junction (BMJ) detector exhibiting breakdown voltage shift depending on adjacent junction's bias. The device's singular behavior has been observed when two adjacent junctions are in reach-through (RT) condition. The breakdown current has been identified to be predominated by thermionic emission. The proposed model determines, for a given BMJ structure with uniform or Gaussian doping distributions under bias conditions, whether two adjacent junctions are in RT condition. In this case, it calculates the merged depletion limits, electric field and electrostatic potential profile. The potential barrier height of each merged depletion region can then be extracted and the thermionic current be computed. Model computations have been compared with TCAD simulations and measurements on the BMJ detector. Good agreements have been observed for different structures in different bias conditions at different temperatures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic chalcogenide compounds have a great potential in the field of spintronics and biomedical applications. Unlike magnetic transition metal oxides, the study on magnetic chalcogenides is sparse. Here we investigate the magnetic, thermodynamic and electronic properties of a ternary chalcogenide, Mn2SnS4. Contrary to most of the 214-chalcogenide compounds which crystallize in well-known olivine structure with space group Pnma, the title compound, Mn2SnS4, crystallizes in the orthorhombic space group, Cmmm. Magnetic measurements reveal two distinct magnetic transitions: (i) an antiferromagnetic ordering below 152 K, (ii) a weak ferromagnetic ordering, possibly due to spin canting and frustration below 53 K. Neutron diffraction study at 100 K suggest that the magnetic moments (spins) within {1 1 1} planes are ordered ferromagnetically and the adjacent {1 1 1} planes are coupled antiferromagnetically, however, the magnetic spins are not collinear rather canted. LMTO-ASA calculation on an antiferromagnetic model indicates that the compound is poorly metallic in nature and the manganese spins are completely spin polarized.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents magnetic force imaging (MFI) – a method for spatially resolved quantitative assessment of the ferrite/martensite fraction in austenitic stainless steel or similar materials. This method exploits the force interaction between a magnetic tip and the surface of a specimen, similar to magnetic force microscopy (MFM). It differs from MFM in the size of the tip and close-to-saturation magnetization of the sample under investigation. In this study, AISI 347 (1.4550/ X6CrNiNb18-10) austenitic stainless steel was analyzed in the as-delivered state, i.e., 30 mm diameter round bars. The MFI results show a distinct resemblance of an inhomogeneous structure that forms bands in the rolling direction. This structure retains its initial square cross-section from which the material was hot rolled and has been detected due to the formation of α′-martensite. The information depth of MFI proved to go beyond the depth of α′ formed due to surface preparation only. The material was further characterized by standard methods, including EBSD, EDX, and hardness measurements.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The phase separation (PS) tendencies in low bandwidth manganites like La1−x−yPrxCayMnO3 have not been probed in terms of size effects. The present paper attempts to decipher the nature of competing phase tendencies in terms of the particle size in archetypical phase separated compound with nominal composition La0.30Pr0.30Ca0.40MnO3 (LPCMO). Differently sized materials have been synthesized by sintering the sol-gel derived powders at TS = 600 °C, 900 °C, 1100 °C and 1300 °C. Phase pureness is confirmed by the Rietveld refinement of the powder X-ray diffraction (XRD) data, which authenticates orthorhombic structure with Pnma space group and thermally sensitive lattice constants. The crystallite (particle) size increases from ~19 nm (54 nm) to ~31 nm (457 nm) as TS goes up from 600 °C to 1300 °C and all the three lattice constants increase with particle size. X-ray photoemission spectroscopy (Mn2p and Mn2s core-levels) substantiates the coexistence of Mn3+ and Mn4+ in the desired ratio. The magnetization measured (H@100 Oe) as a function of temperature exhibits size dependent paramagnetic (PM) to ferromagnetic (FM) transition and also brings out that (i) the hysteresis between the field cooled cooling (FCC) and field cooled warming (FCW) magnetization first increases with increasing crystallite /particle size and then decreases, (ii) the divergence between the zero field cooled (ZFC) and FCW magnetization decreases with increasing crystallite/particle size and (iii) sharp increase of the magnetic moment beyond particle size of ≈90 nm (crystallite size ≈ 23 nm). At lower temperatures a glassy behaviour is visible at higher crystallite size/Particle size. The isothermal magnetization loops also confirm the increase in the FM component at higher crystallite/particle size. A thermally hysteretic insulator-metal transition (IMT) appears at particle size >90 nm (Crystallite size > 23 nm) and the hysteresis decreases as the particle size increases. The PM state in all the samples exhibits variable range hopping conduction with size dependent activation. Our study unravels that the phase separation (PS) tendencies are dominant only in the vicinity of particle size ~100 nm.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The coercivity of hot-deformed (Ce,Nd,Pr)-Fe-B magnet was enhanced from 1.44 T to 1.71 T by the addition of 3 wt% Pr-Cu powders for grain boundary diffusion. Microstructure analysis has shown that the formation of thick grain boundary phase with non-ferromagnetism can well isolate the adjacent main phase grains and weaken the intergranular exchange coupling, which is beneficial to coercivity enhancement. Moreover, the size of platelet shaped grains inhibited by liquid phase inside the ribbon is also one of the reasons for the increase of coercivity. In addition, the temperature stability of coercivity was improved after the diffusion of Pr-Cu alloy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the synthesis of a semiconducting material, [FeII(DMF)4(TCNQ)2](TCNQ)2 (1), which contains partially charged TCNQδ− anions (TCNQ = 7,7,8,8-tetracyanoquinodimethane, 0 < δ < 1). Compound 1 was prepared by different routes, using (Et3NH)(TCNQ)2, a mixture of TCNQ and LiTCNQ, or a mixture of TCNQ and NaTCNQ, to obtain the structure with fractionally charged TCNQδ− anions. The crystal structure of 1 is formed by mononuclear cations [Fe(DMF)4(TCNQ)2]2δ+, the TCNQ units of which form infinite π-π stacks with non-coordinated TCNQδ− counter ions. A detailed examination of X-ray diffraction data, supplemented by inductively coupled plasma mass spectrometry, indicates that some of the non-coordinated TCNQδ− anions, likely, form bonds to a partially occupied Na+ site, thus causing slightly different crystal packing in the vicinity of some Fe(II) centers. This finding is indirectly corroborated by the results of Mössbauer spectroscopy, which shows that the transition metal site corresponds to the high-spin Fe(II) ion, but two such sites are present, with slightly different quadrupole splitting parameters. Temperature-dependent conductivity measurements reveal semiconducting behavior, with the room-temperature conductivity of 0.125 S/cm and the charge-hopping activation energy of 180 meV.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the Fe79Si9B4.5P1.5CuNbx alloys were prepared using the melt spinning method. Further, the microstructure, micromorphology, thermal behavior, and magnetic properties of the alloys were studied. The results denote that Nb can improve the glass formation ability from 85 to 115.5 K, reduce the grain size, decrease the coercivity from 0.22 to 0.10 Oe, and rapidly decrease the Curie temperature from 705 to 648.5 K. In addition, the unit mass loss of Fe79Si9B4.5P1.5CuNb2 is 5.84 W/kg, 19% lower than that of the Fe79Si9B4.5P1.5Cu alloys, and Ms decreased by 3%.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We prepared a novel Pt(mnt)2 (mnt = maleonitriledithiolato) anion radical salt (ethyl-4-iodothiazolium)2[Pt(mnt)2]3 (Pt-I) and investigated the structure and magnetic properties. The chemical composition indicated the existence of two negative charges (electrons) on three Pt(mnt)2 anions. The crystal structure of Pt-I contained a supramolecular rhombic motif mediated via sulfur's σ-holes on the cation. The anions and cations formed a two-dimensional (2D) supramolecular network via noncovalent cation···anion interactions, where the arrangement of the ions was similar to that of an analogous complex (ethyl-4-bromothiazolium)2[Pt(mnt)2]3 (Pt-Br). On the other hand, the orientation of the cations and the stacking manner of the anions along the direction perpendicular to the 2D supramolecular network were different in Pt-I and Pt-Br. Such structural differences are attributed to the strength of the halogen bond, which is greater in iodine than in bromine. The comparison of the crystal structures between Pt-Br and Pt-I allowed us to estimate the contribution of the noncovalent interactions to the parent crystal structure. The magnetic investigations revealed the strong antiferromagnetic interaction (J/kB = −571 K for T > 280 K) between the spins on the trimerized anion. The interaction was greater in Pt-I than in Pt-Br, reflecting the stronger trimerization in Pt-I. These results suggest that sulfur-mediated chalcogen bonds can be robust enough to dominate the primary arrangement of molecules and the resulted physical properties, even in the presence of the other noncovalent intermolecular interactions or even upon the atomic replacements. Sulfur-based chalcogen bonds would be effective to realize desired structures and properties in molecular materials, while understanding the hierarchy of the noncovalent interactions operated in the crystal would be important for the precise crystal engineering.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The PbMn1−xFexBO4 (x ≈ 0.1) orthoborate single crystals have been grown for the first time by spontaneous crystallization and their magnetic and resonance properties and specific heat have been examined. It has been established that partial substitution of iron ions for manganese ones leads to an increase in the Curie temperature to 34.2 K from its value of 30.3 K in the unsubstituted crystal, enhances the magnetic anisotropy, and reduces the saturation magnetization. The magnetization drop is explained in the framework of the model of a ferrimagnetic-like structure, in which the magnetic moments of iron and manganese ions form ferromagnetic subsystems coupled by the antiferromagnetic exchange. It has been found that under magnetization along the rhombic b axis the magnetic moments switch stepwise to the magnetic field direction in a certain critical field. The spin-reorientation transition is the first-order one. This feature of the crystal magnetization does not allow the experimental ferromagnetic resonance frequency-field dependence for the rhombic b axis to be described using the calculation for a simple rhombic ferromagnet. It has been established that the increase in the magnetic anisotropy of the crystal upon substitution leads to an increase in the energy gap in the ferromagnetic resonance spectrum to 121.5 GHz at T = 4.2 K.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the magnetic properties of 14 nm thick and 1 μm long nickel and permalloy nanotubes with external diameters of 40 and 100 nm as a function of the angle θ at which the external magnetic field is applied. Our results show that the coercivity of 40 nm diameter nickel nanotubes follows a non-monotonic behavior from θ = 0° up to θ = 60°, while that corresponding to permalloy displays an increasing monotonic trend at the same angular range. At θ = 90°, both materials evidence a sharp drop of the coercivity to zero, indicating that the reversal mechanism has changed to a pseudo-coherent rotation. On the other hand, nickel and permalloy nanotubes with 100 nm in diameter exhibit a similar angular dependence of the coercivity, reversing their magnetization through the nucleation and propagation of vortex domain walls for angles lower than 75°. For θ = 90°, a novel striking mechanism, the wave reversal mode (W), arises. This phenomenon leads to an unusual S-type shape in the hysteresis curves at those given parameters, which is until now an effect that has not been reported for these nanostructures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The rapid development of information technology urgently requires magnetic materials with excellent magnetoelectric performance under high frequency (GHz band) conditions. A series of investigations of rare earth-iron intermetallic compounds with planar or cone anisotropy lead to the finding that these compounds have attractive features of high saturation magnetization and high resonance frequency fr. With further research and development, rare earth-iron intermetallic compounds are expected to become a new kind of high frequency soft magnetic material. In contrast to the permanent magnets such as Nd2Fe14B with high uniaxial magnetocrystalline anisotropy field, rare earth-transition metal intermetallics such as R(Fe,X)12, (R,R′)2(Fe,X)14B, (R,R′)2(Fe,X)17, and their nitrides (R,R′ are rare–earth, X is the substitutional elements) can be modified to exhibit planar or cone magnetocrystalline anisotropy, achieving excellent soft magnetic properties of higher fr as well as higher permeability μi, and thus much higher Snoek limit: frμi-1. These intermetallics powders/paraffin/resin composites show a maximum reflection loss (RL) between −20 and −70 dB in a wide range of 1–40 GHz, and a large effective absorption bandwidth of 2–10 GHz with a small thickness. Notably, the microwave absorbing performance of the intermetallics samples greatly exceeds the traditional absorbing materials due to their high saturation magnetization and high ratio of the out-of-plane magnetocrystalline anisotropy field to the basal plane anisotropy field. Therefore, rare earth-transition metal intermetallics present an advantage for use as a high-performance thin-layer microwave absorber. They also have great potential to be developed into soft magnetic materials and devices with high performance and high stability at high frequency. It thus opens up broad prospects for technology applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The microstructures and phase transformation temperatures of the as-cast Pr–Fe–B alloys were tested by means of scanning electron microscopy (SEM) with energy dispersive spectrometer (EDS), X-Ray diffraction (XRD) and differential thermal analysis (DTA). The primary solidification region of the Pr–B system with B-contents 30–45 at.% and liquidus surface projection of the Pr–Fe–B system with B-content lower than 20 at.% were investigated. The primary solidification regions of PrB4 in the Pr–B system and fcc(Fe), Fe2B, Pr2Fe14B and Pr1.1Fe4B4 in the Pr–Fe–B system were determined. The liquid composition of the peritectic reaction liq. + PrB4 → Pr2B5 in the Pr–B system was determined between 35 and 32 at.% B. The temperature of the eutectic reaction liq. → Fe2B + Pr2Fe14B + Pr1.1Fe4B4 was determined. Based on the present experimental and literature results, the Pr–B and Pr–Fe–B systems were optimized with CALPHAD method. A set of self-consistent thermodynamic parameters of the Pr–Fe–B system was obtained, and the experimental phase relations, especially phase relations around the hard magnetic Pr2Fe14B phase, were reproduced well.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This work investigates a comparative study between Ni-Zr and Co-Zr substituted Sr-hexaferrites (HFs). SrCoxZrxFe12−2xO19 HFs (denoted as SrCoZr HFs) and SrNixZrxFe12−2xO19 HFs (denoted as SrNiZr HFs) were fabricated via sonochemical approach. X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform-infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR) and high-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HR-TEM) analyses revealed the creation of M-type hexaferrites. The hexagonal-platelet shape is observed by scanning electron microscopy (SEM). The total energy calculations were performed via density functional theory (DFT) on model systems representing the synthesized structures to determine their structural and magnetic properties. The magnetic properties of various synthesized SrCoZr and SrNiZr HFs were evaluated at (RT; T = 300 K) and (T = 10 K). The Ms (saturation magnetization), Mr (remanence), Hc (coercivity), SQR = Mr/Ms (squareness ratio) and nB (magnetic moment) were determined. M-H hysteresis loops of various products revealed their hard ferrimagnetic (FM) nature at RT and 10 K. Lower Co-Zr co-substitution contents (x ≤ 0.04) were discerned to reinforce the magnetic traits of the resultant Sr hexaferrite significantly when compared to the pristine (x = 0.0) one. However, the Ni-Zr co-substitution in Sr HFs provoke a reduction of magnetic parameters.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Recently, the use of carbon based materials and magnetic nanoparticles for supporting or coupling with metal oxides such as ZnO is a promising axis. The use of carbon materials enhances the photocatalytic performance of ZnO for the degradation of organic pollutants because of their properties. The introduction of magnetic nanoparticles such as manganese ferrite (MnFe2O4) to non-magnetic ZnO provides the easy separation of the photocatalyst from the treated water using a magnet and to improve its photoactivity in the visible region of the solar spectrum. This work was focused on the synthesis of a new magnetically separable composite photocatalyst including ZnO, MnFe2O4 and tannic acid (TA) by hydrothermal method. The as-prepared photocatalysts were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), diffuse reflectance spectroscopy (DRS), field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR) and vibration sample magnetometer (VSM). The photocatalytic activities of the prepared photocatalysts were evaluated through the photocatalytic degradation of Congo Red (CR) under visible light and MnFe2O4/TA/ZnO exhibits the best photoactivity. The degradation yield of CR is 84.2% of CR over the MnFe2O4/TA/ZnO under the visible light for 90 min. At the end of five times recycling, the photocatalytic performance of CR presence the MnFe2O4/TA/ZnO can even reach nearly 77.5%. Such results demonstrate that the MnFe2O4/TA/ZnO exhibits great photocatalytic efficiency for CR compared to their constituent photocatalysts and easy separation from the dye solution by applying an external magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We consider a one-dimensional ionic Kondo lattice model, which consists of a hopping term, a local spin-spin interaction, and an alternating one-particle potential. With this model, which is feasible with cold atom setups, we show that it is possible to obtain a quasi-long-range magnetic order for small local couplings, using the density matrix renormalization group method. We found a quasi-long-range antiferromagnetic phase, which is absent in the original model but common for Kondo lattice materials. For weak local couplings and potentials of great strength, we found a quasi-long-range ferromagnetic-antiferromagnetic ground state crossover when the global commensurate density increases.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Due to their unique structure that hosts geometric frustration, spinel oxides with magnetic ions in both the tetrahedral and octahedral environments undergo multiple spin rearrangement transitions. From the magnetization and thermal properties measurements of MnFe2O4, we have found three magnetic states occurring at TFI-1 = 575 K, TFI-2 = 50 K, and Tx = 15 K. Detailed analyses of the specific heat and thermal conductivity reveal a significant contribution from the low-temperature magnetic excitations. Especially, there is a large negative magneto-thermal conductivity with a maximum magnitude near TFI-2, which becomes positive below Tx. The possible origin of each magnetic state is discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The electronic and magnetic behavior of Co(0 0 0 1) thin films on W(1 1 0) was investigated by means of Magnetic Circular Dichroism in the Angular Distribution of photoelectrons (MCDAD). It was found that significant photoelectron intensity differences occur for electrons emitted from the 3d bands near the Fermi level in the situation of a fixed photon helicity of the incoming circularly polarized radiation and opposite magnetization of the magnetic layer. The corresponding MCDAD asymmetry shows a significant dependence on the excitation energy in the VUV range and exhibits values up to about 8%. Emission from bands with majority and minority character results in asymmetry values of opposite sign. The different dispersion properties of these bands lead to different behavior of the corresponding asymmetry.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Fe80.7Si4B13Cu2.3 nanocrystalline soft magnetic alloy powders with outstanding electromagnetic wave absorption properties in X-band (8–12 GHz) have been successfully synthesized by a ball-milling method. As milling time increases from 40 to 160 h, the mean particle size of the near spherical powders with a bcc-Fe nanocrystalline/amorphous composite structure decreases from 9 to 6 μm, while the average nanocrystalline grain size stabilizes at around 10 nm. The alloy powders possess high saturation magnetization of 178.2–183.4 emu/g. The alloy powders/paraffin (3:1 in mass ratio) composites exhibit real permeability and permittivity of 2.18–2.42 and 7.3–9.7 at 2 GHz, respectively, and imaginary permeability of 0.68–0.77 at resonance frequencies of around 12.5 GHz. The composites with thicknesses of 2.1–2.3 mm exhibit large reflection losses (RL) of −39.1 to −50.5 dB with effective absorption bandwidths (RL < −10 dB) of 4.5–5.0 GHz covering the X-band. The excellent absorption properties are benefited from the high permeability and matchable permittivity of the nanocrystalline alloy powders in GHz range.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Topologically nontrivial spin textures have attracted considerable attention not only because of rich physics related to the quantum phases, but also because of their potential for novel spintronic functions. We have successfully synthesized one of the rare triclinic phase of CuSeO3 via modified hydrothermal process. Magnetic studies on triclinic CuSeO3 implies helimagnetic spin structure that is well contrast with ground state ferromagnetic or antiferromagnetic states for monoclinic or orthorhombic phases of CuSeO3. The observed two helimagnetic phases can be further transformed into paramagnetic and induced ferromagnetic phases with tuning of temperature and applied magnetic field. Along with the experimental measurements, a first-principles calculation based on density functional theory reveals that triclinic CuSeO3 is a charge-transfer type Mott insulator with non-collinear antiferromagnetic order. A spiral magnetic spin texture has been found by the theoretical calculation.© 2019In this study we report the synthesis and characterization of superparamagnetic Fe-Pd (1–75 at.% Fe) nanomagnets grown within a lignocellulose fiber matrix for future advanced material applications. The small (~5 nm diameter) Fe-Pd nanoparticles are crystalline with spherical shape and evenly dispersed throughout the lignocellulose support while preserving the structure of the biopolymer matrix. Material characterization of the as-formed biocomposites confirms primarily zero-valent Pd-Fe alloy with a thin surface oxide layer. Normal superparamagnetic behavior consistent with extremely small nanoparticle size is measured, including increasing measured blocking temperature with increasing Fe concentration. Finally, important mass loading effects of metallic nanoparticles within the lignocellulose matrix are measured and discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we demonstrate for the first time an experimental observation of ferromagnetic ordering at temperatures below 60 K in SrIrO3 film which was the upper layer in SrIrO3/La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 bilayers. Epitaxial bilayers were deposited on (1 1 0) NdGaO3 substrates, after which the temperature dependences of the electron spin resonance spectra of the fabricated heterostructures were investigated. The analysis of these spectra showed that under certain conditions, the magnetization of the SrIrO3 layer reached a value of ~1 μB/Ir, comparable to the magnetization of the La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 layer that transfers into a ferromagnetic state at temperatures of 320–350 K.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic-field dependences of the low-frequency complex permeability have been measured for thin-plate single crystals of the high-temperature superconductor TmBa2Cu3Oy in a static external magnetic field H and an alternating magnetic field with the amplitude h (h ≪ H) both directed along the plate plane (crystallographic ab plane). Two different contributions to the permeability have been revealed. The first contribution (μv) is independent of the amplitude and is associated with the vibrational motion of vortices along the c axis. The second contribution (μc) linearly depends on the amplitude and is due to the occurrence of a critical state along the structure layers. The field dependences of μv and the critical current exhibit features indicating the appearance of an additional intrinsic pinning mechanism, which is initiated by the magnetic field and is caused by the interaction of the vortex system with a magnetic rare-earth ion layer. This effect is enhanced as the temperature increases and approaches the critical value Tc. A comparison of the results for two single crystals shows that the interaction of the vortex and magnetic systems weakly depends on the quality of the crystals. The interaction decreases only slightly for the sample with the smaller Tc value. A method has been proposed to increase pinning by the partial substitution of magnetic transition metal ions, primarily iron ions for ions at the yttrium position. Such a substitution is possible up to 20%, keeping a single phase and without a decrease in Tc.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, Ce-Mn substituted X-type hexaferrites along chemical formula Sr2Zn2-xMnxFe28-yCeyO46 (x = 0.0, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75, 1.0 and y = 0.0, 0.025, 0.050, 0.075, 0.10) were produced by sol gel method. The micro graphical, structural, magnetic and dielectric possessions of specimens were characterized through X-ray diffractometer, scanning electron microscope, Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy, vibrating sample magnetometer and dielectric measurement setup respectively. X-ray diffractometer images demonstrated that fabricated composites possess a pure phase of X-type hexaferrites and has basic crystalline configuration of Sr-hexaferrite. The variance in the lattice parameters ‘a’ and ‘c’ was due to the Ce+3 large radius in comparison with Fe3+ ions. The Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy was within the 300–1000 cm−1 wave number range and indicated the stretching vibrational band of metal-oxygen (Fe-O). Vibrating sample magnetometer results revealed the hard magnetic behavior of specimens with the coercivity value of few thousand Oersteds. The dielectric constant demonstrated higher value at small frequencies and reduced as frequency increases. The tangent dielectric loss illustrated the normal behavior that could be described on octahedral locations based on jumping between the Fe2+ and Fe3+ electrons. The largest value of tangent loss at small frequencies is because of significance of composites prepared in medium frequency (MF) systems.© 2019 Elsevier LtdPZT piezoelectric thin film based technology is promising in the field of micro-actuators. This paper discusses the effects of pre-polarization on the key properties of PZT thin film, and explores the improvement rules of pre-polarization from the material to device level experiments. At the material level, the pre-polarization treatment increases the piezoelectric strain coefficient by 25%, and improves dielectric properties. Meanwhile, in ferroelectric properties the pre-polarization treatment increases the residual polarization by 50% and coercive field by 25%, respectively. At the device level, pre-polarization treatment greatly increases the output characteristics of the devices, such as maximum output displacement increasing by at least 45% and withstand voltage enhancing by 2 V, which is consistent with the material level enhancement. In addition, the optimal pre-polarization process conditions and the long-term stability of the performance improvement are investigated. The pre-polarization treatment has proved to be meaningful for the improvement of the output capability of the piezoelectric thin film actuators.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIt is well known that inserting metal oxides on top of electrodes in coplanar bottom-gate bottom-contact organic field-effect transistors (OFETs) improves the OFET performance in terms of increased current density, higher effective mobility and reduced contact resistance. This elucidates the transistor performance gain in case of oxidized metal electrodes using numerical device simulations and experimental data. The study strongly supports the hypothesis that the impact of oxidization can be explained for these experiments by an improvement of the semiconductor morphology in the vicinity of oxidized electrodes in conjunction with an improved mobility in these regions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we prepared GaMnSb and GaNiSb thin films on glass substrates by DC magnetron co-sputtering system. The substrate temperature (Ts) and deposition time were varied during synthesis process. From µ-XRD measurements, SEM and AFM micrographs, were studied the structural, morphological and topographic properties, respectively. Size grains homogeneous, between 50 nm and 250 nm were obtained when substrate temperature varied between 323 K and 523 K. Annealing process for all samples were realized in situ and subsequent to the deposition stage. Decreased amorphous characteristic when the samples were subjected to high temperatures during annealing process (T ≥ 600 K) was observed. From Auger spectroscopy were identified the MNN and LMM transitions of precursor species, and the presence of manganese and antimony was correlated with the Mn2Sb, Mn2Sb2 and NiSb phases formation on the surface of the samples; these phases were identified by XRD and µ-XRD measurements. Moreover, ferromagnetic-like behavior associated with the presence of the binary phases in GaMnSb samples, and the superparamagnetic properties at low temperature related with NiSb phase in the case of GaNiSb samples, were found. Finally, a qualitative model of thin film formation was proposed.© 2019The paper demonstrates a possibility to use Small Angle Light Scattering (SALS) method realized in a conventional laboratory to investigate structuring processes in a magnetic fluid simultaneously exposed to a shear flow and an external magnetic field. We have used a custom made SALS-setup with a laser source combined with a microfluidic chip, an electromagnet and a magnetic circuit to obtain scattering images of a low concentrated biocompatible magnetic fluid with clustered iron oxide nanoparticles. The application of an external magnetic field drastically influences the physical behaviour of the fluid and this effect is directly related to aggregation of particles resulting in chains with a dimension of several micrometers. These chains lead to an anisotropy of the scattering patterns. We have observed an influence of the field and flow on the intensity gradient of the obtained scattering patterns. The presented method opens broad perspectives to obtain microstructural information as well to evaluate structuring kinetics of the diluted magnetic suspensions using conventional laboratory conditions. The SALS measurements are accomplished with a full characterization of the fluid using magneto-rheometry, vibrating sample magnetometry, microscopy as well as dynamic light scattering.© 2019This paper presents a novel approach for the modeling of noise behavior of III-V compound semiconductor based HBT's over a wide frequency range. The main advantage is that the proposed model is based on two individual un-correlated noise sources, and easy to be incorporated with commercial circuit simulation software. The model is verified by measurements of the four noise parameters of an InP HBT up to 20 GHz and a GaAs HBT up to 26 GHz. The good agreements have been obtained.© 2019Polycrystalline U-type hexaferrite with compositions of Ba4Zn2−xCoxFe36O60 (x = 0.4, 0.6, 0.8, 1.2) were synthesized via a conventional ceramic method. The phase and structure were systemically studied by XRD. The magnetic property was characterized by VSM. The single domain critical size has been experimentally determined. The relationships between ferromagnetic resonance and applied external field of samples with different magneto-crystalline anisotropy fields are confirmed. The result tells a smaller external field is needed to reach resonance with higher magneto-crystalline anisotropy in our sample. We also confirm the relation between magneto-crystalline anisotropy and ferromagnetic resonance linewidth.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The spin pumping effect of CoFeB/Ir bilayers has been investigated via the broadband ferromagnetic resonance measurement. With increasing the thickness of heavy metal Ir layer, the Gilbert damping factor of 8 nm CoFeB film increases from 7 × 10−3 to 1.1 × 10−2, and the additional damping factors induced by the spin pumping effect quickly reaches its saturation value. According to the spin pumping theory, the spin mixing conductance of CoFeB/Ir and the spin diffusion length of Ir were obtained. The spin mixing conductance is 2.14 × 1019 m−2. Furtherly, the spin diffusion length is only 1.34 nm, which is quite shorter compared with the heavy metal Pt. Our results reveal the existence of the strong spin-orbit coupling in the heavy metal Ir, which can be a potential material for the application in spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.AlFeO3 is a ferroelectric perovskite material and attempts have been made to study its magnetic properties. However there is no consensus currently on the precise nature of magnetic ordering (antiferromagnetism Vs. ferrimagnetism) in this material. Considering the recent report on band gap tunability of Al1−xInxFeO3 (Sudha Priyanga and Tiju Thomas, J. Alloys. Compd. 750 (2018) 312–319), there is reason to explore the nature of magnetism and bonding, in the parent AlFeO3 system, and its In-doped variants. Here, we analyze the magnetic behavior of this system using first principles calculations. It is found that ferrimagnetic orthorhombic phase of AlFeO3 is the most stable form at normal pressure, consistent with the experiment reported recently. The calculated total magnetic moment of AlFeO3 in orthorhombic phase is 3.97 µB and it is comes from the exchange interaction arising between Fe and oxygen atoms, which in turn leads to ferrimagnetic ordering in the system. The calculated magnetic moment decreases with an increase in In-dopant concentration in Al1−xInxFeO3 (x = 0.25, 0.5, 0.75). Electronic structure reveals that both cubic and rhombohedral phases of AlFeO3 exhibit ferromagnetic and half metallic natures respectively. It is hence evident that ferrimagnetic ordering and half-metallicity of the cubic and rhombohedral phases is rather robust in this system. Charge density distribution, Bader charge analysis, and maximum electron localization function based evaluation shows that the bonding in AlFeO3 is primarily ionic. Interestingly the nature of Fe–O bond is rather invariant with respect to In concentration. Experimental evidence for the results reported (magnetic ordering, nature of bonding) may be pursued here on.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The orthorhombic pseudo-perovskite series NdMn1-xFexO3+δ has negative magnetization, i.e. magnetization directed opposite to an applied field under certain conditions, for x = 0.2 and x = 0.25. We have investigated the microscopic origin of this phenomenon for x = 0.2 by using elastic and inelastic scattering techniques including neutron backscattering, X-ray magnetic circular dichroism at the Mn K and Nd L2 edges, neutron powder diffraction, and powder inelastic neutron scattering. We find that Nd3+ ions possess zero field ordered moments of 1.6 μB per ion at 1.5 K oriented parallel to the Mn moments. Based upon the neutron diffraction, there is a freezing of magnetic clusters before the long-range order sets in. The Nd crystal field levels shift with temperature due to a molecular field that is 1.1 meV at 1.5 K. These findings are consistent with a magnetic domain/cluster model for the negative magnetization in NdMn0.8Fe0.2O3+δ.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt ferrite [CoFe2O4 (CFO)]/chromium oxide [Cr2O3 (CR)] nanocomposite is prepared by following the sol-gel autocombustion method in order to study its magnetoelectric (ME) properties. The presence of both the CFO (cubic) and CR (rhombohedral) phases is confirmed from the Rietveld refinement results of X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns. Field emission scanning electron micrograph (FESEM) display the homogeneous distribution of particles with the average particle sizes of ~50–300 nm. A small opening of hysteresis in the magnetization (M)-magnetic field (H) plot signifies the existence of weak ferromagnetism in the sample. The frequency dependence of impedance responses subjected to applied magnetic fields are well described by impedance based Havriliak-Negami expression and revealed the presence of single relaxation which is attributed to the grains response. The involvement of p-type polaronic relaxation is confirmed from the obtained value of activation energy ≈0.39 eV. More interestingly, the direct magnetoelectric measurement shows the existence of linear magnetoelectricity up to 340 K and therefore provide applications in various ME-based devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have prepared the (CoFe2O4)100-xAgx with x = {35, 60 and 75} wt.% nanocomposites, and report the superspin glass behavior of sample with x = 75 wt.%. The samples were analyzed by X-ray diffraction, transmission electron microscopy, AC susceptibility, DC magnetometry and Mössbauer spectroscopy. The DC magnetic measurements were performed from 4 K to 900 K. The Mzfc curves show a peak at Tmax increasing from 200 K to 470 K when Ag concentration decreases from 75 wt.% to 35 wt.%. For sample with x = 75 wt.%, the in phase AC susceptibility data shows a superspin glass transition at Tg = 165 K. The out of phase AC susceptibility shows a peak at 42 K regarded to the spinglass transition of the particle's disordered surface. At 4 K, all samples show hysteresis loops with exchange bias behavior. A study done on the exchange bias field versus cooling field data for sample with x = 75 wt.%, shows a magnetic disordered layer with thickness of twice the lattice parameter of CoFe2O4.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The first and second-order uniaxial magnetic anisotropy constants K1 and K2 of the Sm(Fe1– xCox)12 compounds and their temperature dependence are determined by the torque magnetometry technique using the anomalous Hall effect (AHE) on epitaxially grown Sm(Fe1- xCox)12 thin films. While K1 monotonically decreases with increasing temperature regardless of the Co concentration, K2 changes its sign from negative to positive with increasing temperature and reaches a maximum at 250 K. These observations are consistent with the hard-axis magnetization curves at low temperature that show an upward deviation from a linear extrapolation of the low field part. Ab-initio estimations of the crystal field parameters at the Sm site using a spin model of Sm(Fe1– xCox)12 compounds and theoretical analysis of magnetocrystalline anisotropy of Sm3+ ions taking the multiple J-mixing into account explain these main features of the experimental results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A 4.5 wt% Si as-cast strip with equiaxed grains microstructure fabricated by twin-roll caster was subjected to three different cold rolling and final recrystallization annealing processes. The results revealed that the rolling process has a significant effect on the evolution of microstructure and texture of the strip-cast 4.5 wt% Si non-oriented electrical steel. Moreover, both mechanical and magnetic properties of the steel exhibited various characteristics because of different rolling routes. After short-time annealing at high temperature, the steel sheet experienced one-step cold rolling exhibits the highest tensile strength. Regarding two-step cold rolling, better magnetic properties were obtained after a second cold rolling with a slight reduction. The excellent performance of mechanic and magnetic properties can be fabricated by two-step medium reduction cold rolling.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We herein investigated the magnetic moment of thickness-dependent SnO2 films at room temperature. The saturation magnetization of SnO2 films grown on the r-plane sapphire substrate was decreased with increasing the film thickness. An areal saturation magnetization, a magnetic moment in the unit surface area, did not vary with increasing film thickness. Hall effect measurement indicated that the charge carrier from oxygen vacancy was presented in the epitaxial SnO2 films. Furthermore, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy analysis revealed that the oxygen vacancy profiles were consistent with that of magnetization. These results suggest that oxygen vacancies at the surface region are the source of the magnetic moment in SnO2 films.© 2019This work presents the physical properties of unusual orthorhombic form of MnNb2-xVxO6 series of compounds. Isostructural Pbcn samples were obtained under ambient and extreme conditions of high pressure (6.7 GPa) and high temperature. All compounds present negative Curie-Weiss temperature θCW indicating dominant antiferromagnetic interactions in paramagnetic state. Extreme compounds MnV2O6 and MnNb2O6 exhibits magnetic structure characterized by commensurate propagation vectors k=0,0, [Formula presented] and (0,0,0), respectively. In spite of different composition and large volume difference, MnV2O6 and MnNb2O6 present very similar macroscopic magnetic properties. The substitution of cations on B site in AB2O6 provides chemical disorder and induces disappearance of magnetic ordered state for the MnNbVO6 intermediate system down to 1.5 K. Specific heat measurements are presented down to T=1.8 K and discussed in the light of magnetic measurements and neutron-diffraction data.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Problems caused by bubble are always inevitable in acceleration sensor with magnetic fluid (ASMF) and influence the performance of the sensor. In this paper, the behavior of single bubble in ASMF is investigated. The relationship between output voltage (Uo) and acceleration (a) of the sensor without bubble is studied theoretically, and it can be clearly found that the linear law is obeyed approximately. Moreover, the formula of total force of the single bubble in ASMF is derived. To analyze the force on the bubble, simulation analysis is utilized by emulating the normal magnetic field strength on the boundary of the bubble. Finally, experiments are presented with different volume fractions of bubble (ranging from 0 to 0.135). Experimental results show that Uo is linear to a when there is no bubble or the bubble is relatively small. It also shows that bubble greatly influences the linearity of the sensor. The difference between experimental results and the theoretical analysis is less than 6.25%.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We reported an investigation on the surface topography and the magnetic anisotropy of wrinkled Ni81Fe19 (NiFe) thin films grown on both uniaxially and biaxially pre-strained polydimethylsiloxane (PDMS) membranes. Because of the large difference in elastic moduli between the magnetic film layer and the elastomeric PDMS substrate, NiFe films grown on a uniaxially pre-strained PDMS show a one-dimensional (1D) wrinkled structure and a uniaxial magnetic anisotropy (UMA) along the wrinkles. In contrast, NiFe films grown on a biaxially pre-strained PDMS show a two-dimensional (2D) zigzag wrinkled surface morphology and an UMA which direction is determined by the sequence of releasing the biaxial pre-stresses. The inter-peak distance and the amplitude of the wavy morphology for both the 1D and 2D wrinkled NiFe thin films decreases and increases with improving the pre-strain, respectively. The UMA of the wrinkled NiFe films originates from a surface effect of magnetic charges created on the wavy topography when a magnetic field is applied.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Fe79MoxB20− xCu1 amorphous and nanocrystalline alloys (x = 2, 4, 6, 8 and 10) were studied to investigate the influence of Mo and B contents on crystallization, structural, and magnetic properties. Samples were prepared by rapid solidification of alloy ingots using a single wheel melt spinner. Primary and secondary crystallization temperatures increased with the Mo content in the alloys. A wide primary phase stability range (~280 °C) is achieved for the Fe79Mo10B10Cu1 alloy. The alloys with x = 8 and 10 exhibited a fine-grained microstructure (~5 nm) of BCC Fe phase after isothermal annealing at the primary crystallization temperature. Magnetization at an applied field of 1.19 × 106 A/m (15 kOe) of the annealed alloys decreases with the Mo content, and coercivity of less than 100 A/m is attained at x = 8 and 10. Grain size increased to ~25 nm for x = 2 and 4 under the same thermal treatment, which resulted in higher coercivities. The Curie temperature of the amorphous alloys was observed to decrease with increasing Mo content, lowering below room temperature at x = 10. A good thermal stability of nanoscale microstructure is characterized for the x = 10 alloy at elevated temperatures (650 °C and 700 °C).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The findings of the experimental research of a phased air cavity capture in a flat channel with a magnetic fluid located along the axis of the annular magnet influenced by the changing in sign magnetic field are discussed. The research was carried out with four magnetic fluids with the magnetic phase concentrations of 1.93%; 2.70%; 4.34%; 9.08%. The analysis of the obtained results is presented within the framework of the electrodynamic model of “low magnetic bodies” based on the development of the system of isolines of the module of the magnetic field intensity. The provided data, first, clarify the conclusions of the previous interpretation of the air cavity capture with an opaque magnetic fluid column, and second, can be useful to solve practical issues of microhydraulics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Room-temperature ferromagnetism was obtained in an organic, originally paramagnetic tris(8-hydroxyquinoline)iron(Feq3) molecule by doping paramagnetic aluminum atoms. The Al-doped Feq3 films were prepared on Si substrates by vacuum thermal co-evaporation. Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy confirmed that all the doped Al atoms react with the O atoms of Feq3 molecule. The magnetic measurement by a physical property measurement system indicated that the Al-doped Feq3 film shows obvious ferromagnetic property even at room temperature. First-principles density functional theory (DFT) calculations were used to study the electronic structure and magnetic properties. DFT calculations results indicated that the doped Al atom tends to place at the attraction center with respect to the two O atoms of Feq3 quinoline ligands, forming –O–Al–O– complex. Compared with pure Feq3 cell, the energy differences between antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic states became much larger after Al atoms doped into Feq3 cell. This may explain the room-temperature ferromagnetism observed in the prepared Al-doped Feq3 film.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic skyrmions could serve as information carriers in next-generation information storage and processing devices. Effective manipulation of the skyrmion motion is a vital task for realizing skyrmion-based applications. Skyrmion motion driven by voltage-controlled magnetic anisotropy (VCMA) has been proposed, of which the investigation is mostly focused on the dynamics of skyrmions. Here, using micromagnetic simulations we show that antiskyrmions can be effectively driven by the VCMA gradient in the presence of the anisotropic Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction. We find that the antiskyrmion shows a transverse motion, i.e., the skyrmion Hall effect, induced by the VCMA gradient. As the skyrmion number of an antiskyrmion is opposite to that of a skyrmion, the anisotropy gradient-induced motion of ferromagnetically coupled skyrmion-antiskyrmion pair and antiferromagnetically coupled skyrmion-skyrmion and antiskyrmion-antiskyrmion pairs do not show the skyrmion Hall effect. We find that the velocity-driving force relations of these three combinations are different. Our results may provide guidelines for building future skyrmion-based information processing applications.© 2019High entropy alloy powders are promising candidates for new microwave absorbents due to its advantages in corrosion resistance, heat resistance and soft magnetic properties. In this work, flake-shaped FeCoNiAlCrx (x = 0.1, 0.3, 0.5, 0.7, and 0.9, in molar ratios) alloy powders are prepared by mechanical alloying, and then annealed at 500 °C. The experimental results show that the milled and annealed FeCoNiAlCrx powders contain similar FCC and BCC phase structure. The addition of Cr element results in more flattened powder particles and more polarization sites, which enhances the surface polarization and ultimately increases the real and imaginary parts of complex permittivity (ε′ and ε″). The real and imaginary parts of complex permeability (μ′ and μ″) decrease first and then increase as the proportion of Cr increases. The minimum reflection loss (RLmin) is improved and moves to the low frequency region (11.20 GHz to 8.23 GHz) as the proportion of Cr increases. After annealing, the enhanced saturation magnetization (Ms) increased μr, and the improvement of crystallinity also increased εr. For FeCoNiAlCr0.9 samples, annealing treatment directly improves the minimum reflection loss from −26.88 dB (8.23 GHz) to −47.55 dB (7.375 GHz), suggesting the positive effects of annealing treatment on reflection loss. All the above findings provide experimental and theoretical basis for FeCoNiAlCrx high entropy alloy powders as absorbing material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic field induced dynamic self-assembly (MFIDSA) can be regarded as one of non-contact manipulation method under special category of micro-scale or nano-scale fabrication technique, which is confined to magnetic materials. This study is focused on MFIDSA process of nonmagnetic materials in a magnetic multiphase fluid by using the experimental technique and numerical method. To explore the controllability of MFIDSA process, a series of experiments by using the magnetic multiphase fluid comprising of nonmagnetic polystyrene microparticles with different particle-size distributions were carried out. The relations of the strength of external magnetic field, the average length of self-assembled chain-like structures, and the particle-size distribution of nonmagnetic polystyrene microparticles were investigated experimentally. Meanwhile, to reveal the interaction mechanisms behind the self-assembling behaviours of nonmagnetic materials, an immersed boundary lattice Boltzmann method was applied to simulate the multi-physical field coupled multiphase flows in MFIDSA process. The present work shows that the average length of self-assembled chain-like structures is mainly determined by the strength of external magnetic field, irrespective of the particle-size distribution of nonmagnetic materials. The coincident results of the experiments and numerical simulations provide a guidance on how to manipulate the nonmagnetic materials to form the chain-like structures by magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Evolution of magnetization behaviour of cobalt film on nano patterned silicon (1 0 0) substrate, with film thickness, has been studied. In situ magneto-optical Kerr effect measurements during film deposition allowed us to study genuine thickness dependence of magnetization behaviour, all other parameters like surface topography, deposition conditions remaining invariant. The nanopatterned substrate had a 8 nm thick amorphous silicon nitride surface layer. Thus, induced magnetic anisotropy in the Co film is expected to be of purely topographical origin, excluding any effect of the single crystalline Si (1 0 0) surface on magnetic anisotropy film due to possible epitaxy or surface step-induced anisoropy. In conformity with earlier results, the film induces a uniaxial magnetic anisotropy in the film, with its magnitude decreasing with increasing thickness. A magnetically dead layer of 2.6 nm forms at the interface with the substrate. Analysis of the magnetic layer thickness dependence of anisotropy shows that it has contributions from both, i) exchange energy which is volume dependent and, ii) stray dipolar fields at the surface/interface. This suggests that local magnetization follows only partially the topography of the rippled surface. As expected from energy considerations, for small film thickness, the local magnetization closely follows the surface contour of the ripples making the volume term as the dominant contribution. With increasing film thickness, the local magnetization gradually deviates from the local slope and approaches towards a uniform magnetization along the macroscopic film plane making the surface term as the dominant contribution. Significant deviation of the observed stray dipolar field contribution from the anisotropy energy calculated on the basis of Schlomann's theory is observed, which can be attributed to several factors like, deviation of surface topography from an ideal sinusoidal wave, breaks of continuity along the ripple direction, topological defects like, pattern dislocations, and small film thicknesses compared to the correlation length of surface corrugations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic chromatography is a promising method for fractionation of magnetic nanoparticles with respect to their size and/or magnetic properties. In this study, we investigate the effect of different magnetic field sources and operation modes on the retention of magnetic nanoparticles which pass through a chromatographic column filled with a fine magnetizable matrix. For nanoparticles in the size range between 50 and 400 nm, both constant magnetic fields and square wave AC fields with amplitudes of around 2 mT, result in retention factors of up to 2, while still showing good particle recoveries of more than 95%. In contrast, when using the ‘on-off’ magnetic field operation reported previously, retention factors of only 1.4 could be achieved. We also demonstrate that single domain magnetic nanoparticles show retention factors of 1.2–1.4 even without the application of an external magnetic field, due to their spontaneous magnetization. By using a combination of online UV-measurement and sample collection followed by the determination of the particle size distribution (PSD) by dynamic light scattering, a quantification of the fractionation efficiency could be achieved. Despite the short column of only 12 cm and the high specific throughput of more than 30 column volumes per hour a separation sharpness of 0.62 could be attained, demonstrating the high potential of the method for scalable nanoparticle fractionation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Using first-principles calculations based on density-functional theory, the effects of strain on the magnetic order and band structure of single-layer CrAsS4 have been investigated systematically. By applying a uniaxial tensile strain of 2.99% along the y-direction or a compressive strain of 1.76% along the x-direction, the single-layer CrAsS4 is determined to be an antiferromagnetic (AFM) semiconductor that undergoes a phase transition from AFM to ferromagnetic (FM) state. Further, the physical mechanism underlying the strain-dependent magnetic stability is discovered to be a competition between direct exchange and indirect superexchange interactions between the nearest neighbour Cr atoms. Moreover, the bandgap exhibits an abrupt change that accompanies the phase transition in the magnetic order. Our study provides an intuitive approach to design the strain-modulated spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Fabrication of voltage tunable high-frequency devices using magnetostrictive ferromagnet-piezoelectric hybrid structures requires materials with low damping and narrow linewidth to achieve low microwave loss. Galfenol exhibits superior magnetostriction, stability over a wide range of temperatures, and is free of rare earth elements, making it an economical and promising candidate, if the microwave losses can be minimized. We report the fabrication, structural and magnetic characterization, and study of dynamic properties of epitaxial FeGa thin films exhibiting an ultra-low residual linewidth, ΔH0=13±1 Oe – a requirement for low microwave loss and effective damping parameter, αeff, as low as 0.0065-0.0001 +0.0005 for the 16 nm thick film. Similarly, we found αeff=0.0039-0.0007 +0.0028 and ΔH0=71±1 Oe for the 24 nm thick film, demonstrating its potential for applications in magnetic memory and high frequency devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The study of novel thermal effects associated with spin current is fundamental to understanding the relationship between magnetoelectric and thermal phenomena. The central focus of attention of our research is on the spin analog of the Thomson effect as the most promising in terms of its use in heat switches of solid-state coolers. In order to model heat flows, the heat conduction equation is derived in the presence of magnetic and electric fields. Applying the developed theoretical framework, the spin Thomson coefficient is calculated for a yttrium-iron garnet plate. It is demonstrated that this coefficient strongly depends on the thickness of the plate. The corresponding estimates of the heat flux carried by the spins are also obtained. For a 200 nm plate, it is 6.81 W/cm2, which is comparable to the heat fluxes in the best thermal switches. Moreover, the results of the paper indicate at the possibility of further increase in the flux by an optimal choice of plate thickness and magnitude of magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Spin transfer torque (STT) driven by a charge current plays a key role in magnetization switching in heavy-metal/ferromagnetic-metal structures. The STT efficiency defined by the ratio between the effective field due to STT and the current density, is required to be improved to reduce energy compulsions in the STT-based spintronic devices. In this work, using the harmonic Hall measurement method, we experimentally studied the STT efficiency in platinum(Pt)/FM structures as a function of the Pt thickness. We found that the STT efficiency strongly depends on the Pt thickness and reaches a maximum value of 4.259 mT/(106 A/cm2) for the 1.8-nm-thickness Pt sample. This result indicates that competition between spin Hall effect (SHE) and Rashba effect as well as spin diffusion process across the Pt layer determines the Pt thickness for the maximum STT efficiency. We demonstrated the role played by the spin diffusion besides the spin current generation mechanisms in improvement of the STT efficiency, which is helpful in designing STT-based devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We developed equations to estimate the spin Hall angle and anisotropy field of ferromagnets in heavy metal/ferromagnet heterostructures using a macrospin model. In this model, critical switching spin current density linearly changes with the applied in-plane magnetic field. Thus the spin Hall angles can be estimated by measuring the critical switching current density under in-plane magnetic field. The obtained spin Hall angle using this method is not only consistent with that obtained by harmonic measurements. Spin Hall angles of PtMn, β-W, Pt and (Bi0.5Sb0.5)2Te3 estimated by our method are also closed to that obtained using other different methods. Therefore, estimating spin Hall angle by macrospin model can be considered a simple, feasible and widely-applicable approach to obtain the spin Hall angle.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have observed ferromagnetism at room temperature in 2% cobalt doped ZnO nanoparticles prepared by a simple chemical precipitation method. This can be described as a consequence of bound magnetic polaron (BMP) resulting from the occurrence of oxygen vacancies and surface defects in the sample. Photoluminescence and Raman measurements indicate the existence of such defects in the sample. Electron Spin Resonance (ESR) studies are done to probe into the magnetic nature of the doped samples further. Redshift in the band gap and formation of characteristic absorption bands after Co doping shows that Co ions are incorporated in the host ZnO lattice. The infrared sensitive vibrational modes are identified with Fourier Transform Infrared Spectroscopy (FTIR) measurements. The spin-orbital splitting in X- ray Photoelectron Spectroscopic (XPS) measurements show the matching oxidation (divalent) state among the dopant and the host. Local structural studies after Co doping by the Extended X-ray Absorption Fine Structure (EXAFS), shows the Co2+ integration in the ZnO lattice without any impurity states. Photocatalytic measurements show that ZnO is a very promising degrading agent for Rhodamine B dye solution under UV as well as solar irradiation.© 2019Ultrathin nanosheets of the spin crossover (SCO) coordination polymer [Fe(py)2Ni(CN)4] (py = pyridine) have been achieved through a reverse micelle route. The nanosheets possess regular square shape with a thickness less than 10 nm and a main width of 600–800 nm. Through controlling the synthetic parameters, the nanostructures of [Fe(py)2Ni(CN)4] can be tuned to be square plate-, cube- and box-like shapes, respectively. The possible formation mechanism for these diversiform nanocrystals was proposed. Magnetic measurements and differential scanning calorimetry analyses revealed an interesting morphology-dependent SCO behavior of [Fe(py)2Ni(CN)4]. The hysteresis width decreases in the order of nanoplates (ca. 22 K), nanocubes (ca. 16 K), nanoboxes (ca. 4 K) and nanosheets (ca. 2 K). The enthalpy (ΔH) and entropy (ΔS) variations associated with the spin transitions of nanosheets and nanoboxes are significantly lower than those of nanocubes and nanoplates. Thus, the nanosheets and nanoboxes exhibit stronger nano-effect and their SCO properties are largely weakened owing to the large specific surface areas resulting from their unique morphologies.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report on an experimental study of partial discharges (PD) in transformer oil with four different volume concentrations of superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPION) ranging from 0 to 0.0004 vol%. To investigate the PD, a specific high-voltage setup was designed. Thanks to the small amount of SPION in the oil (transparency), the PD events in the form of visible corona and streamer discharges were visualized by a CCD camera. Furthermore, the PD inception and extinction voltage, apparent charge and quantities derived from the PD recurrence, as pulse repetition rate and phase resolved patterns, were analyzed in dependence on SPION concentration. It was found that the PD inception voltage increases quasi linearly with increasing SPION concentration but the extinction voltage is practically unaffected. The pulse repetition rate decreases as a result of the increasing SPION concentration. The decreased PD activity is clearly concluded also from the reducing shape and growth of the visual corona discharge patterns. To interpret the observed suppression of PD in transformer oil-based magnetic nanofluids, the electric field modification and injected charge trapping by the dispersed nanoparticles is considered. Moreover, a possible effect of the local magnetic fields around the SPION on the space charge migration is taken into account, too.© 2019In this paper, we present an input-modulating adaptive neuron circuit employing a floating-gate MOSFET (FG-MOSFET) with two asymmetrically shaped control gates. The proposed FG-MOSFET is utilized as key element for implementing neural adaptation in integrate-and-fire (I&F) neuron circuit. To confirm current modulating capability of proposed device, an adjustable-gain current mirror employing the device is simulated as well. Adaptive neuron circuit presented in this paper successfully exhibits spike-triggered adaptation with ratio between maximum and minimum firing rate ranging from 7.97 to 18.4. Compared to conventional researches, adaptive neuron circuit proposed in this paper allows more versatile operation and easier fabrication due to utilization of out FG-MOSFET.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents a theoretical study of magnetocaloric properties of polyoxovanadate molecular magnet V6 containing 6 vanadium ions carrying quantum spins S=1/2. The characteristic property of such structure is the presence of two weakly interacting spin triangles with all-antiferromagnetic couplings. The properties of the system are described using the exact numerical diagonalization approach applied to the quantum Heisenberg model and utilizing a field ensemble formalism. The dependence of the magnetic entropy and magnetic specific heat on the temperature and external magnetic field is calculated and extensively discussed. The magnetocaloric properties are quantified by isothermal entropy change and entropy derivative over the magnetic field. An interesting behaviour of isothermal entropy change is found, with high degree of tunability of the magnetocaloric effect with the initial and final magnetic field values.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The formation of 1:5H phase in Sm (Co, Fe, Cu, Zr)z melt-spun ribbons with high iron content has been investigated. The precipitation of the Zr-rich 2:7R phase is restrained in the boundaries of 2:17H grains for the as-spun ribbon. After aging treatment, only 2:17R phase with planar 1:3R phase occurs, which results in a lower coercivity of around 1.03kOe. After solid solution treatment of the as-spun ribbon, 2:17R phase with lower ordered state together with minor 2:17H phase is obtained. In addition, the ribbon after solid solution consists of large numbers of 2:17R nanotwins. When different twin variants with various stacking sequence encounter each other, those areas which are rich in Sm will act as the nucleation centers of 1:5H phase during aging. The pinning strength for the magnetic domain walls is enhanced, thus leading to a much higher coercivity of 6.16 kOe. These results may provide guidance for high performance 2:17R SmCo permanent magnets with high iron content.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The goal of this work is to demonstrate the positive effect of high energy ball milling on the magnetocaloric properties of materials based on strontium-calcium doped lanthanum manganite. We report a detailed study of crystal structure, magnetic behavior and magnetocaloric effect of La0.7Ca0.3−xSrxMnO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.2, Δx = 0.05) powders, synthesized by assisted high-energy ball milling. The X-ray diffraction patterns disclose the complete formation of manganite with an orthorhombic structure for x ≤ 0.15, and rhombohedral structure for x = 0.2. Magnetic properties show a reduction of the magnetic saturation, and an increase in the Curie temperature with the strontium substitution, in all explored compositions (above room temperature). Arrot curves display that strontium doped manganites exhibit a second-order magnetic transition from ferrimagnetic to paramagnetic order. The magnetocaloric effect was calculated by measuring the isothermal magnetization around the Curie temperature, from 0 to 1.8 T, using Maxwell relations. All the synthesized manganites show magnetocaloric effect larger as compared to that of the parent compounds synthesized by other methods. The un-doped sample (x = 0) presents 7.43 J kg−1 K−1 and 93.29 J kg−1 of maximum magnetic entropy change (|ΔSM|) and the relative cooling power (RCP), respectively, under a low applied field (μoH) of 1.8 T. As it is expected, the introduction of strontium into the manganite, slightly reduces the magnetic entropy at 1.8 T, from 6.29 to 3.47 J kg−1 K−1 for x = 0.05 and x = 0.2, respectively. At the same time, the presence of strontium increases the working temperature above room temperature for strontium contents higer than 0.05, both attributed to the change in the crystal structure. These values are suitable for room-temperature magnetic refrigeration applications, using low magnetic fields (<1.8 T), increasing its potential application in the domestic refrigeration.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the article, magnetization, viscosity and its increment (“magnetoviscous” effect) in a thin near-wall layer of the column of magnetic fluid that oscillates in the tube when applying a strong transverse magnetic field are assessed. Calculations were performed using formulae obtained on the basis of two different theoretical approaches. The described technique is of interest for studying magnetophoresis and the processes of aggregation of magnetic nanoparticles.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The anisotropic behavior of Gilbert damping provides a new dimension for controlling and tuning magnetization relaxation within the same magnetic device. The single-crystalline ferromagnetic metals with a high symmetry have been predicted to possess significantly anisotropic damping for one decade. By decreasing temperature down to T = 4.5 K, we found that the anisotropic damping factor Q, defined as the fractional difference of damping between easy and hard axis, can be approached to 60%–90% in Fe (15 nm)/MgO (0 0 1) without applied fields dependent behavior. It is much larger than Q = 10%–20% obtained at room temperature. Furthermore, it is followed by explanations on the basis of the breathing Fermi surface model giving around Q = 30%–40% when electron-phonon scattering rate is small enough. This discovery will enrich the understanding of damping mechanism, and can provide clues for searching strongly anisotropic damping within 3d transition metals and alloys.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have presented a coupling structure of two-dimensional (2D) magneto-optical photonic crystals (MOPCs) with a triangular lattice. The numerical calculation of photonic band structure is performed based on the finite element method. The result shows that photonic band gap of 2D MOPCs with a triangular lattice is much larger than that of 2D MOPCs with a square lattice or a honeycomb lattice under the same applied external magnetic field, i.e., working bandwidth of 2D MOPCs with a triangular lattice is much larger than that of the other two MOPCs. We have studied the coupling effect of one-way edge modes in 2D MOPCs with a triangle lattice, and achieved a unidirectional air waveguide with high-transmission, strong nonreciprocity and extra-broad operation bandwidth. Furthermore, we have qualitatively analyzed waveguide transmission characteristics based on S-parameter method, and illustrated the effective operating bandwidth and the optimum operating frequency for optical waveguide nonreciprocity devices according to different transmission losses in application.© 2019In this paper, we study the spin-orbit torques (SOTs) originated from the spin-orbit coupling (SOC) of intrinsic type in a periodically buckled honeycomb nanoribbon such as silicene. Using the Green function formalism with density matrix expressions, we analyze the SOT contributions from the Fermi-level and -sea electrons. We find that the intrinsic-SOC-induced inverse spin galvanic effect generates spin accumulations perpendicular to the honeycomb plane. The anti-damping torque results purely from the Fermi-level contribution, while the field-like torque from both the Fermi-level and -sea contributions. At zero bias voltage, the SOT is symmetric with respect to the Fermi energy (i.e., an even function of the Fermi energy), whereas the presence of bias further introduces the anti-symmetric torque components. When the ferromagnet magnetization lies in the honeycomb plane, all Fermi-sea contributions disappear. The maximum SOT among different Fermi energies is also inspected. For large enough in-plane magnetization compared to the staggered potential, the field-like torque has a maximum at zero Fermi energy. When the magnetization is smaller than some value characterized by the intrinsic SOC, the maximum of the anti-damping torque occurs at the cross point of the two Dirac linear bands in the leads. More importantly, we find that the anti-damping torques responsible for magnetic switching as well as the torkance require staggered potential from an applied out-of-plane electric field, i.e., lattice buckling is essential to the switching. When the electric field is reversed, the anti-damping torque and the torkance are also reversed. Accordingly, full electric control of the SOTs can be realized in this buckled system.© 2019 The AuthorsNickelates, just like their isoelectronic cousins (the cuprate superconductors), are candidates for high temperature superconductivity. As charge density waves (CDW) and superconductivity might share a similar microscopic origin and that CDW behaviour is earlier suggested for La4Ni3O10, we here provide a detailed physical characterization of the magnetic, electronic and thermodynamic properties of stoichiometric polycrystalline La4Ni3O10 at and below 300 K. By variable temperature, synchrotron powder X-ray diffraction, we observe noticeable expansion in the b-axis and a contraction in c-axis coinciding with the electronic transition. Magnetic measurements indicate Pauli paramagnetic behaviour for the entire temperature range of 4–300 K. Transport data suggest electron–phonon interaction based conduction from 150 to 300 K, at 138 K the we observe an anomaly of second order nature, previously reported as a CDW anomaly. Below this anomaly, we observe no indications of electron–phonon interaction, but rather, Fermi liquid (FL) based T2 dependence with resistivity minima at 20 K, below which T1/2 dependence occurs for the resistivity indicating pure electron–electron interactions (EEI) based transport. Specific heat data indicates that mass enhancement of La4Ni3O10 similar to that of the normal state of the cuprates and the entropy change at anomaly suggests close similarities to other quasi-two dimensional systems, such as molybdenum bronzes and manganites.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Fe-Si soft magnetic composites (SMCs) coated with novel insulating-magnetic-insulating (IMI) layer were prepared via ball milling Fe-Si/γ-Fe2O3 powders and subsequent spark plasma sintering (SPS) process. We had investigated the formation mechanism of the IMI layer and optimized the microstructure and magnetic properties of the Fe-Si/IMI SMCs by adjusting the γ-Fe2O3 coating content. The analysis results showed that the ball milled Fe-Si/γ-Fe2O3 powders exhibited superior magnetic properties. And γ-Fe2O3 would react with Si and produced Fe2SiO4 with good insulation at the interface between γ-Fe2O3 coating layer and Fe-Si alloy particles during SPS process, which finally resulted in the formation of a novel three-shell structure of Fe2SiO4-γ-Fe2O3-γ-Fe2O3 (IMI) layer. By controlling the γ-Fe2O3 coating content from 0.0 wt% to 10.0 wt%, optimized performances such as very low core loss (23.34 mW/cm3 at 50 kHz), high quality factor (18.4) and saturation magnetization (188.3 emu/g), were obtained when the γ-Fe2O3 coating content is 5.0 wt%.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper the influence of copper addition on the formation of the amorphous phase and the nanocrystallization process of Fe79.8−xCo2CuxMo0.2Si4B14 (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1, 1.5, 2) ribbons was described. The formation of crystalline phases was described using differential scanning calorimetry, X-ray diffractometry, Mössbauer spectroscopy and transmission electron microscopy. It was confirmed that the addition of copper decreases the glass forming ability, while facilitating the process of nanocrystallization. The analysis of the Avrami exponent allowed to state, that for fully amorphous alloys the crystallization of the α-Fe phase is associated with diffusion-controlled growth with decreasing nucleation rate and the Fe2B phase with interface controlled growth with increasing nucleation rate. Additionally, with increasing copper addition onset temperature of crystallization of α-Fe phase shifts to lower values, whereas for second, Fe2B phase, these changes are not so visible. Optimization of the annealing process of toroidal cores made from amorphous ribbons with different copper content allowed to obtain nanocrystalline, soft magnetic materials characterized by low coercivity ~9 A/m and high saturation induction of about 1.6 T. Analysis of transmission electron microscope images and electron diffraction confirmed that high magnetic parameters are related to the coexistence of the amorphous and nanocrystalline phases, which was confirmed also by Mössbauer spectroscopy.© 2019 Elsevier LtdRecent ULSI technology development emphasizes both silicon and graphene-based devices and system performance in terms of their low power and high switching speed. With Moore's law scaling having reached the limits of physics due to ballistic effects, efforts are moving towards nano scale materials and devices such as TFETs and GNRFETs. Still, recent developments with 7 nm lithography-based silicon devices have cited exciting results. The successful development of FinFET devices in integrated systems has been a breakthrough for the semiconductor industry. Research efforts were emphasized for new nanoscale materials such as Graphene, GaN, and Carbon nanotubes, as alternative devices for ULSI integrated system design. This paper provides a cumulative review for these three nanoscale devices: FinFET, TFET, and GNRFET. The study focuses on an 8T SRAM cell as geared towards low power and high-speed features that are suitable for high speed computers, wireless communications, and medical devices. The study covers device theory, models, and simulation. The study has showed evidence that the power consumption for both TFET and GNRFET -based systems features superior low power performance of a ratio 1:0.24 as taken for the Static T Cell for 20 nm scale devices. The practical model of the FinFET is verified and used by industry, while the practical model of both TFET and GNRFET are still in the prototype stage.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the magnetic properties of oxygen-deficient europium monoxide EuO1−x films prepared on (0 0 1)-orientation Si single crystal substrate via laser-MBE. Stoichiometric EuO and reduced EuO1−x films are deposited by adjusting the annealing conditions of Si wafers pre-deposition. An enhanced Curie temperature (TC) from 69 K to 150 K is observed by introducing oxygen vacancies to EuO, which is due to the formation of magnetic polarons. The EuO1−x films exhibit positive exchange bias when the films enter the Heisenberg ferromagnetic phase at a lower temperature, which suggests that an antiferromagnetic coupling between the magnetic polarons and Eu2+ 4f spins which is ordered in the typical Heisenberg ferromagnet.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, NiFe2O4 (NFO) and MgFe2O4 (MFO) thin films are deposited on MgAl2O4 (MAO)(1 0 0) substrate using pulsed laser deposition technique to investigate the atomic replacement effects on the magnetic anisotropy of the films. X-ray diffraction analysis confirms the c-oriented growth of the films. Magnetic field dependent magnetization discloses the soft magnetic nature, lower saturation magnetic field and large magnetic anisotropy in MFO(25 and 50 nm) films as compared to NFO(27 and 47 nm). In particular, MFO(50 nm) film exhibits a symmetrical ferromagnetic resonance spectrum in contrast to the bulk counterpart. The angular dependence of the resonance field reveals the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy in MFO(50 nm) film, making it one of the potential candidates for energy-efficient information and communication based spintronic devices. An induced magnetic anisotropy in MFO may be ascribed to the magneto-elastic Ni2+ ions replacement with non-magneto-elastic Mg2+ ions.© 2019 Elsevier LtdImpedance spectroscopy is able to simultaneously extract three key parameters, namely, the Seebeck coefficient, electrical conductivity, and thermal conductivity, leading to determination of the figure of merit (ZT). As the measurement method is simple, it can be used conveniently at room temperature. However, when measuring at high temperatures, there are restrictions on the IS method. Electrical parasitic parameters between the measuring equipment and the temperature chamber may reduce the reliability of the characterization. Since the electrical part connecting the temperature-variable chamber to the measuring equipment can have tens to hundreds of milliohms, it should be considered as lumped parameters in order to evaluate the intrinsic component of the thermoelectric module. In this study, the electrical and thermal characteristics of the Bi2Te3 thermoelectric module were evaluated in the range from room temperature to 150 ℃ using an impedance spectroscopy-based electrical equivalent model (ISEEM). The ISEEM includes an impedance component consisting of the thermoelectric module itself and the parasitic electrical impedance constituting the measuring apparatus, where the electrical impedance of the measuring equipment can be evaluated by the de-embedding method. As a result, it is possible to accurately extract the intrinsic characteristics of the Bi2Te3 thermoelectric module through ISEEM. The intrinsic parameters of a commercial thermoelectric module of 40 mm by 40 mm were obtained within an error rate of 5% regardless of the peripheral measuring device. Consequently, the module had a ZT maximum value of 0.73 at 22 °C and a performance of 0.49 at 150 °C. These results demonstrate that electrical and thermal characterization can be performed easily, and at the same time, the reliability of the characterization can be improved.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ferrimagnetic insulator Bismuth-substituted YIG (Bi1Y2IG) thin films with thickness from 8.2 nm to 31.7 nm and roughness smaller than 0.5 nm have been grown on substituted Gd3Ga5O12 (sGGG) substrate by pulsed laser deposition (PLD). A comprehensive description of the structural characteristics and magnetic properties of Bi-YIG films were given. Thickness-dependent large perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) was induced in Bi-YIG films by tensile strain originate from lattice mismatch. MOKE and VSM results showed that the 8.2 nm and 17.8 nm film has large PMA, high squareness and small out-of-plane coercivity with a saturation magnetization of 115 emu/cm3. However, with the increasing of film thickness, the easy axis turned from out-of-plane to in-plane. The thickness-dependent PMA indicated that the increase in PMA was caused by the interfacial strain. Furthermore, the Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya interaction (DMI), which is proportional to the strength of spin orbit coupling could also contribute to the increasing of PMA. First-principles calculations were adopted to study the elastic properties of Bi-YIG films. It showed that the Young's modulus of Bi-YIG increased to 225 GPa, which giving a larger Ku λ than un-doped YIG films under same strain. The measured peak to peak linewidth ΔH of Bi-YIG film with PMA is 20 Oe for fields out-of-plane. The derived Gilbert damping constant is 7.03 × 10−4, indicating a low magnetic loss.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A system of Fe-filled multiwall carbon nanotubes (MWCNT) was grown by aerosol chemical vapor deposition with three different concentrations of ferrocene as precursor catalyst. The obtained samples were thoroughly analyzed from the point of view of their morphological, microstructural and magnetic properties. It was found that ferrocene concentration did not change the MWCNTs morphology. However, it increases the number of MWCNTs containing Fe and the Fe amount in each MWCNT. The Fe is located either in form of nanorods within the inner channel of the MWCNTs or as nanoparticles of various sizes, sometimes aggregated in clusters. The magnetic results indicate the presence of different phases, identified as α-Fe, Fe3C and Fe3O4, mostly in form of single-domain particles. A simple model of single domain non-interacting particles allows explaining the observed temperature behavior of coercivity and remanence over a wide temperature range, up to 950 K. The different ferrocene concentrations affect only the saturation magnetization but not the coercivity of the samples. As a further result, MWCNT/epoxy nanocomposites, with possible application as electromagnetic shields, were prepared by the “two factor mechanical method”. The nanocomposites exhibit the same magnetic properties of the Fe-filled MWCNTs, in terms of both coercivity and hysteresis loop shape.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the cobalt oxide (Co3O4) nanoparticles (NPs) assisted modifications of magnetic properties of melt-quench synthesized Er3+ doped sodium magnesium boro-tellurite glass. The changes in magnetic parameters are attributed to the difference in the content of Co3O4 NPs. XRD pattern confirmed the amorphous nature of the newly doped glasses. Surface plasmon band of Co3O4 NPs in the glass revealed two peaks which are corresponded to the characteristic of spinel-type cobalt oxide phase and TEM images manifest the occurrence of non-spherical Co3O4 NPs having an average diameter 6.02 ± 0.10 nm. Magnetic study using Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (VSM) revealed the paramagnetic behavior of Co ion in boro-tellurite glass doped Er3+ contributes by the embedded Co3O4 NPs. The lower value of squareness ratio in the sample is attributed by stronger interactions among grains implying the appearance of isotropic behavior, hence, making them as a multi-domain magnetic with the addition of Co3O4 NPs. Electron Paramagnetic Resonance (EPR) spectra revealed three prominent value of g factor at ranges of 4.07–4.22, 2.97–3.02, 2.11–2.41. Furthermore, the tetrahedral symmetry contribution is increased as inferred from the oxidation states of Co2+ ions probed by EPR.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hysteretic properties of an assembly of uniaxial magnetic nanoparticles described as double well systems (DWS) with either collinear or randomly distributed easy axes are studied by means of a rate-equation approach. The resulting picture is sufficiently accurate to be exploited in high frequency applications of nanoparticles such as magnetic hyperthermia. The rate equation scheme allows an exhaustive description of hysteretic effects to be achieved in a rather simple way, with remarkable advantages over treatments based on nonlinear equations of magnetization dynamics and models derived from the Stoner-Wohlfarth theory. Rate equations for the magnetic DWS are then simplified and decoupled by making special assumptions on the escape frequency from the energy wells; it is shown that the simplified rate equation scheme can be applied in extended intervals of frequencies and temperatures, including the ones of interest for present-day practical applications of magnetic nanoparticles. Analytical solutions of the simplified rate equations allow one to explain several hysteretic properties of the system when the magnetic field is applied either parallel or perpendicular to the nanoparticle easy axis. These solutions are suitable to be generalized to the case of an assembly of nanoparticles with randomly distributed easy axes. Minor hysteresis loops of an assembly of DWS exhibit an anomalous behaviour: the magnetization driven by the periodic field initially follows a spiral path in the (H,M) plane; closed, self-similar hysteresis loops corresponding to the system's steady state are achieved only after a sequence of iterations that depends on the loop's vertex field: the smaller the vertex field is, the longer the time needed to reach the steady state. Only major loops (i.e., ones where the magnetization goes from positive to negative saturation) are closed since the very beginning. The anomaly occurs at all angles between magnetic field and easy axis and at all explored frequencies. This effect should be taken in due account in magnetic hyperthermia experiments.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We analyze the contribution of the inhomogeneous magnetic field induced by an electrical current to the spin Hall effect in metals. The Zeeman coupling between the field and the electron spin leads to a spin dependent force, and to spin accumulation at the edges. We compare the effect of this relativistic correction to the electron dynamics to the features induced by the spin-orbit interaction. The effect of current induced magnetic fields on the spin Hall effect can be comparable to the extrinsic contribution from the spin-orbit interaction, although it does not require the presence of heavy elements with a strong spin-orbit interaction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we compiled all the first principles calculations performed on RE-TM5 (RE: rare earth, TM: transition metal) system to address the following question: Has everything been tried to improve the hard magnetic properties of this special intermetallic compound, and are there any venues that are worth pursuing? As it is the case with the first principles studies in any field, they are driven mainly by experimental work: (i) to validate their results, and (ii) to extend our understanding of the underlying physical phenomena so that the theory in hand can be used as a predictive tool to shed light on certain what-if scenarios. Our analysis indicates that three major compounds are investigated more than others: (1) YCo5, because it can potentially be an intermediate-performance hard magnet, and the presence of yttrium with no localized 4f electrons simplifies calculations significantly, (2) SmCo5, because it has the largest magnetic anisotropy energy among all RE hard magnets as well as very impressive high temperature performance, (3) CeCo5, because Ce is the most abundant rare earth element with a curious 4f electron behavior that gives rise to pronounced deviations in its structural and magnetic properties across the lanthanides series. This is followed by a brief analysis of several ab initio approaches that were developed to treat these rather complicated systems both at 0 K and at finite temperatures. Towards the end, we elucidate the role of exchange-correlation approximations such as local density approximations (LDA) and generalized gradient approximation (GGA) formulation in determining the MAE and Ms by analyzing their corresponding density of states (DOS), and providing our results on a rather overlooked hard-magnetic material: LaCo5.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Manipulation of oxygen vacancies (VO) in transition metal oxides (TMOs) can largely alter their physical and chemical properties, such as electrical conductivity, magnetic state, optical band-gap, and electrocatalytic reactivity. Many experimental and theoretical works have been conducted to study the formation/annihilation of VO and its corresponding effect on the properties in TMOs. In this paper, a solid-state approach to modulate the oxygen stoichiometry in high quality SrCoOx epitaxial thin films was demonstrated. Dependence of the magnetic and electrical conducting properties on VO was investigated. Room temperature reversible phase switching between brownmillerite antiferromagnetic insulating SrCoO2.5 and perovskite ferromagnetic metallic SrCoO3−δ was achieved by electric-field induced oxygen non-stoichiometry. This room temperature reversible phase switching indicates that SrCoOx thin films are a promising candidate for practical applications in resistive random access memory and spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic anisotropies of Mn-, Fe- and Co-doped monolayer MoS2 at Mo-site have been investigated by first-principles calculations. The results demonstrate that the preferential axis of magnetization is perpendicular to the MoS2 monolayer for Fe dopant, while in-plane for Mn and Co dopants. Especially, the magnetic anisotropy energy (MAE) of the Co-doped system can reach −3.58 meV, whose absolute value is the largest among these systems. The analyses of microscopic origin of MAE are based on the second-order interactions of spin-orbit coupling (SOC) between the occupied and unoccupied states near the Fermi level. Additionally, the MAE distributions of doped systems are clearly shown in the reciprocal space. Finally, the fitted curves of the angular dependence of total energy for these systems strongly support our argument. Our research may assist in designing new spintronic devices.© 2019Magnetic skyrmions have attracted great interest in recent years due to their potential wide-scale applications in spintronic devices, such as the spin torque nano-oscillator (STNO) and racetrack memory. The spin-transfer torque can drive the motion of skyrmions on a ferromagnetic nanodisk, where skyrmions are stabilized by the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI). However, the Magnus force acted on a skyrmion can drive the skyrmion moving toward either the nanodisk center or edge, which may lead to the destruction of skyrmion at edge, and thus reduce the performance of skyrmion-based STNO. In order to overcome this problem, we designed a ferromagnet/spacer/ferromagnet/heavy metal STNO model, in which the inner and outer areas of the ferromagnetic nanodisk have different DMI, and those skyrmions could move along the boundary between inner and outer areas. We investigated the dynamics of skyrmions in such a STNO model by adjusting several geometrical and material parameters. We obtained an optimal frequency of skyrmion oscillation of 3.43 GHz. Our results may be useful for designing future STNOs based on skyrmions, where the Magnus-force-induced destruction of skyrmions can be effectively avoided.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A series of Fe2V1-xRuxSi (x = 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1) Heusler alloys was synthesized and the atomic ordering, electronic structure and magnetic properties of them were investigated theoretically and experimentally. When substituting for V, the Ru atom shows a strong tendency to occupy the C site and drives Fe to the B site, which was confirmed by both structural optimization and XRD measurement. This preferable occupation is related to the enhanced bonding character when Ru entering C site and becoming the nearest neighbor of Si. This knowledge is useful for understanding the site preference of transition metal atoms in Heusler alloys. Ru-doping can stabilize the ferromagnetic state in Fe2V1-xRuxSi effectively. Both the Curie temperature TC and saturation magnetization Ms increase monotonously with Ru-doping. The increase of Ms mainly comes from the partial spin moment of Fe, which gets large rapidly with expanding lattice after Ru-doping. The doping of Ru tends to close the minority pseudogap at EF, so the DOS structure indicates a normal ferromagnetic metal character in Fe2V1-xRuxSi.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThree types of E-mode AlGaN/GaN MIS-HEMTs with different barrier depths and conventional HEMT were fabricated on the Si substrates. HfO2 gate insulator with a thickness of 30 nm was grown by plasma enhanced atomic layer deposited (PEALD). Characteristics of the four devices with different recess depths are analyzed. The MIS-HEMT with barrier layer thickness of 3 nm features good comprehensive performance. The threshold voltage (Vth) is 1.8 V, the drain current density is 480 mA/mm and the figure of merit (FOM) is 363 MW/cm2. When the barrier thickness is 0 nm, the Vth is up to 3.7 V. A calculation model of threshold voltage for recessed MIS-HEMTs is proposed. When the barrier layer thickness is 6 nm, the calculated value of Vth was 0.3 V which is in good match with the experimental value of 0.4 V. The proposed model provides guidelines for the AlGaN/GaN MIS-HEMTs designs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The saturation field of circular islands, consisting of [Fe84Cu16/MgO]9Fe84Cu16 multilayers, increases with decreasing diameter of the islands. When the diameter of the islands is below 450 nm the field induced changes are dominated by a coherent rotation of the moment of the Fe84Cu16 layers. For diameters of 2 μm and larger, a signature of domain nucleation and evolution is observed. The changes in the saturation field with diameter of the islands are ascribed to the interplay between interlayer exchange coupling, stray field coupling at the edges and the crystalline anisotropy of the Fe84Cu16 layers.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A comparative study of dielectric, specific heat, and magnetic properties has been carried out between bulk Y3Fe5O12 (YIG) samples which display different behavior regarding the dielectric and ac-susceptibility spectra. Experimental results are presented from two categories of YIG samples (called sample-A and sample-B). Sample-A exhibits zero imaginary part χ″(T) of the magnetic ac susceptibility whereas sample-B exhibits χ″(T) curves with two well defined broad maxima in the kHz region. These two maxima can be assigned to two different relaxation regimes. The frequency dependence of real (ε′) and imaginary (ε″) dielectric permittivity of sample-B reveals step-like transitions in ε′ and local maxima in ε″ at the kHz region, which are indicative for several relaxation processes. These processes are not observed in the electric permittivity of sample-A, indicating that dielectric and magnetic relaxation effects depend strongly on the preparation conditions of YIG. Such a completely different spectral behavior among YIG samples corresponds to a direct shape change of absorption sextets in Mössbauer spectra (MS). It was discovered that samples without dispersion in magnetic susceptibility and electric permittivity exhibit MS with distinct broadening of absorption lines in tetrahedral sites, as compared with samples that display dispersion. Moreover, Mössbauer spectroscopy for both categories of samples does not provide evidence for the presence of Fe2+.© 2019 Elsevier LtdTrue random number generators (TRNGs) provide a wide area of applications and can be fabricated on the basis of magnetic tunnel junctions (MTJs). This work represents the modeling of TRNG readout optimization, where the induced digital random bit is detected within only a single computational period. The period contains two sub-cycles: write and joined read & reset cycles. The system has a valuable potential to become stochastically independent after calibrating at the desired working point against the factors, which cause to the signal deviations: temperature-induced, material degradation or other problems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The rapidly solidified Cu18Al25Ho57 and Cu18Al25Tm57 melt-spun ribbons have been successfully synthesized. Both ribbons show complete amorphous characteristics based on the analysis of the X-ray diffraction (XRD) and differential scanning calorimeter (DSC). Magnetic measurements illustrate that a paramagnetic to ferromagnetic type transition takes place at Curie temperatures TC of 22.2 and 4.9 K for Cu18Al25Ho57 and Cu18Al25Tm57, respectively, which are companied with a considerable magnetocaloric effect (MCE). For a magnetic field change (ΔH) of 0–7 T, Cu18Al25Ho57 and Cu18Al25Tm57 ribbons display the maximum magnetic entropy (ΔSM max) of 24.8 and 20.9 J kg−1 K−1, the refrigerant capacity (RC) determined from the area below a full-width at half-maximum (δTFWHM) forΔS(T)curve of 582.9 and 385 J kg−1, respectively. The large MCEs at low temperatures demonstrate that Cu18Al25RE57 (RE = Ho and Tm) are competitive candidates among the MCE materials working at liquid hydrogen and liquid helium temperature zones.© 2019We present an in-depth magnetic study of polycrystalline, microstain-free, magnetic, and thermally stable cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) octahedrons with an edge dimension of 214 nm. Nanoparticles were synthesized from granular CoFe2O4 nanotubes growing on bacterial nanocellulose and annealed at T = 1273 K. SEM, XRD, and VSM were used to investigate the morphology, structure and magnetic properties of the octahedral particles. The results indicate that heat treatment increases the sizes of the crystallites (2 times) and of the particles (4 times), compared with the starting material. The particles show a change of the magnetization saturation and magnetic anisotropy around 150 K compared with canonical ferrimagnetic materials, associated with a First Order Magnetization Process. The magnetization process as a function of temperature, cooling without (ZFC) and with (FC) different applied magnetic fields are explained by multi-domain theory. ZFC-FC curves show an irreversible branching temperature, which is highly sensitive to the applied magnetic field. In contrast, the temperature for the maximal magnetization value in the ZFC curves, change slightly with the external applied magnetic field, H.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.BaTiO3 based composites have been widely utilized to achieve better ferroelectric and magnetoelectric characteristics. BiFeO3 is one of materials that exhibit superior magnetoelectric characteristics in single phase. In this work, (1 − x)Ba0.83Ca0.10Sr0.07TiO3-xBiFeO3 (x = 0–0.30) multiferroic composites have been synthesized using mechano-chemical activation method. The strategy is to achieve optimum ferroelectric and ferromagnetic properties without hampering the inherent dielectric and ferroelectric characteristics of Ba0.83Ca0.10Sr0.07TiO3. The synthesized composites have shown diphasic nature with homogeneous grains and clearly distinguishable grain boundaries. The composition with x = 0.10 exhibits superior electrical properties, which are attributed to optimum resistivity and increased tetragonal lattice distortion introduced by BiFeO3 addition. The modification in bond length and bond angle leads to a significant enhancement in ferromagnetic characteristics of prepared composites. The composites have shown a gradual increase in magnetoelectric characteristics and substantial DC magnetic field dependence. This work provides an optimum composition and feasible route to prepare high-performance magnetoelectric composites.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We fabricate a cost-effective and environmental friendly magnetoresistor based on a magnetic active tissue consisting of glucose, carbonyl iron microparticles and cotton fibers. We investigate the electrical properties of the magnetoresistor with and without an external magnetic field at pre-established time intervals for a time duration limited by glucose crystallization. We show that both glucose crystallization kinetics and magnetic field sensibly influence the electrical properties of the magnetoresistor. Owing to these effects, the magnetoresistor can be used as a sensor for monitoring glucose and metabolic processes. We explain the obtained results by using the model of dipolar approximations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Density functional theory (DFT) and the bond order-length-strength mechanism are used to investigate the electronic, bonding, and magnetic behaviours of Sc atoms adsorbed on the surface of lithium (Li) (1 1 0). The results indicate that Sc atoms form two-dimensional (2D) geometric structures including larger decagon, trapezoid decagon, decagon, octagon, and quadrangle structures on the Li (1 1 0) surface. The total magnetic moments of these structures are respectively 4.75, 1.84, 3.44, 3.32, and −0.427 μB. Further, the residual spin spectrum (RSS) correlation clearly indicates that the quadrangle structure has anti-ferromagnetic property; this finding should open up a new study direction for the design of novel 2D magnetic materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic skyrmions have attracted a great deal of interest in the last decades. They are widely used for many spintronic applications. In this manuscript, we study by micromagnetic simulation the emergence of a hexagonal Néel-type skyrmion lattice in a square thin film of CeFeB. We specifically examine the formation and annihilation of the skyrmion lattice. Moreover, we show the decrease of the skyrmion sizes with the increase of the magnetic field, while the lattice parameter remains unchanged during this rise.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this article, the dynamics of ferrodroplet deformation and bubbles merging within the ferrofluid under a uniform magnetic field are studied through numerical simulations. A recently developed simplified multiphase lattice Boltzmann method (SMLBM) is used to capture the hydrodynamic behavior of ferrofluids, the Cahn-Hilliard (CH) equation is employed as the interface tracking algorithm, whose solution is also obtained within the lattice Boltzmann framework and a self-correcting procedure is used to solve the magnetic field along with conjugate boundary conditions for a smooth transition of magnetic permeability at the interface. A series of numerical simulations are performed for a range of magnetic field strength, magnetic susceptibility and Ohnesorge number (Oh), along with a comparison between obtained results and previous experimental and numerical results. The dynamical behavior of ferrodroplets and bubbles merging in ferrofluids is analyzed through the distribution of magnetic field and magnetic flux density, velocity contours, pressure variations, the magnetic energy density and the effect of inertia. Findings of this study may help to explain the mechanism of ferrodroplet deformation and merging of bubbles within the ferrofluid and provide a useful insight into the distribution of flow variables during these deformations and merging phenomena.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThickness-controlled separation of a thin layer of single-crystalline semiconductors from its bulk substrate has been developed for the co-integration of compound semiconductors with silicon-based integrated circuit chips and the fabrication of high-performance flexible devices. Recently, a controlled spalling technique that can mechanically separate single-crystalline semiconductor layers has been actively demonstrated because of the process simplicity and the less limitation on the use of materials. Here, we developed an analytic model that can precisely estimate the spalling depth. In this model, the spalling depth was calculated from the thermodynamic equilibrium condition in which total strain energy accumulated in a separated layer is balanced with the crystal binding energy. We experimentally investigated the dependence of the spalling depth on the stressor layer thickness and stress, and we compared the empirical results with the proposed analytic model. We also verified that the crack initiation angle of the spalling process is determined by the binding energy contrast in the main crystal orientations in the semiconductor.© 2019PrFeB/PrCo5 hybrid magnet has excellent magnetic properties and better thermal stability. In this paper, anisotropic nanocomposite PrFeB/PrCo5 hot-deformed magnets with and without doping PrCu eutectic alloy were prepared by spark plasma sintering (SPS) technique. With the addition of 6 wt% PrCu, the coercivity of the magnet (10.8 kOe) is almost double than that of undoped magnet (5.6 kOe), with an enhancement of the remanence (9.1 kG versus 8.4 kG). For the magnet with PrCu, the nonmagnetic PrCu phase is mainly distributed in the phase boundary regions, introducing a coupling effect of demagnetization on the hard-magnetic phases, which obtained an enhancement of the coercivity. The deformed Pr2Fe14B grains of the hybrid magnet have elongated platelet shapes, but the PrCo5 grains are not easy to be deformed, which affects the overall degree of deformation texture of the hybrid magnet. This implies that there is uncoordinated deformation for the PrFeB/PrCo5 hybrid magnet.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We use micromagnetic simulation to demonstrate layer-selective detection of magnetization directions from magnetic dots having two recording layers by using a spin-torque oscillator (STO) as a read device. This method is based on ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) excitation of recording-layer magnetizations by the microwave field from the STO. The FMR excitation affects the oscillation of the STO, which is utilized to sense the magnetization states in a recording layer. The recording layers are designed to have different FMR frequencies so that the FMR excitation is selectively induced by tuning the oscillation frequency of the STO. Since all magnetic layers interact with each other through dipolar fields, unnecessary interlayer interferences can occur, which are suppressed by designing magnetic properties of the layers. We move the STO over the magnetic dots, which models a read head moving over recording media, and show that changes in the STO oscillation occur on the one-nanosecond timescale.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Intragranular rare earth-rich phases play a vital role in affecting the intrinsic coercivity of sintered Nd-Fe-B permanent magnets. To explore the origin of these intragranular rare-earth-rich phases, the starting material-strip cast Nd-Fe-B flakes were characterized by a variety of high-end microscopy techniques. It was surprisingly found that the intragranular rare-earth-rich phase is spherical in a diameter of ~150–300 nm and consists of amorphous regions rich in additive elements (e.g., Cu, Co, and Ga) and crystalline regions which are a combination of hexagonal light-rare-earth-rich phases and body centered cubic phases rich in light and heavy rare earth, and oxygen. Amorphous interfacial layers between the glass/crystal particles and the crystalline matrix were observed, probably due to insufficient time to reach a crystalline equilibrium state. Based on the microstructural observation, we proposed a formation mechanism of these intragranular glass/crystal conjugated particles in strip cast Nd-Fe-B flakes, which may facilitate to minimize the volume of these detrimental intragranular phases during the strip casting process.© 2019 Elsevier LtdBased on the polarization property and negative-capacitance (NC) effect of ferroelectric capacitors, nanoelectromechanical (NEM) diode nonvolatile memory cells (NC-NEM diode NVMs) are proposed for use in random-access memory arrays. It is observed that, by optimizing the structural parameters of the NEM memories, the NC-NEM diode NVMs can achieve more scaled program/erase voltages and better switching delays, when compared to the existing NEM diode memories. Moreover, the NC-NEM diode NVM has a one-directional current path, which is desirable in random-access memory arrays to block the sneak leakage.© 2019Fully hydrogenated La0.9Ce0.1Fe11.7-xMnxSi1.3 bulk hydrides with Curie temperature TC around room temperature were prepared by high-hydrogen-pressure sintering. High-resolution X-ray microtomography has been employed to analyze the morphology, size and distribution of the micropores in the sintered bulk sample. The analysis result shows that most of the micropores have the size of several micrometers with the porosity of 0.22%. A thin plate of La0.9Ce0.1Fe11.35Mn0.35Si1.3H2.0 exhibits a magnetic-entropy change ΔSm of 7.5 J/kg K at 290 K and a hysteresis loss of 0.5 J/kg for a magnetic-field change from 0 to 2 T. As the sintering pressure increases from 40 to 50 MPa, more α-Fe (~20 wt%) precipitates from the 1:13 phase, which causes a reduction of ΔSm to 6.2 J/kg K for a field change from 0 to 2 T at 297 K and a remarkable enhancement of the compressive strength from 46 to 421 MPa.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Uniaxial magnetic anisotropy has been induced in multi-element soft magnetic amorphous FeNiPGd thin films, which were fabricated by electroplating with an external magnetic field applied parallel to the plane of the electrode. After the application of the magnetic field, surface morphology of the FeNiPGd layer is improved. The crystal grains are refined, and the number of pores generated on the surface is remarkably reduced. The introduction of external magnetic field can significantly improve the deposition rate and dynamic permeability. And the cutoff frequency can achieve 500 MHz when the applied magnetic field is 40 mT during the deposition process. Specifically, the in-plane anisotropy field of the film was calculated by the area integral method to be approximately 116Oe while the magnetic field is 10 mT, which is obviously higher than that of the binary FeNi material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, bidirectionally controlling the valence electron concentration (e/a) is proposed to tune and realize the coincident magneto-structural transformation in MnCoGe alloy. With the common effect of e/a and ‘chemical pressure’ produced by the change of chemical composition, the martensitically magneto-structural transformation is achieved from paramagnetic Ni2In-type austenite to ferromagnetic TiNiSi-type martensite in both Mn1− xCoGe1+ x and Mn1+ yCoGe1− y systems under the same experimental capabilities. It is interesting that a magnetic-field-induced metamagnetic martensitic transformation is observed in Mn1− xCoGe1+ x system. Accordingly, large magnetic entropy change peak values of ~31.6 and ~20.1 J kg−1 K−1 are obtained under the applied field change of μ0ΔH = 0–5 T at 276 and 294 K for Mn0.98CoGe1.02 and Mn0.985CoGe1.015 alloys, respectively. Likewise, a moderate magnetic entropy change ~9.13 J kg−1 K−1 is acquired under μ0ΔH = 0–5 T around 320 K for Mn1.03CoGe0.97 alloy. Bidirectionally controlling a physical variable may pave a new and effective way in designing and optimizing compositions to simultaneously realize the magneto-structural transformation in both directions in MnCoGe and other systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The ferromagnetic system Sr2FeMoO6 is considered fundamental to understand the half-metallicity and the Curie temperature in double perovskites, experimental results in this compound have shown that the addition of itinerant electrons increases the Curie temperature with important effects in its physical properties. In this work, we present the structural and electronic properties of the double perovskite Sr2-yLayFeMoO6 (y=0.25, 0.5, 0.75 and 1.0) compound including disorder (12.5% and 25%) effects. It is well known experimentally that the effect of substituting divalent ions (Sr2+) by trivalent ions (La3+) in Sr2FeMoO6 is to increase the electronic density at Mo (4d) orbitals and therefore induce disorder at Fe and Mo sites, this kind of disorder is considered in this work. Our results show that the highest disorder considered in this study (25%) destroys the half-metallicity of the perovskite compound for all La compositions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The dependence of the magnetic structure and the hysteresis properties of the amorphous microwires on the applied load is investigated by the magnetic-optical method of the indicator films and the inductive pickup coils. We examine the amorphous microwires of Fe73.5Cu1Nb3Si13.5B9 and Fe77.5Si7.5B15, with a positive magnetostriction and different thickness of the glass coating and the diameter of the metal core. An increase in the stress level can be achieved by stretching along a microwire axis. The hysteresis properties and magnetic domain structure are examined during in situ stretching. Coercivity versus tension curves have been plotted for the examined microwires. It is shown that an increase in the stress leads to an increase in the coercivity.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Metal-insulator (CoFeB)x(LiNbO3)100− x nanocomposite films with different content of the ferromagnetic (FM) phase x are investigated by ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) technique. A strong change of the FMR line shape is observed in the vicinity of metal-insulator transition (MIT) of the film, where the hopping-type conductivity σ modifies to the regime of a strong intergranular tunnelling, characterized by a logarithmic dependence σ(T) at high temperatures. It is shown that below MIT, the FMR linewidth is mainly determined by the inhomogeneous distribution of the local anisotropy axes in the film plane. Above MIT, the contribution of this inhomogeneity to the line broadening decreases. At the same time, two-magnon magnetic relaxation processes begin to play a significant role in the formation of the linewidth. The observed behaviour indicates the critical role of interparticle exchange in the tunnelling regime above MIT of the nanocomposite.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The industrial grade gram scale fine magnetite particles were synthesized from the mill scale. Mill scale, the reactant in this study, has higher ferrous to ferric ratio (≃2), in contrary to the standard ratio (0.5) required for the synthesis of spinel crystalline magnetite. A reverse coprecipitation method was developed for direct synthesis of magnetite particles without any arrangement for oxidation or reduction of ferrous or ferric ions present in the reactants. Particles were aged at two different pH levels (8 and 12) after synthesizing at higher pH and their stability and characteristics were compared. XRD confirmed the cubic spinel structure of magnetite. In agreement with XRD and Raman spectroscopy, FTIR identified the Fe-O band in octahedral and tetrahedral sites indicating the formation of cubic crystalline magnetite. The magnetization value was determined 68 emu/g. Spherical structures of magnetite were confirmed by SEM and TEM analysis. Specific surface area of black and brown magnetite was determined 75.7712 and 64.4382 m2/g, respectively. Newly synthesized magnetite particles were found very effective for the adsorptive removal of phosphate and arsenic from the contaminated water.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents the design and modeling of a linear eddy current speed sensor with a flat type structure and an air coil configuration. The theory of the eddy current speed sensor is based on utilizing the speed component of the induced currents in a solid moving conductor under stationary or alternating source fields. The stationary part comprises one rectangular excitation coil and two antiserially connected rectangular pick-up coils on the left and right sides of the excitation coil in the direction of the trajectory of the moving part. The moving part is considered firstly as a rectangular conductive ferromagnetic solid iron plate, and secondly as a rectangular aluminum plate. A 3D analytical model using Fourier series is developed to analyze the linear speed sensor in Cartesian coordinates. In addition, the 3D numerical finite element method is used for simulations of the linear speed sensor, and the results are compared with the results for analytical methods. The effects of iron permeability on the speed sensor are calculated for a rectangular ferromagnetic solid iron bar or conductor. The experimental results are presented for a linear speed sensor for a rectangular ferromagnetic solid iron plate and also for a rectangular aluminum plate, at variable speeds. The calculation and the experimental results show that the speed sensor outputs differ completely for solid iron conductive plates and for aluminum conductive plates, due to the different electrical conductivities and magnetic permeabilities.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.CuO in nanocrystalline form (nano-CuO) was obtained by chemical route. These nano-CuO crystallites were incorporated in polyvinylidene fluoride (PVDF) to form nano-CuO/PVDF free-standing composite films containing varying amounts of nano-CuO by using sol-gel method. These films indicated ferromagnetism at room temperature. All the films were appropriately characterized. Magnetization was found to decrease with increase in temperature. The observed ferromagnetism in nano-CuO/PVDF samples could be due to possible interaction between magnon scatterings arising from the Cu2+ ions of nano-CuO particles when embedded in PVDF matrix which in turn would alter the electronic configuration of Cu ions for inducing ferromagnetic property in these films under study.© 2019 Elsevier LtdBeryllium oxide (BeO) thin films were grown on a p-type Si substrate by plasma enhanced atomic layer deposition (PEALD) using diethylberyllium as a precursor and O2 plasma. The PEALD BeO exhibited self-saturation and linear growth rates. The dielectric properties of PEALD were compared with those of thermal atomic layer deposition (ThALD). X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy was performed to determine the bandgap energy of PEALD BeO (8.0 eV) and ThALD BeO (7.9 eV). Capacitance–voltage curves revealed that PEALD BeO had low hysteresis and frequency dispersion compared to ThALD BeO. In addition, PEALD showed a dielectric constant of 7.15 (at 1 MHz) and low leakage current (7.25×10-9 A/cm2 at −1 MV/cm). These results indicate that the highly activated radicals from oxygen plasma prompt the chemical reaction at the substrate, thus reducing nucleation delay and interface trap density.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we introduce a method for the assembly of micropatterned bimetallic nanoparticles (NPs) with controllable patterns and particle sizes on laser interference-structured substrates. The microstructures of interference patterning in conjunction with the nanostructures fabricated by the direct laser interference ablation (DLIA) were used as the templates for the assembly of patterned NPs in thermal dewetting processes. The location and particle size of micropatterned Au-Ni NPs formed were well-controlled by the nanostructures on the substrate surface. The magnetic domain pattern of as-annealed Au-Ni NPs is consistent with the topography of the silicon templates. The DLIA method provides a one-step new way for the large-area and high throughput fabrication of patterned NPs with the templated dewetting method. It can be easily extended to many metal combinations and has wide applications such as magnetic recording, plasmon-enhancement and other functional nanostructured elements and devices.© 2019 The AuthorsWe report on the first observation of an exact fractal pattern in the time-domain arising spontaneously from a dynamic artificial crystal (DAC). The all-magnon process occurs in a passive, unlithographed magnetic waveguide. The DAC was created by a standing spin wave of frequency fDAC in a region of nonlinear waveguide, resulting in a spatio-temporally periodic potential. The interaction of travelling spin waves of frequency f′ with the DAC resulted in a series of new modes appearing in a comb with intervals Δf(0)=|fDAC-f′|. As the magnetic field H was increased a 1st pre-fractal pattern was observed with frequency interval Δf(1)=Δf(0)/2. Finally, the onset of a 2nd pre-fractal was observed with frequency interval Δf(2)=Δf(1)/2=Δf(0)/4. The magnetic field dependence of the nonlinear signals matched that of the DAC. The spin wave fractal behavior was demonstrated for different values of f′.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic and structural properties of Sc75Fe25 nanoglass prepared by Inert Gas Condensation and compression at 6 GPa are compared with Sc75Fe25 metallic glass produced by melt cooling. Nanoglass consists of nanometer sized glass regions connected by interfacial regions that have a non-crystalline structure. The magnetisation of Sc75Fe25 nanoglass was found to be about an order of magnitude larger than the magnetisation of Sc75Fe25 metallic glass (e.g., ~10 A m2 kg−1 cf. 0.4 A m2 kg−1 at 100 K respectively). The differences in magnetic behaviour of Sc75Fe25 nanoglass and Sc75Fe25 metallic glass result from the exceptional atomic structures of the interfacial regions in nanoglass with ferromagnetic Fe-clusters embedded in a Pauli paramagnetic matrix formed in the nanoglass interfacial regions. This in turn results in a reduction of the magnetic Fe-clusters in nanoglass with increasing external field, Bex; an effect that has not been observed previously in established magnetic materials. The distributions of Fe and Sc in Sc75Fe25 nanoglass and Sc75Fe25 metallic glass have been determined by scanning transmission electron microscopy; STEM based local radial distribution function (STEM-RDF) and electron energy loss spectroscopy (EELS).© 2019The deviation angle of the easy magnetisation 〈0 0 1〉-axes from the rolling direction (RD) strongly affects the magnetic domain configuration within individual grains and hence the overall magnetic properties in grain oriented electrical steels (GOES). In the current study, both angles of deviations; α: the angle between 〈0 0 1〉 and in-plane rolling direction, and β: the angle between 〈0 0 1〉 and out-plane rolling direction, where calculated using electron backscatter diffraction (EBSD) raw data to investigate the exact correlation between the crystal orientation and magnetic domain structure. Further, EBSD combined with forescatter detector (FSD) is used to reveal the magnetic domain configuration within individual oriented grains. The microstructure and microtexture of various GOESs with different chemical compositions and magnetic properties were characterised. The magnetic domain patterns were directly imaged and correlated to the crystal orientation and α and β deviation angles. It is demonstrated that the crystal orientation has a great impact on the magnetic domain patterns, width, and configurations. It was also shown that the grain boundary characteristics have a significant influence on the magnetic domain transfer between neighbouring grains. It was evident that low angle grain boundaries allowed domain transfer without a significant change in the domain pattern, whereas high angle grain boundaries perturbed the magnetic domain pattern, width, and configuration. Furthermore, it was demonstrated that the size of the deviated orientation grains from ideal (1 1 0) 〈0 0 1〉 GOSS orientation is a critical microtexture parameter for the optimisation of magnetic property. Finally, it is concluded that the magnetic domain patterns and α and β angle of deviations are strongly correlated to the magnetic losses in GOES.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the spinel-strontium ferrite (SrFe2O4) nanoparticles with size of the particles of 10–25 nm by a sol–gel method using the ethylene glycol as surfactant at 700 °C and 4 h was prepared. Then, the effects of the ethylene glycol on the structural, microstructural, magnetic and optical properties of the SrFe2O4 nanoparticles were studied. The results of the field emission scanning electron microscope showed that by adding of the ethylene glycol, the average particle size was reduced. Also, the morphology of particles with adding the ethylene glycol is spherical and the aggregation effect of the samples has been reduced. The VSM results show that with an addition of the ethylene glycol to the samples the magnetic coercivity (Hc), the remanence (Mr), and the saturation magnetization (Ms) increases. The results of the ultraviolet-visible spectroscopy study show that adding of the ethylene glycol surfactant causes an increase in the energy gap.© 2019In the present work, we consider magnetic properties of the non-interacting diluted magnetic semiconductor (DMS) quantum ring lattices applying the 2D rotator model. The exchange interaction and the Zeeman term effect on the magnetic moment is taking into account. For this purpose, the exact analytic expression for the single-particle partition function is found and it used to determine the magnetic moment. We show that magnetization in DMS quantum ring sharp changes with a small increase in temperature and after a peak the magnetization starts to decrease.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetism, whose physical properties include the Giant-Magneto resistance, spin-transfer torque, spin-Hall effect and so on, attracts researchers’ interest in the search for the spin polarizers in spin electronics. In this paper, we investigate a higher-order (2+1)-dimensional nonlinear Schrödinger-type equation for a Heisenberg ferromagnetic spin chain with the bilinear and biquadratic interaction. Magnetic breathers are derived. Conditions of the transformation from the magnetic breather to the magnetic soliton are obtained. We get the magnetic chaotic wave fields, in which the magnetic breather-like solitons and rogue waves appear. Effects of γ on the magnetic chaotic wave fields are studied: As γ increases, mean amplitude of the magnetic waves in the chaotic wave field increases, and amplitude dispersion degree decreases, where γ represents the lattice parameter.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structural, electronic and magnetic properties of Co1− xMnxFe2O4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 1.0) spinel ferrites were systematically studied by the first-principles calculations based on density functional theory. The calculated results show that Mn ions tend to replace Co2+ and locate at the octahedral sites with +3 valence when x ≤ 0.25, while the remaining Mn ions prefer to locate at the tetrahedral sites with +2 valence when 0.375 < x < 1.0. The lattice constant increases linearly with the increase of the Mn content, due to the fact that the ionic radius of Mn is larger than that of Co. The effect of Mn substituted Co on magnetic properties show that the total magnetic moment enhances with the increase of Mn content when x ≥ 0.375. The analysis of density of states indicates that the introduction of Mn ions has vital influence on the conductivity of cobalt ferrite.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A route for improving the saturation magnetization (MS) and lowering magnetic loss of nanocrystalline MnZn ferrites has been reported. Mn0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 nano-particles were synthesized by phase transformation method under dc magnetic field of 0, 2, 4, and 6 T, respectively. The magnetic field enhances the lattice strain. The Ms of the sample prepared at 6 T is ~18% and ~16% higher than that of the sample prepared at 0 T at 120 K and 300 K, respectively. The MS at 120 K increases with the fabrication field up to 6 T. The blocking temperatures are ~65 K and ~40 K for the samples prepared at 0 T and 6 T, respectively. Results of a.c. magnetic properties show that the 6 T sample has a smaller imaginary susceptibility than the 0 T sample and the MnZn nano-ferrite system is a spin-glass one. The effects of magnetic field on the structure and magnetic properties of MnZn nano-ferrites are also discussed. The a.c. magnetic susceptibility experiments show dependency of the magnetic responses with applied frequency, revealing strongly magnetic interactions between the nano-sized particles.© 2019Fine magnetic powder particles are usually utilized to prepare high coercivity Nd-Fe-B magnets. However, it is more difficult to obtain high orientation degree due to the larger friction between finer powder particles during magnetic-aligned compaction process, which greatly affects the performance of final magnets. In this work, a special wet pressing method is adopted to reduce the friction between the powder particles. The degree of alignment of the magnet is obviously increased and the microstructure is optimized. The remanent magnetization of the magnet shows a significant increase with negligible coercivity change, while the compressive strength is improved compared with that of the traditional method.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we study the spin transport at the Ferromagnet|Noncentrosymmetric Superconductor (F|NCSC) junction of a Ferromagnet|Noncentrosymmetric Superconductor|Ferromagnet (F|NCSC|F) spin valve. We investigate the Tunnelling Spin-Conductance (TSC), spin current and Spin Tunnelling Magneto-Resistance (STMR), and their dependence on various important parameters like Rashba Spin-Orbit Coupling (RSOC), strength and orientation of magnetization, an external in-plane magnetic field, barrier strength and a significant Fermi Wavevector Mismatch (FWM) at the ferromagnetic and superconducting regions. The study has been carried out for different singlet-triplet mixing of the NCSC gap parameter. We develop Bogoliubov-de Gennes (BdG) Hamiltonian and use the extended Blonder–Tinkham–Klapwijk (BTK) approach along with the scattering matrix formalism to calculate the scattering coefficients. Our results strongly suggest that the TSC is highly dependent on RSOC, magnetization strength and its orientation, and singlet-triplet mixing of the gap parameter. It is observed that NCSC with moderate RSOC shows maximum conductance for a partially opaque barrier in presence of low external magnetic field. For a strongly opaque barrier and a nearly transparent barrier a moderate value and a low value of field respectively are found to be suitable. Moreover, NCSC with large singlet component is appeared to be useful. In addition, for NCSC with large RSOC and low magnetization strength, a giant STMR (%) is observed. We have also seen that the spin current is strongly magnetization orientation dependent. With the increase in bias voltage spin current increases in transverse direction, but the component along the direction of flow is almost independent.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Single phase Fe16N2 is a potential material in building high-performance magnetic writing heads and permanent magnets due to its ultra-high saturation magnetization (MS) and magnetic anisotropy (Keff). However, the poor controllability of phase constituent and low thermostability (decomposed at 200 °C) are big obstacles to its practical applications. In this work, we have devised a novel Fe/Cr/FeN:Co heterostructure to introduce both lattice strain and Co doping for tuning the FeN constituent and enhancing the phase stability synergistically. With effective regulation, the FeN layer can possesse both superior MS (2.4–2.8 T) and high thermostability with standing 450 °C annealing. Furthermore, by first-principles calculations, we reveal that the synergistic regulation on the thermostability is closely related to the solution heat tunability of Fe-N phases. The Fe/Cr/FeN:Co heterostructure may serve as a promising material for constructing high-efficient writing heads, permanent magnets, and other magnetic devices.© 2019In this letter, a novel indirect avalanche event detection is proposed and demonstrated for Single Photon Avalanche Diodes (SPADs) implemented in CMOS 28 nm Fully Depleted Silicon-On-Insulator (FDSOI) technology. This approach is based on the capacitive coupling between the P-well, i.e. SPAD anode, and the transistor channel, separated by the ultra-thin buried oxide. The associated body-biasing effect is used to dynamically modulate the output of a simple voltage divider synchronously with the SPAD activity. A test-chip has been designed, fabricated and characterized to validate the proposed approach. This novel architecture opens the way for innovative SPAD processing circuitry implemented in 3D native CMOS FDSOI.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We studied the magnetic properties of 10 and 20 nm-thick, gold-capped FeRh layers grown on MgO(0 0 1). Whereas the majority of the FeRh film undergoes ferromagnetic–antiferromagnetic phase transition upon cooling, a small fraction of the FeRh system remains in the ferromagnetic state at low temperatures. This residual ferromagnetic phase located at the FeRh/MgO interface exhibits perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. Moreover, in the 10 nm-thick film, a small amount of the antiferromagnetic phase survives to high temperatures above the phase transition and probably originates from the epitaxial strains generated at the FeRh/Au interface.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of the spinel-type Cd1− xCoxCr2O4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 1.0) nanocrystals are systematically studied. Complementary results of the inductively coupled plasma optical emission spectroscopy (ICP-OES) and the dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDX) indicate cations redistribution with increased Cr concentration from the nanoparticle core to the surface. Powder X-ray diffraction (XRD) reveals an obtained single spinel phase of average crystallite size of 7–10 nm that is in consistence with TEM particle size. The lattice constant exhibits a general decrease by incorporating the smaller Co atoms, however its behavior violates Vegard's law. An observed kink anomaly in the lattice constant behavior at x ~ 0.4 is attributed to the cations redistribution and further preferred site occupations. Static magnetization and AC susceptibility measurements reveal competitive magnetic phases in the solid solution nanocrystals. A superparamagnetic state of the noninteracting and single domain CdCr2O4 nanoparticles expands first to higher blocking temperatures at x < 0.4 before it evolves to a core collinear ferrimagnetic (FIM) state with coexisting surface spin-glass freezing. The low-temperature core spiral spin orders survive in the FIM phase. A tentative magnetic phase diagram is presented and discussed in a frame of effects of the type and redistribution of cations as well as emergent uncompensated surface spins on the nearest and next nearest neighbor exchanges in chromite nanospinels.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A method has been developed for manufacturing rare-earth-free MnBi-based magnets capable of filling the existing “gap” between the ferrite and rare-earth permanent magnets. Whereas the earlier approaches relied on sintering of fine and easily degrading single-crystal MnBi particles, the new method achieves refinement of the key α-MnBi phase through melt-spinning combined with appropriate alloying. Modification of the MnBi alloys with Mg and Sb generates a high-coercivity nanostructure of the metastable β' phase. A subsequent compaction at 150 °C produces fully dense materials while converting the β' phase into the stable α phase. Finally, a short annealing at 265–300 °C in a magnetic field of 3 T increases the fraction of the α phase to 97–98% and aligns the c axes of the α crystallites. A maximum energy product (BH)max of 11.5 MGOe and an intrinsic coercivity Hc of 5.6 kOe have been obtained in a magnet with the nominal composition Mn50Bi46.5Mg3Sb0.5. Because the coercivity increases with temperature, the maximum energy product of this magnet is still as high as 8.9 MGOe at 175 °C. Increasing the Sb content to 1.5 at.% increases the Hc to 9.3 kOe, but at the same time inhibits the development of the texture thus decreasing the (BH)max. The addition of Mg was found to increase the c lattice parameter of the α phase resulting in an unusually large ratio c/a ≈ 1.432.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a theoretical study of the electronic, magnetic and electrical properties of double perovskite Mn2FeReO6 with a high Curie temperature so far in magnetic oxides was conducted, using several methods such as Ab-initio and Statistical Physics like Monte-Carlo Simulations (MCS). However, the first principles calculations showed a half-metallic behavior from the density of states and band structures calculation, using PBE + U (apply on the elements Mn, Fe, and Re respectively). The critical temperature obtained by MCS has a great similarity with the experimental results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Heterostructures consisting of ferromagnetic metal and antiferromagnetic insulator have exhibited novel properties in interface exchange coupling, magnetoresistance and spin injection due to their fundamental physics of magnetism. However, as compared with bilayer heterostructures, it is very challenging in experiments to prepare single crystal epitaxial ultrathin superlattices consisting of ferromagnetic metal and antiferromagnetic insulator, where the interface exchange coupling, magnetic order, and electrical transport properties are expected to be greatly modulated due to the multiple interfaces and periodical structures. Here we prepared single crystal epitaxial [Co/CoO]n superlattices consisting of ferromagnetic metal Co and antiferromagnetic insulator CoO by molecular beam epitaxy. It is found that the saturation magnetization of [Co 0.6 nm/CoO 1.2 nm]5 superlattice is robust against temperature increase, which only shows a slight decrease of 1.5% from 5 K to 300 K. Moreover, we found that the longitudinal resistivity and anomalous Hall resistivity of [Co/CoO]n superlattices are strongly modulated by the short-period Co/CoO heterostructure, which are quite distinguished from the electrical transport properties of Co bulk ferromagnetic metal. The [Co/CoO]n superlattices provide a new insight into heterostructures consisting of ferromagnetic metal and antiferromagnetic insulator, which are beneficial for designing future spintronics devices.© 2019 Elsevier LtdA gate-normal tunnel field-effect transistor (TFET) showing negative differential transconductance (NDT) and its design guideline are proposed. The introduction of the source depletion to the gate-normal TFETs leads to negative differential transconductance. It is also confirmed that the NDT of the proposed gate-normal TFET is successfully enhanced by modulating gate-induced source depletion effects.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this article, we propose the universal theoretical expression of the ferrofluid initial magnetic susceptibility, which is valid in a wide range of concentrations. The new formula is tested against experimental susceptibility measurements and compared with the well-known second-order modified mean-field theory (MMF2) [Phys. Rev. E 64, 041405 (2001)] and the extended version of MMF2 theory (MMF2+) [Phys. Rev. E 96, 052609 (2017)]. It is shown that the new formula is more reliable than MMF2 and MMF2 + theories and predicts initial magnetic susceptibility correctly for the polydisperse ferrofluids within a wide range of both temperature and concentration.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we present a model to calculate exchange-bias and coercive fields in a prototype exchange-bias layer system using the in-plane and out-of-plane grain size distributions of the polycrystalline antiferromagnet measured non-destructively by X-ray diffraction and the magnetic history of the exchange-bias system. The model is checked by comparing the computed values with measured ones considering a constant average magnetic anisotropy energy density for all samples and the average exchange coupling energy area density as a parameter for the calculation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Here, martensitic transformation and magnetic anisotropy induced by magneto-annealling are reported in the cylindrical Ni42Co8Mn39Sn11 Heusler alloy as prepared by arc melting & suction casting method. It is found that the magneto-annealing has a significant effect on the magnetic anisotropy in both martensitic and austenitic states, but exhibits a negligible effect on the corresponding transition-temperature, as supported by the effective anisotropy constant which is calculated from the M(H) curves, showing that the magneto-annealing induced anisotropy in Ni42Co8Mn39Sn11alloy can be up to a maximum relative value of ~19.4%.© 2019Magnetic remanence (Br) and coercivity (Hc) of hard magnets play a crucial role in electro-mechanical devices like electrical motors or generators. Elevated remanence ensures high efficiency of the device, and large coercivity protects the magnet from demagnetization. Usually, the increase of one comes at the cost of the other, such that the material optimization has a trade-off character. In this work, we demonstrate that in many electrical machines which use permanent magnets, high coercivity is required mainly at the edges of the magnet. This enables us to design a novel form of a permanent magnet, called a multicomponent magnet, where the sides of the magnet have high coercivity, while the central part is characterized by high remanence. Such multicomponent magnets are realized by two independent methods, namely, conventional high-temperature sintering and Spark Plasma Sintering (SPS). The magnetic and mechanical performances are suitable for applications, and simulation results using the magnetic characteristics of the multicomponent geometry predict its benefit on the device functionality. Further tuning of the geometry of the multicomponent permanent magnets opens avenues for promising applications, particularly in electrical motors for electrical vehicles.© 2019In this study, Ni-Co-P alloy were successfully grown on graphene nanosheets by one-step hydrothermal method to synthesize Ni-Co-P/graphene nanosheets (Ni-Co-P/GNs) composites. The effect of the content ratio of Ni to Co on the morphology and electromagnetic wave absorption properties of the composite were investigated. The results show that the content ratio of Ni to Co has a great influence on the morphology and electromagnetic wave absorption properties of Ni-Co-P/GNs. The content ratios of Ni to Co in the five samples were 9:1, 7:3, 5:5, 3:7, and 1:9, respectively. In terms of morphology, Ni-Co-P is uniformly grown on the surface of graphene nanosheets in a microspherical morphology, and the particle size of Ni-Co-P microspheres increase with the decrease of Ni content and the increase of Co content. And the distribution density on the surface of the GNs is reduced. In terms of EM wave absorbing properties, when the content ratio of Ni to Co is 5:5, Ni-Co-P/GNs exhibits the best EM wave absorbing properties of which the minimum reflection loss is −57.8 dB. When the content ratio of Ni to Co is 9:1, it has the widest effective absorption bandwidth of 3.6 GHz (11.7–15.3 GHz), and the corresponding minimum absorption loss (RL) also reaches −52.8 dB. When the content of Co is much higher than Ni, the electromagnetic wave absorbing properties of Ni-Co-P/GNs become poor. In addition, the best EM wave absorbing performance of Ni-Co-P/GNs at different content ratios all occur at the thickness of around 1.5 mm, which indicates that Ni-Co-P/GNs composites can meet the lightweight requirements of EM wave absorber. Ni-Co-P/GNs have the potential to be the candidates for EM wave absorber. It is of great significance to study the content ratio of Ni and Co for guiding the adjustment of the morphology and electromagnetic wave absorption properties of Ni-Co-P/GNs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, exchange-biased Co/IrMn bilayers were fabricated by dc magnetron sputtering at room temperature. We investigated the misalignment angle between uniaxial and unidirectional anisotropies by measuring in-plane angular dependent ferromagnetic resonance. We found that the misalignment angle decreases with the ferromagnetic-layer (Co) thickness increasing. An asymmetric magnetization reversal phenomenon was also observed due to the misalignment anisotropy. By rotating the sample to a certain angle which respond to the direction of effective easy axis of uniaxial and unidirectional anisotropies, the asymmetry magnetization reversal can be effectively eliminated.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We used the Linear Response Theory to determine the injection of spin current at the interface between a ferromagnetic insulator (FMI) and a superconductor (SC). As quasi-particles (the excited states on the superconductor ground state) cannot penetrate the FMI, there is no electric current across the interface. However, a spin-flip scattering allows quasi-particles to exchange spin with localized electrons in the FMI via magnons. Assuming an imbalance δμ=μ↑-μ↓ between the up and down-spin in the SC, quasi-particles in the most populated state are reflected with spin inversion while magnons are absorbing or emitting at the interface. Depending on the value of δμ, we obtained two different behaviors of the spin current in the phase transition from a superconducting to a normal metal phase. For δμ<1.20Δ(0),Δ(0) is the superconducting gap at zero temperature, the transition is of the second order while for δμ>1.20Δ(0) the spin current presents a discontinuous jump at Tc. The dependence on δμ is also determined as well as the spin conductance.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The metal-insulator transition (MIT) with large change in electric resistance offers the electronic devices great application prospects whatsoever limited by its gap formation mechanisms such as complex electron correlation or magnetic ordering effects. In the past, studies on Slater-type insulators based on antiferromagnetic (AFM)-ordering-induced MIT effect were only limited to high atomic number transition metal oxides (TMO). In this paper, we predict a Slater-type insulator based on spin-web Cu3TeO6 in AFM ground state by simulating the formation progress of MIT using density functional theory (DFT) and the local spin density approximation (LSDA) + U (Hubbard parameter). The molecular bonding relevant with orbital hybridization between Cu-3d and O-2p states are analyzed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we studied the exchange interaction as a function of X thickness for nanocrystalline Pr2Co7 thin films prepared by electron beam evaporation on Si(1 0 0) substrate. A quantitative analysis of static ferromagnetic correlations was realized by two methods: the correlation magnetometry technique (CMT) and magnetic force microscopy (MFM). Using random magnetic anisotropy model, the thickness dependence of magnetic macroscopic properties (exchange interaction energy A, the magnetic correlation length Rc, the anisotropy constant Ka) and magnetic microscopic properties (saturation magnetization Ms, coercivity Hc) were investigated. In addition, many fundamental magnetic parameters were extracted. The exchange interaction energy A decreases from 6.151 × 10-7 for X = 10 nm to 6.132 × 10-7 erg/cm for X = 400 nm. This causes a decrease in the coercivity Hc from 81.2 × 104 to 10.4 × 104 A/m. The soft magnetic properties of these films are due to interaction of magnetization correlations and random magnetic anisotropy. The nanocrystalline Pr2Co7 films can be considered as suitable candidates for basic surveys of magnetization correlations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.To improve the magnetic properties of films applied in spintronic devices, this article explored the microstructure and magnetic properties of Fe nanocrystalline films via annealing and applying high magnetic field (HMF) during different film-formation stages. The results indicate that both annealing and HMF inhibited the sloping and overlapping of the columnar grains in the as-deposited film. Annealing promoted the formation of nanoparticles, while annealing with HMF arrayed the columnar grains along the direction of HMF. A chain arrangement with mixture columnar grains and nanoparticles was observed by combined film-growth HMF and annealing. Different-stage HMFs and annealing improved the particle size but suppressed the stain and surface roughness of the Fe films. The film-growth HMF and annealing both enhanced the saturation magnetization (Ms) of the Fe films. Especially, combined film-growth HMF and annealing obtained 10% larger Ms than Fe bulk. The low disordered structure, average grain size and grain shape anisotropy under film-growth HMF and annealing remarkably decreased the coercivity (by 91%) but increased the remanence ratio (by 67%) of films. However, annealing with HMF did not obviously improve the magnetic properties of Fe films. These indicated that film-growth HMF and annealing provide useful ways to adjust structure and enhance properties.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Experiments have found that the interface layer formed by the interface atomic diffusion in the SmCo/Fe hard/soft exchange-spring system may improve magnetic properties such as the nucleation field and energy product. One-dimensional (1D) analytical micromagnetics can well explain the underlying physics of this phenomenon. In this paper, the magnetic properties of SmCo/Fe exchange-spring multilayers are studied by an analytical micromagnetic approach, focusing on the effect of the interface layer thickness on demagnetization progress. The equations for the angular distribution of the magnetization in all layers and the interface constraint are first derived analytically. The microscopic and macroscopic hysteresis loops, the energy product and angular distribution are calculated, with realistic values for the interface layer thickness considered. It is found that as the interface layer thickness increases, the nucleation field rises, the coercivity increases first and then is almost constant, hence the maximum energy product goes up, while the angular distribution and depinning field decrease. The nucleation field rises with the interface layer thickness for a wide region of the interface exchange energy constant, calculated by a three-dimensional (3D) micromagnetic software (OOMMF), which agrees perfectly with 1D calculated results. Meanwhile, the nucleation field goes up with the interface exchange coupling coefficient for any interface layer thickness. Above results indicate that the existence of an interface layer between the soft and hard layers enhances the exchange coupling interaction between them, which is qualitatively consistent with the experiment in [Appl. Phys. Lett. 91, 072509 (2007)], as confirmed via an in-plane 1D model with interface layer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports the synthesis of pure and doped lanthanum nickel oxide (LaNiO3) nanoparticles (NPs) using auto-combustion route. Various characterization techniques were employed for the investigation of the effect of transition metal doping on the structural, optical, magnetic and frequency dependent dielectric properties of this system. X-ray diffraction (XRD) results were used to calculate the crystallite size and phase composition of the nanoparticles. The well intense peaks in the XRD pattern confirmed the perfect doping of transition metal ions (Fe, Cr, Co) in the LaNiO3 lattice structure. The scanning electron microscopy (SEM) confirmed the porous surface morphology of the nanoparticles. The presence of various functional groups, stretching and vibrational modes were analyzed by the Fourier Transform Infra-Red (FTIR) technique. The energy band gap (Eg) of the synthesized materials were calculated from the absorbance spectra using Tauc's relation. The band gap was observed to increase with doping indicating blue shift. The frequency dependent dielectric properties were measured at room temperature using LCR meter in the frequency range of 42 Hz to 5 MHz. It was observed that the dielectric constant and dielectric loss decreases with the increase in frequency. This decrease in dielectric constant as well as in dielectric loss with increase in frequency may be attributed to decreased polarization at higher frequency. The dielectric behaviour of LaNiO3 based perovskite oxides is explained on the basis of Koop's theory which is based on Maxwell-Wagner two layer model. Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) was used to study the magnetic properties at room temperature and the obtained results confirmed the ferromagnetic nature of all the compositions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.To achieve excellent microwave absorption properties within the frequency range of 2–18 GHz, Zr4+-Ni2+ co-doped barium ferrites BaFe12-2x(ZrNi)xO19 have been synthesized through a sol–gel process and subsequent sintering. Broadened bandwidth of ∼6.9 GHz and strong microwave absorption of −59.3 dB is attained for the ferrite with x = 0.6 and sintering in Ar. The excellent microwave absorption properties are attributed to both the effective shifting of resonance peaks by Zr4+-Ni2+ substitution and the enhanced dielectric loss by generating lattice vacancies through the oxygen-deficient sintering process. This work would be helpful to understand the nature of manipulating the resonance behaviors and further improving the microwave absorption efficiency of traditional ferrite absorbers.© 2019This article presents the development of dot-patterned magnetorheological (MR) elastomers (MREs) via 3D printing technology and their magnetorheological characterization. The 3D printed MR elastomer consists of three different materials; magnetic particles, magnetic particles carrier medium, and an elastomer. In such 3D printing, a controlled volume of MR fluid is encapsulated layer-by-layer within the elastomer matrix. The capability of 3D printing technology has been successfully demonstrated by developing the various dot patterns MR elastomers namely isotropic, anisotropic and configurations inspired from basic crystal structures such as BCC and FCC. The magneto-mechanical properties of such 3D printed MR elastomers (3DP-MREs) are studied using a cyclic compression and through a forced vibration testing. In the presence of a magnetic field, a clear change in stiffness of 3DP-MREs has been achieved. Moreover, the anisotropic behavior of 3DP-MREs has also been demonstrated. The experimental results suggested that the 3D printing method makes it possible to develop various structured MREs even without applying a magnetic field during the fabrication process.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.As an exploration for probable magnetic vortex state in chromium(IV) oxide (CrO2), we performed micro-magnetic simulations on CrO2 nanodiscs. For our simulation studies, we considered CrO2 nanodiscs with 100 nm diameter and 20 nm thickness. After the ferromagnetic positive or negative saturation, when the applied magnetic field along the ±x-axis was reduced, vortex states with its magnetization winding in xy-plane nucleated in the CrO2 nanodisc at ∓12 mT, and annihilated at ∓41 mT. The magnetic vortex states were found to be stable even after reducing the applied magnetic field to 0 mT. Further, switching the magnetic vortex core polarity pointing up to down and vice versa using DC as well as AC magnetic fields has been simulated. The magnetization of the vortex core instantaneously flipped by an applied DC magnetic field of ±138 mT and within 2 ns by applied 6 GHz resonance AC magnetic field with 8 mT amplitude. Furthermore, we present a comparison about the formation, remanent state and switching of the magnetic vortex state in CrO2 nanodisc with that of the most widely studied permalloy nanodisc having same dimensions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The Gd, Nb substituted barium titanate-lithium ferrite composite are synthesized using the normal solid state technique. The structural, morphological, ferroelectric, electric and magnetic properties of doped and undoped composites are investigated using X-ray diffraction, FESEM, P-E loop tracer, dielectric spectrometer and vibrating sample magnetometer respectively. The diffraction peaks in XRD confirm the formation of tetragonal and the ferrite peaks of composites reduce with increases in concentration of Nb and Gd in BL. The FESEM reveals the formation of dense microstructure with low pores and the average grain size of composites increase first and later it decreases when increase concentration of Gd and Nb in BL composites. The unsaturated hysteresis loops of BTG-1 and BTG-2 are representing poor ferroelectricity in the samples. The dielectric constant (ε′) of all composite exhibits high at low frequency which is decreases steeply with increasing frequency upto certain frequency beyond this it becomes constant. The impedance (Z′) of the BL, BTG-1 and BTG-2 composites shows dispersion and also impedance (Z′) of the BL, BTG-1 and BTG-2 composites are decreasing with temperature at low frequency region. The capacitance (Cp') of all composites is decreasing with decreasing temperature. The resistivity (ρ) of BL increases when Gd and Nb doped in it. The magnetic properties of BL are changing as and when Gd and Nb doped in BL composites and these properties of all composites are obtained from magnetic hysteresis loop.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A methodology of rotating the applied static magnetic field on Ni0.8Zn0.2Fe2O4 (NZFO)/PZT-8 magnetoelectric laminate, was introduced to realize 180° phase reversal with constant amplitude, which is invariably required for phase-based communication system, engineering technology and microelectronic devices. Through further decoding the phase information existed in magnetoelectric coefficient, we found that the undistorted 180° phase reversal can be achieved once the applied field was reversed. Moreover, piezomagnetic response can essentially track the magnetoelectric response under optimum bias with the variations of rotation angle, and then the origins can be well explained. Experimental results show that the maximum resonance ME voltage coefficient of +51.72 V/cm Oe and −51.93 V/cm Oe were obtained in angle of θ = 0° and 180°, respectively. These results provide great possibilities for practical applications in ME phase shifters and inverters.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic phase diagrams of MnFe0.6Ni0.4Si1− xGex alloys (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) are explored using powder X-ray diffraction, magnetic and calorimetric measurements. At room temperature, the crystal structure evolves from the orthorhombic TiNiSi-type to the hexagonal Ni2In-type with the increase in Ge. A magneto-structural coupling leading to a first-order ferromagnetic transition is found at 204 K for x ~ 0.5. Differential scanning calorimetry reveals a recalescence-like event at the first cooling across the structural transition. In-field specific heat measurements are used to quantify the giant magnetocaloric effect and show that the latent heat of the magneto-structural transition is less than in closely related MnMX alloys, which leads to sizable transition sensitivity to the magnetic field and finite adiabatic temperature change.© 2019The generation of the paramagnetic radical (Cl2An[rad]3−) in the framework-edge moieties of an Fe-based two-dimensional honeycomb framework with 2,5-dichloro-3,6-dihydroxy-1,4-benzoquinonate (Cl2Ann −), (H3O)2(phz)3[Fe2(Cl2An)3] (phz = phenazine), allowed the formation of long-range magnetic correlations over the network with a relative high magnetic phase transition temperature (Tc) of 128 K. The original compound is a paramagnet with a diamagnetic Cl2An2− linker that significantly separates paramagnetic FeII ions (S = 2), where the [(H3O)2(phz)3]2+ cation is located between layered frameworks. Post-synthetic electron-doping, i.e., reduction in the solid state, using a lithium-ion battery (LIB) system, finally produced (Li+)3(H3O+)2(phz)3[(Fe2+)2(Cl2An[rad]3−)3], which demonstrated a drastic magnetic change.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The crystal and magnetic structures of the perovskite-like, oxygen deficient layered cobalt oxide TbBaCo1.91Fe0.09O5.5 have been studied by means of neutron diffraction at high pressures up to 6.2 GPa in the temperature range 5–300 K and X-ray diffraction at high pressures up to 30 GPa and ambient temperature. The structural anomalies in lattice compression at P = 20–25 GPa were revealed, which could be associated with the insulator-metal transition. At ambient pressure below TN = 300 K a formation of the complex magnetic structure on the Co/Fe sublattice, comprising the G-type antiferromagnetic (AFM) and ferromagnetic (FM) components, was observed. Below T ≈ 150 K the FM component vanished. At T = 5 K a presence of the long range AFM order on the Tb sublattice was also revealed. At high pressures, the FM component has become suppressed and the only G-type AFM order was found for the Co/Fe sublattice. The Néel temperature decreased noticeably down to 275 K at P = 6.2 GPa with a pressure coefficient dTN/dP = −4 K/GPa. The intrinsic mechanisms of the observed pressure-induced magnetic phenomena are discussed.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe role of silver nanoparticles (AgNP) in polyaniline (PANI) as a buffer layer for ITO/AgNP-PANI/PANI/Al solar cell was investigated. It is observed that AgNP-PANI buffer layer significantly improves the electrical parameters such as diode-ideality factor, series-resistance, energy-barrier height, and shunt-resistance as a growing function of AgNP concentration. On-the-other hand oppose to the dark current-voltage response, 0.5% concentration of AgNP in buffer layer shows the most optimum photovoltaic response and cause to increase the power conversion efficiency (PCE) nearly 5 times compared to same solar cell without buffer layer. Such improvements in electrical parameters can be interpreted as the reduction in interfacial trap states as well as enhancement in interfacial dipole-moment by AgNP embedded buffer layer for given photovoltaic device. While, the observed optimum photovoltaic behavior at 0.5% AgNP concentration is may be due to the trade-offs between gains and losses for optical absorption enhancement, self-absorption heating and interface recombination losses respectively. It is also observed that the AgNP embedded PANI buffer layer approach is an effective solution to lower the photovoltaic degradation and hence improves the stability of the photovoltaic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Measurements on the magnetic, electronic transport and thermal properties of the binary YbNi3 alloy are reported. The results are consistent with a magnetic transition at 3.9 K of Ferrimagnetic nature, as established from the AC magnetic susceptibility and the field dependence of DC magnetization and specific heat at low temperatures. Moreover, magnetic and electrical resistivity measurements reveal the presence of an additional magnetic transition around 50 K. The unusual magnetic ground state for Yb compounds is explained by the presence of different inequivalent Yb and Ni crystallographic sites, within an orthorhombic structure of the PuNi3-type (space group R3¯m), with similar temperature scales of the magnetic and Kondo interactions (TK=6K). The results are also compared to those reported for other binary Yb-Ni and RNi3 (R-Rare Earth) alloys.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Phase mixture single layer film with 3-dimensional spatial distribution of internal interfaces between ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic nanoclusters was achieved through the inhomogeneous distribution of oxygen atoms within the ferromagnetic transition metal thin film layer. In the present work, enhanced exchange bias properties of phase mixture single layer film including both exchange and super-exchange couplings within the body of the single layer were investigated under various conditions. The film exhibited same exchange bias field regardless of the layer thickness, which violates the known relationship of inverse proportionality between the exchange bias field and the thickness of the magnetic layer in the conventional ferromagnet/antiferromagnet bilayers systems. Furthermore, it was found that the exchange bias could be set in any direction with respect to the film surface, removing the restriction by the magnetic shape anisotropy of the thin film structure. Low blocking temperature of the phase mixture single layer film could also be overcome with an additional neighboring antiferromagnet layer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of double perovskite La2MnCoO6 (LCMO) by making a composite with ordered double perovskite CaCu3Ti4O12 (CCTO) have been investigated. The composites were prepared by mixing the prior synthesized pure phases of LCMO and CCTO at different mole ratio. We observed that a new low temperature ferromagnetic phase (TC ~ 110 K) with lower magnetization value evolved at the expense of a high temperature ferromagnetic phase (TC ~ 228 K). The latter ferromagnetism is associated with ordering of Mn4+ and Co2+ ions. The new magnetic phase could be correlated to vibronic superexchange interaction between Mn3+–O–Co3+ cations, which would establish a ferromagnetic state. The genesis of this magnetic phase can be attributed to the local structural modulation of LCMO across the grain boundary in contact with CCTO. The lower magnetic moments and low temperature transitions have been attributed to the atomic disorder antiferromagnetic interactions (Mn4+–O–Mn4+ and Co2+–O–Co2+) akin to parent LCMO.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have studied surface anisotropy energy and surface pinning parameters of ferromagnetic semiconductor GaMnAs film by analyzing spin wave resonance (SWR) measurements carried out on this material. The SWR spectra were observed in various polar and azimuthal angular orientations of external static magnetic field with respect to crystal axes of an annealed GaMnAs film with a Mn concentration of 8.0 at.%). The observed SWR spectra were interpreted in terms of a recently developed spherical surface pinning (SSP) theory. As predicted by the SSP theory, our data clearly show the existence of two critical angles in specific resonance configurations. The experimental confirmation of this key prediction of the SSP model brings new insights into the behavior of magnetic surface anisotropy of GaMnAs films. In particular, the agreement of our experimental results with SWR theory shows that, by including higher-order terms with cubic symmetry in the description of the surface free energy, our analysis will improve our understandings of the magnetic surface anisotropy of GaMnAs films.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe gate leakage current in advanced FD-SOI devices are investigated using systematic measurements on multiple geometry devices from 14 nm node. A simple model with an equivalent trapezoidal barrier based on WKB approximation is introduced and verified on the different measurements. The wafer level variability of the leakage current is explored using statistical modelling and the simple model for gate leakage current. The pure physical sources of variation are identified and the scaling trends of the standard deviations of the sources are analysed. The methodology and models have been validated also on 28 nm node devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This work proposes a novel magnetic field sensor based on nanoparticle ferrosoferric oxide (Fe3O4) magnetic fluid for different magnetic field strength from 100 Oe to 160 Oe. Investigations are performed to verify the simulation model and measure the spectral shift for applied magnetic field strength. The results of this task indicate that it has high sensitivity response with the variation of various magnetic field strength (Oe). The reported sensitivity as 83268.46 nm/RIU and 83188.25 nm/RIU for both for X and Y polarization respectively and it will be the maximum sensitivity to the best of knowledge. The other significant of this work that the proposed sensor seem to be as simple structure, low cost, high accuracy and also helpful for microfluidics technology.© 2019The microstructure and magnetic properties of Ta/Ni81Fe19/Ta tri-layer thin films on three types of mono-like cast silicon substrates (flat, upright pyramid and inverted pyramid surfaces) were investigated. Results show that the surface topography structures of the films followed those of the substrates generally. But the thickness of the film on pyramid surface increases from the pyramid tip to the bottom. This is caused by the anisotropical diffusion of incident atoms/ions on the pyramid surfaces during the film growth process. The films on pyramid structured substrates have smaller saturation magnetizations but larger in-plane coercivity than that of on the flat substrate. This should be mainly caused by the non-zero angle between the magnetic field and the substrates as suggested by the angular dependent magnetic properties of the films. The hysteresis loops measured from in-plane to out-of-plane directions show that the coercivities of films on all the mono-like cast silicons are highly angular dependent. A further post-annealing of the films suggests that the magnetic properties of the films are dominantly determined by the surface microstructure of substrates instead of the fabrication conditions. The above results can help better integration of NiFe thin films on mono-like cast silicon based devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In order to improve the magnetic properties of soft magnetic composites (SMCs), the Fe-based amorphous powder cores (AMPCs) based on spherical FeSiBCCr amorphous magnetic powders coated with inorganic-organic (TiO2-epoxy resin) hybrid insulating layer were prepared. The influence of annealing temperature on the soft magnetic properties of the AMPCs has been systematically researched in this work. It was found that the reasonable annealing temperature could increase the permeability and decrease the core loss of the AMPCs. The AMPCs annealed at 480 °C showed a constant permeability of 81.5 up to 10 MHz, and low total core loss of 275 mW/cm3. This study demonstrated that the present Fe-based AMPCs with inorganic-organic hybrid insulating layer have a great promising future in the field of medium and high frequency for the various electronic components.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis study introduces a characterization technique for trap locations (Xt) with considerable trap density along the channel in field effect transistors (FETs). The technique is based on the experimental gate-to-source or gate-to-drain capacitance-voltage (CGS-VGS or CGD-VGD) characteristics of FETs. As the gate bias (VG) increases, the effective channel length (Leff) extends by the increased conductivity of the channel from the source or the drain. Due to trapped charges at the trap sites with a high density of traps along the channel, abrupt change in the C-V characteristics is observed. For the transition gate bias (VG,t) with abrupt change in the C-V characteristics, the dominant trap location (Xt) can be converted through the channel conduction factor (α(VG) to be the effective channel length Leff(VG) = α(VG)∙Lch). We expect that the proposed C-V technique to be useful in non-destructive electrical characterization of lateral trap locations (interface states, bulk traps, and/or grain boundary traps caused by the bias stress and/or fabrication process) along the channel in FETs. We successfully applied the proposed technique to the p-channel poly-Si thin-film transistors (TFTs) for characterization of the grain boundary locations along the channel. As an example for the proposed technique, we applied the technique to a p-channel poly-Si TFT and obtained a dominant trap at XGB1 = 3.13 [μm] from the source and another at XGB2 = 3.70 [μm] from the drain.© 2019Cobalt and nickel ferrites modified with copper iodide were synthesized by the sol-gel autocombustion method. An optimum content of the copper iodide (~0.38 by volume) in the composites of CuI/CoFe2O4 and CuI/NiFe2O4, which leads to the most intensive and maximum values of electrical parameters was identified experimentally. Magnetic and electrophysical properties of CuI/ferrite filled polychlorotrifluoroethylene (PCTFE) composites were examined at low frequencies and in the microwave range at ambient temperature. For polymer composites with modified cobalt ferrite, the values of the real and imaginary components of the complex permittivity at a frequency of 9 GHz are 3–5 times higher than for composites with modified nickel ferrite. The values of electrical conductivity at a frequency of 100 Hz for polymer composites with modified cobalt ferrite are 1–2 orders of magnitude higher than for composites with modified nickel ferrite.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Herein, A first-order antiferromagnetic (AFM) phase transition is observed in SrFe12O19 hexaferrites, the detailed analysis has been investigated systematically by magnetic measurements and confirmed it depend on magnetic field. Interestingly, the original peak appear in variable temperature X-ray diffractions, and structural transition change from space group P63/mmc to P-62c around critical temperature without destroying hexagonal crystal system, which is illustrated to be the driving force to result in first-order AFM transition. Furthermore, An apparent phenomenon of magnetic phase transition exhibits in M(H) curves, some characteristic properties of critical temperature and field are specifically correspond to the one of thermal hysteresis and structural transition, suggesting the strong coupling between structural and magnetic transition.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The multiferroic ceramics of (1-x) Bi0.85Nd0.15Fe0.98Mn0.02O3-x BaTiO3 (x = 0, 0.275, 0.3 and 0.325) were prepared by the conventional solid phase reaction. The crystal structure, microstructure, dielectric, ferroelectric and magnetic properties were systematically investigated. The X-ray diffraction pattern indicates that the structure of Bi0.85Nd0.15Fe0.98Mn0.02O3 is rhombohedral and the space group is R3c. Rietveld refinement shows that with the introduction of BaTiO3, the crystal structure of the material transformed from rhombohedral (R3c) to pseudo-cubic (P4mm). Scanning electron microscopy analysis shows that the average grain size decreases with the introduction of BaTiO3. Temperature dependence of the dielectric constant and the dielectric loss indicate that the introduction of BaTiO3 leads to ferroelectric relaxation. The dielectric constant and the dielectric loss are improved in sync. The leakage current density is reduced by about two orders of magnitude under the electric field of 15 kV/cm. The ferroelectricity and ferromagnetism are greatly improved after the addition of BaTiO3 seen from the polarization hysteresis (P-E) loops and the magnetization hysteresis (M-H) loops.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the effects of A-site cation disorder on the magnetic transition in doped Sr2YRuO6 insulating double perovskites. Disorder is induced by partially substituting Sr for Ca, Ba and La. The relative concentration of the doping ions was carefully chosen in order to warrant a constant average ionic radius equal to the one found in Sr2+. The variance, σ2 = <rA 2> − <rA>2, where rA is the ionic radius of each type of ion occupying the A-site, is the parameter used to quantify disorder. Unexpectedly, in spite of the fact that the magnetic ground state in Sr2YRuO6 is the result of a delicate balance between competitive ferro- and antiferromagnetic interactions with bound lengths and angles playing a relevant role, the magnetic transition temperature is virtually insensitive to disorder, in sharp contrast to the behavior observed for metallic perovskites. This result supports the idea that the leading mechanism suppressing the magnetic transition in Sr2YRuO6 is the deviation from planarity of the RuO2 layers.© 2019Comparison of magnetic properties of nanocomposite and bulk samples of frustrated magnets is carried out. Classical spin ice material Ho2Ti2O7 and probable candidate of quantum spin ice material Yb2Ti2O7 are chosen as the objects of investigation. The nanocomposite samples contain titanate particles with the dimensions less than 50 nm into the interspherical voids of opal matrices. The magnetization curves and temperature dependences of magnetic susceptibility are measured. It has been established that the magnetic properties of bulk and nanocomposite rare earth titanates substantially differ. In the field of 30 kOe the magnetization value in bulk and nanocomposite titanate Ho2Ti2O7 differs not in proportion to the volume fraction of titanate in nanocomposite but several times more. For the bulk titanates Ho2Ti2O7 and Yb2Ti2O7 the Curie-Weiss law approximately holds in the temperature range from 2 to 50 K but the deviations are essential in wider temperature range. Whereas for nanocomposite titanates there is a difference between the temperature dependences of susceptibility measured in the low field of 100 Oe under cooling and heating.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a new physics-based compact model implementation for interface state creation due to hot-carrier degradation in advanced SiGe HBTs. This model accounts for dynamic stress bias conditions through a combination of the solution of reaction-diffusion theory and Fick's law of diffusion. The model reflects transistor degradation in terms of base recombination current parameters of HiCuM compact model and its accuracy has been validated against results from long-term DC and dynamic aging tests performed close to the safe-operating-areas of various HBT technologies.© 2019The effect of calcium treatment on magnetic properties of non-oriented electrical steels was studied. Inclusions, precipitates, grain size and textures of final annealed sheets were analyzed and their effects on magnetic properties of the steel were discussed. Inclusions varied from Al2O3-MnS to Al2O3-CaS-(CaO) due to the reaction of calcium and sulfur after calcium treatment. The number density of (Mn,Cu)S precipitates decreased with the increasing Ca/S in the steel, which also favored to the grain growth of final products. Both of the texture factors of 100/111 and (100 + 110)/111 were increased from 0.22 and 0.34 to 0.37 and 0.50, respectively, due to the increase of the volume fraction of 100 from 8.34% to 15.80% with the increasing Ca/S from 0 to 1. The core loss decreased by 0.25 W/kg with Ca/S increasing from 0 to 1 in the steel, due to less (Mn,Cu)S precipitates and larger grain size. However, the increase in the number density of Al2O3-CaS-(CaO) inclusions caused by calcium treatment increased the volume fraction of 111 fiber textures, having a detrimental effect on the magnetic induction of the steel. Therefore, in order to improve the steel magnetic properties, inclusions of Al2O3-CaS-(CaO) formed after calcium treatment should be removed as much as possible.© 2019The fluorides contain much stronger ionic bonds with F−, instead of the much stronger covalent bonds with O2−, which may break the empirical rule of the contradicting requirements of d-shell electrons in oxide perovskites. However, the magnetic ordering temperatures of fluorides are much lower than room temperature, which strongly limits their practical applications. In this work, BaMnF4 films have been successfully prepared on (0 0 0 1) Al2O3 substrate by pulsed laser deposition. The X-ray diffraction pattern confirms the (0 1 0) orientation of the films, and Mn ions are in +2 valence state from X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy. The clear observation of amplitude and phase hysteresis loops by piezoresponse force microscopy confirms the ferroelectricity at room temperature. Magnetization measurements show the hysteresis loop clearly, together with the bifurcation at 300 K between zero field cooling and field cooling temperature dependent magnetization cures, indicating the Curie temperature higher than room temperature. Furthermore, exchange bias effect is observed below 200 K, and its strength increases drastically below 50 K, due to the magnetization pinned by the spontaneous polarization. The improved ferromagnetism at room temperature in BaMnF4 films might be due to the epitaxial strain from the lattice mismatch between the film and substrate, which provides an efficient strategy to induce room temperature multiferroicity in fluorides.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A fast and cost effective way to determine the anisotropy field (µ0Ha) and the saturation magnetization (µ0Ms) of a hard magnetic compound is crucial to search for new permanent magnet materials. A single crystal in a defined shape is the conventional way to determine µ0Ha. However, the growth of phase-pure single crystalline sample is not always possible for some hard magnetic compounds with poor phase stability. In this study, we propose and demonstrate a fast and cost-effective method for determining µ0Ha and µ0Ms of a main phase in complex alloys. For this purpose, a single grain in trapezoidal prism shape was micro-sampled from bulk heterogeneous (Sm0.8Zr0.2)(Fe0.8Co0.2)11.5Ti0.5 ingot using focused ion beam, from which the magnetization and the anisotropy filed of the ThMn12-type phase in the alloy was determined to be μ0Ms = 1.53 T and µ0Ha = 8.2 T. Electron backscattered diffraction (EBSD) was carried out prior to the lift-out process to select desired region with a known c-axis direction, parallel to the lift out direction in this work. The reliability of this technique was tested by comparing the result with that for the (Nd0.9Dy0.1)2Fe14B single crystal.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report a detailed structural, vibrational, and magnetic properties of mechanically alloyed NiO-(Mg,Ti) (x at.%) [xMg = 0–50 and xTi = 0–35] powders prepared using high-energy planetary ball mill under dry milling condition. Structural studies not only reveal a large crystallite size reduction during milling, but also illustrate an in-situ mechanochemical reduction of NiO with the reaction kinetics changing from gradual to self-sustaining type upon increasing xMg and xTi. This yields a maximum NiO reduction of 95% and 73% for xMg = 50 and xTi = 35 with the formation of nanocomposites of NiO-Ni-MgO and NiO-Ni-TiO2, respectively. As a result, antiferromagnetic behavior of pure un-milled NiO transforms into ferromagnetic one with increasing x. The progress of NiO reduction is demonstrated from both the structural studies and the change in magnetization at room temperature and temperature dependent magnetic properties at high temperatures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic metamaterials have great potential for various future research and commercial applications. In this work, we investigate field-focused magnetic metamaterial for wireless power transfer (WPT) and propulsion of an untethered microrobot. With small dimensions, the operating time of an untethered microrobot is limited by the battery capacity. To perform critical missions for a long time, realizing stable power for the microrobot is a major challenge. We propose a new method of generating both wireless power and propulsion for a tiny untethered microrobot. The method is realized using the cavity mode created on a dynamically reconfigurable metasurface. The cavity effectively enhances the efficiency of the WPT by focusing the fields into the small regions where the receiver is located. Instead of a time-varying magnetic field, which requires shielding to generate a net force, we use a static field for propulsion. We propose a simple method to break the symmetry needed for generating a net force. Experiments are performed using a prototype microrobot having a size of 4 cm × 4 cm and a weight of 5.5 g floating on a water surface. The proposed approach achieves a velocity of 0.85 mm/s under a magnetic field of 0.815 mT and an input power of 1 W. Using the propulsion control, we demonstrate a microrobot navigating to multiple goal locations.© 2019Current studies on magnetorheological elastomers (MREs) are mainly focused on the mechanical properties after curing. However, very few studies have been conducted on the relationship between the viscosity characteristics and the movement mechanism of the magnetic particles during curing. Aimed at the problems above, the movement mechanism of magnetic particles combined with viscosity characteristics under external magnetic field is studied based on the silicone rubber-based MRE during the curing process. First, we prepared silicone rubber-based MREs under different magnetic field conditions and with different volume fractions. Further, we tested and applied the law of viscosity change during the curing of the silicone rubber-based MRE, via numerical simulation using the Stokes equation, and established the corresponding mechanical theory model. Finally, we successfully simulated the movement state of the magnetic particles for magnetic field conditions and particle volume fractions, and discussed the chain formation mechanism of these particles based on the relationship between the viscous and magnetic forces by correcting the Mason number formula.© 2019We show detail study of asymmetric exchange bias originating from asymmetric behaviour of ascending and descending loops of the magnetic hysteresis of Bi2Fe4O9-BiFeO3 multiferroics nanocomposites. Detail magnetometry study reveals the co-existence of super spin glass (SSG) and dilute antiferromagnet in a field (DAFF) at the interface between antiferromagnetic (AFM) BiFeO3 and ferromagnetic (FM) Bi2Fe4O9 in nanocomposite particles. The interfacial spins behave differently for positive and negative fields and result into asymmetric exchange bias, which has been precisely identified by several critical magnetic measurements such as training effect, stop & wait protocol, isothermal remanence (IRM) & thermoremanence (TRM) measurements, and high field relaxation measurement. The DAFF spins, which generate non-switchable unidirectional anisotropy at the complex FM-SSG-DAFF-AFM interface below Vogel-Fulcher freezing temperature of BiFeO3 at 29.4 K, are solely responsible for such asymmetry in exchange bias.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A coupled micromagnetic-Maxwell equations solver is presented which takes into account the effect of eddy currents. The proposed solver relies on a strategy involving two parallel solvers, one for the micromagnetic equation, the other for the Maxwell equations, which allows o take advantage of the linearity of the Maxwell equations. Both the micromagnetic and Maxwell equations portions of the solver use a finite element formulation and they perform time integration in parallel with each other using a variable time stepping scheme. A finite element formulation for the Maxwell equations coupled with a micromagnetic solver is proposed. The resulting sparse linear system is solved using a preconditioned iterative method. Since the system matrix changes depending on the time step used, the preconditioner used is an ILU factorization which is interpolated from a set of pre-computed ILU factorizations, thus avoiding the need to recompute a factorization at every time step. The proposed solver is validated by solving a test problem with a known analytical solution. The performance of the solver is illustrated by solving a realistic hard-disk drive recording head model.© 2019Soft magnetic compacted powder materials represent specific material class with expanding application range. They are intensively studied as there is still large potential for their properties improvement. The paper presents the innovative method of smoothing of surfaces of powder elements suitable for further compaction to create bulk materials exhibiting excellent magnetic properties. The positive impact of described method is documented by comparison of structure of compacts prepared from powders with and without smoothed surfaces. The measured results of magnetic properties – coercivity, total energy losses and complex permeability illustrate the positive effect of mechanical treatment on powder elements applied before pressing procedure.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The statics of the spherical body with magnetizable material (body), partially immersed in the magnetic fluid drop on the horizontal plane in the uniform vertical applied magnetic field are experimentally and theoretically considered. It is shown that the deformation of the magnetic fluid in the applied magnetic field can be used to lift the body above the plane.© 2019We study theoretically, via Monte Carlo simulations on lattices containing up to 1000×1000 spins, thermal creation of skyrmion lattices in a 2D ferromagnetic film with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy and Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction. At zero temperature, skyrmions only appear in the magnetization process in the presence of static disorder. Thermal fluctuations violate conservation of the topological charge and reduce the effective magnetic anisotropy that tends to suppress skyrmions. In accordance with recent experiments, we find that elevated temperatures assist the formation of skyrmion structures. Once such a structure is formed, it can be frozen into a regular skyrmion lattice by reducing the temperature. We investigate topological properties of skyrmion structures and find the average skyrmion size. Energies of domain and skyrmion states are computed. It is shown that skyrmion lattices have lower energy than labyrinth domains within a narrow field range.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Fluorides in general are characterized by big variety of crystal structures, whereas those containing transition metals also often show sizable magnetic properties. The tendency of fluorine to form linear chain structures in many cases results in low-dimensional magnetism. Despite the plethora of magnetic phenomena in fluorides, their magnetoelectric properties are less studied than those of oxides. In the present work we theoretically study the magnetic and magnetoelectric properties of spin-chain compounds CaFeF5 and SrFeF5. The density functional theory is employed for determination of magnetic exchange constants, which are then used in Monte Carlo calculations. The symmetry analysis reveals that CaFeF5 does not show magnetoelectric properties, whereas SrFeF5 is a multiferroic.© 2019The influence of the magnetic field on the thermoelectric figure of merit in semiconducting materials is studied theoretically. One of the important issues is the urgency to distinguish the various conditions under which the magneto-thermoelectric effects can be observed. Isothermal effects take place when there is no temperature gradient in the direction perpendicular to the plane containing the magnetic field and applied temperature gradient. Adiabatic effects occur when there is no heat current in the same transverse direction while a temperature gradient arises due to the Righi-Leduc effect. In this paper we examine how the application of an external magnetic field can vary the figure of merit ZT under isothermal and adiabatic conditions and establish relations among them for both longitudinal and transverse Nernst-Ettingshausen effects. Analytical expressions for the figures of merit are obtained in semiconductors with both non-degenerate and strongly degenerate statistics of charge carriers, in limiting cases of weak and classically strong magnetic fields.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.New-type crystalline-Fe/amorphous-Fe core-shell structures with greatly-improved soft magnetic performance have been synthesized from coating micron-sized Fe powders with amorphous micrometer-thick Fe layers using a facile chemical coating method. Surface-oxidized amorphous Fe layers are uniformly coated upon the surfaces of high-purity Fe particles, which results in their high saturated magnetization (204.6 A m2 kg−1) and high compacted density (7.42 g/cm3) in these crystalline-Fe/amorphous-Fe composites. For metal-based soft magnetic composites used in high-power applications, it is always an important goal to accomplish increased magnetic inductions along with reduced core loss. In the present work, excellent soft magnetic performance containing high inductions, reduced core loss and desirable frequency-dependent magnetic characteristics is successfully achieved in fully compressed crystalline-Fe/amorphous-Fe composites due to higher resistivity of amorphous Fe shells, which promises their latent utilization for high-power metal-based magnetic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the structural, magnetic and electronic properties of a new compound YbFe2As2 based on our experimental studies and spin polarized density functional theory (DFT) calculations. X-ray diffraction measurements on the crushed crystals of YbFe2As2 shows monoclinic unit cell structure. Our electronic structure calculations were based on the Perdew-Burke Ernzerhof method (PBE + U) to treat the strong correlation effects between the 3d and 4f electrons of the Fe and Yb atoms respectively. The calculated partial density of states reveal that the hybridization between Yb-4f and Fe-3d states lead to these strong electron-correlation effects, which could provide a plausible explanation for the breaking of a possible antiferromagnetic order into small regions of ferromagnetic correlations contributed by the Fe atoms. This conjecture seems to be in agreement with our magnetization and electrical resistivity results. The density of states (DOS) reveals a metallic behaviour, which is also in agreement with the electrical resistivity measurements. The electronic band structure of YbFe2As2 depicts that in addition to high dispersion bands in the conduction band region, there are flat bands at the Fermi region composed of As-4p states and Fe-3d states.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric properties in La0.5Ca0.5−xPbxMnO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.2) manganites are considered by both direct and indirect measurement techniques. The ac susceptibility shows that the compounds with low Pb doping exhibit mixture of CE-type AFM ordering and FM phase, while at high Pb doping FM phase is dominated. For samples x = 0 and 0.05, the M-H curves at different temperatures exhibit the magnetization first increases and then decreases with decreasing temperature, indicating the growth of the AFM phase below TN. In the curves for samples x = 0.1 and 0.2, with decreasing temperature the magnetization increases and the FM phase is overcoming at low temperature. The magnetic entropy change (ΔSM) is enhanced continuously with increasing Pb concentration up to x = 0.1, then slightly decreases. The magnetocaloric effect in the vicinity of TC for x = 0.1 and 0.2 was investigated by the direct field-induced adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad). The results of the direct method show the absolute values of obtained ΔTad are almost the same for both samples (0.62 and 0.53 K under 1.96 T for x = 0.1 and 0.2, respectively). The outcomes demonstrate that doping by Pb is a promising material for the magnetic refrigeration.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Thickness (d) and surface roughness (σ) of material thin films are inseparable characteristics engendered by the same deposition process. Both are crucial parameters for magnetic properties (p) of real mesoscopic scale thick ferromagnetic films. When condition (d/σ) < 102 is validated, sorting out samples of a series is possible only by means of τ = (d/σ) geometrical ratio which enables their coherent comparison. Their magnetic properties (p) are thereby expressed in a single function form p = f(τ). Application of that approach to a series of nanostructured Ni electrodeposits reveals that these samples are consistent with the ratio range 1.23 ≤ τ ≤ 82.00 concurring with the reported description. Their coercivity (Hc) and magnetic domain size (w) behave in agreement with their respective predicted general curve profile when d is substituted by τ, which depicts quite well the similar role of both parameters. The study of these properties evolution using the normalization model indicates a discontinuity in the magnetism of the investigated samples. Bloch magnetic domains (MD)B are associated with mixed domain walls (DWN + DWB) below a critical position (τ0 −1) ≈ 0.35, while Néel domain walls (DWN) coexist with mixed magnetic domains (MDB + MDN) beyond that position.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Doping of rare earth (RE) ions can influence the magnetic properties in spinel ferrites, whereas the phase formation plays an important role. Therefore, it is important to choose the RE ions for doping content to get more benefit. In this work, synthesis of Yttrium doped Co-Zn ferrites were carried out by the method of solid state reaction. Co0.25Zn0.75YxFe2−xO4 (CZYF) is the general formula of the studied ferrites where x = 0.00, 0.02, 0.04, 0.06 and 0.08. The structural properties of CZYF ferrites were studied by X-ray diffraction (XRD) technique and further refined by Rietveld method. XRD and Rietveld refinement approved that all the CZYF samples are cubic spinel structure and the lattice parameters were increased with increasing Y content. The variation of grain growth and surface morphology of CZYF samples were studied from SEM images indicated that the average grain size increased from 1.412 µm to 2.341 µm. Frequency dependent magnetic properties (complex permeability, loss factor) were observed in the range of 100 Hz to 120 MHz at 300 K (room temperature). The initial permeability of CZYF ferrites are found to decrease with the increase in Y content. This decrease nature of permeability is related to the increase of porosity and average grain size. At three different temperatures (80 K, 200 K and 300 K), we measured saturation magnetization, coercivity and remanent magnetization. The mentioned properties make CZYF ferrites applicable for use as a soft ferrite.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Giant magneto-impedance (GMI) investigations comprising ZnO thin layers have received considerable attention for sensitive sensor applications. Herein, a ZnO thin layer with different thicknesses (92–503 nm) was deposited on surface of Fe-based amorphous ribbon (FeCoSiB) using RF magnetron sputtering. The GMI response and magnetic field sensitivity were investigated. While GMI% increased continuously up to the thickness of 223 nm, further increasing the ZnO thin layer thickness decreased GMI response. The GMI response and magnetic field sensitivity increased from 156% and 1.21%/Oe to 237% and 2.91%/Oe for bare Fe-based ribbon and ZnO thin layer/Fe-based ribbon/ZnO thin layer sandwich structure (223 nm in thickness), respectively. X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and atomic force microscopy (AFM) were used to characterize ZnO-enhanced structural parameters. A vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) was used to indicate the role of the ZnO thin layer in the GMI response. Similar increasing and decreasing trends of GMI% as a function of thickness were observed in transverse permeability of samples as determined by VSM. Our results provide a simple approach to achieve high GMI response and magnetic field sensitivity by using a dielectric sandwich structure.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a friction apparatus was developed to explore the magnetization phenomenon of pure iron during the friction process. A series of sliding-friction tests were carried out to study the tribo-magnetization effect under lubrication and non-lubrication condition. Furthermore, the correlation between the distribution and variation of magnetic domains and the metallographic structure of the materials were analyzed. And a model of tribo-magnetization was built. The results showed that the tribo-magnetization phenomenon under non-lubricated conditions was more significant than that under lubricated conditions because of the interaction between two interfaces which affected the range and deformation degree of the area of influence beneath the sliding surface. It was found that the generation of plastic deformation beneath a sliding surface is the principal source of magnetization.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Novel stable ultra-thin phases of europium oxide are investigated by means of state-of-the-art first principles calculations. Total energy calculations show that single layers of EuO2 and Eu(OH)2 can be stabilized in an octahedrally coordinated (1T) atomic structure. However, phonon calculations reveal that although both structures are energetically feasible, only the 1T-EuO2 phase has dynamical stability. The phonon spectrum of 1T-EuO2 displays three Raman active modes; a non-degenerate out-of-plane A1g mode at 353.5 cm-1 and two doubly-degenerate in-plane Eg modes at 304.3cm-1. Furthermore, magnetic ground state and electronic band dispersion calculations show that the single layer EuO2 is a metal with net magnetic moment of 5μB per unitcell resulting in a half-metallic ferrimagnetic behavior. Moreover, robustness of the half-metallic ferrimagnetic characteristics of EuO2 is confirmed by the application of electric field and charging. Single layer 1T-EuO2, with its stable ultra-thin structure and half-metallic ferrimagnetic feature, is a promising novel material for nanoscale electronic and spintronic applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroic 0.7Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3-0.3NiFe2O4 ceramics were prepared by sol-gel method with various temperatures ranging from 950 to 1100 °C. The influence of annealing temperature on structure, morphology, dielectric, magnetic and magnetoelectric coupling effect was investigated. The refinement of x-ray diffraction data and the thermogravimetric-differential thermal analysis indicated the coexistence of perovskite and spinel phases with annealing temperature above 950 °C. Increasing grain size in surface morphology measurement was closely related to the increasing annealing temperature. Enhancement in dielectric properties was observed with increasing annealing temperature. The room-temperature ferromagnetic properties were also detected with saturated magnetic hysteresis loops under different annealing temperatures. Finally, magnetoelectric coupling effect was confirmed in the samples. The possible factors for room-temperature multiferroic properties were discussed with increasing annealing temperature. This study showed that annealing temperature could evidently affect the multiferroic properties in 0.7Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3-0.3NiFe2O4 solid solution.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanocomposite materials are of interest for applications including power inductors and transformers, where a combined large bandwidth, low loss, and relatively high permeability are desired. This work demonstrates the fabrication of nickel/iron-oxide nanocomposites, up to ~3 μm thick, and permalloy/iron-oxide nanocomposites, up to ~1 μm thick, using an electro-infiltration process, whereby the voids in an iron-oxide nanoparticle film are filled with electroplated metal. Measurements show that the magnetic nanocomposites exhibit hybrid magnetic properties: modestly high permeability and saturation attributed to the metal matrix phase, but with an increased bandwidth attributed to the iron-oxide inclusion phase. At 10 MHz, the nickel/iron-oxide nanocomposite material exhibits a relative permeability of ~23, with a loss tangent around 0.1; the permalloy/iron-oxide nanocomposite exhibits a relative permeability of ~136, with a loss tangent around 0.15.© 2019Iron-chromium based alloys are known as potentially high damping corrosion-resistance alloys with good mechanical properties and workability. The main structural mechanism of enhanced damping in the Fe-Cr alloys is magneto-mechanical coupling due to reversible and irreversible motion of magnetic domain walls, which is also linked with magnetostriction of the alloys. In order to create new complex alloyed materials with improved functional properties, it is important to study experimentally the basic relation between structure, mechanical and functional properties of binary Fe-Cr alloys. In this paper, we used cold-rolled sheets of a high-purity Fe-18Cr alloy to study the correlation between heat treatment, grain size, damping capacity and magnetostriction. Damping capacity of the samples was measured at bending using forced vibrations by means of dynamical mechanical analyzer Q800 TA Instruments and using free-decay of bending vibrations in different structural states after various annealing treatments. The results show that the optimal properties for Fe-18Cr binary alloy were achieved after annealing of cold-rolled sheets at 840 °C. Homogenizing by annealing at 1200 °C for 3 h before the final heat treatment shifts the annealing temperature for maximal damping capacity to 900 °C with approximately the same value of damping capacity and decreases mechanical properties due to the significant increase in the grain size. Slow cooling of the samples after high-temperature annealing causes a marked decrease of the impact toughness, reduction of damping capacity and an increase in the coercive force of the Fe-18Cr alloy. This effect can be explained by spinodal decomposition of the α-solid solution and formation of local zones enriched with Cr or Fe.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A series of nanocrystalline Zr1-xMnxO2 (0.005 ≤ x ≤ 0.02) samples were prepared by chemical route and further annealed at 750 °C for 5 h. All the prepared samples are in mixed phase of monoclinic and tetragonal form. However, the tetragonal phase of zirconia increases with the increase in Mn concentration and suppresses the monoclinic phase of zirconia. The bandgap the nanocrystalline samples decreases with the increase in Mn concentration, which confirms the substitution of Mn in zirconia matrix. The saturation magnetization increases with the increase in Mn concentration in nanocrystalline Zr1-xMnxO2. The occurrence of room temperature ferromagnetism in nanocrystalline Zr1-xMnxO2 is attributed due to the presence of oxygen vacancies and also due to the lattice distortion of ZrO2 by Mn substitution. The development of oxygen vacancies and the lattice distortion is well observed in Raman and Photoluminescence spectra. Again, the suppression of monoclinic phase and enhancement of tetragonal phase is the mechanism for the creation of oxygen vacancies for which the ferromagnetic contribution enhances with the increase in Mn concentration in nanocrystalline Zr1-xMnxO2.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Spin-transfer torque (STT) magnetic tunnel junctions (MTJs) in the sub-10-nm size range have shown enhancement in energy efficiency. This improved switching energy efficiency means a longer spin relaxation time, a corresponding stronger spin accumulation, and a resulting lower switching current density. This improvement in switching energy efficiency stems from a reduction in damping as the device size is reduced. This can be seen by a reduction in the damping constant in the Landau-Lifshitz Gilbert (LLG) equation. This term can take a range of values, and this range depends on the different contributions from the surface relative to the bulk. Specifically, at such small sizes the damping constant differs from the bulk damping constant. In this study, a detailed equation defining this surface-to-volume relative contribution was developed. This theory was tested through simulations involving a sub-10-nm cobalt cube utilizing the Object Oriented Micromagnetic Framework (OOMMF). These simulations showed a longer spin relaxation time with a decrease in device size (defined by side length) as well as a reduction in switching current density with a decrease in side length. This reduction in switching current density was approximately logarithmic versus volume, surface area, and side length. Moreover, in the sub-5-nm range, this reduction was nearly linear with respect to side length. These results agree with theoretical predictions and they are aligned with the experimentally demonstrated quantum size effect.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the impact of fluorination on structural, electronic and magnetic properties of phthalocyanine molecules by employing density functional theory (DFT) within generalized gradient approximation (GGA) and hybrid functionals (PBE0, HSE06). The GGA based calculations reveal that fluorinated transition metal phthalocyanine (FMPc) molecules retain planar D4h symmetry. Mn in FMnPc molecule is found to be in intermediate spin state (3 μB). As the occupation of 3d orbital (n) increases from 5 (FMnPc) up to 8 (FNiPc), magnetic moment reduces smoothly from 3 to 0 μB, owing to consequent increase in minority spin population. Hybrid functionals (PBE0, HSE06) largely retain the magnetic state as obtained from GGA. However, PBE0/HSE06 bring about noticeable changes in electronic structure, namely increase in HOMO-LUMO energy gaps as well as reduction of 3d state contribution in frontier orbitals. These results are in good agreement with available experimental data. We further highlight the impact of fluorination on electronic structure: spin state of phthalocyanine molecules remains largely unaffected by fluorination. However, unlike the case of H, states arising from F contribute to density of states near Fermi level, which can be exploited for practical applications such as transport or gas sensing.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic hydrogels are interesting nanomaterials able to change their shape and temperature if exposed to external magnetic fields. Thanks to these features, which originate from the microstructure of magnetic hydrogels (magnetic nanoparticles tied together through polymeric chains), these substances have several applications in technological fields and biomedicine. Hydrogels are able to absorb and release large amounts of water, which makes them eligible materials for drug delivery. This feature is made even more attractive in cases where the delivery/release can be externally controlled. Controlling the system using external magnetic fields requires keystone processes like modeling and simulation. In this paper, the properties of the system have been analyzed using a 2D microscopical simulation of a suitable physical model. Experimentally, the behavior of the system with and without the application of external magnetic fields and its dissipative effects have been characterized. Specifically, we analyze the change of size and temperature of an hydrogel system as a function of the external magnetic field frequency, thus providing a fundamental tool for developing magnetic substances suitable for specific applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Selective laser melting (SLM) and subsequently recrystallization annealing was employed to additively manufacture Ni-15Fe-5Mo Permalloy magnetic shielding structures for applications. The experimental works of SLM process optimization were completed to obtain the tailored parameters for acquiring samples with a high relative bulk density of 99.86% and a relatively low surface roughness. The hierarchical and anisotropic microstructure characteristics and their effects on the mechanical and soft magnetic properties of SLM-printed and subsequently annealed samples were focused on to explain some mechanism issues in terms of the comparisons on those before and after the anneal. The recrystallization annealing did not significantly alter the preferred orientations of the crystallographic textures. The SLM-printed microstructural evolution, including residual-stress relief, grain boundary density variation, elimination of cellular substructural walls, and composition re-homogenization, contributed to the promotion of the synthetical magnetic characteristics in the Ni-15Fe-5Mo Permalloy. The anisotropy characteristic of as-printed and subsequently annealed microstructures induced the typical phenomenon of magnetic anisotropy exhibiting when the magnetic induction was changed corresponding to the SLM building direction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Recent developments in high-magnetic field/high-frequency electron magnetic resonance (HMF-EMR) techniques offer improved capabilities for determination of the spin Hamiltonian (SH) parameters, including the fourth-rank zero field splitting (ZFS) parameters (ZFSPs) for spin S̃ = 2 systems. However, the density functional theory (DFT) and ab-initio methods provide predictions of the ZFS energies from which usually only the second-rank ZFSPs are obtained. Here we present an analytical method for determination of the fourth-rank ZFSPs from the ZFS energy levels for S̃ = 2 ions at orthorhombic sites. This enables assessment of their significance and determination of the dominant parameters. Applications of this method for Fe2+ in [Fe(H2O)6](NH4)2(SO4)2, Fe2+ in forsterite (Fe2+:Mg2SiO4), and Cr2+ ions in (ND4)2Cr(D2O)6(SO4)2 and Rb2Cr(D2O)6(SO4)2 indicate an important role of the fourth-rank ZFSPs. The analytical formulas derived by us may be applied to other 3d6 and 3d4 (S̃ = 2) ions at orthorhombic sites in various hosts for better modeling of spectroscopic and magnetic properties of these systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Skyrmion sequential elements are proposed and demonstrated. A skyrmion latch is implemented in a single device where skyrmion motion is controlled by spin-orbit torque and voltage-controlled magnetic anisotropy in a magnetic nanotrack with gradient anisotropy. Micromagnetic simulations have been carried out to verify the feasibility of the latch function and to study device performance. The results indicate that the proposed skyrmion latch have potential advantages, including a small device footprint, a tunable switching speed, and low power consumption. Furthermore, a master-slave skyrmion flip-flop can be simply implemented by cascading two skyrmion latches to be further used for constructing a skyrmion register. This work provides a guideline to design spintronics for sequential logic circuits.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In order to get the wide band absorbing and shielding composite, a novel gradient honeycomb absorber was designed as the polyethylene terephthalate glycol (PETG) was matrix and carbonyl iron particles (CIPs) and flaky Cu were the absorbents. The composite was fabricated by 3D printing and the morphology was obtained by the scanning electron microscopy. The permittivity and permeability of the absorbing wire were tested with the vector network analyzer. Using the transmission and reflection method, the parameters of the columnar and gradient honeycomb elements were simulated. The equivalent parameters were calculated based on the Maxwell-Garnett mixing rule, then the simulated and calculated results including reflection loss (RL) and shielding effectiveness (SE) were compared, the mixing rule was effective to calculate the equivalent parameters and the shape factor was the key parameter. Using the interpolate method on the shape factor, the permittivity and permeability of honeycomb with random size could be calculated. Finally, RL and SE were optimized using the genetic algorithm in which the structure lengths were the variables. The result indicated that the structural composites had an excellent absorbing property (minimum RL −28 dB) in 8–12 GHz and SE was larger than 20 dB. As the incident wave was oblique, the absorbing property was also excellent (minimum RL −35 dB@35°), the angle range was 0–70° with RL less than −10 dB. It could be implied that the novel gradient honeycomb was a potential good absorbing structure.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Thermally assisted spin transfer torque (STT) switching of hybrid memory stacks with a low Curie temperature (TC) CoPd/Pd multilayers (MLs) and high TC Co/Pd MLs were investigated. Current-perpendicular-to-the-plane giant-magneto-resistance (CPP-GMR) structures with a stack of [Co/Pt]6/Cu/[Co/Pd]M/[CoPd/Pd]N (M + N = 3) were fabricated. The intrinsic critical current density (Jc0) and thermal stability factor Δ of the hybrid memory layer were evaluated from the STT-switching of the CPP-GMR. Jc0 and Δ were found to be almost independent of the pillar diameter, and the effective reversal size contributing to Δ was found to be much smaller than the physical pillar diameter. At room temperature, slight decreases of Jc0 and Δ were confirmed with increasing the thickness ratio of the low TC MLs (N) in the hybrid memory layer. At high temperature of ~150 °C, Jc0 and Δ were found to significantly reduce, suggesting the thermally assisted STT switching by using the low TC/high TC hybrid memory layer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In a theoretical part of the paper a macroscopic model, based on quantum approaches, of a deformed magnetically soft ferromagnet is proposed for the α-iron crystal sample. The statistical transition to a multidomain sample is carried out and dynamical equations of the Bloch type are obtained. In the framework of modelling approximations and the Runge-Kutta numerical method, a solution of dynamic equations in the form of a complete hysteresis loop is obtained. The dependences of hysteresis loop parameters on the crystal tetragonallity and the relative deformation are studied. In an experimental part the magneto-elastic effect (the Villari effect) in the steel ER70S-6 sample is investigated. A comparison of model results with experimental data is shown a qualitative and quantitative agreement. Also a series of experiments are carried out to research magneto-plastic effects in the steel 9MnSi5 sample. It is found the effect of a mechanical erasure of a magnetic memory of a metal (MMM). An application of the theoretical model to research the obtained MMM effect is shown a quantitative agreement with experimental data.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the metamagnetic-like transition in the triple layer ruthenate Sr4Ru3O10 by means of neutron diffraction from single crystals. The magnetic structure of the compound appears to be determined in a complex way by the two substructures of inequivalent ruthenium ions. At Tc = 105 K the system has a sharp transition into a ferromagnetic state along the c-axis which is driven by the ruthenium atoms in the central octahedra of the triple layers whereas the substructure of the outer ruthenium atoms tend to align in the ab plane achieving an antiferromagnetic order at the metamagnetic transition T* ~ 50 K. Below T* the strong anisotropy along c prevails, the outer ruthenium tend to align along the c-axis and the in-plane antiferromagnetic order disappears. This finding confirms the delicate balance between antiferro and ferromagnetic couplings in the (Sr,Ca)n +1RunO3 n +1 family of compounds, and proves the layer dependence of the magnetic anisotropy in Sr4Ru3O10.© 2019Fe-P-Si alloys with two levels of phosphorous (0.11 and 0.33 wt%) were prepared through the wrought alloy route. The as-cast alloys were forged and rolled at high temperature (>1000 °C) followed by stack hot rolling up to ~0.5 mm thickness. The alloys were further solutionized at 1000 °C/1h followed by aging at 500 °C/30 min and characterized for microstructural, magnetic and electrical properties. X-ray diffraction studies revealed that the alloys are of single phase α-Fe. From electron backscattered diffraction (EBSD) analysis, it was inferred that the grains were equiaxed with no retained austenite phase in the alloys. Transmission electron microscopic (TEM) and Electron Energy Loss Spectroscopy (EELS) showed the presence of Fe3P/Fe3(P,Si) nanoprecipitates whose volume fraction increased from 1.17% to 2.08% as P content (wt.%) of the alloys increased from 0.11 to 0.33%, with a corresponding increase in precipitates size from 1.7 nm to 2.6 nm. To rationalize the influence of various microstructural parameters on the magnetic and electrical properties of the alloys, we have used the existing theoretical models. As a result, it is now possible to estimate the relative contributions of the microstructural features to the various electrical and magnetic properties. Low core loss (~186 W/kg) combined with low coercivity (47 A/m) and high saturation magnetization (2.1 T) obtained in high P content (0.33%) Fe-P-Si alloy makes it a promising material for automotive applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The present work investigates the static and dynamic magnetization behaviour of Co-Zn nanoferrites and optimizes the magnetocrystalline anisotropy and spin relaxation time. The CoxZn1-xFe2O4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) magnetic nanoparticles are synthesized by pH-controlled co-precipitation method. The Le Bail structural refinement of X-ray diffraction patterns confirms the single phase formation with negligible synthesis dependent site inversion. The room temperature static dc magnetization study shows a continuous transition from hard ferrimagnetic CoFe2O4 to soft and weakly magnetic ZnFe2O4, which has been successfully explained with Yafet-Kittel model. Furthermore, approach-to-saturation analysis gives effective magnetocrystalline anisotropy of 1.45 × 104 J/m3 and lowest anisotropy field of 1.3 kOe for x = 0.4. Next, the dynamic magnetization is studied with Electron Spin Resonance spectroscopy. The lineshape analysis gives highest g-value of 3.88 and lowest spin-relaxation time (T2) of 4.86 × 10−12 s for x = 0.4, which is in agreement with static magnetization study. The optimized magnetocrystalline anisotropy and lowest spin-relaxation time for Zn0.4Co0.6Fe2O4 make it a good candidate for use in different biomedical applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Manganese (Mn+2) doped spinel cobalt ferrites nanoparticles (NPs) having composition (MnxCo1−xFe2O4 where x = 0.2, 0.4, 0.6 and 0.8) were synthesized by sol-gel precipitation method. The structural, dielectric and magnetic properties were characterized via X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier-transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), LCR meter, and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The average crystallite size (D) was found to increase from 10.79 nm to 14.18 nm with increasing the Mn+2 doping ratio from (0.2 to 0.6) then decrease to 9.95 nm with further increasing of Mn+2 to (0.8). FTIR spectrum confirmed the formation of the spinal structure of ferrite, where the main observed bands (416.64–459.07 cm−1) assigned to the octahedral complexes and (513.08–574.81 cm−1) assigned to tetrahedral complexes. The dielectric properties of samples found to be decreased with increasing the doping ratio. While the hysteresis loop obtains from VSM indicated the formation of soft magnetic material and the saturation magnetization decrease from 56 emu g−1 (Mn+2 = 0.2) to 38 emu g−1 (Mn+2 = 0.8).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the possibility of growing on outward bent rigid substrates to create an in-plane magnetic anisotropy in Ga-rich FeGa layers grown in the diffusive flow that in principle are expected to be magnetically isotropic in the sample plane when using non-bent rigid substrates. In this work, samples were grown by sputtering in the diffusive regime in rigid outward bent substrates, i.e. substrates under tensile stress. After the growth of the layers, the release of the substrate promotes a compression in the sample plane confirmed by x-ray diffractometry. This compression strain induces a uniaxial magnetic anisotropy axis in the sample plane perpendicular to the mechanical stress as expected for a material with a positive magnetostriction. Moreover, a value of 73 ppm for the magnetostriction constant has been inferred from the magnetic anisotropy measurements in the as-grown layer. A thermal treatment at a moderate temperature of 300 °C partially release the strain, but it does not modify the magnetic anisotropy either in magnitude or direction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An investigation of the synthesis of the YCo2Fe2B-type phase and its magnetic properties is presented. As-rapidly quenched specimens produced from YCo2Fe2B alloy were amorphous and did not show high coercivity. A specimen with the YCo2Fe2B phase was obtained by annealing of the amorphous specimen. The specimen had a Curie temperature of 610 K but did not show high coercivity. When Y0.75Sm0.25Co2Fe2B alloy was used, a specimen with the (Y,Sm)Co2Fe2B phase was obtained by annealing of the as-rapidly quenched amorphous specimen. The resultant specimen exhibited a high coercivity of 8.90 kOe with a Curie temperature of 630 K.© 2019Grain-oriented electrical steel containing 6.5 wt% Si is a promising soft magnetic material with very low iron losses for high-frequency applications. However, due to the ordered phases formed in the microstructure, the room-temperature ductility (formability) of this material is extremely low. It is essentially not possible to process this steel by conventional cold rolling. In this study, an Fe-6.5 wt% Si grain-oriented electrical steel was processed through strip casting (also known as twin-roll casting), hot rolling, warm rolling, cold rolling, primary and secondary annealing. The effect of hot rolling reduction rate (12–40%) on the microstructure, crystallographic texture and magnetic properties of the final steel sheets was investigated. The results showed that hot rolling increased the area fraction of the Goss ({1 1 0}〈0 0 1〉) grains, reduced the grain size, and promoted the precipitation of fine second-phase particles. After warm rolling, cold rolling and primary annealing, the recrystallized microstructure was the finest if the hot-rolling reduction rate was the highest (40%). After secondary annealing, the steel with the largest hot rolling reduction rate (40%) showed the most apparent abnormal grain growth, leading to the formation of the Goss texture. As a result, the magnetic flux density and the magnetic Barkhausen noise (MBN) also showed the largest values among all the samples. On the other hand, those with lower hot-rolling reduction rates (12–32%) showed no or less abnormal grain growth during secondary recrystallization, which resulted in lower magnetic flux density and weaker magnetic Barkhausen noise. Increasing the amount of hot rolling reduction was thus able to promote abnormal grain growth during secondary recrystallization, and optimize the magnetic properties of the steel.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Temperature dependent magnetization study on single phase orthorhombic Ruddlesden-Popper manganite Ca3Mn2O7 evidences antiferromagnetic (AFM) ordering below 123 K. Field-dependent magnetization M(H) depicts off-centered hysteretic loops below ~110 K—confirming the existence of both weak ferromagnetism (WFM) and exchange bias, whose development upon cooling is examined in detail. WFM is attributed to the formation of uncompensated-spin-clusters within the AFM-matrix, stabilized by the high-anisotropy in the manganite, favoring Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya (D-M) interaction. Temperature dependence of an evaluated average canting angle from the M(H) loops provides a quantitative measure of the WFM-evolution. Dielectric measurements exhibit magneto-conductive effects concurrent to the WFM-onset. Temperature dependence of the low-frequency/dc-limit of Jonscher-fits to the conductivity isotherms confirms the presence of relatively more-conductive clusters, embedded in the insulating-bulk. Nyquist impedance-analysis of complex impedance reveals two relaxations, yielding dual magnetic-field effects; the lumped circuit parameters feature anomalies across the magnetic phase changes.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Two-dimensional (2D) ferromagnetic semiconductors with robust magnetism are urgently desired for nanoscale spintronics applications. However, it remains a challenge to realize them experimentally. In this work, we proposed intriguing 2D p-orbital ferromagnetic semiconductors X2NO2 (X=Ca,Sr) monolayer with 3μB magnet per unit under O surface termination using first-principles calculations. The Ca2NO2 monolayer is bipolar magnetic material (BMS) with spin-flip gap 0.24 eV, and the Sr2NO2 is half-semiconductor (HSC) with spin-flip gap 0.31 eV, which is large enough to prevent the spin-flip transition. The Curie temperature can reach to 206 and 239 K, respectively, due to the superexchange interaction between N- ions. The values are much higher than the boiling point of liquid nitrogen (77 K) and comparable to that of the reported ScCl monolayer. Moreover, the half metals are obtained via carrier doping for both the Ca2NO2 and Sr2NO2 monolayers. In addition, the half-metallic completely spin-polarized direction of BMS Ca2NO2 monolayer can be controlled by carrier doping type. Furthermore, the magnetism of X2NO2 monolayer is derived from p orbital, without the involvement of conventional transition metals or rare earth atoms. This is advantageous for high-speed and long-distance spin-polarization transport. These results suggest that the X2NO2 monolayer can develop spin field effect transistor for information processing and storage, and open opportunities for designing new ferromagnetic semiconductors.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Based on our works [1–4], we report the magnetic and hysteretic properties of graphene-based Janus materials namely, pure and doped zigzag graphone nanoribbons, hexagonal core/shell graphene-like nanoribbon, and graphyne core/shell nanoparticle, within the framework of both Monte Carlo calculations and mean field theory. We have reported the effects of the Hamiltonian parameters on the magnetic and the thermodynamic quantities of the systems. The total magnetization, the susceptibility, the specific heat, and the hysteresis curves, as well as the critical temperature and the compensation behavior, that is of crucial importance for technological applications such as thermo-optical recording, are studied. A number of characteristic behaviors are found, such as the existence of two new and non-classified magnetization profiles in addition to the Q-, P-, and N-types of compensation behavior and the occurrence of square, single, and triple hysteresis loops which exhibit different step effects and various shapes.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Basing on ab initio calculations, we investigate the electronic structures and magnetic properties of triazine-based graphitic carbon nitride (gt-C3N4) sheets with adsorbed transition metals (TM). TM atoms energetically prefer to be adsorbed on the vacancy site. Adsorptions lead to magnetic moments of 1.0, 2.0, 3.0, 3.0, 2.0, and 3.0 μB for Sc, Ti, V, Mn, Fe, and Co, respectively, which originate from the cooperation between ligand field theory and Hund's rule. Adsorptions result in different types of magnetic behavior that vary with TM. The system remains semiconducting but with reduced band-gap upon the adsorption of Cr or Ni atom. The adsorption of V and Co atoms can transform semiconducting gt-C3N4 into magnetic metallicity and half metallicity, respectively, with an estimated Curie temperature (TC) above room temperature. Sc, Ti, Fe, and Mn adsorption induce anti-ferromagnetism in the host gt-C3N4. These findings indicate adsorptions of TM lead to various magnetic characters that has potential application in future spintronics.© 2019In the present work, equiatomic FeNi and FeCo magnetic nanowires (NWs) have been electrodeposited in Anodic Aluminum Oxide (AAO) membranes with 70 nm pore size. The role of the electroactive species Ni2+ and Co2+ on the anomalous codeposition behavior in thin films and nanowires has been discussed and compared. Field Emission Gun-Scanning Electron Microscope (FEG-SEM), X-ray diffraction (XRD) and Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (VSM) were used to evaluate the morphology, composition, crystalline structure and magnetic properties of the materials. SEM-FEG analysis showed very homogeneous NWs lengths for both FeNi and FeCo NWs, Energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDS) analysis revealed a stable composition along the FeCo NWs and a change in composition along the FeNi NWs. The XRD patterns indicate the predominance of the bcc structure for both alloys. Except for additional peaks of fcc phase found on FeNi alloy, the same crystalline bcc structure is observed after annealing treatment of 300 °C during 20 h. TEM analysis confirmed the ordered character of the bcc FeCo alloy. The hysteresis loops show an easy magnetization direction parallel to the wires due to the predominance of the shape anisotropy. The coercive field (Hc) of FeNi NWs increases with the length of the wires while that of FeCo NWs decreases. The annealing treatment doesn't affect the magnetic properties of FeNi NWs, whereas a remarkable increase in the coercivity of the FeCo NWs is observed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Effect of Ag inclusions on magnetic properties and magnetic circular dichroism (MCD) of Fe3O4 nanoparticles (NPs) in the mixed system of Fe3O4 and Ag NPs in dependence on the relative concentration of the components is presented. The samples were synthesized by the thermal decomposition of the mixture of constant concentration of Fe(NO3)3·9H2O and varied concentration of AgNO3. The synthesized powdered samples consisted of Fe3O4 and Ag NPs located very close with each other, and in the most cases the Fe3O4 NPs were bordered with the Ag nanocrystals. The Ag introducing in the samples does not effect, practically, in the Fe3O4 NPs morphology and size distribution. At the same time, Ag NPs in the powdered samples cause a decrease in the Fe3O4 NPs magnetization and shift of the blocking temperature to lower temperatures, both approximately proportional to the Ag concentration. Most significant changes are revealed in the MCD spectra in the energy region of 1.2–2.2 eV. We have discussed the influence of the Ag NPs on the MCD spectra features in terms of the charge-transfer electron transitions.© 2019The effective manipulation of skyrmion motion by magnetic field gradients introduces the technological possibility with skyrmion as information carriers for spintronic applications. Recent studies indicate that the skyrmion Hall effect can be suppressed in a synthetic antiferromagnetic (SAF) multilayer structure driven by a spin polarized current. In this paper, an analytical model based on Thiele equation is developed to describe the properties of a skyrmion pair in a SAF structure driven by a magnetic field gradient. Combining the analytical solutions with the micromagnetic simulation results, we demonstrate the essential dynamic features of the skyrmion pair as a function of AF coupling and magnetic field gradients, revealing that the skyrmion pair motion could be suppressed by increasing the interlayer antiferromagnetic coupling.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.It is well known from theoretical models that a ferromagnetic system should undergo a disorder induced phase transition in its magnetization reversal mode at a critical disorder level RC, below which, the reversal is characterized by the appearance of the so-called spanning avalanche. The critical regime above RC is characterized by power-law distributed avalanche sizes and durations, whose exponents determine the universality class to which the magnetic system belongs. The most commonly studied among these is the size-exponent τ, which most theoretical models estimate to be in the range 1.3–1.5. However, experimental determinations of this exponent fall in a much wider interval, between 0.98 and 1.8, well outside the domain of the models. This discrepancy, which is far more common for 2D systems, has not been effectively addressed for more than a decade. In this article, we have determined experimentally the size-exponent ‘τ’ in 2D Permalloy(Ni80Fe20) thin films by measuring Barkhausen noise through the disorder-induced transition using planar Hall effect. This was compared with our simulations of the random field Ising model, an established nucleation model, with a modification that better represented the experimental condition. Our findings indicated that large ‘τ’-values would arise in samples with very low disorder levels well outside the critical regime, where the statistics were non-universal. In such samples, our measured ‘τ’ increased monotonically with temperature, which indicated a decrease in the effective disorder with temperature according to the nucleation models. This temperature dependence could be understood in the light of an extended Néel-Brown model which we had studied earlier, that had predicted a decrease in the width of switching field distribution with increasing temperature. In this context, we also used micromagnetic simulations, which helped to understand the dependence of coercivity on disorder, a property not predicted correctly by the Ising model.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Fe1.82Si0.18@Al2O3 soft magnetic composites (SMCs) have been fabricated by NaOH oxidation combined with subsequent spark plasma sintering (SPS). The microstructure and generation mechanism of Fe3O4 coatings on the surface of FeSiAl powders have been investigated systematically. Effects of oxidation time on the magnetic properties also have been revealed. In addition, the displacement reaction between Fe3O4 and Al during SPS process results in the formation of Al2O3 insulation layer, leading to a remarkable variation of the magnetic performances of SMCs. The increased NaOH oxidation time had positive influences on the electrical resistivity, frequency stability of permeability and core loss. The saturation magnetization first decreases then increases with the increase of oxidation time. These above results indicate that the fabrication method in this paper creates a way to form Fe3O4 nanoparticles and Al2O3 insulation layer, which enhance the magnetic performance of FeSiAl SMCs and will facilitate the design of efficient magnets in the future.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hybrid core-shell nanowires (NWs) with nickel as core and Co doped BiFeO3 (BFCO) as shell were synthesized by employing a two-step methodology. A noticeable exchange bias Hex phenomenon has been observed which clearly demonstrated the antiferromagnetic functionality of BiFeO3 shell material, was also observed. Both coercivity and exchange bias has shown slight increase after Co doping in BFO. This increase might be due to reduction in domain sizes of ferromagnetic material between layers of core-shell nanowires. At lower temperatures, the super-paramagnetic contributions play very important role to contribute to the overall magnetic behavior of core-shell nanostructures. It has been observed that easy magnetization axis was aligned along the NWs’ axis because of dominant shape anisotropy. Angular dependence of coercivity Hc has shown the coherent mode of magnetization reversal mechanism. This two-step methodology can be used to fabricate other similar hybrid nanostructures which can further be investigated for their possible implementation in device applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Several previous works have shown that (Lenaite) AgFeS2 has a chalcopyrite structure with I-42d space group, but several information about its magnetic and optoelectronic behavior remain still unknown. The study of these properties is the main objective of our work, which is based on several theoretical approaches. The determination of the most stable magnetic ordering and the study of structural and elastic properties and that of most magnetic and optoelectronic properties have been carried out with FP-(L)APW + lo method, which is implemented in WIEN2k code. Our results have shown that AgFeS2-Chalcopyrite is an antiferromagnetic material with the same magnetic ordering as CuFeS2. The structural results are in good agreement with the previous results. The study of elasticity has shown that this compound is mechanically stable in its chalcopyrite structure and the analysis of the directional dependence of Young's modulus has shown its large elastic anisotropy. The electronic properties have been studied taking into account the strong correlation between the electrons of 3d-Fe states and their spin-orbit coupling (SOC). The obtained results with these two corrections have shown that AgFeS2 is a semiconductor with an indirect band-gap. Néel temperature has been estimated by mean-field approximation (MFA), which is based on the estimation of the exchange coupling parameters (Jij). These latter were calculated by SPR-KKR method and TN found value is relatively very high in comparison with that of CuFeS2. Electronic transitions and optical absorption have also been studied respectively by the determination of the dielectric function and the study of the absorption coefficient variations as a function of energy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The microstructures and soft magnetic properties of Co66Fe4Mo2Si16B12 amorphous tape wound core were systematically investigated. The phase composition and corresponding structure evaluation of Co66Fe4Mo2Si16B12 amorphous ribbon after annealing at various temperatures were identified firstly. In particular, at 758 K the microstructure of the ribbon is primarily composed of Co2B, Fe2B and β-Co phases. With the temperature approaching to 768 K, the new phases α-Co and CoSi appears. When the temperature increases to 778 K, the mixed phase combination of α(Co) + β(Co) + Co2B + Fe2B + CoSi exists along with an apparent nano-crystallization. The soft magnetic properties of tape wound core assembled by Co66Fe4Mo2Si16B12 amorphous ribbon were then studied at annealed temperature from 713 K to 753 K. At 723 K, we found the permeability is highest with a maximum value of μm = 1.675 × 103, and the coercive force is lowest with a minimum value of 0.134 Oe. The magnetization curve and the hysteresis loop of established tape would core annealed at 713–753 K remain almost unchanged. Finally, the relation between frequency and magnetic permeability and quality factor were carefully examined at different annealing temperatures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Heat transfer in ferromagnetic stretching flow by moving surface considering a magnetic dipole is elaborated in current research. Rheological relations of non-Newtonian (Williamson) fluid are taken into account for modeling and analysis. Chemical reactions (homogeneous and heterogeneous) are considered for elaboration of mass transportation characteristics. Governing flow expressions are reduced to ODEs by implementing transformation procedure. The well-known bvp4c scheme is used for nonlinear systems computation. Influences of sundry parameters like ferrohydrodynamic interaction parameter, Weissenberg number, homogeneous-heterogeneous reaction parameters, Prandtl number and heat generation parameter on velocity, thermal and solutal fields in addition to coefficient of skin-friction and Nusselt number are displayed via graphs and tabular values. It is revealed that velocity and thermal fields have opposite behavior for ferrohydrodynamic interaction parameter. Besides the heat transportation rate is improved subjected to larger Prandtl number.© 2019Noble metals are generally used as electrodes in resistive switching devices. In this work, ferromagnetic metallic NiFe is used as top electrode on NiO films, and stable unipolar resistive switching (URS) behavior has been observed after a forming process. By inserting a thin Al2O3 layer between NiFe and NiO, URS persists with increasing the thickness of Al2O3 layer up to 20 nm. The URS behavior can be attributed to the formation and rupture of metallic Ni filaments in NiO layer, which penetrate through the thin Al2O3 layer, and have been confirmed by the observation of anisotropic magnetoresistance. With further increasing the thickness of Al2O3 layer up to 30 nm, forming free bipolar resistive switching (BRS) behavior is observed, which is due to the oxygen vacancy accumulation and dissipation at the interface because the thick Al2O3 layer blocks the penetration of Ni filaments. By inserting a thin Al2O3 layer with thickness below 20 nm, the distribution of the reset voltages in URS is significantly narrowed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report the magnetic properties of metal–organic frameworks (MOF) of perovskite-like [(CH3)2NH2]M(HCOO)3 (M = FeII, CoII) and niccolite-like [(CH3)2NH2]FeIIIFeII(HCOO)6 synthesized by a solvothermal route. The [(CH3)2NH2]FeII(HCOO)3 exhibits two magnetic transitions at the temperatures of ~19 K for the canted weak ferromagnetic ordering and of ~10 K for the blocking of single-ion quantum magnet due to phase separation, while the [(CH3)2NH2]CoII(HCOO)3 shows one magnetic transition at the Curie temperature (TC) of 14.9 K for the canted weak ferromagnetic ordering. Below the TC values, spin-flop transition is observed in the magnetization curves of the [(CH3)2NH2]M(HCOO)3 crystals with the critical magnetic field of about 104 kOe and 90 kOe at 10 K, respectively. Multistep-like jumping magnetization transitions induced by high magnetic field are observed in the [(CH3)2NH2]FeIIIFeII(HCOO)6 in a temperature range between 10 and 25 K, indicating a complex spin configuration different from that in the [(CH3)2NH2]M(HCOO)3 MOFs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the grain growth, lattice strain, order behavior and electronic structure of FeSiAl powder were studied. Only the disorder bcc α-Fe peaks were exhibited after milling, and as the ball milling time increases, the internal strain rose and the grain size decreased. When the anneal temperature reached 773 K, we could see the obvious DO3 superlattice peak at (1 1 1), (2 0 0) and (3 1 1) plane. At the same time, the internal strain decreased and the grain size rose with the increment of annealing temperature. Annealing at temperatures above 773 K results in a long-range order (LRO) parameter about 0.67–0.76. This high LRO parameter further supports the observation of the formation of order DO3 structures. Furthermore, we found that the interaction between Fe and Si, Al atoms can decrease magnetic moment of the Fe atom. By the calculation of the empirical electron theory of solids and molecules, we confirmed that grinding process could change the electronic structure and the bond length difference ΔD of powder milled for 20 h had the smallest values.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This study aims to develop a computational method for characterizing the magnetic and dielectric properties of ferrite nanoparticle modified polymeric nanocomposites for mobile device applications. The spinel structured nickel zinc ferrite (Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4) nanoparticles were synthesized using chemical thermal treatment. The nanocomposites were fabricated using epoxy matrix dispersed with the nanoparticles through ultrasonic agitation mixing. The effects of the ferrite nanoparticles’ shape, concentration, and distribution on the magneto-dielectric properties of the nanocomposites were systematically investigated by computer modeling. The isothermal magnetization curves of the nanocomposites have been experimentally measured for validating the numerical prediction. The effective relative permittivity and permeability of the nanocomposites predicted by numerical method were compared with the results of analytical methods (classical mixing rules of Maxwell-Garnett rule and Bruggeman rule).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic thin films with a layer sequence of Si|CoSi2|Sm-Co were grown by direct sputter deposition at elevated temperatures, through interfacial diffusion between Si (1 0 0) substrate and the overlying Sm-Co layer. HR-TEM analysis revealed the occurrence of CoSi2-interfacial layer close to the Si-substrate surface, with controllable thicknesses of ~20 and 35 nm at deposition temperatures: 450 and 500 °C, respectively. XRD studies confirmed the crystallization of Sm2Co17 and SmCo5 magnetic phases accompanied by the other phases such as CoSi2 and SmCoSi2 due to the intermixing of Co and Si -atoms at higher deposition temperatures. The measured coercivity values are found to be increased from 8.7 to 11.6 kOe at higher CoSi2-layer thickness. The angular-dependent hysteresis measurements demonstrated a distinct isotropic and uniaxial magnetic anisotropy characteristics for the Sm-Co films consisting of 35 and 20-nm thick CoSi2 interfacial layers, respectively and the associated magnetization reversal mechanisms are discussed using the Stoner-Wohlfarth model. The temperature coefficients of remanence (α) and coercivity (β) were determined from the temperature-dependent hysteresis curves. The Sm-Co films consisting of 35-nm thick CoSi2-layer exhibited a better thermal stability with ‘α’ and ‘β’ values of 0.35 ± 0.05%/°C and −0.13 ± 0.02%/°C, respectively. The results of present study provide splendid opportunities for exploiting the potential of CoSi2 as an under layer, for growing the Sm-Co films towards high-temperature applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Transmission of electromagnetic waves through (Fe0.82Ni0.18)/V superlattices has been studied at frequencies from 27 to 38 GHz. For the superlattices with antiparallel ordering of magnetization of neighbor ferromagnetic layers the microwave giant magnetoresistive effect is observed. The thickness of Fe0.82Ni0.18 layers which have reduced magnetization is estimated from comparison of magnetization obtained from magnetic measurements and from ferromagnetic resonance results in microwave transmission. For (1 0 0)MgO/[Fe0.82Ni0.18(4ML)/V(7ML)]100/Pd(6 nm) superlattice in frequency range from 36.4 to 37 GHz the influence of spin-wave resonances has been found. Explanation is given for these resonances based on solution of the dispersion equation for the waves in ferromagnetic metallic plate and calculation of transmission coefficient in magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Amorphous Co69Fe4Cr4Si12B11 glass-coated microwires after heat treatment in the temperature range of 250–600 °C during 30 min were investigated. Changes of microstructure, phase composition, fracture morphology, and giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) properties were shown. It is confirmed that a significant increase in the GMI effect was possible not only due to the structural relaxation, but also as a result of phase transformations at the temperature close to the onset of crystallization. It is shown that at the very initial stage of the nucleation of Co nanocrystals, a sharp increase in circumferential diagonal GMI component was observed, a further increase in the amount of the crystalline Co phase was accompanied by degradation of this effect. The most significant GMI ratio was obtained for microwires annealed at 430 °C. At 450 °C and above, an irreversible decrease of the GMI ratio took place. It was caused by the formation of Co crystals, decrease in amount and composition change of the amorphous phase during primary and secondary crystallization. At the final stage of the Co crystals segregation the secondary crystallization of the residual amorphous phase occurred with formation of a metastable τ-phase with a Me23B6 type structure. Thermal stability of the τ-phase was analyzed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The nonmagnetic In3+ doping in the hexagonal SrFe12− xInxO19 (x = 0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, 0.5, 1 and 2) permanent magnet increases the saturation magnetization at 300 K with the highest value up to 73.87 emu/g at x = 0.5, and decreases it with x > 0.5. The coercive field keeps almost the same for x ≤ 0.2, but it decreases with x > 0.2. The Curie temperature linearly decreases from 740 K for x = 0 to 610 K for x = 1.0, and decreases at a much lower rate to 592 K for x = 2.0. The XPS, FT-IR and UV–vis spectra are carried out to characterize the relations between the magnetic properties and the structure. The In3+ ions preferentially occupy the tetragonal 4f1 site, deduced from the xrd refinement and the FT-IR spectra. It is consistent with the increasing magnetization by the In3+ doping. Oxygen vacancies exist in the compounds. The In3+ doping and oxygen vacancies deteriorate the coercivity, while Fe2+ ions are in favor of a high magnetocrystalline anisotropy. The energy band gap of SrFe12− xInxO19 increases with the increasing In3+ doping from 1.75 eV for x = 0 to 1.87 eV for x = 1.0, but that of x = 2.0 decreases to 1.79 eV. It reflects that oxygen vacancies in x = 2.0 play a function on the energy band gap.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ba2MUO6 (M = Co, Ni) alloys are investigated to understand their electronic structure, magnetic character together with thermoelectric behavior using ab-initio formulism. The variations in physical properties by changing M-site atom are analyzed. The crystal structure of Ba2MUO6 (M = Co, Ni) alloys is found to be face-centered cubic (Fm-3m) with lattice constant of 0.845 nm for Ba2CoUO6 and 0.841 nm for Ba2NiUO6. The band structure and density of states convey half-metallic ferromagnetic character of Ba2CoUO6, while Ba2NiUO6 exhibit ferromagnetic semiconducting nature. The electron filling in the d-orbitals of Co and Ni determines the overall electronic and magnetic character of alloys. The obtained structural parameters and magnetic moment are consistent with experimental results. The variation in various thermoelectric parameters with temperature is also examined. The highest value of power factor obtained for Ba2NiUO6 and Ba2CoUO6 is 54.92 μW cm−1 K−2 and 9.25 μW cm−1 K−2, respectively. The semiconducting nature in both spin orientations favors Ba2NiUO6 for thermoelectric applications. The computed elastic constants along with other elastic parameters suggest that these alloys are mechanically stable and possess ductile character.© 2019Herein we initiate a comeback to the arc melting technique to produce MAX-phase solid solutions. Bulk samples of (Cr1−xMnx)2AlC MAX-phase with X = 0, 0.025, 0.05 and 0.1 were synthesized and studied by means of X-ray diffractometry, scanning electron microscopy in combination with energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy. Samples were established to be homogeneous with an incorporation of Cr7C3, AlCr2 and Al2O3 secondary phases which is slightly increasing with the raise of the dopant concentration. Manganese successfully intermixes in the MAX-phase structure due to the effect of the high-energetic plasma during the melting process. SQUID magnetometry identified the co-existence of ferro- and antiferromagnetic interactions with the latter prevailing in high temperatures and being attributed to the MAX-phase. Magnetic state transitions were observed at approximately 4 K and 5 K for doped samples which was associated with the presence of the marginal amount of ferromagnetic Mn-based secondary phases. The negative component of magnetoresistance was observed in highly doped samples at low temperatures that is likely due to the influence of ferromagnetic secondary phases as well. Transport properties measurement revealed the satisfactory quality of the produced samples.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents modeling of an integrated design of an electromagnetic driven spherical motion generator with multi-layer structure. An analytical method to calculate the complex magnetic field distribution of the rotor array by combining the equivalent charge model and transformation method is developed, upon which torque model is further established analytically by using the moment principle. Both the analytical magnetic model and torque model are validated with the numerical finite element method by Ansoft Maxwell and experimental measurements. With the model, two different designs of the electromagnetic driven SMGs are analyzed to illustrate the application of the developed model.© 2019One challenge of stress measurement by using Magnetic Barkhausen noise (MBN) is to build correlation model between MBN and micro magnetic characterization of the material. In particular, it highly requires a quantitative evaluation for micro-macro magnetic properties characterizing under the stress impaction. In this study, a correlation model between domain wall (DW) motion and MBN under tensile stress is established and promoted. Optical flow (OF) traces motion of magnetic domain images, which can quantify the status of DW motion during magnetization process. When applied field is in stress direction, tensile stress aligns the magnetic domains parallel to the stress direction and makes coercive field decrease. This can make a phenomenon vary of DW motion as well as MBN signal. The average velocity of DW motion (OF value) is proportional to MBN signal under tensile stress. Root mean square (RMS) and mean value are extracted from both DW motion velocity (OF value) and MBN signal to quantitatively analyze the changes under tensile stress to quantify the correlation between micro and macro magnetic parameters. In addition, the correlation model between DW motion and MBN is quantitatively analyzed in different locations to evaluate the repeatability of the correlation, as well as the effect of microstructure on MBN and DW motion under the tensile stress. The correlation coefficient of RMS and mean value show the highly correlation between DW motion and MBN, which in turn sheds deep understanding the micro-macro property-physic mechanisms. The proposed work has potential for interpretation of the statistical properties of MBN under different tensile stress by studying DW motion, which can be further applied for enhancing accuracy on stress measurement.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The martensitic transformation (MT) and magnetocaloric properties are investigated in melt-spun Mn50Ni31.5Co8.5Ti10 all-3d-metal alloy ribbons fabricated at different wheel speeds (WSs), 15, 20, and 25 m/s. All these ribbon samples reveal a coexistence of the predominant 5-layer modulated (5 M) (monoclinic, space group P2/m) martensite and a small amount of non-modulated (NM) L10 structure (tetragonal, space group P4/mmm) martensite at room temperature (RT), implying the MT temperature is above RT. With the increase of WSs from 15 to 25 m/s, the structural and magnetic parameters, such as average grain size, unit cell volume, MT temperature, and magnetic entropy change, decrease. However, it is worth noting that from 20 to 25 m/s, the reduction becomes much more sluggish or even almost stagnate in comparison with that from 15 to 20 m/s. Large effective refrigeration capacity ~79.4 J kg−1 is obtained in sample with 20 m/s under μ0ΔH = 0–5 T, indicating that these ribbons could be the potential candidate for magnetic refrigeration. The origins of manipulation in MT by WSs in these ribbon samples are discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.(1−x)CoFe2O4/xCoFe composites with x = 0.3, 0.4, 0.5, 0.6 were synthesized by using a hydrothermal method. The face-centered cubic structure CoFe2O4 adheres to the polyhedral CoFe surface due to strong magnetic interaction to form a composite material. The effects of compositions of the CoFe2O4/CoFe composites on their microwave absorption properties were studied. The sample with a composition of 0.4CoFe2O4/0.6Co4Fe6 showed optimal reflection loss (RL) −58.22 dB at 12.96 GHz, and the matching thickness was 1.45 mm. Meanwhile, it had an effective absorption frequency range of 11.12–15.28 GHz (RL < −10 dB), with a bandwidth of 4.16 GHz, covering the X-band and Ku-band. The enhanced microwave absorption properties of the composites, as compared with the two components, are attributed to the strengthened natural resonance and the increased impedance matching. Most importantly, by adjusting their composition, the CoFe2O4/CoFe composites can be used as microwave absorbers at C, X or Ku bands. Consequently, these CoFe2O4/CoFe composites are promising candidates that can be used to design effective microwave absorbers over wide frequency bands.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Net-shaped hexagonal barium and strontium ferrites with desirable shapes have been successfully fabricated by the extrusion-based three-dimensional (3D) printing. The influence of milling and calcination conditions on magnetic properties of as-printed hexaferrites are systematically investigated by vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM). The typical ferromagnetic hysteresis loops are observed, revealing that the resulting bulk ferrites derived from the preliminary milled powders are prefect hard magnetic materials. In particular, it is clear that the saturation magnetization is very close to the theoretical values after calcinations. Moreover, the coercivity can be effectively enhanced in the range of 4–6 kOe upon thermal treatment, which is a much higher value compared to ferrites prepared by the conventional ceramic processing. More importantly, the maximum energy product can be significantly improved to as high as around 2.5 MGOe for the 3D-printed strontium ferrites. This is attributed not only to fine precursor powders subjected to mechanical milling, but also to the optimized annealing for grain growth with sizes near the critical single domain limit. Overall, the fabrication of bulk ferrites derived from milled powders using the 3D printing is attractive for the large-scale applications, and may also pave the way for some specific applications, for instance, magnetic separation for nanoparticles.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Based on density functional theory combined with Keldysh non-equilibrium Green's function formalism, we investigate the spin-polarized transport properties of planar four-coordinate Fe complexes-based molecular devices with carbon nanotube bridges and electrodes. The results show that these systems can exhibit perfect spin filtering, large giant magnetoresistance and low-bias negative differential resistance effects with the external magnetic field modulation. The underlying mechanism is analyzed by spin-resolved transmission spectra, projected density of states, and spatial distributions of corresponding molecular projected self-consistent Hamiltonian orbitals. On the basis of these intriguing transport properties, we further design basic spin molecular Boolean logic gates, such as YES, NOT, AND, NAND, XOR, NXOR, OR and NOR logic gates.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Oxygen vacancies derived resistive and magnetic switching, was demonstrated in facile solution-processed Au-Co3O4 nanocomposite thin films, in terms of optimum Au content. The metal element introduced is a unique way to create the optimum amount of oxygen vacancies in the dielectric films even in the absence of electrochemically active electrodes. Compared with pure Co3O4 based device, the RRAM device with Au additives showed bipolar switching behavior with uniform Set/Reset voltages, enhanced endurance of >103 cycles, and stable time-dependent resistances up to 104 s. The introduction of Au nanoparticles caused the oxygen vacancies based confined filament growth for optimum switching uniformity and stability. Results showed that Ohmic conduction was dominant at LRS and Schottky emission was dominated at HRS of the devices. Temperature dependence and magnetization change of various resistance states revealed that resistive and magnetic switching was due to the formation and rupture of conductive filaments of Au atoms confined oxygen vacancies with the conversion of cation valence states (Co2+ and Co3+). The present study suggests that Au-Co3O4 nanocomposite thin films have a potential for future multifunctional electromagnetic integrated device applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have recently applied the magnetic field and temperature dependence of magnetic entropy change as a probe of the magnetic states of a single crystal of Ca3Co2O6 to establish a more comprehensive magnetic phase diagram for this exotic system. The results are consistent with the spin-density wave description of the ground state and indicate the suppression of the modulated state in favor of a ferrimagnetic up-up-down arrangement of the spin chains with the application of a moderate field. We demonstrate, in this study, that the features of the static magnetic phase diagram are preserved when the grain size of Ca3Co2O6 is reduced to 440 nm (below the maximum c-axis correlation length of ~550 nm in Ca3Co2O6), although the polycrystalline materials show a non-saturating behavior, rounded steps, and reduced magnetization when compared to the single crystal. Our new finding of the multiple low-temperature magnetization steps in the 440 nm sample, together with conflicting reports concerning such steps in nanostructured samples, suggests that correlations in the ab plane are more important than correlations along the c-axis in the appearance of the plateaus. The relaxation processes in the system are studied through the decay of remanent magnetization, ac susceptibility, and Argand diagrams. The introduction of grain boundaries in Ca3Co2O6 weakens the slow-dynamic state, widens the low-temperature distribution of relaxation times, and lowers activation energies within the Arrhenius-like relaxation regime.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The soft magnetic composites (SMCs) with high saturation magnetic flux density (Bs) and low core loss (Ps) have great potential in power electronics. In this work, the insulating SiO2-Al2O3 layer was prepared by a hydro-thermal method to coat on the surface of the carbonyl iron powders (CIPs). Then, the coated CIPs were heterogeneously distributed in the reduced iron powders (RIPs) to fabricate the intergranular insulated SMCs. The scanning electron microscope (SEM) images and elements analysis confirmed that the surface of the CIPs was covered by a thin insulating layer forming a core-shell structure, and the Si-O-Al bond was detected by FTIR spectra. The resulting samples were annealed at 450 °C in N2 atmosphere to eliminate the residual stress and improve magnetic properties. The annealed. SMCs containing 25 wt% CIPs@SiO2-Al2O3 have optimum magnetic properties with a low Ps of 106.9 W/kg and a highly approximate Bs of 1.28 T (measured at 500 Hz). Compared with the conventional SMCs, the addition of the coated CIPs can suppress the adverse effect of the nonmagnetic coating layer on magnetic properties; meanwhile, the coated CIPs distributed in the RIPs can reduce the Ps. This work provides a promising approach to the development of SMCs with low hysteresis loss and optimum magnetic properties at low frequency.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We herein investigate the novel magnetic interactions, such as exchange bias (EB), memory effect (ME) and magnetic relaxation dynamics (MRD) in NiO and 10 wt% Gd doped NiO nanoparticles synthesized by hydrothermal process. X-ray diffraction studies showed crystallization of face-centered-cubic structure for both NiO and Gd-doped NiO nanoparticles. Transmission electron microscopy analysis revealed a spherical morphology for both samples and their mean particle sizes were estimated as 24.5 and 10.3 nm for the pure and Gd-doped NiO nanoparticles, respectively. SQUID magnetic measurements demonstrated the occurrence of large EB coupling: 1.04 and 0.767 kOe; and enhanced coercive fields: 1.75 and 1.27 kOe, for the pure and Gd-doped NiO nanoparticles, respectively. The size-dependent magnetic properties such as, EB, ME and MRD is found to vanish at the average blocking temperature and interestingly, these properties set-in on cooling the samples at 5 K under applied field of 5 kOe. The surface defects such as oxygen vacancies and the Gd2O3 impurity phase played a significant role in determining the EB and ME characteristics of NiO nanoparticles.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Pure cobalt ferrite nanoparticles were synthesised by hydrothermal method. Cubic spinel structure and improved crystallinity was confirmed by X-ray diffraction analysis. Morphology and average particle size within thenanorange were identified by SEM and TEM. EDX confirmed the presence of Fe, Co, and O elements without any impurities. FT-IR analysis confirmed the presence of vibrational bands in the range of 581–590 cm−1 and 424–468 cm−1 ascribed to Fe–O and Co–O bonds, respectively. The presence of five Raman active modes confirmed the cubic spinel-type structure. Optical study revealed the influence of higher annealing temperature on the band gap; it decreases from 2.60 to 1.53 eV. The dielectric constant, dielectric loss and ac-conductivity were found to varywith increasing frequency range. The shifting of cations between tetrahedral (A) to octahedral (B) sites and vice versa was revealed by Mossbauer spectroscopy. The observed sextets proposed that CoFe2O4 nanoparticles are highly crystalline and magnetically ordered. With increasing annealing temperature, both saturation magnetization and remanence increased, while the coercivity was reduced, which is due to the transition from single domain to multidomain on crossing the critical size of ~40 nm. The Cyclic Voltammetry (CV) test of nanoparticles annealed at 800 °C (S3) revealed excellent specific capacitance at low scan rate.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We numerically examine the role of Fano resonance for enhanced magneto-optical effect in an arrayed magneto-plasmonic core-shell structure composed of Bi:YIG cores as a magneto-optical active medium and Au sells as plasmonic ones. The optical and magneto-optical behavior of the magneto-plasmonic core-shell grating structure sustaining Fano resonance is investigated by means of Lumerical software based on the finite-difference time-domain solver. In the proposed structure, Fano resonance arises from the interplay between the guided mode and the surface plasmon resonance which results in enhanced magneto-optical Faraday effect. In addition, the Fano resonance and correspond enhanced magneto-optical effect can be tuned by changing the array period of the structure. The obtained results can be of interest in miniaturized and advanced magneto-optical devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Since the discovery of the giant magnetocaloric effect in the compound Gd5Si2Ge2, rare earth based intermetallics of the form R5(Si,Ge)4 have been largely investigated in their structural and magnetic properties. From the parent compounds Gd5Si4 and Nd5Si4, the present paper reports the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of the series Gd5-xNdxSi4. Our results indicate that the magnetic moments of the Gd and Nd sublattices are antiparallel, where the moment of each sublattice has almost the same magnitude near x=4. The antiparallel alignment of the sublattices is detrimental to the magnetocaloric properties of the samples. The end members of the series present larger entropy changes, while for the compound x=4 such quantity is much lower when compared to all other samples.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Spin-orbit torque in magnetic domain walls was studied by solving the Pauli-Schrödinger equation for the itinerant electrons. The Rashba interaction considered is derived from the violation of inversion symmetry at interfaces between ferromagnets and heavy metals. In equilibrium, the Rashba spin-orbit interaction gives rise to a torque corresponding to the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction. When there is a current flowing, the spin-orbit torque experienced by the itinerant electrons in short domain walls has both field-like and damping-like components. However, when the domain wall width is increased, the damping-like component, which is the counterpart of the non-adiabatic spin transfer torque, decreases rapidly at the domain wall center. In contrast to the non-adiabatic spin transfer torque, the damping-like spin-orbit torque does not approach to zero far away from the domain wall center, even in the adiabatic limit. The scattering of spin-up and spin-down wave functions, which is caused by the Rashba spin-orbit interaction and the spatial variation of magnetization profile in the domain walls, gives rise to the finite damping-like spin-orbit torque.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline Nickel sulfide, Ni3S2, was prepared mechanochemically using ball milling in an inert atmosphere at room temperature, starting from Ni60S40 powder mixtures. X-ray powder diffraction (XRPD) was used to investigate the structural and microstructural evolution of the Ni60S40 alloy with milling time. The formation of the trigonal Ni3S2 phase (space group R32H) occurs with only 1.5 h, remaining stable up to 24 h of milling. The cell volume, lattice parameters, atomic coordinates, and isotropic atomic dislocation (thermal) parameters of the Ni3S2 phase, together with the average crystallite size and micro-strain, were determined from Rietveld analysis of the XRPD data. The average crystallite size decreases from about 37 nm to 22 nm with milling time increasing, with the same behavior happening for micro-strain. The high-temperature experiments showed that the melting point of the nanocrystalline Ni3S2 is about 660 °C, which is much lower than bulk. Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) images and electron diffraction patterns confirmed the nanometric size of the crystalline domains but revealed that it belongs to larger agglomerated particles (~100 nm). The nanocrystalline samples have their magnetic properties characterized by vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), showing an evolution from ferromagnetism to a mixed magnetic state as milling time increases. The high-pressure experiments revealed no phase transitions up to 20 GPa and a bulk modulus of about 143 GPa for the Ni3S2 nanophase using the least-squares fit of first-order Murnaghan equation of states.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Multifunctional microwave absorber materials exhibit promising characteristics, since they combine the diverse properties of their components. More precisely, by precipitating polypyrrole (PPy) on a mixture soundly chosen of copper and two different hexaferrites, the dielectric, plasmonic and ferrimagnetic properties can be combined in a beneficial way to tune the absorption characteristics. Beyond the multifunctionality of this absorber, several properties may emerge from intrinsic factors, such as: morphology and/or interfacial polarization linked to the core-shell structure. The absorber has been structurally characterized by XRD, FTIR and UV–vis spectroscopy. The magnetic properties and the microwave reflection loss (RL) have been investigated using a VSM and VNA, respectively. The results indicate that the presence of copper metal boosts the reflection loss of the absorber, widen the bandwidth and shifts the matching frequency towards higher values. The core-shell structure formed by coating PPy on the copper and hexaferrites mixture enhances the RL and lower both absorber thickness and loading percentage required to achieve comparable absorption performance to that of an absorber prepared by simple mixture of the components. The current optimized absorber exhibits a minimum RL of −22 dB at a matching frequency around 10.8 GHz and a thickness of 2 mm. The bandwidth under −10 dB covers all the X band starting from 9.6 GHz and continues into the Ku band.© 2019A ferromagnetic/antiferromagnetic (FM/AFM) bilayers structure was proposed to act as a new structure to meet the demands of anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) linear sensor. Through a single domain model, we found that the direction of initial magnetic moment of FM layer could be modulated by the co-effect of the exchange bias (EB) field along vertical direction and the shape anisotropy field induced by limited regular size magnetic thin film. When the length and width of magnetic thin film are fixed, if a proper magnitude of EB field is adopted, the 45-degree self-biased AMR sensor can be achieved, and vice versa. Following the model, a series of Ta/NiFe/FeMn/Ta samples were grown by changing the EB field and shape anisotropy field, the self-biased sensor cell with high linearity and sensitivity was achieved.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Heusler alloy composed by NiMnIn was prepared by induction melting in Argon atmosphere. The thermal martensitic and magnetic transitions of the sample were identified by differential scanning calorimetry. The quasi-static magnetic properties were observed by field-colled, zero-field-colled, and isothermal magnetization curves in a wide range of temperature. Moreover, AC susceptibility measurements were employed to analyze the low-frequency magnetization dynamics. The martensitic state of the sample leads to magnetic disturbances of quasi-diamagnetism and exchange bias behavior. The exchange bias field presented a transition from negative values to positive values with the temperature increasing. Therefore, the results open a way for technological applications of the NiMnIn Heusler alloy, with potential perspectives for the development of spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Domain wall (DW) motion via current induced spin-orbit torque (SOT) and/or a magnetic field in ferromagnet/heavy metal heterostructure has attracted abundant interests due to its potential applications in magnetic memories and logic devices. In this work, we study the influence of the depinning energy barrier on DW motion in the creep regime using the polar magneto-optical Kerr microscopy in the Cr layer decorated Pt/Co/Ta structure. We find that although the SOT efficiency shows a significant enhancement in the Pt/Co/Cr/Ta system, but the current-induced DW motion efficiency still shows an attenuation. We confirm that this unexpected result is caused by the enhanced pinning energy barrier, extracted from the relationship between the cumulative depinning probability (Pd) and the depinning time (t). Moreover, the relationship between Pd and t exhibits preferred exponential distribution, indicating that a single energy barrier governs the depinning behavior in our systems. We also reveal that the energy barrier depends on the interface between the ferromagnet and heavy metal. Our study suggests that the current-induced DW motion efficiency is not only determined by the SOT efficiency, but also the depinning energy barrier.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Y3Fe5O12 shortly named YIG thin film and various form of Au and YIG thin film stacks have been grown on quartz substrate using both spin-coating and sputtering methods. The films are crystallized in cubic phase after heat treatments process that is optimized to avoid cracks on the surface. The thickness of the YIG layer measured by cross-section electron microscope imaging technique are found as about 80 nm for all samples. While the root-mean-square surface roughness of the YIG film is in sub-nanometer scale, it increases up to 2.86 nm by adding Au layer in the film structure. All films exhibit in-plane easy axis and low coercive field at room temperature. But, the saturation magnetization values of films decrease with Au layer. Whereas the optical transmission value is around 80% for YIG samples above 400 nm, it decreases dramatically with Au in the film stacks. The highest absorption coefficient value is found as ~20 × 104 cm−1 in Q/Au/YIG structure. This strong absorption might come from the localized surface plasmon polaritons of Au noble metals in YIG structure because it enhances the electronic transition from crystal field splitting. As a result of these measurements, it is seen that the Au layer reduces the magnetization of the films, while increases the absorption rate significantly. Due to considerably low production cost of YIG in this work, it might open to commonly use of them in the magneto-optical devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the skyrmion Hall effect using the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert (LLG) equation and the Thiele equation, respectively. Then, we find that these methods give different values for the ratio of in-plane skyrmion velocity components when the Gilbert damping constant is relatively small. Since the Thiele equation is derived from the LLG equation by assuming that the skyrmion structure does not change and behaves like a rigid body, the above result suggests that this assumption does not hold when the Gilbert damping constant is relatively small. Therefore, we conclude that the Thiele equation can not describe the systems precisely under the relatively small Gilbert damping constant due to the distortion of the skyrmion structure and that it is mandatory to solve the LLG equation numerically in order to investigate the skyrmion Hall effect accurately. This result is very important since the Gilbert damping constants of metal materials are generally very small.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A highly-sensitive magnetic field sensor based on magnetic fluid (MF) infiltrated ring whispering gallery mode (WGM) resonator was proposed and demonstrated in experiment. The resonator was fabricated by attaching a corrosive hollow-core fiber (HCF) to a tapering fiber, which could generate a WGM resonance spectrum. It was firstly demonstrated in theory and experiment that resonance wavelength of the WGM resonator is sensitive to refractive index of medium that infiltrated in the HCF, and the refractive index sensitivity is related to the wall thickness of the HCF. Then, coupling and packaging of the HCF and the tapering fiber were realized by using a simple method, making the sensor robust and portable. When MF was infiltrated in the HCF, since the refractive index of the MF changed with external magnetic field, the WGM resonance valley shifted in wavelength as a function of the magnetic field, which could be used for magnetic field sensing. Experimental results demonstrated that a high sensitivity of 32.4 pm/Gs could be obtained for magnetic field measurement with good linearity. Besides, the proposed sensor behaved simple and robust structure, simple preparation process, low cost, and compact size.© 2018 The Author(s)The authors regret a mistake in simulations of the excitation coils. As a result, the used field strengths are much smaller than mentioned in the paper. In the paper we described that the AC field is 0.5 mT and the DC field is 50 mT at the location of the sample. However, this should be 0.2 mT AC and 3.3 mT DC. This won't affect any of the results or conclusions described in the paper. We think it is even more promising that the method works this well at these low field strengths. The authors would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.